
Project Gutenberg Etext of Twelve Stories and a Dream
by H. G. Wells, #17 in our series by H. G. Wells


Copyright laws are changing all over the world, be sure to check
the copyright laws for your country before posting these files!!

Please take a look at the important information in this header.
We encourage you to keep this file on your own disk, keeping an
electronic path open for the next readers.  Do not remove this.


**Welcome To The World of Free Plain Vanilla Electronic Texts**

**Etexts Readable By Both Humans and By Computers, Since 1971**

*These Etexts Prepared By Hundreds of Volunteers and Donations*

Information on contacting Project Gutenberg to get Etexts, and
further information is included below.  We need your donations.


Twelve Stories and a Dream

by H. G. Wells

May, 1999  [Etext #1743]


Project Gutenberg Etext of Twelve Stories and a Dream
by H. G. Wells, #17 in our series by H. G. Wells
******This file should be named 12sad10.txt or 12sad10.zip******

Corrected EDITIONS of our etexts get a new NUMBER, 12sad11.txt
VERSIONS based on separate sources get new LETTER, 12sad10a.txt


Etext scanned by Aaron Cannon, formatted and proofed by
Stephanie Johnson


Project Gutenberg Etexts are usually created from multiple editions,
all of which are in the Public Domain in the United States, unless a
copyright notice is included.  Therefore, we do usually do NOT! keep
these books in compliance with any particular paper edition.


We are now trying to release all our books one month in advance
of the official release dates, leaving time for better editing.

Please note:  neither this list nor its contents are final till
midnight of the last day of the month of any such announcement.
The official release date of all Project Gutenberg Etexts is at
Midnight, Central Time, of the last day of the stated month.  A
preliminary version may often be posted for suggestion, comment
and editing by those who wish to do so.  To be sure you have an
up to date first edition [xxxxx10x.xxx] please check file sizes
in the first week of the next month.  Since our ftp program has
a bug in it that scrambles the date [tried to fix and failed] a
look at the file size will have to do, but we will try to see a
new copy has at least one byte more or less.


Information about Project Gutenberg (one page)

We produce about two million dollars for each hour we work.  The
time it takes us, a rather conservative estimate, is fifty hours
to get any etext selected, entered, proofread, edited, copyright
searched and analyzed, the copyright letters written, etc.  This
projected audience is one hundred million readers.  If our value
per text is nominally estimated at one dollar then we produce $2
million dollars per hour this year as we release thirty-six text
files per month, or 432 more Etexts in 1999 for a total of 2000+
If these reach just 10% of the computerized population, then the
total should reach over 200 billion Etexts given away this year.

The Goal of Project Gutenberg is to Give Away One Trillion Etext
Files by December 31, 2001.  [10,000 x 100,000,000 = 1 Trillion]
This is ten thousand titles each to one hundred million readers,
which is only ~5% of the present number of computer users.

At our revised rates of production, we will reach only one-third
of that goal by the end of 2001, or about 3,333 Etexts unless we
manage to get some real funding; currently our funding is mostly
from Michael Hart's salary at Carnegie-Mellon University, and an
assortment of sporadic gifts; this salary is only good for a few
more years, so we are looking for something to replace it, as we
don't want Project Gutenberg to be so dependent on one person.

We need your donations more than ever!


All donations should be made to "Project Gutenberg/CMU": and are
tax deductible to the extent allowable by law.  (CMU = Carnegie-
Mellon University).

For these and other matters, please mail to:

Project Gutenberg
P. O. Box  2782
Champaign, IL 61825

When all other email fails. . .try our Executive Director:
Michael S. Hart <hart@pobox.com>
hart@pobox.com forwards to hart@prairienet.org and archive.org
if your mail bounces from archive.org, I will still see it, if
it bounces from prairienet.org, better resend later on. . . .

We would prefer to send you this information by email.

******

To access Project Gutenberg etexts, use any Web browser
to view http://promo.net/pg.  This site lists Etexts by
author and by title, and includes information about how
to get involved with Project Gutenberg.  You could also
download our past Newsletters, or subscribe here.  This
is one of our major sites, please email hart@pobox.com,
for a more complete list of our various sites.

To go directly to the etext collections, use FTP or any
Web browser to visit a Project Gutenberg mirror (mirror
sites are available on 7 continents; mirrors are listed
at http://promo.net/pg).

Mac users, do NOT point and click, typing works better.

Example FTP session:

ftp sunsite.unc.edu
login: anonymous
password: your@login
cd pub/docs/books/gutenberg
cd etext90 through etext99
dir [to see files]
get or mget [to get files. . .set bin for zip files]
GET GUTINDEX.??  [to get a year's listing of books, e.g., GUTINDEX.99]
GET GUTINDEX.ALL [to get a listing of ALL books]

***

**Information prepared by the Project Gutenberg legal advisor**

(Three Pages)


***START**THE SMALL PRINT!**FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN ETEXTS**START***
Why is this "Small Print!" statement here?  You know: lawyers.
They tell us you might sue us if there is something wrong with
your copy of this etext, even if you got it for free from
someone other than us, and even if what's wrong is not our
fault.  So, among other things, this "Small Print!" statement
disclaims most of our liability to you.  It also tells you how
you can distribute copies of this etext if you want to.

*BEFORE!* YOU USE OR READ THIS ETEXT
By using or reading any part of this PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
etext, you indicate that you understand, agree to and accept
this "Small Print!" statement.  If you do not, you can receive
a refund of the money (if any) you paid for this etext by
sending a request within 30 days of receiving it to the person
you got it from.  If you received this etext on a physical
medium (such as a disk), you must return it with your request.

ABOUT PROJECT GUTENBERG-TM ETEXTS
This PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm etext, like most PROJECT GUTENBERG-
tm etexts, is a "public domain" work distributed by Professor
Michael S. Hart through the Project Gutenberg Association at
Carnegie-Mellon University (the "Project").  Among other
things, this means that no one owns a United States copyright
on or for this work, so the Project (and you!) can copy and
distribute it in the United States without permission and
without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules, set forth
below, apply if you wish to copy and distribute this etext
under the Project's "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark.

To create these etexts, the Project expends considerable
efforts to identify, transcribe and proofread public domain
works.  Despite these efforts, the Project's etexts and any
medium they may be on may contain "Defects".  Among other
things, Defects may take the form of incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged
disk or other etext medium, a computer virus, or computer
codes that damage or cannot be read by your equipment.

LIMITED WARRANTY; DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES
But for the "Right of Replacement or Refund" described below,
[1] the Project (and any other party you may receive this
etext from as a PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm etext) disclaims all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including
legal fees, and [2] YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE OR
UNDER STRICT LIABILITY, OR FOR BREACH OF WARRANTY OR CONTRACT,
INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE
OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE
POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.

If you discover a Defect in this etext within 90 days of
receiving it, you can receive a refund of the money (if any)
you paid for it by sending an explanatory note within that
time to the person you received it from.  If you received it
on a physical medium, you must return it with your note, and
such person may choose to alternatively give you a replacement
copy.  If you received it electronically, such person may
choose to alternatively give you a second opportunity to
receive it electronically.

THIS ETEXT IS OTHERWISE PROVIDED TO YOU "AS-IS".  NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ARE MADE TO YOU AS
TO THE ETEXT OR ANY MEDIUM IT MAY BE ON, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A
PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Some states do not allow disclaimers of implied warranties or
the exclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so the
above disclaimers and exclusions may not apply to you, and you
may have other legal rights.

INDEMNITY
You will indemnify and hold the Project, its directors,
officers, members and agents harmless from all liability, cost
and expense, including legal fees, that arise directly or
indirectly from any of the following that you do or cause:
[1] distribution of this etext, [2] alteration, modification,
or addition to the etext, or [3] any Defect.

DISTRIBUTION UNDER "PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm"
You may distribute copies of this etext electronically, or by
disk, book or any other medium if you either delete this
"Small Print!" and all other references to Project Gutenberg,
or:

[1]  Only give exact copies of it.  Among other things, this
     requires that you do not remove, alter or modify the
     etext or this "small print!" statement.  You may however,
     if you wish, distribute this etext in machine readable
     binary, compressed, mark-up, or proprietary form,
     including any form resulting from conversion by word pro-
     cessing or hypertext software, but only so long as
     *EITHER*:

     [*]  The etext, when displayed, is clearly readable, and
          does *not* contain characters other than those
          intended by the author of the work, although tilde
          (~), asterisk (*) and underline (_) characters may
          be used to convey punctuation intended by the
          author, and additional characters may be used to
          indicate hypertext links; OR

     [*]  The etext may be readily converted by the reader at
          no expense into plain ASCII, EBCDIC or equivalent
          form by the program that displays the etext (as is
          the case, for instance, with most word processors);
          OR

     [*]  You provide, or agree to also provide on request at
          no additional cost, fee or expense, a copy of the
          etext in its original plain ASCII form (or in EBCDIC
          or other equivalent proprietary form).

[2]  Honor the etext refund and replacement provisions of this
     "Small Print!" statement.

[3]  Pay a trademark license fee to the Project of 20% of the
     net profits you derive calculated using the method you
     already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  If you
     don't derive profits, no royalty is due.  Royalties are
     payable to "Project Gutenberg Association/Carnegie-Mellon
     University" within the 60 days following each
     date you prepare (or were legally required to prepare)
     your annual (or equivalent periodic) tax return.

WHAT IF YOU *WANT* TO SEND MONEY EVEN IF YOU DON'T HAVE TO?
The Project gratefully accepts contributions in money, time,
scanning machines, OCR software, public domain etexts, royalty
free copyright licenses, and every other sort of contribution
you can think of.  Money should be paid to "Project Gutenberg
Association / Carnegie-Mellon University".

*END*THE SMALL PRINT! FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN ETEXTS*Ver.04.29.93*END*





Etext scanned by Aaron Cannon, formatted and proofed by
Stephanie Johnson






TWELVE STORIES AND A DREAM

BY H. G. WELLS


CONTENTS

1.  Filmer

2.  The Magic Shop

3.  The Valley of Spiders

4.  The Truth About Pyecraft

5.  Mr. Skelmersdale in Fairyland

6.  The Story of the Inexperienced Ghost

7.  Jimmy Goggles the God

8.  The New Accelerator

9.  Mr. Ledbetter's Vacation

10.  The Stolen Body

11.  Mr. Brisher's Treasure

12.  Miss Winchelsea's Heart

13.  A Dream of Armageddon




1.  FILMER

In truth the mastery of flying was the work of thousands of men--
this man a suggestion and that an experiment, until at last only 
one vigorous intellectual effort was needed to finish the work.
But the inexorable injustice of the popular mind has decided
that of all these thousands, one man, and that a man who never flew,
should be chosen as the discoverer, just as it has chosen to 
honour Watt as the discoverer of steam and Stephenson of the
steam-engine. And surely of all honoured names none is so 
grotesquely and tragically honoured as poor Filmer's, the timid,
intellectual creature who solved the problem over which the world
had hung perplexed and a little fearful for so many generations,
the man who pressed the button that has changed peace and warfare
and well-nigh every condition of human life and happiness. Never
has that recurring wonder of the littleness of the scientific man
in the face of the greatness of his science found such an amazing
exemplification. Much concerning Filmer is, and must remain,
profoundly obscure--Filmers attract no Boswells--but the essential
facts and the concluding scene are clear enough, and there are
letters, and notes, and casual allusions to piece the whole together.
And this is the story one makes, putting this thing with that,
of Filmer's life and death.

The first authentic trace of Filmer on the page of history is
a document in which he applies for admission as a paid student
in physics to the Government laboratories at South Kensington,
and therein he describes himself as the son of a "military bootmaker"
("cobbler" in the vulgar tongue) of Dover, and lists his various
examination proofs of a high proficiency in chemistry and
mathematics. With a certain want of dignity he seeks to enhance
these attainments by a profession of poverty and disadvantages,
and he writes of the laboratory as the "gaol" of his ambitions,
a slip which reinforces his claim to have devoted himself exclusively
to the exact sciences. The document is endorsed in a manner that
shows Filmer was admitted to this coveted opportunity; but until
quite recently no traces of his success in the Government institution
could be found.

It has now, however, been shown that in spite of his professed zeal
for research, Filmer, before he had held this scholarship a year,
was tempted, by the possibility of a small increase in his immediate
income, to abandon it in order to become one of the nine-pence-an-hour
computers employed by a well-known Professor in his vicarious
conduct of those extensive researches of his in solar physics--researches
which are still a matter of perplexity to astronomers. Afterwards,
for the space of seven years, save for the pass lists of the
London University, in which he is seen to climb slowly to a double
first class B.Sc., in mathematics and chemistry, there is no evidence
of how Filmer passed his life. No one knows how or where he lived,
though it seems highly probable that he continued to support
himself by teaching while he prosecuted the studies necessary for
this distinction. And then, oddly enough, one finds him mentioned
in the correspondence of Arthur Hicks, the poet.

"You remember Filmer," Hicks writes to his friend Vance; "well,
HE hasn't altered a bit, the same hostile mumble and the nasty
chin--how CAN a man contrive to be always three days from shaving?
-- and a sort of furtive air of being engaged in sneaking in front
of one; even his coat and that frayed collar of his show no further
signs of the passing years. He was writing in the library and
I sat down beside him in the name of God's charity, whereupon
he deliberately insulted me by covering up his memoranda. It seems
he has some brilliant research on hand that he suspects me of all
people--with a Bodley Booklet a-printing!--of stealing. He has taken
remarkable honours at the University--he went through them with
a sort of hasty slobber, as though he feared I might interrupt him
before he had told me all--and he spoke of taking his D.Sc. as one
might speak of taking a cab. And he asked what I was doing--with
a sort of comparative accent, and his arm was spread nervously,
positively a protecting arm, over the paper that hid the precious
idea--his one hopeful idea.

"'Poetry,' he said, 'Poetry. And what do you profess to teach
in it, Hicks?'

"The thing's a Provincial professorling in the very act of budding,
and I thank the Lord devoutly that but for the precious gift
of indolence I also might have gone this way to D.Sc. and
destruction . . ."

A curious little vignette that I am inclined to think caught Filmer
in or near the very birth of his discovery. Hicks was wrong in
anticipating a provincial professorship for Filmer. Our next glimpse
of him is lecturing on "rubber and rubber substitutes," to the
Society of Arts--he had become manager to a great plastic-substance
manufactory--and at that time, it is now known, he was a member
of the Aeronautical Society, albeit he contributed nothing to the
discussions of that body, preferring no doubt to mature his great
conception without external assistance. And within two years
of that paper before the Society of Arts he was hastily taking out
a number of patents and proclaiming in various undignified ways
the completion of the divergent inquiries which made his flying
machine possible. The first definite statement to that effect
appeared in a halfpenny evening paper through the agency of a man
who lodged in the same house with Filmer. His final haste after
his long laborious secret patience seems to have been due to
a needless panic, Bootle, the notorious American scientific quack,
having made an announcement that Filmer interpreted wrongly as
an anticipation of his idea.

Now what precisely was Filmer's idea? Really a very simple one.
Before his time the pursuit of aeronautics had taken two divergent
lines, and had developed on the one hand balloons--large apparatus
lighter than air, easy in ascent, and comparatively safe in descent,
but floating helplessly before any breeze that took them; and on
the other, flying machines that flew only in theory--vast flat
structures heavier than air, propelled and kept up by heavy engines
and for the most part smashing at the first descent. But, neglecting
the fact that the inevitable final collapse rendered them impossible,
the weight of the flying machines gave them this theoretical
advantage, that they could go through the air against a wind,
a necessary condition if aerial navigation was to have any practical
value. It is Filmer's particular merit that he perceived the way
in which the contrasted and hitherto incompatible merits of balloon
and heavy flying machine might be combined in one apparatus,
which should be at choice either heavier or lighter than air.
He took hints from the contractile bladders of fish and the pneumatic
cavities of birds. He devised an arrangement of contractile
and absolutely closed balloons which when expanded could lift
the actual flying apparatus with ease, and when retracted by the
complicated "musculature" he wove about them, were withdrawn
almost completely into the frame; and he built the large framework
which these balloons sustained, of hollow, rigid tubes, the air
in which, by an ingenious contrivance, was automatically pumped
out as the apparatus fell, and which then remained exhausted
so long as the aeronaut desired. There were no wings or propellers
to his machine, such as there had been to all previous aeroplanes,
and the only engine required was the compact and powerful little
appliance needed to contract the balloons. He perceived that such
an apparatus as he had devised might rise with frame exhausted
and balloons expanded to a considerable height, might then contract
its balloons and let the air into its frame, and by an adjustment
of its weights slide down the air in any desired direction. As it fell
it would accumulate velocity and at the same time lose weight,
and the momentum accumulated by its down-rush could be utilised
by means of a shifting of its weights to drive it up in the air again
as the balloons expanded. This conception, which is still the
structural conception of all successful flying machines, needed,
however, a vast amount of toil upon its details before it could
actually be realised, and such toil Filmer--as he was accustomed
to tell the numerous interviewers who crowded upon him in
the heyday of his fame--"ungrudgingly and unsparingly gave."
His particular difficulty was the elastic lining of the contractile
balloon. He found he needed a new substance, and in the discovery
and manufacture of that new substance he had, as he never failed
to impress upon the interviewers, "performed a far more arduous
work than even in the actual achievement of my seemingly greater
discovery."

But it must not be imagined that these interviews followed hard
upon Filmer's proclamation of his invention. An interval of nearly
five years elapsed during which he timidly remained at his rubber
factory--he seems to have been entirely dependent on his small
income from this source--making misdirected attempts to assure
a quite indifferent public that he really HAD invented what he had
invented. He occupied the greater part of his leisure in the
composition of letters to the scientific and daily press, and
so forth, stating precisely the net result of his contrivances,
and demanding financial aid. That alone would have sufficed for
the suppression of his letters. He spent such holidays as he could
arrange in unsatisfactory interviews with the door-keepers of
leading London papers--he was singularly not adapted for inspiring
hall-porters with confidence--and he positively attempted to induce
the War Office to take up his work with him. There remains a
confidential letter from Major-General Volleyfire to the Earl of Frogs.
"The man's a crank and a bounder to boot," says the Major-General
in his bluff, sensible, army way, and so left it open for the Japanese
to secure, as they subsequently did, the priority in this side
of warfare--a priority they still to our great discomfort retain.

And then by a stroke of luck the membrane Filmer had invented for his
contractile balloon was discovered to be useful for the valves
of a new oil-engine, and he obtained the means for making a trial
model of his invention. He threw up his rubber factory appointment,
desisted from all further writing, and, with a certain secrecy
that seems to have been an inseparable characteristic of all his
proceedings, set to work upon the apparatus. He seems to have
directed the making of its parts and collected most of it in a room
in Shoreditch, but its final putting together was done at Dymchurch,
in Kent. He did not make the affair large enough to carry a man,
but he made an extremely ingenious use of what were then called
the Marconi rays to control its flight. The first flight of this
first practicable flying machine took place over some fields
near Burford Bridge, near Hythe, in Kent, and Filmer followed
and controlled its flight upon a specially constructed motor tricycle.

The flight was, considering all things, an amazing success.
The apparatus was brought in a cart from Dymchurch to Burford Bridge,
ascended there to a height of nearly three hundred feet, swooped
thence very nearly back to Dymchurch, came about in its sweep,
rose again, circled, and finally sank uninjured in a field behind
the Burford Bridge Inn. At its descent a curious thing happened.
Filmer got off his tricycle, scrambled over the intervening dyke,
advanced perhaps twenty yards towards his triumph, threw out
his arms in a strange gesticulation, and fell down in a dead faint.
Every one could then recall the ghastliness of his features and
all the evidences of extreme excitement they had observed throughout
the trial, things they might otherwise have forgotten. Afterwards
in the inn he had an unaccountable gust of hysterical weeping.

Altogether there were not twenty witnesses of this affair, and 
those for the most part uneducated men. The New Romney doctor
saw the ascent but not the descent, his horse being frightened
by the electrical apparatus on Filmer's tricycle and giving him
a nasty spill. Two members of the Kent constabulary watched
the affair from a cart in an unofficial spirit, and a grocer calling
round the Marsh for orders and two lady cyclists seem almost
to complete the list of educated people. There were two reporters
present, one representing a Folkestone paper and the other being
a fourth-class interviewer and "symposium" journalist, whose
expenses down, Filmer, anxious as ever for adequate advertisement
--and now quite realising the way in which adequate advertisement
may be obtained--had paid. The latter was one of those writers
who can throw a convincing air of unreality over the most credible
events, and his half-facetious account of the affair appeared
in the magazine page of a popular journal. But, happily for Filmer,
this person's colloquial methods were more convincing. He went
to offer some further screed upon the subject to Banghurst,
the proprietor of the New Paper, and one of the ablest and most
unscrupulous men in London journalism, and Banghurst instantly
seized upon the situation. The interviewer vanishes from the narrative,
no doubt very doubtfully remunerated, and Banghurst, Banghurst himself,
double chin, grey twill suit, abdomen, voice, gestures and all,
appears at Dymchurch, following his large, unrivalled journalistic nose.
He had seen the whole thing at a glance, just what it was and
what it might be.

At his touch, as it were, Filmer's long-pent investigations exploded
into fame. He instantly and most magnificently was a Boom. One turns
over the files of the journals of the year 1907 with a quite incredulous
recognition of how swift and flaming the boom of those days could be.
The July papers know nothing of flying, see nothing in flying,
state by a most effective silence that men never would, could or
should fly. In August flying and Filmer and flying and parachutes
and aerial tactics and the Japanese Government and Filmer and again
flying, shouldered the war in Yunnan and the gold mines of
Upper Greenland off the leading page. And Banghurst had given
ten thousand pounds, and, further, Banghurst was giving five thousand
pounds, and Banghurst had devoted his well-known, magnificent
(but hitherto sterile) private laboratories and several acres of land
near his private residence on the Surrey hills to the strenuous
and violent completion--Banghurst fashion--of the life-size
practicable flying machine. Meanwhile, in the sight of privileged
multitudes in the walled-garden of the Banghurst town residence
in Fulham, Filmer was exhibited at weekly garden parties putting
the working model through its paces. At enormous initial cost,
but with a final profit, the New Paper presented its readers
with a beautiful photographic souvenir of the first of these occasions.

Here again the correspondence of Arthur Hicks and his friend Vance
comes to our aid.

"I saw Filmer in his glory," he writes, with just the touch of envy
natural to his position as a poet passe. "The man is brushed
and shaved, dressed in the fashion of a Royal-Institution-Afternoon
Lecturer, the very newest shape in frock-coats and long patent shoes,
and altogether in a state of extraordinary streakiness between
an owlish great man and a scared abashed self-conscious bounder
cruelly exposed. He hasn't a touch of colour in the skin of his face,
his head juts forward, and those queer little dark amber eyes of his
watch furtively round him for his fame. His clothes fit perfectly
and yet sit upon him as though he had bought them ready-made.
He speaks in a mumble still, but he says, you perceive indistinctly,
enormous self-assertive things, he backs into the rear of groups
by instinct if Banghurst drops the line for a minute, and when
he walks across Banghurst's lawn one perceives him a little out
of breath and going jerky, and that his weak white hands are clenched.
His is a state of tension--horrible tension. And he is the Greatest
Discoverer of This or Any Age--the Greatest Discoverer of This
or Any Age! What strikes one so forcibly about him is that he didn't
somehow quite expect it ever, at any rate, not at all like this.
Banghurst is about everywhere, the energetic M.C. of his great
little catch, and I swear he will have every one down on his lawn
there before he has finished with the engine; he had bagged
the prime minister yesterday, and he, bless his heart! didn't look
particularly outsize, on the very first occasion. Conceive it! Filmer!
Our obscure unwashed Filmer, the Glory of British science!
Duchesses crowd upon him, beautiful, bold peeresses say in their
beautiful, clear loud voices--have you noticed how penetrating
the great lady is becoming nowadays?--'Oh, Mr. Filmer, how DID
you do it?'

"Common men on the edge of things are too remote for the answer.
One imagines something in the way of that interview, 'toil ungrudgingly
and unsparingly given, Madam, and, perhaps--I don't know--but perhaps
a little special aptitude.'"

So far Hicks, and the photographic supplement to the New Paper is in
sufficient harmony with the description. In one picture the machine
swings down towards the river, and the tower of Fulham church
appears below it through a gap in the elms, and in another, Filmer
sits at his guiding batteries, and the great and beautiful of the earth
stand around him, with Banghurst massed modestly but resolutely
in the rear. The grouping is oddly apposite. Occluding much of
Banghurst, and looking with a pensive, speculative expression
at Filmer, stands the Lady Mary Elkinghorn, still beautiful,
in spite of the breath of scandal and her eight-and-thirty years,
the only person whose face does not admit a perception of the camera
that was in the act of snapping them all.

So much for the exterior facts of the story, but, after all,
they are very exterior facts. About the real interest of the business
one is necessarily very much in the dark. How was Filmer feeling
at the time? How much was a certain unpleasant anticipation present
inside that very new and fashionable frock-coat? He was in the
halfpenny, penny, six-penny, and more expensive papers alike,
and acknowledged by the whole world as "the Greatest Discoverer
of This or Any Age." He had invented a practicable flying machine,
and every day down among the Surrey hills the life-sized model
was getting ready. And when it was ready, it followed as a clear
inevitable consequence of his having invented and made it--everybody
in the world, indeed, seemed to take it for granted; there wasn't
a gap anywhere in that serried front of anticipation--that he would
proudly and cheerfully get aboard it, ascend with it, and fly.

But we know now pretty clearly that simple pride and cheerfulness
in such an act were singularly out of harmony with Filmer's private
constitution. It occurred to no one at the time, but there the fact is.
We can guess with some confidence now that it must have been
drifting about in his mind a great deal during the day, and, from
a little note to his physician complaining of persistent insomnia,
we have the soundest reason for supposing it dominated his nights,
--the idea that it would be after all, in spite of his theoretical
security, an abominably sickening, uncomfortable, and dangerous
thing for him to flap about in nothingness a thousand feet or so
in the air. It must have dawned upon him quite early in the period
of being the Greatest Discoverer of This or Any Age, the vision
of doing this and that with an extensive void below. Perhaps
somewhen in his youth he had looked down a great height or fallen
down in some excessively uncomfortable way; perhaps some habit of
sleeping on the wrong side had resulted in that disagreeable falling
nightmare one knows, and given him his horror; of the strength
of that horror there remains now not a particle of doubt.

Apparently he had never weighed this duty of flying in his earlier
days of research; the machine had been his end, but now things
were opening out beyond his end, and particularly this giddy whirl
up above there. He was a Discoverer and he had Discovered.
But he was not a Flying Man, and it was only now that he was beginning
to perceive clearly that he was expected to fly. Yet, however much
the thing was present in his mind he gave no expression to it until
the very end, and meanwhile he went to and fro from Banghurst's
magnificent laboratories, and was interviewed and lionised, and
wore good clothes, and ate good food, and lived in an elegant flat,
enjoying a very abundant feast of such good, coarse, wholesome
Fame and Success as a man, starved for all his years as he had been
starved, might be reasonably expected to enjoy.

After a time, the weekly gatherings in Fulham ceased. The model
had failed one day just for a moment to respond to Filmer's guidance,
or he had been distracted by the compliments of an archbishop.
At any rate, it suddenly dug its nose into the air just a little
too steeply as the archbishop was sailing through a Latin quotation
for all the world like an archbishop in a book, and it came down
in the Fulham Road within three yards of a 'bus horse. It stood
for a second perhaps, astonishing and in its attitude astonished,
then it crumpled, shivered into pieces, and the 'bus horse was
incidentally killed.

Filmer lost the end of the archiepiscopal compliment. He stood up
and stared as his invention swooped out of sight and reach of him.
His long, white hands still gripped his useless apparatus.
The archbishop followed his skyward stare with an apprehension
unbecoming in an archbishop.

Then came the crash and the shouts and uproar from the road
to relieve Filmer's tension. "My God!" he whispered, and sat down.

Every one else almost was staring to see where the machine had
vanished, or rushing into the house.

The making of the big machine progressed all the more rapidly
for this. Over its making presided Filmer, always a little slow
and very careful in his manner, always with a growing preoccupation
in his mind. His care over the strength and soundness of the apparatus
was prodigious. The slightest doubt, and he delayed everything
until the doubtful part could be replaced. Wilkinson, his senior
assistant, fumed at some of these delays, which, he insisted, were
for the most part unnecessary. Banghurst magnified the patient
certitude of Filmer in the New Paper, and reviled it bitterly
to his wife, and MacAndrew, the second assistant, approved Filmer's
wisdom. "We're not wanting a fiasco, man," said MacAndrew. "He's
perfectly well advised."

And whenever an opportunity arose Filmer would expound to Wilkinson
and MacAndrew just exactly how every part of the flying machine
was to be controlled and worked, so that in effect they would be
just as capable, and even more capable, when at last the time came,
of guiding it through the skies.

Now I should imagine that if Filmer had seen fit at this stage
to define just what he was feeling, and to take a definite line
in the matter of his ascent, he might have escaped that painful
ordeal quite easily. If he had had it clearly in his mind he could
have done endless things. He would surely have found no difficulty
with a specialist to demonstrate a weak heart, or something gastric
or pulmonary, to stand in his way--that is the line I am astonished
he did not take,--or he might, had he been man enough, have
declared simply and finally that he did not intend to do the thing.
But the fact is, though the dread was hugely present in his mind,
the thing was by no means sharp and clear. I fancy that all through
this period he kept telling himself that when the occasion came
he would find himself equal to it. He was like a man just gripped
by a great illness, who says he feels a little out of sorts, and expects
to be better presently. Meanwhile he delayed the completion of
the machine, and let the assumption that he was going to fly it
take root and flourish exceedingly about him. He even accepted
anticipatory compliments on his courage. And, barring this secret
squeamishness, there can be no doubt he found all the praise and
distinction and fuss he got a delightful and even intoxicating draught.

The Lady Mary Elkinghorn made things a little more complicated
for him.

How THAT began was a subject of inexhaustible speculation to Hicks.
Probably in the beginning she was just a little "nice" to him
with that impartial partiality of hers, and it may be that to her eyes,
standing out conspicuously as he did ruling his monster in the upper air,
he had a distinction that Hicks was not disposed to find. And somehow
they must have had a moment of sufficient isolation, and the great
Discoverer a moment of sufficient courage for something just
a little personal to be mumbled or blurted. However it began,
there is no doubt that it did begin, and presently became quite
perceptible to a world accustomed to find in the proceedings
of the Lady Mary Elkinghorn a matter of entertainment. It complicated
things, because the state of love in such a virgin mind as Filmer's
would brace his resolution, if not sufficiently, at any rate
considerably towards facing a danger he feared, and hampered him
in such attempts at evasion as would otherwise be natural and congenial.

It remains a matter for speculation just how the Lady Mary felt
for Filmer and just what she thought of him. At thirty-eight one
may have gathered much wisdom and still be not altogether wise,
and the imagination still functions actively enough in creating
glamours and effecting the impossible. He came before her eyes
as a very central man, and that always counts, and he had powers,
unique powers as it seemed, at any rate in the air. The performance
with the model had just a touch of the quality of a potent incantation,
and women have ever displayed an unreasonable disposition to imagine
that when a man has powers he must necessarily have Power. Given
so much, and what was not good in Filmer's manner and appearance
became an added merit. He was modest, he hated display, but given
an occasion where TRUE qualities are needed, then--then one would see!

The late Mrs. Bampton thought it wise to convey to Lady Mary her opinion
that Filmer, all things considered, was rather a "grub." "He's certainly
not a sort of man I have ever met before," said the Lady Mary,
with a quite unruffled serenity. And Mrs. Bampton, after a swift,
imperceptible glance at that serenity, decided that so far as saying
anything to Lady Mary went, she had done as much as could be expected
of her. But she said a great deal to other people.

And at last, without any undue haste or unseemliness, the day
dawned, the great day, when Banghurst had promised his public--
the world in fact--that flying should be finally attained and overcome.
Filmer saw it dawn, watched even in the darkness before it dawned,
watched its stars fade and the grey and pearly pinks give place
at last to the clear blue sky of a sunny, cloudless day. He watched it
from the window of his bedroom in the new-built wing of Banghurst's
Tudor house. And as the stars were overwhelmed and the shapes and
substances of things grew into being out of the amorphous dark,
he must have seen more and more distinctly the festive preparations
beyond the beech clumps near the green pavilion in the outer park,
the three stands for the privileged spectators, the raw, new fencing
of the enclosure, the sheds and workshops, the Venetian masts
and fluttering flags that Banghurst had considered essential,
black and limp in the breezeless dawn, and amidst all these things
a great shape covered with tarpauling. A strange and terrible
portent for humanity was that shape, a beginning that must surely
spread and widen and change and dominate all the affairs of men,
but to Filmer it is very doubtful whether it appeared in anything
but a narrow and personal light. Several people heard him pacing
in the small hours--for the vast place was packed with guests
by a proprietor editor who, before all understood compression.
And about five o'clock, if not before, Filmer left his room and
wandered out of the sleeping house into the park, alive by that time
with sunlight and birds and squirrels and the fallow deer. MacAndrew,
who was also an early riser, met him near the machine, and they went
and had a look at it together.

It is doubtful if Filmer took any breakfast, in spite of the urgency
of Banghurst. So soon as the guests began to be about in some number
he seems to have retreated to his room. Thence about ten he went
into the shrubbery, very probably because he had seen the Lady Mary
Elkinghorn there. She was walking up and down, engaged in conversation
with her old school friend, Mrs. Brewis-Craven, and although Filmer
had never met the latter lady before, he joined them and walked
beside them for some time. There were several silences in spite
of the Lady Mary's brilliance. The situation was a difficult one,
and Mrs. Brewis-Craven did not master its difficulty. "He struck me,"
she said afterwards with a luminous self-contradiction, "as a very
unhappy person who had something to say, and wanted before all things
to be helped to say it. But how was one to help him when one didn't
know what it was?"

At half-past eleven the enclosures for the public in the outer park
were crammed, there was an intermittent stream of equipages along
the belt which circles the outer park, and the house party was dotted
over the lawn and shrubbery and the corner of the inner park,
in a series of brilliantly attired knots, all making for the
flying machine. Filmer walked in a group of three with Banghurst,
who was supremely and conspicuously happy, and Sir Theodore Hickle,
the president of the Aeronautical Society. Mrs. Banghurst was close
behind with the Lady Mary Elkinghorn, Georgina Hickle, and the Dean
of Stays. Banghurst was large and copious in speech, and such
interstices as he left were filled in by Hickle with complimentary
remarks to Filmer. And Filmer walked between them saying not a word
except by way of unavoidable reply. Behind, Mrs. Banghurst listened
to the admirably suitable and shapely conversation of the Dean
with that fluttered attention to the ampler clergy ten years
of social ascent and ascendency had not cured in her; and the Lady Mary
watched, no doubt with an entire confidence in the world's
disillusionment, the drooping shoulders of the sort of man she had
never met before.

There was some cheering as the central party came into view of
the enclosures, but it was not very unanimous nor invigorating cheering.
They were within fifty yards of the apparatus when Filmer took
a hasty glance over his shoulder to measure the distance of the ladies
behind them, and decided to make the first remark he had initiated
since the house had been left. His voice was just a little hoarse,
and he cut in on Banghurst in mid-sentence on Progress.

"I say, Banghurst," he said, and stopped.

"Yes," said Banghurst.

"I wish--" He moistened his lips. "I'm not feeling well."

Banghurst stopped dead. "Eh?" he shouted.

"A queer feeling." Filmer made to move on, but Banghurst was immovable.
"I don't know. I may be better in a minute. If not--perhaps . . . 
MacAndrew--"

"You're not feeling WELL?" said Banghurst, and stared at his white face.

"My dear!" he said, as Mrs. Banghurst came up with them, "Filmer
says he isn't feeling WELL."

"A little queer," exclaimed Filmer, avoiding the Lady Mary's eyes.
"It may pass off--"

There was a pause.

It came to Filmer that he was the most isolated person in the world.

"In any case," said Banghurst, "the ascent must be made. Perhaps
if you were to sit down somewhere for a moment--"

"It's the crowd, I think," said Filmer.

There was a second pause. Banghurst's eye rested in scrutiny
on Filmer, and then swept the sample of public in the enclosure.

"It's unfortunate," said Sir Theodore Hickle; but still--I suppose--
Your assistants--Of course, if you feel out of condition and disinclined--"

"I don't think Mr. Filmer would permit THAT for a moment," said Lady Mary.

"But if Mr. Filmer's nerve is run--It might even be dangerous for him
to attempt--" Hickle coughed.

"It's just because it's dangerous," began the Lady Mary, and felt
she had made her point of view and Filmer's plain enough.

Conflicting motives struggled for Filmer.

"I feel I ought to go up," he said, regarding the ground. He looked
up and met the Lady Mary's eyes. "I want to go up," he said, and
smiled whitely at her. He turned towards Banghurst. "If I could
just sit down somewhere for a moment out of the crowd and sun--"

Banghurst, at least, was beginning to understand the case. "Come
into my little room in the green pavilion," he said. "It's quite
cool there." He took Filmer by the arm.

Filmer turned his face to the Lady Mary Elkinghorn again. "I shall
be all right in five minutes," he said. "I'm tremendously sorry--"

The Lady Mary Elkinghorn smiled at him. "I couldn't think--" he
said to Hickle, and obeyed the compulsion of Banghurst's pull.

The rest remained watching the two recede.

"He is so fragile," said the Lady Mary.

"He's certainly a highly nervous type," said the Dean, whose weakness
it was to regard the whole world, except married clergymen with
enormous families, as "neurotic."

"Of course," said Hickle, "it isn't absolutely necessary for him
to go up because he has invented--"

"How COULD he avoid it?" asked the Lady Mary, with the faintest
shadow of scorn.

"It's certainly most unfortunate if he's going to be ill now," said
Mrs. Banghurst a little severely.

"He's not going to be ill," said the Lady Mary, and certainly
she had met Filmer's eye.

"YOU'LL be all right," said Banghurst, as they went towards the pavilion.
"All you want is a nip of brandy. It ought to be you, you know.
You'll be--you'd get it rough, you know, if you let another man--"

"Oh, I want to go," said Filmer. "I shall be all right. As a matter
of fact I'm almost inclined NOW--. No! I think I'll have that nip
of brandy first."

Banghurst took him into the little room and routed out an empty
decanter. He departed in search of a supply. He was gone perhaps
five minutes.

The history of those five minutes cannot be written. At intervals
Filmer's face could be seen by the people on the easternmost
of the stands erected for spectators, against the window pane
peering out, and then it would recede and fade. Banghurst vanished
shouting behind the grand stand, and presently the butler appeared
going pavilionward with a tray.

The apartment in which Filmer came to his last solution was a pleasant
little room very simply furnished with green furniture and an old
bureau--for Banghurst was simple in all his private ways. It was
hung with little engravings after Morland and it had a shelf of books.
But as it happened, Banghurst had left a rook rifle he sometimes
played with on the top of the desk, and on the corner of the mantelshelf
was a tin with three or four cartridges remaining in it. As Filmer
went up and down that room wrestling with his intolerable dilemma
he went first towards the neat little rifle athwart the blotting-pad
and then towards the neat little red label 

".22 LONG."

The thing must have jumped into his mind in a moment.

Nobody seems to have connected the report with him, though the gun,
being fired in a confined space, must have sounded loud, and there
were several people in the billiard-room, separated from him only
by a lath-and-plaster partition. But directly Banghurst's butler
opened the door and smelt the sour smell of the smoke, he knew,
he says, what had happened. For the servants at least of Banghurst's
household had guessed something of what was going on in Filmer's mind.

All through that trying afternoon Banghurst behaved as he held
a man should behave in the presence of hopeless disaster, and his guests
for the most part succeeded in not insisting upon the fact--though
to conceal their perception of it altogether was impossible--that
Banghurst had been pretty elaborately and completely swindled
by the deceased. The public in the enclosure, Hicks told me, dispersed
"like a party that has been ducking a welsher," and there wasn't a soul
in the train to London, it seems, who hadn't known all along that flying
was a quite impossible thing for man. "But he might have tried it,"
said many, "after carrying the thing so far."

In the evening, when he was comparatively alone, Banghurst broke
down and went on like a man of clay. I have been told he wept,
which must have made an imposing scene, and he certainly said
Filmer had ruined his life, and offered and sold the whole apparatus
to MacAndrew for half-a-crown. "I've been thinking--" said MacAndrew
at the conclusion of the bargain, and stopped.

The next morning the name of Filmer was, for the first time, less
conspicuous in the New Paper than in any other daily paper in the world.
The rest of the world's instructors, with varying emphasis, according
to their dignity and the degree of competition between themselves
and the New Paper, proclaimed the "Entire Failure of the New Flying
Machine," and "Suicide of the Impostor." But in the district of North
Surrey the reception of the news was tempered by a perception of unusual
aerial phenomena.

Overnight Wilkinson and MacAndrew had fallen into violent argument
on the exact motives of their principal's rash act.

"The man was certainly a poor, cowardly body, but so far as his
science went he was NO impostor," said MacAndrew, "and I'm prepared
to give that proposition a very practical demonstration, Mr. Wilkinson,
so soon as we've got the place a little more to ourselves. For I've
no faith in all this publicity for experimental trials."

And to that end, while all the world was reading of the certain
failure of the new flying machine, MacAndrew was soaring and curvetting
with great amplitude and dignity over the Epsom and Wimbledon divisions;
and Banghurst, restored once more to hope and energy, and regardless
of public security and the Board of Trade, was pursuing his gyrations
and trying to attract his attention, on a motor car and in his pyjamas--
he had caught sight of the ascent when pulling up the blind of his
bedroom window--equipped, among other things, with a film camera
that was subsequently discovered to be jammed.  And Filmer
was lying on the billiard table in the green pavilion with a sheet
about his body. 


2.  THE MAGIC SHOP

I had seen the Magic Shop from afar several times; I had passed
it once or twice, a shop window of alluring little objects, magic
balls, magic hens, wonderful cones, ventriloquist dolls, the material
of the basket trick, packs of cards that LOOKED all right, and all
that sort of thing, but never had I thought of going in until one day,
almost without warning, Gip hauled me by my finger right up to
the window, and so conducted himself that there was nothing for it
but to take him in. I had not thought the place was there, to tell
the truth--a modest-sized frontage in Regent Street, between
the picture shop and the place where the chicks run about just
out of patent incubators, but there it was sure enough. I had fancied
it was down nearer the Circus, or round the corner in Oxford Street,
or even in Holborn; always over the way and a little inaccessible
it had been, with something of the mirage in its position; but here
it was now quite indisputably, and the fat end of Gip's pointing
finger made a noise upon the glass.

"If I was rich," said Gip, dabbing a finger at the Disappearing Egg,
"I'd buy myself that. And that"--which was The Crying Baby, Very Human
--and that," which was a mystery, and called, so a neat card asserted,
"Buy One and Astonish Your Friends."

"Anything," said Gip, "will disappear under one of those cones.
I have read about it in a book.

"And there, dadda, is the Vanishing Halfpenny--, only they've put it
this way up so's we can't see how it's done."

Gip, dear boy, inherits his mother's breeding, and he did not propose
to enter the shop or worry in any way; only, you know, quite unconsciously
he lugged my finger doorward, and he made his interest clear.

"That," he said, and pointed to the Magic Bottle.

"If you had that?" I said; at which promising inquiry he looked up
with a sudden radiance.

"I could show it to Jessie," he said, thoughtful as ever of others.

"It's less than a hundred days to your birthday, Gibbles," I said,
and laid my hand on the door-handle.

Gip made no answer, but his grip tightened on my finger, and so
we came into the shop.

It was no common shop this; it was a magic shop, and all the prancing
precedence Gip would have taken in the matter of mere toys was wanting.
He left the burthen of the conversation to me.

It was a little, narrow shop, not very well lit, and the door-bell
pinged again with a plaintive note as we closed it behind us.
For a moment or so we were alone and could glance about us.
There was a tiger in papier-mache on the glass case that covered
the low counter--a grave, kind-eyed tiger that waggled his head
in a methodical manner; there were several crystal spheres, a china
hand holding magic cards, a stock of magic fish-bowls in various
sizes, and an immodest magic hat that shamelessly displayed its springs.
On the floor were magic mirrors; one to draw you out long and thin,
one to swell your head and vanish your legs, and one to make you short
and fat like a draught; and while we were laughing at these the shopman,
as I suppose, came in.

At any rate, there he was behind the counter--a curious, sallow,
dark man, with one ear larger than the other and a chin like
the toe-cap of a boot.

"What can we have the pleasure?" he said, spreading his long,
magic fingers on the glass case; and so with a start we were aware
of him.

"I want," I said, "to buy my little boy a few simple tricks."

"Legerdemain?" he asked. "Mechanical? Domestic?"

"Anything amusing?" said I.

"Um!" said the shopman, and scratched his head for a moment as if
thinking. Then, quite distinctly, he drew from his head a glass ball.
"Something in this way?" he said, and held it out.

The action was unexpected. I had seen the trick done at entertainments
endless times before--it's part of the common stock of conjurers--
but I had not expected it here.

"That's good," I said, with a laugh.

"Isn't it?" said the shopman.

Gip stretched out his disengaged hand to take this object and found
merely a blank palm.

"It's in your pocket," said the shopman, and there it was!

"How much will that be?" I asked.

"We make no charge for glass balls," said the shopman politely.
"We get them,"--he picked one out of his elbow as he spoke--"free."
He produced another from the back of his neck, and laid it beside
its predecessor on the counter. Gip regarded his glass ball sagely,
then directed a look of inquiry at the two on the counter, and finally
brought his round-eyed scrutiny to the shopman, who smiled.

"You may have those too," said the shopman, "and, if you DON'T mind,
one from my mouth. SO!"

Gip counselled me mutely for a moment, and then in a profound silence
put away the four balls, resumed my reassuring finger, and nerved
himself for the next event.

"We get all our smaller tricks in that way," the shopman remarked.

I laughed in the manner of one who subscribes to a jest. "Instead
of going to the wholesale shop," I said. "Of course, it's cheaper."

"In a way," the shopman said. "Though we pay in the end. But not
so heavily--as people suppose. . . . Our larger tricks, and our daily
provisions and all the other things we want, we get out of that hat. . .
And you know, sir, if you'll excuse my saying it, there ISN'T
a wholesale shop, not for Genuine Magic goods, sir. I don't know
if you noticed our inscription--the Genuine Magic shop." He drew
a business-card from his cheek and handed it to me. "Genuine,"
he said, with his finger on the word, and added, "There is absolutely
no deception, sir."

He seemed to be carrying out the joke pretty thoroughly, I thought.

He turned to Gip with a smile of remarkable affability. "You, you know,
are the Right Sort of Boy."

I was surprised at his knowing that, because, in the interests
of discipline, we keep it rather a secret even at home; but Gip
received it in unflinching silence, keeping a steadfast eye on him.

"It's only the Right Sort of Boy gets through that doorway."

And, as if by way of illustration, there came a rattling at the door,
and a squeaking little voice could be faintly heard. "Nyar! I WARN 'a
go in there, dadda, I WARN 'a go in there. Ny-a-a-ah!" and then
the accents of a down-trodden parent, urging consolations and
propitiations. "It's locked, Edward," he said.

"But it isn't," said I.

"It is, sir," said the shopman, "always--for that sort of child,"
and as he spoke we had a glimpse of the other youngster, a little,
white face, pallid from sweet-eating and over-sapid food, and
distorted by evil passions, a ruthless little egotist, pawing
at the enchanted pane. "It's no good, sir," said the shopman,
as I moved, with my natural helpfulness, doorward, and presently
the spoilt child was carried off howling.

"How do you manage that?" I said, breathing a little more freely.

"Magic!" said the shopman, with a careless wave of the hand, and behold!
sparks of coloured fire flew out of his fingers and vanished into
the shadows of the shop.

"You were saying," he said, addressing himself to Gip, "before
you came in, that you would like one of our 'Buy One and Astonish
your Friends' boxes?"

Gip, after a gallant effort, said "Yes."

"It's in your pocket."

And leaning over the counter--he really had an extraordinarily
long body--this amazing person produced the article in the customary
conjurer's manner. "Paper," he said, and took a sheet out of
the empty hat with the springs; "string," and behold his mouth was
a string-box, from which he drew an unending thread, which when
he had tied his parcel he bit off--and, it seemed to me, swallowed
the ball of string. And then he lit a candle at the nose of one
of the ventriloquist's dummies, stuck one of his fingers (which
had become sealing-wax red) into the flame, and so sealed the parcel.
"Then there was the Disappearing Egg," he remarked, and produced
one from within my coat-breast and packed it, and also The Crying
Baby, Very Human. I handed each parcel to Gip as it was ready,
and he clasped them to his chest.

He said very little, but his eyes were eloquent; the clutch of
his arms was eloquent. He was the playground of unspeakable emotions.
These, you know, were REAL Magics. Then, with a start, I discovered
something moving about in my hat--something soft and jumpy. I whipped
it off, and a ruffled pigeon--no doubt a confederate--dropped out
and ran on the counter, and went, I fancy, into a cardboard box
behind the papier-mache tiger.

"Tut, tut!" said the shopman, dexterously relieving me of my headdress;
"careless bird, and--as I live--nesting!"

He shook my hat, and shook out into his extended hand two or three
eggs, a large marble, a watch, about half-a-dozen of the inevitable
glass balls, and then crumpled, crinkled paper, more and more and more,
talking all the time of the way in which people neglect to brush
their hats INSIDE as well as out, politely, of course, but with
a certain personal application. "All sorts of things accumulate,
sir. . . . Not YOU, of course, in particular. . . . Nearly every
customer. . . . Astonishing what they carry about with them. . . ."
The crumpled paper rose and billowed on the counter more and more
and more, until he was nearly hidden from us, until he was altogether
hidden, and still his voice went on and on. "We none of us know
what the fair semblance of a human being may conceal, sir. Are we
all then no better than brushed exteriors, whited sepulchres--"

His voice stopped--exactly like when you hit a neighbour's gramophone
with a well-aimed brick, the same instant silence, and the rustle
of the paper stopped, and everything was still. . . .

"Have you done with my hat?" I said, after an interval.

There was no answer.

I stared at Gip, and Gip stared at me, and there were our distortions
in the magic mirrors, looking very rum, and grave, and quiet. . . .

"I think we'll go now," I said. "Will you tell me how much all this
comes to? . . . .

"I say," I said, on a rather louder note, "I want the bill; and
my hat, please."

It might have been a sniff from behind the paper pile. . . .

"Let's look behind the counter, Gip," I said. "He's making fun of us."

I led Gip round the head-wagging tiger, and what do you think
there was behind the counter? No one at all! Only my hat on the floor,
and a common conjurer's lop-eared white rabbit lost in meditation,
and looking as stupid and crumpled as only a conjurer's rabbit
can do. I resumed my hat, and the rabbit lolloped a lollop or so
out of my way.

"Dadda!" said Gip, in a guilty whisper.

"What is it, Gip?" said I.

"I DO like this shop, dadda."

"So should I," I said to myself, "if the counter wouldn't suddenly
extend itself to shut one off from the door." But I didn't call
Gip's attention to that. "Pussy!" he said, with a hand out to
the rabbit as it came lolloping past us; "Pussy, do Gip a magic!"
and his eyes followed it as it squeezed through a door I had
certainly not remarked a moment before. Then this door opened wider,
and the man with one ear larger than the other appeared again.
He was smiling still, but his eye met mine with something between
amusement and defiance. "You'd like to see our show-room, sir," he
said, with an innocent suavity. Gip tugged my finger forward. I
glanced at the counter and met the shopman's eye again. I was
beginning to think the magic just a little too genuine. "We haven't
VERY much time," I said. But somehow we were inside the show-room
before I could finish that.

"All goods of the same quality," said the shopman, rubbing his
flexible hands together, "and that is the Best. Nothing in the place
that isn't genuine Magic, and warranted thoroughly rum. Excuse me, sir!"

I felt him pull at something that clung to my coat-sleeve, and then
I saw he held a little, wriggling red demon by the tail--the little
creature bit and fought and tried to get at his hand--and in a moment
he tossed it carelessly behind a counter. No doubt the thing was
only an image of twisted indiarubber, but for the moment--! And his
gesture was exactly that of a man who handles some petty biting bit
of vermin. I glanced at Gip, but Gip was looking at a magic rocking-
horse. I was glad he hadn't seen the thing. "I say," I said, in an
undertone, and indicating Gip and the red demon with my eyes, "you
haven't many things like THAT about, have you?"

"None of ours! Probably brought it with you," said the shopman--
also in an undertone, and with a more dazzling smile than ever.
"Astonishing what people WILL carry about with them unawares!"
And then to Gip, "Do you see anything you fancy here?"

There were many things that Gip fancied there.

He turned to this astonishing tradesman with mingled confidence
and respect. "Is that a Magic Sword?" he said.

"A Magic Toy Sword. It neither bends, breaks, nor cuts the fingers.
It renders the bearer invincible in battle against any one under
eighteen. Half-a-crown to seven and sixpence, according to size. These
panoplies on cards are for juvenile knights-errant and very useful--
shield of safety, sandals of swiftness, helmet of invisibility."

"Oh, daddy!" gasped Gip.

I tried to find out what they cost, but the shopman did not heed me.
He had got Gip now; he had got him away from my finger; he had
embarked upon the exposition of all his confounded stock, and nothing
was going to stop him. Presently I saw with a qualm of distrust
and something very like jealousy that Gip had hold of this person's
finger as usually he has hold of mine. No doubt the fellow was
interesting, I thought, and had an interestingly faked lot of stuff,
really GOOD faked stuff, still--

I wandered after them, saying very little, but keeping an eye
on this prestidigital fellow. After all, Gip was enjoying it.
And no doubt when the time came to go we should be able to go
quite easily.

It was a long, rambling place, that show-room, a gallery broken up
by stands and stalls and pillars, with archways leading off to other
departments, in which the queerest-looking assistants loafed and
stared at one, and with perplexing mirrors and curtains. So perplexing,
indeed, were these that I was presently unable to make out the door
by which we had come.

The shopman showed Gip magic trains that ran without steam or clockwork,
just as you set the signals, and then some very, very valuable boxes
of soldiers that all came alive directly you took off the lid
and said--. I myself haven't a very quick ear and it was a tongue-
twisting sound, but Gip--he has his mother's ear--got it in no time.
"Bravo!" said the shopman, putting the men back into the box
unceremoniously and handing it to Gip. "Now," said the shopman, and in
a moment Gip had made them all alive again.

"You'll take that box?" asked the shopman.

"We'll take that box," said I, "unless you charge its full value.
In which case it would need a Trust Magnate--"

"Dear heart! NO!" and the shopman swept the little men back again,
shut the lid, waved the box in the air, and there it was, in brown
paper, tied up and--WITH GIP'S FULL NAME AND ADDRESS ON THE PAPER!

The shopman laughed at my amazement.

"This is the genuine magic," he said. "The real thing."

"It's a little too genuine for my taste," I said again.

After that he fell to showing Gip tricks, odd tricks, and still
odder the way they were done. He explained them, he turned them
inside out, and there was the dear little chap nodding his busy bit
of a head in the sagest manner.

I did not attend as well as I might. "Hey, presto!" said the Magic
Shopman, and then would come the clear, small "Hey, presto!"
of the boy. But I was distracted by other things. It was being
borne in upon me just how tremendously rum this place was; it was,
so to speak, inundated by a sense of rumness. There was something
a little rum about the fixtures even, about the ceiling, about the
floor, about the casually distributed chairs. I had a queer feeling
that whenever I wasn't looking at them straight they went askew, and
moved about, and played a noiseless puss-in-the-corner behind my back.
And the cornice had a serpentine design with masks--masks altogether
too expressive for proper plaster.

Then abruptly my attention was caught by one of the odd-looking
assistants. He was some way off and evidently unaware of my presence--
I saw a sort of three-quarter length of him over a pile of toys
and through an arch--and, you know, he was leaning against a pillar
in an idle sort of way doing the most horrid things with his features!
The particular horrid thing he did was with his nose. He did it
just as though he was idle and wanted to amuse himself. First of all
it was a short, blobby nose, and then suddenly he shot it out
like a telescope, and then out it flew and became thinner and thinner
until it was like a long, red, flexible whip. Like a thing in
a nightmare it was! He flourished it about and flung it forth
as a fly-fisher flings his line.

My instant thought was that Gip mustn't see him. I turned about,
and there was Gip quite preoccupied with the shopman, and thinking
no evil. They were whispering together and looking at me. Gip was
standing on a little stool, and the shopman was holding a sort of
big drum in his hand.

"Hide and seek, dadda!" cried Gip. "You're He!"

And before I could do anything to prevent it, the shopman had clapped
the big drum over him.  I saw what was up directly. "Take that off,"
I cried, "this instant! You'll frighten the boy. Take it off!"

The shopman with the unequal ears did so without a word, and held
the big cylinder towards me to show its emptiness. And the little
stool was vacant! In that instant my boy had utterly disappeared? . . .

You know, perhaps, that sinister something that comes like a hand
out of the unseen and grips your heart about. You know it takes
your common self away and leaves you tense and deliberate, neither
slow nor hasty, neither angry nor afraid. So it was with me.

I came up to this grinning shopman and kicked his stool aside.

"Stop this folly!" I said. "Where is my boy?"

"You see," he said, still displaying the drum's interior, "there is
no deception---"

I put out my hand to grip him, and he eluded me by a dexterous
movement. I snatched again, and he turned from me and pushed open
a door to escape. "Stop!" I said, and he laughed, receding. I leapt
after him--into utter darkness.

THUD!

"Lor' bless my 'eart! I didn't see you coming, sir!"

I was in Regent Street, and I had collided with a decent-looking
working man; and a yard away, perhaps, and looking a little
perplexed with himself, was Gip. There was some sort of apology,
and then Gip had turned and come to me with a bright little smile,
as though for a moment he had missed me.

And he was carrying four parcels in his arm!

He secured immediate possession of my finger.

For the second I was rather at a loss. I stared round to see
the door of the magic shop, and, behold, it was not there!
There was no door, no shop, nothing, only the common pilaster
between the shop where they sell pictures and the window with
the chicks! . . .

I did the only thing possible in that mental tumult; I walked straight
to the kerbstone and held up my umbrella for a cab.

"'Ansoms," said Gip, in a note of culminating exultation.

I helped him in, recalled my address with an effort, and got in also.
Something unusual proclaimed itself in my tail-coat pocket, and
I felt and discovered a glass ball. With a petulant expression
I flung it into the street.

Gip said nothing.

For a space neither of us spoke.

"Dada!" said Gip, at last, "that WAS a proper shop!"

I came round with that to the problem of just how the whole thing
had seemed to him. He looked completely undamaged--so far, good;
he was neither scared nor unhinged, he was simply tremendously
satisfied with the afternoon's entertainment, and there in his arms
were the four parcels.

Confound it! what could be in them?

"Um!" I said. "Little boys can't go to shops like that every day."

He received this with his usual stoicism, and for a moment I was sorry
I was his father and not his mother, and so couldn't suddenly there,
coram publico, in our hansom, kiss him. After all, I thought,
the thing wasn't so very bad.

But it was only when we opened the parcels that I really began to be
reassured. Three of them contained boxes of soldiers, quite ordinary
lead soldiers, but of so good a quality as to make Gip altogether
forget that originally these parcels had been Magic Tricks of the only
genuine sort, and the fourth contained a kitten, a little living
white kitten, in excellent health and appetite and temper.

I saw this unpacking with a sort of provisional relief. I hung about
in the nursery for quite an unconscionable time. . . .

That happened six months ago. And now I am beginning to believe
it is all right. The kitten had only the magic natural to all kittens,
and the soldiers seem as steady a company as any colonel could
desire. And Gip--?

The intelligent parent will understand that I have to go cautiously
with Gip.

But I went so far as this one day. I said, "How would you like
your soldiers to come alive, Gip, and march about by themselves?"

"Mine do," said Gip. "I just have to say a word I know before
I open the lid."

"Then they march about alone?"

"Oh, QUITE, dadda. I shouldn't like them if they didn't do that."

I displayed no unbecoming surprise, and since then I have taken
occasion to drop in upon him once or twice, unannounced, when
the soldiers were about, but so far I have never discovered them
performing in anything like a magical manner.

It's so difficult to tell.

There's also a question of finance. I have an incurable habit of
paying bills. I have been up and down Regent Street several times,
looking for that shop. I am inclined to think, indeed, that in that
matter honour is satisfied, and that, since Gip's name and address
are known to them, I may very well leave it to these people,
whoever they may be, to send in their bill in their own time.


3.  THE VALLEY OF SPIDERS

Towards mid-day the three pursuers came abruptly round a bend in
the torrent bed upon the sight of a very broad and spacious valley.
The difficult and winding trench of pebbles along which they had
tracked the fugitives for so long, expanded to a broad slope,
and with a common impulse the three men left the trail, and rode
to a little eminence set with olive-dun trees, and there halted,
the two others, as became them, a little behind the man with
the silver-studded bridle.

For a space they scanned the great expanse below them with eager eyes.
It spread remoter and remoter, with only a few clusters of sere
thorn bushes here and there, and the dim suggestions of some now
waterless ravine, to break its desolation of yellow grass. Its purple
distances melted at last into the bluish slopes of the further hills--
hills it might be of a greener kind--and above them invisibly
supported, and seeming indeed to hang in the blue, were the snowclad
summits of mountains that grew larger and bolder to the north-westward
as the sides of the valley drew together. And westward the valley
opened until a distant darkness under the sky told where the forests
began. But the three men looked neither east nor west, but only
steadfastly across the valley.

The gaunt man with the scarred lip was the first to speak. "Nowhere,"
he said, with a sigh of disappointment in his voice. "But after all,
they had a full day's start."

"They don't know we are after them," said the little man on the white
horse.

"SHE would know," said the leader bitterly, as if speaking to himself.

"Even then they can't go fast. They've got no beast but the mule,
and all to-day the girl's foot has been bleeding---"

The man with the silver bridle flashed a quick intensity of rage
on him. "Do you think I haven't seen that?" he snarled.

"It helps, anyhow," whispered the little man to himself.

The gaunt man with the scarred lip stared impassively. "They can't
be over the valley," he said. "If we ride hard--"

He glanced at the white horse and paused.

"Curse all white horses!" said the man with the silver bridle,
and turned to scan the beast his curse included.

The little man looked down between the mclancholy ears of his steed.

"I did my best," he said.

The two others stared again across the valley for a space. The gaunt
man passed the back of his hand across the scarred lip.

"Come up!" said the man who owned the silver bridle, suddenly.
The little man started and jerked his rein, and the horse hoofs
of the three made a multitudinous faint pattering upon the withered
grass as they turned back towards the trail. . . .

They rode cautiously down the long slope before them, and so came
through a waste of prickly, twisted bushes and strange dry shapes
of horny branches that grew amongst the rocks, into the levels below.
And there the trail grew faint, for the soil was scanty, and the only
herbage was this scorched dead straw that lay upon the ground.
Still, by hard scanning, by leaning beside the horses' necks and
pausing ever and again, even these white men could contrive to follow
after their prey.

There were trodden places, bent and broken blades of the coarse
grass, and ever and again the sufficient intimation of a footmark.
And once the leader saw a brown smear of blood where the half-caste
girl may have trod. And at that under his breath he cursed her for
a fool.

The gaunt man checked his leader's tracking, and the little man
on the white horse rode behind, a man lost in a dream. They rode
one after another, the man with the silver bridle led the way,
and they spoke never a word. After a time it came to the little man
on the white horse that the world was very still. He started out
of his dream. Besides the little noises of their horses and equipment,
the whole great valley kept the brooding quiet of a painted scene.

Before him went his master and his fellow, each intently leaning
forward to the left, each impassively moving with the paces of his
horse; their shadows went before them--still, noiseless, tapering
attendants; and nearer a crouched cool shape was his own. He looked
about him. What was it had gone? Then he remembered the reverberation
from the banks of the gorge and the perpetual accompaniment of
shifting, jostling pebbles. And, moreover--? There was no breeze.
That was it! What a vast, still place it was, a monotonous afternoon
slumber. And the sky open and blank, except for a sombre veil of haze
that had gathered in the upper valley.

He straightened his back, fretted with his bridle, puckered his lips
to whistle, and simply sighed. He turned in his saddle for a time,
and stared at the throat of the mountain gorge out of which they
had come. Blank! Blank slopes on either side, with never a sign
of a decent beast or tree--much less a man. What a land it was!
What a wilderness! He dropped again into his former pose.

It filled him with a momentary pleasure to see a wry stick of purple
black flash out into the form of a snake, and vanish amidst the brown.
After all, the infernal valley WAS alive. And then, to rejoice him
still more, came a little breath across his face, a whisper that
came and went, the faintest inclination of a stiff black-antlered
bush upon a little crest, the first intimations of a possible breeze.
Idly he wetted his finger, and held it up.

He pulled up sharply to avoid a collision with the gaunt man, who
had stopped at fault upon the trail. Just at that guilty moment
he caught his master's eye looking towards him.

For a time he forced an interest in the tracking. Then, as they rode
on again, he studied his master's shadow and hat and shoulder,
appearing and disappearing behind the gaunt man's nearer contours.
They had ridden four days out of the very limits of the world into
this desolate place, short of water, with nothing but a strip
of dried meat under their saddles, over rocks and mountains,
where surely none but these fugitives had ever been before--for THAT!

And all this was for a girl, a mere wilful child! And the man
had whole cityfuls of people to do his basest bidding--girls, women!
Why in the name of passionate folly THIS one in particular? asked
the little man, and scowled at the world, and licked his parched lips
with a blackened tongue. It was the way of the master, and that
was all he knew. Just because she sought to evade him. . . .

His eye caught a whole row of high plumed canes bending in unison,
and then the tails of silk that hung before his neck flapped and fell.
The breeze was growing stronger. Somehow it took the stiff stillness
out of things--and that was well.

"Hullo!" said the gaunt man.

All three stopped abruptly.

"What?" asked the master. "What?"

"Over there," said the gaunt man, pointing up the valley.

"What?"

"Something coming towards us."

And as he spoke a yellow animal crested a rise and came bearing
down upon them. It was a big wild dog, coming before the wind,
tongue out, at a steady pace, and running with such an intensity
of purpose that he did not seem to see the horsemen he approached.
He ran with his nose up, following, it was plain, neither scent
nor quarry. As he drew nearer the little man felt for his sword.
"He's mad," said the gaunt rider.

"Shout!" said the little man, and shouted.

The dog came on. Then when the little man's blade was already out,
it swerved aside and went panting by them and past. The eyes of
the little man followed its flight. "There was no foam," he said.
For a space the man with the silver-studded bridle stared up
the valley. "Oh, come on!" he cried at last. "What does it matter?"
and jerked his horse into movement again.

The little man left the insoluble mystery of a dog that fled from
nothing but the wind, and lapsed into profound musings on human
character. "Come on!" he whispered to himself. "Why should it be
given to one man to say 'Come on!' with that stupendous violence
of effect. Always, all his life, the man with the silver bridle
has been saying that. If _I_ said it--!" thought the little man.
But people marvelled when the master was disobeyed even in the wildest
things. This half-caste girl seemed to him, seemed to every one,
mad--blasphemous almost. The little man, by way of comparison,
reflected on the gaunt rider with the scarred lip, as stalwart as
his master, as brave and, indeed, perhaps braver, and yet for him
there was obedience, nothing but to give obedience duly and stoutly. . .

Certain sensations of the hands and knees called the little man back
to more immediate things. He became aware of something. He rode up
beside his gaunt fellow. "Do you notice the horses?" he said in an
undertone.

The gaunt face looked interrogation.

"They don't like this wind," said the little man, and dropped behind
as the man with the silver bridle turned upon him.

"It's all right," said the gaunt-faced man.

They rode on again for a space in silence. The foremost two rode
downcast upon the trail, the hindmost man watched the haze that
crept down the vastness of the valley, nearer and nearer, and noted
how the wind grew in strength moment by moment. Far away on the left
he saw a line of dark bulks--wild hog perhaps, galloping down
the valley, but of that he said nothing, nor did he remark again upon
the uneasiness of the horses.

And then he saw first one and then a second great white ball,
a great shining white ball like a gigantic head of thistle-down,
that drove before the wind athwart the path. These balls soared
high in the air, and dropped and rose again and caught for a moment,
and hurried on and passed, but at the sight of them the restlessness
of the horses increased.

Then presently he saw that more of these drifting globes--and then
soon very many more--were hurrying towards him down the valley.

They became aware of a squealing. Athwart the path a huge boar rushed,
turning his head but for one instant to glance at them, and then
hurling on down the valley again. And at that, all three stopped
and sat in their saddles, staring into the thickening haze that
was coming upon them.

"If it were not for this thistle-down--" began the leader.

But now a big globe came drifting past within a score of yards
of them. It was really not an even sphere at all, but a vast, soft,
ragged, filmy thing, a sheet gathered by the corners, an aerial
jelly-fish, as it were, but rolling over and over as it advanced,
and trailing long, cobwebby threads and streamers that floated
in its wake.

"It isn't thistle-down," said the little man.

"I don't like the stuff," said the gaunt man.

And they looked at one another.

"Curse it!" cried the leader. "The air's full of it up there.
If it keeps on at this pace long, it will stop us altogether."

An instinctive feeling, such as lines out a herd of deer at the
approach of some ambiguous thing, prompted them to turn their horses
to the wind, ride forward for a few paces, and stare at that advancing
multitude of floating masses. They came on before the wind with a sort
of smooth swiftness, rising and falling noiselessly, sinking to earth,
rebounding high, soaring--all with a perfect unanimity, with a still,
deliberate assurance.

Right and left of the horsemen the pioneers of this strange army
passed. At one that rolled along the ground, breaking shapelessly
and trailing out reluctantly into long grappling ribbons and bands,
all three horses began to shy and dance. The master was seized
with a sudden unreasonable impatience. He cursed the drifting globes
roundly. "Get on!" he cried; "get on! What do these things matter?
How CAN they matter? Back to the trail!" He fell swearing at his horse
and sawed the bit across its mouth.

He shouted aloud with rage. "I will follow that trail, I tell you!"
he cried. "Where is the trail?"

He gripped the bridle of his prancing horse and searched amidst
the grass. A long and clinging thread fell across his face, a grey
streamer dropped about his bridle-arm, some big, active thing
with many legs ran down the back of his head. He looked up to discover
one of those grey masses anchored as it were above him by these things
and flapping out ends as a sail flaps when a boat comes, about--
but noiselessly.

He had an impression of many eyes, of a dense crew of squat bodies,
of long, many-jointed limbs hauling at their mooring ropes to bring
the thing down upon him. For a space he stared up, reining in his
prancing horse with the instinct born of years of horsemanship.
Then the flat of a sword smote his back, and a blade flashed overhead
and cut the drifting balloon of spider-web free, and the whole mass
lifted softly and drove clear and away.

"Spiders!" cried the voice of the gaunt man. "The things are full
of big spiders! Look, my lord!"

The man with the silver bridle still followed the mass that drove away.

"Look, my lord!"

The master found himself staring down at a red, smashed thing
on the ground that, in spite of partial obliteration, could still
wriggle unavailing legs. Then when the gaunt man pointed to another
mass that bore down upon them, he drew his sword hastily. Up the
valley now it was like a fog bank torn to rags. He tried to grasp the
situation.

"Ride for it!" the little man was shouting. "Ride for it down the
valley."

What happened then was like the confusion of a battle. The man
with the silver bridle saw the little man go past him slashing
furiously at imaginary cobwebs, saw him cannon into the horse
of the gaunt man and hurl it and its rider to earth. His own horse
went a dozen paces before he could rein it in. Then he looked up
to avoid imaginary dangers, and then back again to see a horse
rolling on the ground, the gaunt man standing and slashing over it
at a rent and fluttering mass of grey that streamed and wrapped
about them both. And thick and fast as thistle-down on waste land
on a windy day in July, the cobweb masses were coming on.

The little man had dismounted, but he dared not release his horse.
He was endeavouring to lug the struggling brute back with the strength
of one arm, while with the other he slashed aimlessly, The tentacles
of a second grey mass had entangled themselves with the struggle,
and this second grey mass came to its moorings, and slowly sank.

The master set his teeth, gripped his bridle, lowered his head,
and spurred his horse forward. The horse on the ground rolled over,
there were blood and moving shapes upon the flanks, and the gaunt man,
suddenly leaving it, ran forward towards his master, perhaps ten paces.
His legs were swathed and encumbered with grey; he made ineffectual
movements with his sword. Grey streamers waved from him; there was
a thin veil of grey across his face. With his left hand he beat at
something on his body, and suddenly he stumbled and fell. He struggled
to rise, and fell again, and suddenly, horribly, began to howl,
"Oh--ohoo, ohooh!"

The master could see the great spiders upon him, and others upon
the ground.

As he strove to force his horse nearer to this gesticulating,
screaming grey object that struggled up and down, there came a
clatter of hoofs, and the little man, in act of mounting, swordless,
balanced on his belly athwart the white horse, and clutching its mane,
whirled past. And again a clinging thread of grey gossamer swept
across the master's face. All about him, and over him, it seemed
this drifting, noiseless cobweb circled and drew nearer him. . . .

To the day of his death he never knew just how the event of that moment
happened. Did he, indeed, turn his horse, or did it really of its
own accord stampede after its fellow? Suffice it that in another
second he was galloping full tilt down the valley with his sword
whirling furiously overhead. And all about him on the quickening
breeze, the spiders' airships, their air bundles and air sheets,
seemed to him to hurry in a conscious pursuit.

Clatter, clatter, thud, thud--the man with the silver bridle rode,
heedless of his direction, with his fearful face looking up now right,
now left, and his sword arm ready to slash. And a few hundred yards
ahead of him, with a tail of torn cobweb trailing behind him, rode
the little man on the white horse, still but imperfectly in the saddle.
The reeds bent before them, the wind blew fresh and strong, over his
shoulder the master could see the webs hurrying to overtake. . . .

He was so intent to escape the spiders' webs that only as his horse
gathered together for a leap did he realise the ravine ahead. And then
he reaIised it only to misunderstand and interfere. He was leaning
forward on his horse's neck and sat up and back all too late.

But if in his excitement he had failed to leap, at any rate he had
not forgotten how to fall. He was horseman again in mid-air.
He came off clear with a mere bruise upon his shoulder, and his horse
rolled, kicking spasmodic legs, and lay still. But the master's sword
drove its point into the hard soil, and snapped clean across, as
though Chance refused him any longer as her Knight, and the splintered
end missed his face by an inch or so.

He was on his feet in a moment, breathlessly scanning the onrushing
spider-webs. For a moment he was minded to run, and then thought
of the ravine, and turned back. He ran aside once to dodge one drifting
terror, and then he was swiftly clambering down the precipitous sides,
and out of the touch of the gale.

There under the lee of the dry torrent's steeper banks he might
crouch, and watch these strange, grey masses pass and pass in safety
till the wind fell, and it became possible to escape. And there
for a long time he crouched, watching the strange, grey, ragged
masses trail their streamers across his narrowed sky.

Once a stray spider fell into the ravine close beside him--a full
foot it measured from leg to leg, and its body was half a man's hand--
and after he had watched its monstrous alacrity of search and escape
for a little while, and tempted it to bite his broken sword, he lifted
up his iron-heeled boot and smashed it into a pulp. He swore as he did
so, and for a time sought up and down for another.

Then presently, when he was surer these spider swarms could not
drop into the ravine, he found a place where he could sit down,
and sat and fell into deep thought and began after his manner
to gnaw his knuckles and bite his nails. And from this he was moved
by the coming of the man with the white horse.

He heard him long before he saw him, as a clattering of hoofs,
stumbling footsteps, and a reassuring voice. Then the little man
appeared, a rueful figure, still with a tail of white cobweb trailing
behind him. They approached each other without speaking, without
a salutation. The little man was fatigued and shamed to the pitch
of hopeless bitterness, and came to a stop at last, face to face with
his seated master. The latter winced a little under his dependant's
eye. "Well?" he said at last, with no pretence of authority.

"You left him?"

"My horse bolted."

"I know. So did mine."

He laughed at his master mirthlessly.

"I say my horse bolted," said the man who once had a silver-studded
bridle.

"Cowards both," said the little man.

The other gnawed his knuckle through some meditative moments,
with his eye on his inferior.

"Don't call me a coward," he said at length.

"You are a coward like myself."

"A coward possibly. There is a limit beyond which every man must fear.
That I have learnt at last. But not like yourself. That is where
the difference comes in."

"I never could have dreamt you would have left him. He saved
your life two minutes before. . . . Why are you our lord?"

The master gnawed his knuckles again, and his countenance was dark.

"No man calls me a coward," he said. "No. A broken sword is better
than none. . . . One spavined white horse cannot be expected to carry
two men a four days' journey. I hate white horses, but this time
it cannot be helped. You begin to understand me? . . . I perceive
that you are minded, on the strength of what you have seen and fancy,
to taint my reputation. It is men of your sort who unmake kings.
Besides which--I never liked you."

"My lord!" said the little man.

"No," said the master. "NO!"

He stood up sharply as the little man moved. For a minute perhaps
they faced one another. Overhead the spiders' balls went driving.
There was a quick movement among the pebbles; a running of feet,
a cry of despair, a gasp and a blow. . . .

Towards nightfall the wind fell. The sun set in a calm serenity,
and the man who had once possessed the silver bridle came at last
very cautiously and by an easy slope out of the ravine again; but now
he led the white horse that once belonged to the little man.
He would have gone back to his horse to get his silver-mounted
bridle again, but he feared night and a quickening breeze might
still find him in the valley, and besides he disliked greatly
to think he might discover his horse all swathed in cobwebs
and perhaps unpleasantly eaten.

And as he thought of those cobwebs and of all the dangers he
had been through, and the manner in which he had been preserved
that day, his hand sought a little reliquary that hung about his neck,
and he clasped it for a moment with heartfelt gratitude. As he did so
his eyes went across the valley.

"I was hot with passion," he said, "and now she has met her reward.
They also, no doubt--"

And behold! Far away out of the wooded slopes across the valley,
but in the clearness of the sunset distinct and unmistakable,
he saw a little spire of smoke.

At that his expression of serene resignation changed to an amazed
anger. Smoke? He turned the head of the white horse about, and
hesitated. And as he did so a little rustle of air went through the
grass about him. Far away upon some reeds swayed a tattered sheet of
grey. He looked at the cobwebs; he looked at the smoke.

"Perhaps, after all, it is not them," he said at last.

But he knew better.

After he had stared at the smoke for some time, he mounted the white
horse.

As he rode, he picked his way amidst stranded masses of web. For some
reason there were many dead spiders on the ground, and those that
lived feasted guiltily on their fellows. At the sound of his horse's
hoofs they fled.

Their time had passed. From the ground without either a wind to carry
them or a winding sheet ready, these things, for all their poison,
could do him little evil.  He flicked with his belt at those
he fancied came too near. Once, where a number ran together over
a bare place, he was minded to dismount and trample them with his boots,
but this impulse he overcame. Ever and again he turned in his saddle,
and looked back at the smoke.

"Spiders," he muttered over and over again. "Spiders! Well, well. . . .
The next time I must spin a web."


4.  THE TRUTH ABOUT PYECRAFT

He sits not a dozen yards away. If I glance over my shoulder
I can see him. And if I catch his eye--and usually I catch his eye--
it meets me with an expression.

It is mainly an imploring look--and yet with suspicion in it.

Confound his suspicion! If I wanted to tell on him I should have told
long ago. I don't tell and I don't tell, and he ought to feel at his
ease. As if anything so gross and fat as he could feel at ease! Who
would believe me if I did tell?

Poor old Pyecraft! Great, uneasy jelly of substance! The fattest
clubman in London.

He sits at one of the little club tables in the huge bay by the fire,
stuffing. What is he stuffing? I glance judiciously and catch him
biting at a round of hot buttered tea-cake, with his eyes on me.
Confound him!--with his eyes on me!

That settles it, Pyecraft! Since you WILL be abject, since you WILL
behave as though I was not a man of honour, here, right under your
embedded eyes, I write the thing down--the plain truth about Pyecraft.
The man I helped, the man I shielded, and who has requited me
by making my club unendurable, absolutely unendurable, with his
liquid appeal, with the perpetual "don't tell" of his looks.

And, besides, why does he keep on eternally eating?

Well, here goes for the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the
truth!

Pyecraft--. I made the acquaintance of Pyecraft in this very smoking-
room. I was a young, nervous new member, and he saw it. I was sitting
all alone, wishing I knew more of the members, and suddenly he came,
a great rolling front of chins and abdomina, towards me, and grunted
and sat down in a chair close by me and wheezed for a space,
and scraped for a space with a match and lit a cigar, and then
addressed me. I forget what he said--something about the matches
not lighting properly, and afterwards as he talked he kept stopping
the waiters one by one as they went by, and telling them about
the matches in that thin, fluty voice he has. But, anyhow, it was
in some such way we began our talking.

He talked about various things and came round to games. And thence
to my figure and complexion. "YOU ought to be a good cricketer,"
he said. I suppose I am slender, slender to what some people would
call lean, and I suppose I am rather dark, still--I am not ashamed
of having a Hindu great-grandmother, but, for all that, I don't want
casual strangers to see through me at a glance to HER. So that
I was set against Pyecraft from the beginning.

But he only talked about me in order to get to himself.

"I expect," he said, "you take no more exercise than I do, and
probably you eat no less." (Like all excessively obese people
he fancied he ate nothing.) "Yet,"--and he smiled an oblique smile--
"we differ."

And then he began to talk about his fatness and his fatness;
all he did for his fatness and all he was going to do for his fatness;
what people had advised him to do for his fatness and what he had
heard of people doing for fatness similar to his. "A priori," he said,
"one would think a question of nutrition could be answered by dietary
and a question of assimilation by drugs." It was stifling. It was
dumpling talk. It made me feel swelled to hear him.

One stands that sort of thing once in a way at a club, but a time
came when I fancied I was standing too much. He took to me altogether
too conspicuously. I could never go into the smoking-room but
he would come wallowing towards me, and sometimes he came and
gormandised round and about me while I had my lunch. He seemed
at times almost to be clinging to me. He was a bore, but not so
fearful a bore as to be limited to me; and from the first there
was something in his manner--almost as though he knew, almost as
though he penetrated to the fact that I MIGHT--that there was a remote,
exceptional chance in me that no one else presented.

"I'd give anything to get it down," he would say--"anything,"
and peer at me over his vast cheeks and pant.

Poor old Pyecraft! He has just gonged, no doubt to order another
buttered tea-cake!

He came to the actual thing one day. "Our Pharmacopoeia," he said,
"our Western Pharmacopoeia, is anything but the last word of medical
science. In the East, I've been told--"

He stopped and stared at me. It was like being at an aquarium.

I was quite suddenly angry with him. "Look here," I said, "who told
you about my great-grandmother's recipes?"

"Well," he fenced.

"Every time we've met for a week," I said, "and we've met pretty
often--you've given me a broad hint or so about that little secret
of mine."

"Well," he said, "now the cat's out of the bag, I'll admit, yes,
it is so. I had it--"

"From Pattison?"

"Indirectly," he said, which I believe was lying, "yes."

"Pattison," I said, "took that stuff at his own risk."

He pursed his mouth and bowed.

"My great-grandmother's recipes," I said, "are queer things to handle.
My father was near making me promise--"

"He didn't?"

"No. But he warned me. He himself used one--once."

"Ah! . . . But do you think--? Suppose--suppose there did happen
to be one--"

"The things are curious documents," I said.

"Even the smell of 'em. . . . No!"

But after going so far Pyecraft was resolved I should go farther.
I was always a little afraid if I tried his patience too much he would
fall on me suddenly and smother me. I own I was weak. But I was
also annoyed with Pyecraft. I had got to that state of feeling
for him that disposed me to say, "Well, TAKE the risk!" The little
affair of Pattison to which I have alluded was a different matter
altogether. What it was doesn't concern us now, but I knew, anyhow,
that the particular recipe I used then was safe. The rest I didn't
know so much about, and, on the whole, I was inclined to doubt
their safety pretty completely.

Yet even if Pyecraft got poisoned--

I must confess the poisoning of Pyecraft struck me as an immense
undertaking.

That evening I took that queer, odd-scented sandalwood box out of
my safe and turned the rustling skins over. The gentleman who wrote
the recipes for my great-grandmother evidently had a weakness for skins
of a miscellaneous origin, and his handwriting was cramped to the last
degree. Some of the things are quite unreadable to me--though my family,
with its Indian Civil Service associations, has kept up a knowledge
of Hindustani from generation to generation--and none are absolutely
plain sailing. But I found the one that I knew was there soon enough,
and sat on the floor by my safe for some time looking at it.

"Look here," said I to Pyecraft next day, and snatched the slip away
from his eager grasp.

"So far as I--can make it out, this is a recipe for Loss of Weight.
("Ah!" said Pyecraft.) I'm not absolutely sure, but I think it's that.
And if you take my advice you'll leave it alone. Because, you know--
I blacken my blood in your interest, Pyecraft--my ancestors on
that side were, so far as I can gather, a jolly queer lot. See?"

"Let me try it," said Pyecraft.

I leant back in my chair. My imagination made one mighty effort
and fell flat within me. "What in Heaven's name, Pyecraft," I asked,
"do you think you'll look like when you get thin?"

He was impervious to reason. I made him promise never to say a word
to me about his disgusting fatness again whatever happened--never,
and then I handed him that little piece of skin.

"It's nasty stuff," I said.

"No matter," he said, and took it.

He goggled at it. "But--but--" he said.

He had just discovered that it wasn't English.

"To the best of my ability," I said, "I will do you a translation."

I did my best. After that we didn't speak for a fortnight. Whenever he
approached me I frowned and motioned him away, and he respected
our compact, but at the end of a fortnight he was as fat as ever.
And then he got a word in.

"I must speak," he said. "It isn't fair. There's something wrong.
It's done me no good. You're not doing your great-grandmother justice."

"Where's the recipe?"

He produced it gingerly from his pocket-book.

I ran my eye over the items. "Was the egg addled?" I asked.

"No. Ought it to have been?"

"That," I said, "goes without saying in all my poor dear
great-grandmother's
recipes. When condition or quality is not specified you must get
the worst. She was drastic or nothing. . . . And there's one or two
possible alternatives to some of these other things. You got FRESH
rattlesnake venom."

"I got a rattlesnake from Jamrach's. It cost--it cost--"

"That's your affair, anyhow. This last item--"

"I know a man who--"

"Yes. H'm. Well, I'll write the alternatives down. So far as I know
the language, the spelling of this recipe is particularly atrocious.
By-the-bye, dog here probably means pariah dog."

For a month after that I saw Pyecraft constantly at the club and
as fat and anxious as ever. He kept our treaty, but at times he broke
the spirit of it by shaking his head despondently. Then one day
in the cloakroom he said, "Your great-grandmother--"

"Not a word against her," I said; and he held his peace.

I could have fancied he had desisted, and I saw him one day talking
to three new members about his fatness as though he was in search
of other recipes. And then, quite unexpectedly, his telegram came.

"Mr. Formalyn!" bawled a page-boy under my nose, and I took the telegram
and opened it at once.

"For Heaven's sake come.--Pyecraft."

"H'm," said I, and to tell the truth I was so pleased at the
rehabilitation of my great grandmother's reputation this evidently
promised that I made a most excellent lunch.

I got Pyecraft's address from the hall porter. Pyecraft inhabited the
upper half of a house in Bloomsbury, and I went there so soon as I
had done my coffee and Trappistine. I did not wait to finish my cigar.

"Mr. Pyecraft?" said I, at the front door.

They believed he was ill; he hadn't been out for two days.

"He expects me," said I, and they sent me up.

I rang the bell at the lattice-door upon the landing.

"He shouldn't have tried it, anyhow," I said to myself. "A man who
eats like a pig ought to look like a pig."

An obviously worthy woman, with an anxious face and a carelessly
placed cap, came and surveyed me through the lattice.

I gave my name and she let me in in a dubious fashion.

"Well?" said I, as we stood together inside Pyecraft's piece of the
landing.

"'E said you was to come in if you came," she said, and regarded me,
making no motion to show me anywhere. And then, confidentially,
"'E's locked in, sir." 

"Locked in?"

"Locked himself in yesterday morning and 'asn't let any one in since,
sir. And ever and again SWEARING. Oh, my!"

I stared at the door she indicated by her glances.

"In there?" I said.

"Yes, sir."

"What's up?"

She shook her head sadly, "'E keeps on calling for vittles, sir.
'EAVY vittles 'e wants. I get 'im what I can. Pork 'e's 'ad,
sooit puddin', sossiges, noo bread. Everythink like that. Left outside,
if you please, and me go away. 'E's eatin', sir, somethink AWFUL."

There came a piping bawl from inside the door: "That Formalyn?"

"That you, Pyecraft?" I shouted, and went and banged the door.

"Tell her to go away."

I did.

Then I could hear a curious pattering upon the door, almost like
some one feeling for the handle in the dark, and Pyecraft's familiar
grunts.

"It's all right," I said, "she's gone."

But for a long time the door didn't open.

I heard the key turn. Then Pyecraft's voice said, "Come in."

I turned the handle and opened the door. Naturally I expected to see
Pyecraft.

Well, you know, he wasn't there!

I never had such a shock in my life. There was his sitting-room
in a state of untidy disorder, plates and dishes among the books
and writing things, and several chairs overturned, but Pyecraft--

"It's all right, o' man; shut the door," he said, and then I
discovered him.

There he was right up close to the cornice in the corner by the door,
as though some one had glued him to the ceiling. His face was anxious
and angry. He panted and gesticulated. "Shut the door," he said.
"If that woman gets hold of it--"

I shut the door, and went and stood away from him and stared.

"If anything gives way and you tumble down," I said, "you'll break
your neck, Pyecraft."

"I wish I could," he wheezed.

"A man of your age and weight getting up to kiddish gymnastics--"

"Don't," he said, and looked agonised.

"I'll tell you," he said, and gesticulated.

"How the deuce," said I, "are you holding on up there?"

And then abruptly I realised that he was not holding on at all,
that he was floating up there--just as a gas-filled bladder might
have floated in the same position. He began a struggle to thrust
himself away from the ceiling and to clamber down the wall to me.
"It's that prescription," he panted, as he did so. "Your great-gran--"

He took hold of a framed engraving rather carelessly as he spoke
and it gave way, and he flew back to the ceiling again, while
the picture smashed onto the sofa. Bump he went against the ceiling,
and I knew then why he was all over white on the more salient curves
and angles of his person. He tried again more carefully, coming
down by way of the mantel.

It was really a most extraordinary spectacle, that great, fat,
apoplectic-looking man upside down and trying to get from the ceiling
to the floor. "That prescription," he said. "Too successful."

"How?"

"Loss of weight--almost complete."

And then, of course, I understood.

"By Jove, Pyecraft," said I, "what you wanted was a cure for fatness!
But you always called it weight. You would call it weight."

Somehow I was extremely delighted. I quite liked Pyecraft for the time.
"Let me help you!" I said, and took his hand and pulled him down.
He kicked about, trying to get a foothold somewhere. It was very like
holding a flag on a windy day.

"That table," he said, pointing, "is solid mahogany and very heavy.
If you can put me under that---"

I did, and there he wallowed about like a captive balloon, while
I stood on his hearthrug and talked to him.

I lit a cigar. "Tell me," I said, "what happened?"

"I took it," he said.

"How did it taste?"

"Oh, BEASTLY!"

I should fancy they all did. Whether one regards the ingredients
or the probable compound or the possible results, almost all of
my great-grandmother's remedies appear to me at least to be
extraordinarily uninviting. For my own part--

"I took a little sip first."

"Yes?"

"And as I felt lighter and better after an hour, I decided to take
the draught."

"My dear Pyecraft!"

"I held my nose," he explained. "And then I kept on getting lighter
and lighter--and helpless, you know."

He gave way to a sudden burst of passion. "What the goodness am I
to DO?" he said.

"There's one thing pretty evident," I said, "that you mustn't do.
If you go out of doors, you'll go up and up." I waved an arm upward.
"They'd have to send Santos-Dumont after you to bring you down again."

"I suppose it will wear off?"

I shook my head. "I don't think you can count on that," I said.

And then there was another burst of passion, and he kicked out
at adjacent chairs and banged the floor. He behaved just as I should
have expected a great, fat, self-indulgent man to behave under trying
circumstances--that is to say, very badly. He spoke of me and
my great-grandmother with an utter want of discretion.

"I never asked you to take the stuff," I said.

And generously disregarding the insults he was putting upon me,
I sat down in his armchair and began to talk to him in a sober,
friendly fashion.

I pointed out to him that this was a trouble he had brought upon
himself, and that it had almost an air of poetical justice. He had
eaten too much. This he disputed, and for a time we argued the point.

He became noisy and violent, so I desisted from this aspect
of his lesson. "And then," said I, "you committed the sin of euphuism.
You called it not Fat, which is just and inglorious, but Weight. You--"

He interrupted to say he recognised all that. What was he to DO?

I suggested he should adapt himself to his new conditions. So we
came to the really sensible part of the business. I suggested that
it would not be difficult for him to learn to walk about on the ceiling
with his hands--

"I can't sleep," he said.

But that was no great difficulty. It was quite possible, I pointed out,
to make a shake-up under a wire mattress, fasten the under things
on with tapes, and have a blanket, sheet, and coverlet to button
at the side. He would have to confide in his housekeeper, I said;
and after some squabbling he agreed to that. (Afterwards it was
quite delightful to see the beautifully matter-of-fact way with which
the good lady took all these amazing inversions.) He could have
a library ladder in his room, and all his meals could be laid on
the top of his bookcase. We also hit on an ingenious device by which
he could get to the floor whenever he wanted, which was simply to put
the British Encyclopaedia (tenth edition) on the top of his open
shelves. He just pulled out a couple of volumes and held on, and down
he came. And we agreed there must be iron staples along the skirting,
so that he could cling to those whenever he wanted to get about the
room on the lower level.

As we got on with the thing I found myself almost keenly interested.
It was I who called in the housekeeper and broke matters to her,
and it was I chiefly who fixed up the inverted bed. In fact, I spent
two whole days at his flat. I am a handy, interfering sort of man
with a screw-driver, and I made all sorts of ingenious adaptations
for him--ran a wire to bring his bells within reach, turned all
his electric lights up instead of down, and so on. The whole affair
was extremely curious and interesting to me, and it was delightful
to think of Pyecraft like some great, fat blow-fly, crawling about
on his ceiling and clambering round the lintels of his doors
from one room to another, and never, never, never coming to
the club any more. . . .

Then, you know, my fatal ingenuity got the better of me. I was
sitting by his fire drinking his whisky, and he was up in his
favourite corner by the cornice, tacking a Turkey carpet to the
ceiling, when the idea struck me. "By Jove, Pyecraft!" I said, "all
this is totally unnecessary."

And before I could calculate the complete consequences of my notion
I blurted it out. "Lead underclothing," said I, and the mischief was
done.

Pyecraft received the thing almost in tears. "To be right ways up
again--" he said.  I gave him the whole secret before I saw where
it would take me. "Buy sheet lead," I said, "stamp it into discs.
Sew 'em all over your underclothes until you have enough. Have
lead-soled boots, carry a bag of solid lead, and the thing is done!
Instead of being a prisoner here you may go abroad again, Pyecraft;
you may travel--"

A still happier idea came to me. "You need never fear a shipwreck.
All you need do is just slip off some or all of your clothes, take the
necessary amount of luggage in your hand, and float up in the air--"

In his emotion he dropped the tack-hammer within an ace of my head.
"By Jove!" he said, "I shall be able to come back to the club again."

The thing pulled me up short. "By Jove!" I said faintly. "Yes.
Of course--you will."

He did. He does. There he sits behind me now, stuffing--as I live!--
a third go of buttered tea-cake. And no one in the whole world knows--
except his housekeeper and me--that he weighs practically nothing;
that he is a mere boring mass of assimilatory matter, mere clouds
in clothing, niente, nefas, the most inconsiderable of men. There
he sits watching until I have done this writing. Then, if he can,
he will waylay me. He will come billowing up to me. . . .

He will tell me over again all about it, how it feels, how it
doesn't feel, how he sometimes hopes it is passing off a little.
And always somewhere in that fat, abundant discourse he will say,
"The secret's keeping, eh? If any one knew of it--I should be
so ashamed. . . . Makes a fellow look such a fool, you know.
Crawling about on a ceiling and all that. . . ."

And now to elude Pyecraft, occupying, as he does, an admirable
strategic position between me and the door.


5.  MR. SKELMERSDALE IN FAIRYLAND

"There's a man in that shop," said the Doctor, "who has been in
Fairyland."

"Nonsense!" I said, and stared back at the shop. It was the usual
village shop, post-office, telegraph wire on its brow, zinc pans and
brushes outside, boots, shirtings, and potted meats in the window.
"Tell me about it," I said, after a pause.

"_I_ don't know," said the Doctor. "He's an ordinary sort of lout--
Skelmersdale is his name. But everybody about here believes it
like Bible truth."

I reverted presently to the topic.

"I know nothing about it," said the Doctor, "and I don't WANT to know.
I attended him for a broken finger--Married and Single cricket match--
and that's when I struck the nonsense. That's all. But it shows you
the sort of stuff I have to deal with, anyhow, eh? Nice to get
modern sanitary ideas into a people like this!"

"Very," I said in a mildly sympathetic tone, and he went on to tell
me about that business of the Bonham drain. Things of that kind,
I observe, are apt to weigh on the minds of Medical Officers of Health.
I was as sympathetic as I knew how, and when he called the Bonham
people "asses," I said they were "thundering asses," but even that
did not allay him.

Afterwards, later in the summer, an urgent desire to seclude myself,
while finishing my chapter on Spiritual Pathology--it was really,
I believe, stiffer to write than it is to read--took me to Bignor.
I lodged at a farmhouse, and presently found myself outside that
little general shop again, in search of tobacco. "Skelmersdale,"
said I to myself at the sight of it, and went in.

I was served by a short, but shapely, young man, with a fair downy
complexion, good, small teeth, blue eyes, and a languid manner.
I scrutinised him curiously. Except for a touch of melancholy
in his expression, he was nothing out of the common. He was in the
shirt-sleeves and tucked-up apron of his trade, and a pencil was
thrust behind his inoffensive ear. Athwart his black waistcoat was
a gold chain, from which dangled a bent guinea.

"Nothing more to-day, sir?" he inquired. He leant forward over
my bill as he spoke.

"Are you Mr. Skelmersdale?" said I.

"I am, sir," he said, without looking up.

"Is it true that you have been in Fairyland?"

He looked up at me for a moment with wrinkled brows, with an aggrieved,
exasperated face. "O SHUT it! " he said, and, after a moment
of hostility, eye to eye, he went on adding up my bill. "Four,
six and a half," he said, after a pause. "Thank you, Sir."

So, unpropitiously, my acquaintance with Mr. Skelmersdale began.

Well, I got from that to confidence--through a series of toilsome
efforts. I picked him up again in the Village Room, where of a night
I went to play billiards after my supper, and mitigate the extreme
seclusion from my kind that was so helpful to work during the day.
I contrived to play with him and afterwards to talk with him. I found
the one subject to avoid was Fairyland. On everything else he was
open and amiable in a commonplace sort of way, but on that he had
been worried--it was a manifest taboo. Only once in the room did
I hear the slightest allusion to his experience in his presence,
and that was by a cross-grained farm hand who was losing to him.
Skelmersdale had run a break into double figures, which, by the Bignor
standards, was uncommonly good play. "Steady on!" said his adversary.
"None of your fairy flukes!"

Skelmersdale stared at him for a moment, cue in hand, then flung
it down and walked out of the room.

"Why can't you leave 'im alone?" said a respectable elder who had
been enjoying the game, and in the general murmur of disapproval
the grin of satisfied wit faded from the ploughboy's face.

I scented my opportunity. "What's this joke," said I, "about Fairyland?"

"'Tain't no joke about Fairyland, not to young Skelmersdale," said
the respectable elder, drinking.  A little man with rosy cheeks was
more communicative. "They DO say, sir," he said, "that they took him
into Aldington Knoll an' kep' him there a matter of three weeks."

And with that the gathering was well under weigh. Once one sheep
had started, others were ready enough to follow, and in a little time
I had at least the exterior aspect of the Skelmersdale affair.
Formerly, before he came to Bignor, he had been in that very similar
little shop at Aldington Corner, and there whatever it was did happen
had taken place. The story was clear that he had stayed out late
one night on the Knoll and vanished for three weeks from the sight
of men, and had returned with "his cuffs as clean as when he started,"
and his pockets full of dust and ashes. He returned in a state of
moody wretchedness that only slowly passed away, and for many days he
would give no account of where it was he had been. The girl he was
engaged to at Clapton Hill tried to get it out of him, and threw him
over partly because he refused, and partly because, as she said, he
fairly gave her the "'ump." And then when, some time after, he let out
to some one carelessly that he had been in Fairyland and wanted to go
back, and when the thing spread and the simple badinage of the
countryside came into play, he threw up his situation abruptly, and
came to Bignor to get out of the fuss. But as to what had happened in
Fairyland none of these people knew. There the gathering in the Village
Room went to pieces like a pack at fault. One said this, and another
said that.

Their air in dealing with this marvel was ostensibly critical and
sceptical, but I could see a considerable amount of belief showing
through their guarded qualifications. I took a line of intelligent
interest, tinged with a reasonable doubt of the whole story.

"If Fairyland's inside Aldington Knoll," I said, "why don't you dig it
out?"

"That's what I says," said the young ploughboy.

"There's a-many have tried to dig on Aldington Knoll," said the
respectable elder, solemnly, "one time and another. But there's
none as goes about to-day to tell what they got by digging."

The unanimity of vague belief that surrounded me was rather impressive;
I felt there must surely be SOMETHING at the root of so much conviction,
and the already pretty keen curiosity I felt about the real facts
of the case was distinctly whetted. If these real facts were to be
got from any one, they were to be got from Skelmersdale himself;
and I set myself, therefore, still more assiduously to efface
the first bad impression I had made and win his confidence to the pitch
of voluntary speech. In that endeavour I had a social advantage.
Being a person of affability and no apparent employment, and wearing
tweeds and knickerbockers, I was naturally classed as an artist
in Bignor, and in the remarkable code of social precedence prevalent
in Bignor an artist ranks considerably higher than a grocer's assistant.
Skelmersdale, like too many of his class, is something of a snob;
he had told me to "shut it," only under sudden, excessive provocation,
and with, I am certain, a subsequent repentance; he was, I knew,
quite glad to be seen walking about the village with me. In due course,
he accepted the proposal of a pipe and whisky in my rooms readily
enough, and there, scenting by some happy instinct that there
was trouble of the heart in this, and knowing that confidences beget
confidences, I plied him with much of interest and suggestion from
my real and fictitious past. And it was after the third whisky
of the third visit of that sort, if I remember rightly, that a propos
of some artless expansion of a little affair that had touched and
left me in my teens, that he did at last, of his own free will
and motion, break the ice. "It was like that with me," he said,
"over there at Aldington. It's just that that's so rum. First I didn't
care a bit and it was all her, and afterwards, when it was too late,
it was, in a manner of speaking, all me."

I forbore to jump upon this allusion, and so he presently threw out
another, and in a little while he was making it as plain as daylight
that the one thing he wanted to talk about now was this Fairyland
adventure he had sat tight upon for so long. You see, I'd done
the trick with him, and from being just another half-incredulous,
would-be facetious stranger, I had, by all my wealth of shameless
self-exposure, become the possible confidant. He had been bitten
by the desire to show that he, too, had lived and felt many things,
and the fever was upon him.

He was certainly confoundedly allusive at first, and my eagerness
to clear him up with a few precise questions was only equalled
and controlled by my anxiety not to get to this sort of thing too soon.
But in another meeting or so the basis of confidence was complete;
and from first to last I think I got most of the items and aspects--
indeed, I got quite a number of times over almost everything that
Mr. Skelmersdale, with his very limited powers of narration, will
ever be able to tell. And so I come to the story of his adventure,
and I piece it all together again. Whether it really happened,
whether he imagined it or dreamt it, or fell upon it in some strange
hallucinatory trance, I do not profess to say. But that he invented
it I will not for one moment entertain. The man simply and honestly
believes the thing happened as he says it happened; he is transparently
incapable of any lie so elaborate and sustained, and in the belief
of the simple, yet often keenly penetrating, rustic minds about him
I find a very strong confirmation of his sincerity. He believes--
and nobody can produce any positive fact to falsify his belief.
As for me, with this much of endorsement, I transmit his story--
I am a little old now to justify or explain.

He says he went to sleep on Aldington Knoll about ten o'clock one
night--it was quite possibly Midsummer night, though he has never
thought of the date, and he cannot be sure within a week or so--
and it was a fine night and windless, with a rising moon. I have been
at the pains to visit this Knoll thrice since his story grew up
under my persuasions, and once I went there in the twilight summer
moonrise on what was, perhaps, a similar night to that of his adventure.
Jupiter was great and splendid above the moon, and in the north
and northwest the sky was green and vividly bright over the sunken
sun. The Knoll stands out bare and bleak under the sky, but surrounded
at a little distance by dark thickets, and as I went up towards it
there was a mighty starting and scampering of ghostly or quite
invisible rabbits. Just over the crown of the Knoll, but nowhere else,
was a multitudinous thin trumpeting of midges. The Knoll is, I believe,
an artificial mound, the tumulus of some great prehistoric chieftain,
and surely no man ever chose a more spacious prospect for a sepulchre.
Eastward one sees along the hills to Hythe, and thence across
the Channel to where, thirty miles and more perhaps, away, the great
white lights by Gris Nez and Boulogne wink and pass and shine.
Westward lies the whole tumbled valley of the Weald, visible as far
as Hindhead and Leith Hill, and the valley of the Stour opens
the Downs in the north to interminable hills beyond Wye. All
Romney Marsh lies southward at one's feet, Dymchurch and Romney
and Lydd, Hastings and its hill are in the middle distance, and
the hills multiply vaguely far beyond where Eastbourne rolls up
to Beachy Head.

And out upon all this it was that Skelmersdale wandered, being troubled
in his earlier love affair, and as he says, "not caring WHERE he went."
And there he sat down to think it over, and so, sulking and grieving,
was overtaken by sleep. And so he fell into the fairies' power.

The quarrel that had upset him was some trivial matter enough
between himself and the girl at Clapton Hill to whom he was engaged.
She was a farmer's daughter, said Skelmersdale, and "very respectable,"
and no doubt an excellent match for him; but both girl and lover
were very young and with just that mutual jealousy, that intolerantly
keen edge of criticism, that irrational hunger for a beautiful
perfection, that life and wisdom do presently and most mercifully
dull. What the precise matter of quarrel was I have no idea. She may
have said she liked men in gaiters when he hadn't any gaiters on,
or he may have said he liked her better in a different sort of hat,
but however it began, it got by a series of clumsy stages to bitterness
and tears. She no doubt got tearful and smeary, and he grew dusty
and drooping, and she parted with invidious comparisons, grave doubts
whether she ever had REALLY cared for him, and a clear certainty
she would never care again. And with this sort of thing upon his mind
he came out upon Aldington Knoll grieving, and presently, after
a long interval, perhaps, quite inexplicably, fell asleep.

He woke to find himself on a softer turf than ever he had slept
on before, and under the shade of very dark trees that completely
hid the sky. Always, indeed, in Fairyland the sky is hidden, it seems.
Except for one night when the fairies were dancing, Mr. Skelmersdale,
during all his time with them, never saw a star. And of that night
I am in doubt whether he was in Fairyland proper or out where the rings
and rushes are, in those low meadows near the railway line at Smeeth.

But it was light under these trees for all that, and on the leaves
and amidst the turf shone a multitude of glow-worms, very bright
and fine. Mr. Skelmersdale's first impression was that he was SMALL,
and the next that quite a number of people still smaller were standing
all about him. For some reason, he says, he was neither surprised
nor frightened, but sat up quite deliberately and rubbed the sleep
out of his eyes. And there all about him stood the smiling elves
who had caught him sleeping under their privileges and had brought
him into Fairyland.

What these elves were like I have failed to gather, so vague
and imperfect is his vocabulary, and so unobservant of all minor
detail does he seem to have been. They were clothed in something
very light and beautiful, that was neither wool, nor silk, nor leaves,
nor the petals of flowers. They stood all about him as he sat and waked,
and down the glade towards him, down a glow-worm avenue and fronted
by a star, came at once that Fairy Lady who is the chief personage
of his memory and tale. Of her I gathered more. She was clothed in
filmy green, and about her little waist was a broad silver girdle. Her
hair waved back from her forehead on either side; there were curls not
too wayward and yet astray, and on her brow was a little tiara,
set with a single star. Her sleeves were some sort of open sleeves
that gave little glimpses of her arms; her throat, I think, was
a little displayed, because he speaks of the beauty of her neck
and chin. There was a necklace of coral about her white throat,
and in her breast a coral-coloured flower. She had the soft lines
of a little child in her chin and cheeks and throat. And her eyes,
I gather, were of a kindled brown, very soft and straight and sweet
under her level brows. You see by these particulars how greatly
this lady must have loomed in Mr. Skelmersdale's picture. Certain
things he tried to express and could not express; "the way she moved,"
he said several times; and I fancy a sort of demure joyousness
radiated from this Lady.

And it was in the company of this delightful person, as the guest
and chosen companion of this delightful person, that Mr. Skelmersdale
set out to be taken into the intimacies of Fairyland. She welcomed
him gladly and a little warmly--I suspect a pressure of his hand
in both of hers and a lit face to his. After all, ten years ago
young Skelmersdale may have been a very comely youth. And once
she took his arm, and once, I think, she led him by the hand adown
the glade that the glow-worms lit.

Just how things chanced and happened there is no telling from
Mr. Skelmersdale's disarticulated skeleton of description. He gives
little unsatisfactory glimpses of strange corners and doings, of places
where there were many fairies together, of "toadstool things that
shone pink," of fairy food, of which he could only say "you should
have tasted it!" and of fairy music, "like a little musical box,"
that came out of nodding flowers. There was a great open place
where fairies rode and raced on "things," but what Mr. Skelmersdale
meant by "these here things they rode," there is no telling. Larvae,
perhaps, or crickets, or the little beetles that elude us so abundantly.
There was a place where water splashed and gigantic king-cups grew,
and there in the hotter times the fairies bathed together. There were
games being played and dancing and much elvish love-making, too,
I think, among the moss-branch thickets. There can be no doubt that
the Fairy Lady made love to Mr. Skelmersdale, and no doubt either
that this young man set himself to resist her. A time came, indeed,
when she sat on a bank beside him, in a quiet, secluded place
"all smelling of vi'lets," and talked to him of love.

"When her voice went low and she whispered," said Mr. Skelmersdale,
"and laid 'er 'and on my 'and, you know, and came close with a soft,
warm friendly way she 'ad, it was as much as I could do to keep my
'ead."

It seems he kept his head to a certain limited unfortunate extent.
He saw "'ow the wind was blowing," he says, and so, sitting there
in a place all smelling of violets, with the touch of this lovely
Fairy Lady about him, Mr. Skelmersdale broke it to her gently--
that he was engaged!

She had told him she loved him dearly, that he was a sweet human lad
for her, and whatever he would ask of her he should have--even
his heart's desire.

And Mr. Skelmersdale, who, I fancy, tried hard to avoid looking
at her little lips as they just dropped apart and came together,
led up to the more intimate question by saying he would like enough
capital to start a little shop. He'd just like to feel, he said,
he had money enough to do that. I imagine a little surprise in those
brown eyes he talked about, but she seemed sympathetic for all that,
and she asked him many questions about the little shop, "laughing like"
all the time. So he got to the complete statement of his affianced
position, and told her all about Millie.

"All?" said I.

"Everything," said Mr. Skelmersdale, "just who she was, and where
she lived, and everything about her. I sort of felt I 'ad to all
the time, I did."

"'Whatever you want you shall have,' said the Fairy Lady. 'That's as
good as done. You SHALL feel you have the money just as you wish.
And now, you know--YOU MUST KISS ME.'"

And Mr. Skelmersdale pretended not to hear the latter part of her
remark, and said she was very kind. That he really didn't deserve she
should be so kind. And--

The Fairy Lady suddenly came quite close to him and whispered, "Kiss
me!"

"And," said Mr. Skelmersdale, "like a fool, I did."

There are kisses and kisses, I am told, and this must have been quite
the other sort from Millie's resonant signals of regard. There was
something magic in that kiss; assuredly it marked a turning point.
At any rate, this is one of the passages that he thought sufficiently
important to describe most at length. I have tried to get it right,
I have tried to disentangle it from the hints and gestures through
which it came to me, but I have no doubt that it was all different
from my telling and far finer and sweeter, in the soft filtered light
and the subtly stirring silences of the fairy glades. The Fairy Lady
asked him more about Millie, and was she very lovely, and so on--
a great many times. As to Millie's loveliness, I conceive him
answering that she was "all right." And then, or on some such
occasion, the Fairy Lady told him she had fallen in love with him
as he slept in the moonlight, and so he had been brought into
Fairyland, and she had thought, not knowing of Millie, that perhaps
he might chance to love her. "But now you know you can't," she said,
"so you must stop with me just a little while, and then you must
go back to Millie." She told him that, and you know Skelmersdale
was already in love with her, but the pure inertia of his mind kept
him in the way he was going. I imagine him sitting in a sort
of stupefaction amidst all these glowing beautiful things, answering
about his Millie and the little shop he projected and the need
of a horse and cart. . . . And that absurd state of affairs must
have gone on for days and days. I see this little lady, hovering
about him and trying to amuse him, too dainty to understand his
complexity and too tender to let him go. And he, you know, hypnotised
as it were by his earthly position, went his way with her hither
and thither, blind to everything in Fairyland but this wonderful
intimacy that had come to him. It is hard, it is impossible, to give
in print the effect of her radiant sweetness shining through the jungle
of poor Skelmersdale's rough and broken sentences. To me, at least,
she shone clear amidst the muddle of his story like a glow-worm
in a tangle of weeds.

There must have been many days of things while all this was happening--
and once, I say, they danced under the moonlight in the fairy rings
that stud the meadows near Smeeth--but at last it all came to an end.
She led him into a great cavernous place, lit by a red nightlight
sort of thing, where there were coffers piled on coffers, and cups
and golden boxes, and a great heap of what certainly seemed to all
Mr. Skelmersdale's senses--coined gold. There were little gnomes
amidst this wealth, who saluted her at her coming, and stood aside.
And suddenly she turned on him there with brightly shining eyes.

"And now," she said, "you have been kind to stay with me so long,
and it is time I let you go. You must go back to your Millie. You must
go back to your Millie, and here--just as I promised you--they will
give you gold."

"She choked like," said Mr. Skelmersdale. "At that, I had a sort
of feeling--" (he touched his breastbone) "as though I was fainting
here. I felt pale, you know, and shivering, and even then--I 'adn't
a thing to say."

He paused. "Yes," I said.

The scene was beyond his describing. But I know that she kissed
him good-bye.

"And you said nothing?"

"Nothing," he said. "I stood like a stuffed calf. She just looked
back once, you know, and stood smiling like and crying--I could
see the shine of her eyes--and then she was gone, and there was
all these little fellows bustling about me, stuffing my 'ands and
my pockets and the back of my collar and everywhere with gold."

And then it was, when the Fairy Lady had vanished, that Mr. Skelmersdale
really understood and knew. He suddenly began plucking out the gold
they were thrusting upon him, and shouting out at them to prevent
their giving him more. "'I don't WANT yer gold,' I said. 'I 'aven't
done yet. I'm not going. I want to speak to that Fairy Lady again.'
I started off to go after her and they held me back. Yes, stuck
their little 'ands against my middle and shoved me back. They kept
giving me more and more gold until it was running all down my
trouser legs and dropping out of my 'ands. 'I don't WANT yer gold,'
I says to them, 'I want just to speak to the Fairy Lady again.'"

"And did you?"

"It came to a tussle."

"Before you saw her?"

"I didn't see her. When I got out from them she wasn't anywhere
to be seen."

So he ran in search of her out of this red-lit cave, down a long
grotto, seeking her, and thence he came out in a great and desolate
place athwart which a swarm of will-o'-the-wisps were flying to and fro.
And about him elves were dancing in derision, and the little gnomes
came out of the cave after him, carrying gold in handfuls and casting
it after him, shouting, "Fairy love and fairy gold! Fairy love and
fairy gold!"

And when he heard these words, came a great fear that it was all over,
and he lifted up his voice and called to her by her name, and suddenly
set himself to run down the slope from the mouth of the cavern,
through a place of thorns and briers, calling after her very loudly
and often. The elves danced about him unheeded, pinching him
and pricking him, and the will-o'-the-wisps circled round him
and dashed into his face, and the gnomes pursued him shouting and
pelting him with fairy gold. As he ran with all this strange rout
about him and distracting him, suddenly he was knee-deep in a swamp,
and suddenly he was amidst thick twisted roots, and he caught his foot
in one and stumbled and fell. . . .

He fell and he rolled over, and in that instant he found himself
sprawling upon Aldington Knoll, all lonely under the stars.

He sat up sharply at once, he says, and found he was very stiff
and cold, and his clothes were damp with dew. The first pallor
of dawn and a chilly wind were coming up together. He could have
believed the whole thing a strangely vivid dream until he thrust
his hand into his side pocket and found it stuffed with ashes.
Then he knew for certain it was fairy gold they had given him.
He could feel all their pinches and pricks still, though there was
never a bruise upon him. And in that manner, and so suddenly,
Mr. Skelmersdale came out of Fairyland back into this world of men.
Even then he fancied the thing was but the matter of a night until
he returned to the shop at Aldington Corner and discovered amidst
their astonishment that he had been away three weeks.

"Lor'! the trouble I 'ad!" said Mr. Skelmersdale.

"How?"

"Explaining. I suppose you've never had anything like that to explain."

"Never," I said, and he expatiated for a time on the behaviour of
this person and that. One name he avoided for a space.

"And Millie?" said I at last.

"I didn't seem to care a bit for seeing Millie," he said.

"I expect she seemed changed?"

"Every one was changed. Changed for good. Every one seemed big,
you know, and coarse. And their voices seemed loud. Why, the sun,
when it rose in the morning, fair hit me in the eye!"

"And Millie?"

"I didn't want to see Millie."

"And when you did?"

"I came up against her Sunday, coming out of church. 'Where you been?'
she said, and I saw there was a row. _I_ didn't care if there was.
I seemed to forget about her even while she was there a-talking
to me. She was just nothing. I couldn't make out whatever I 'ad seen
in 'er ever, or what there could 'ave been. Sometimes when she
wasn't about, I did get back a little, but never when she was there.
Then it was always the other came up and blotted her out. . . .
Anyow, it didn't break her heart."

"Married?" I asked.

"Married 'er cousin," said Mr. Skelmersdale, and reflected on the
pattern of the tablecloth for a space.

When he spoke again it was clear that his former sweetheart had clean
vanished from his mind, and that the talk had brought back the Fairy
Lady triumphant in his heart. He talked of her--soon he was letting
out the oddest things, queer love secrets it would be treachery to
repeat. I think, indeed, that was the queerest thing in the whole
affair, to hear that neat little grocer man after his story was done,
with a glass of whisky beside him and a cigar between his fingers,
witnessing, with sorrow still, though now, indeed, with a time-blunted
anguish, of the inappeasable hunger of the heart that presently
came upon him. "I couldn't eat," he said, "I couldn't sleep. I made
mistakes in orders and got mixed with change. There she was day
and night, drawing me and drawing me. Oh, I wanted her. Lord! how
I wanted her! I was up there, most evenings I was up there on the Knoll,
often even when it rained. I used to walk over the Knoll and round it
and round it, calling for them to let me in. Shouting. Near blubbering
I was at times. Daft I was and miserable. I kept on saying it was all
a mistake. And every Sunday afternoon I went up there, wet and fine,
though I knew as well as you do it wasn't no good by day. And I've
tried to go to sleep there."

He stopped sharply and decided to drink some whisky.

"I've tried to go to sleep there," he said, and I could swear his lips
trembled. "I've tried to go to sleep there, often and often. And,
you know, I couldn't, sir--never. I've thought if I could go to sleep
there, there might be something. But I've sat up there and laid up
there, and I couldn't--not for thinking and longing. It's the
longing. . . . I've tried--"

He blew, drank up the rest of his whisky spasmodically, stood up
suddenly and buttoned his jacket, staring closely and critically
at the cheap oleographs beside the mantel meanwhile. The little
black notebook in which he recorded the orders of his daily round
projected stiffly from his breast pocket. When all the buttons were
quite done, he patted his chest and turned on me suddenly. "Well,"
he said, "I must be going."

There was something in his eyes and manner that was too difficult
for him to express in words. "One gets talking," he said at last
at the door, and smiled wanly, and so vanished from my eyes.
And that is the tale of Mr. Skelmersdale in Fairyland just as
he told it to me.


6.  THE STORY OF THE INEXPERIENCED GHOST

The scene amidst which Clayton told his last story comes back very
vividly to my mind. There he sat, for the greater part of the time,
in the corner of the authentic settle by the spacious open fire, and
Sanderson sat beside him smoking the Broseley clay that bore his name.
There was Evans, and that marvel among actors, Wish, who is also a
modest man. We had all come down to the Mermaid Club that Saturday
morning, except Clayton, who had slept there overnight--which indeed
gave him the opening of his story. We had golfed until golfing was
invisible; we had dined, and we were in that mood of tranquil
kindliness when men will suffer a story. When Clayton began to tell
one, we naturally supposed he was lying. It may be that indeed he was
lying--of that the reader will speedily be able to judge as well as I.
He began, it is true, with an air of matter-of-fact anecdote, but
that we thought was only the incurable artifice of the man.

"I say!" he remarked, after a long consideration of the upward
rain of sparks from the log that Sanderson had thumped, "you know
I was alone here last night?"

"Except for the domestics," said Wish.

"Who sleep in the other wing," said Clayton. "Yes. Well--" He pulled
at his cigar for some little time as though he still hesitated about
his confidence. Then he said, quite quietly, "I caught a ghost!"

"Caught a ghost, did you?" said Sanderson. "Where is it?"

And Evans, who admires Clayton immensely and has been four weeks
in America, shouted, "CAUGHT a ghost, did you, Clayton? I'm glad
of it! Tell us all about it right now."

Clayton said he would in a minute, and asked him to shut the door.

He looked apologetically at me. "There's no eavesdropping of course,
but we don't want to upset our very excellent service with any rumours
of ghosts in the place. There's too much shadow and oak panelling
to trifle with that. And this, you know, wasn't a regular ghost.
I don't think it will come again--ever."

"You mean to say you didn't keep it?" said Sanderson.

"I hadn't the heart to," said Clayton.

And Sanderson said he was surprised.

We laughed, and Clayton looked aggrieved. "I know," he said, with
the flicker of a smile, "but the fact is it really WAS a ghost,
and I'm as sure of it as I am that I am talking to you now. I'm not
joking. I mean what I say."

Sanderson drew deeply at his pipe, with one reddish eye on Clayton,
and then emitted a thin jet of smoke more eloquent than many words.

Clayton ignored the comment. "It is the strangest thing that has
ever happened in my life. You know, I never believed in ghosts
or anything of the sort, before, ever; and then, you know, I bag
one in a corner; and the whole business is in my hands."

He meditated still more profoundly, and produced and began to pierce
a second cigar with a curious little stabber he affected.

"You talked to it?" asked Wish.

"For the space, probably, of an hour."

"Chatty?" I said, joining the party of the sceptics.

"The poor devil was in trouble," said Clayton, bowed over his cigar-end
and with the very faintest note of reproof.

"Sobbing?" some one asked.

Clayton heaved a realistic sigh at the memory. "Good Lord!" he said;
"yes." And then, "Poor fellow! yes."

"Where did you strike it?" asked Evans, in his best American accent.

"I never realised," said Clayton, ignoring him, "the poor sort of
thing a ghost might be," and he hung us up again for a time, while
he sought for matches in his pocket and lit and warmed to his cigar.

"I took an advantage," he reflected at last.

We were none of us in a hurry. "A character," he said, "remains
just the same character for all that it's been disembodied. That's
a thing we too often forget. People with a certain strength or
fixity of purpose may have ghosts of a certain strength and fixity
of purpose--most haunting ghosts, you know, must be as one-idea'd
as monomaniacs and as obstinate as mules to come back again and again.
This poor creature wasn't." He suddenly looked up rather queerly, and
his eye went round the room. "I say it," he said, "in all kindliness,
but that is the plain truth of the case. Even at the first glance
he struck me as weak."

He punctuated with the help of his cigar.

"I came upon him, you know, in the long passage. His back was towards
me and I saw him first. Right off I knew him for a ghost. He was
transparent and whitish; clean through his chest I could see the glimmer
of the little window at the end. And not only his physique but
his attitude struck me as being weak. He looked, you know, as though
he didn't know in the slightest whatever he meant to do. One hand
was on the panelling and the other fluttered to his mouth. Like--SO!"

"What sort of physique?" said Sanderson.

"Lean. You know that sort of young man's neck that has two great
flutings down the back, here and here--so! And a little, meanish head
with scrubby hair--And rather bad ears. Shoulders bad, narrower
than the hips; turn-down collar, ready-made short jacket, trousers
baggy and a little frayed at the heels. That's how he took me.
I came very quietly up the staircase. I did not carry a light,
you know--the candles are on the landing table and there is that lamp--
and I was in my list slippers, and I saw him as I came up. I stopped
dead at that--taking him in. I wasn't a bit afraid. I think that
in most of these affairs one is never nearly so afraid or excited
as one imagines one would be. I was surprised and interested.
I thought, 'Good Lord! Here's a ghost at last! And I haven't believed
for a moment in ghosts during the last five-and-twenty years.'"

"Um," said Wish.

"I suppose I wasn't on the landing a moment before he found out I
was there. He turned on me sharply, and I saw the face of an immature
young man, a weak nose, a scrubby little moustache, a feeble chin.
So for an instant we stood--he looking over his shoulder at me
and regarded one another. Then he seemed to remember his high calling.
He turned round, drew himself up, projected his face, raised his arms,
spread his hands in approved ghost fashion--came towards me.
As he did so his little jaw dropped, and he emitted a faint, drawn-out
'Boo.' No, it wasn't--not a bit dreadful. I'd dined. I'd had a bottle
of champagne, and being all alone, perhaps two or three--perhaps
even four or five--whiskies, so I was as solid as rocks and no more
frightened than if I'd been assailed by a frog. 'Boo!' I said.
'Nonsense. You don't belong to THIS place. What are you doing here?'

"I could see him wince. 'Boo-oo,' he said.

"'Boo--be hanged! Are you a member?' I said; and just to show
I didn't care a pin for him I stepped through a corner of him and
made to light my candle. 'Are you a member?' I repeated, looking
at him sideways.

"He moved a little so as to stand clear of me, and his bearing
became crestfallen. 'No,' he said, in answer to the persistent
interrogation of my eye; 'I'm not a member--I'm a ghost.'

"'Well, that doesn't give you the run of the Mermaid Club. Is there
any one you want to see, or anything of that sort?' and doing it as
steadily as possible for fear that he should mistake the carelessness
of whisky for the distraction of fear, I got my candle alight.
I turned on him, holding it. 'What are you doing here?' I said.

"He had dropped his hands and stopped his booing, and there he stood,
abashed and awkward, the ghost of a weak, silly, aimless young man.
'I'm haunting,' he said.

"'You haven't any business to,' I said in a quiet voice.

"'I'm a ghost,' he said, as if in defence.

"'That may be, but you haven't any business to haunt here. This is
a respectable private club; people often stop here with nursemaids
and children, and, going about in the careless way you do, some poor
little mite could easily come upon you and be scared out of her wits.
I suppose you didn't think of that?'

"'No, sir,' he said, 'I didn't.'

"'You should have done. You haven't any claim on the place, have you?
Weren't murdered here, or anything of that sort?'

"'None, sir; but I thought as it was old and oak-panelled--'

"'That's NO excuse.' I regarded him firmly. 'Your coming here is
a mistake,' I said, in a tone of friendly superiority. I feigned
to see if I had my matches, and then looked up at him frankly.
'If I were you I wouldn't wait for cock-crow--I'd vanish right away.'

"He looked embarrassed. 'The fact IS, sir--' he began.

"'I'd vanish,' I said, driving it home.

"'The fact is, sir, that--somehow--I can't.'

"'You CAN'T?'

"'No, sir. There's something I've forgotten. I've been hanging
about here since midnight last night, hiding in the cupboards
of the empty bedrooms and things like that. I'm flurried. I've never
come haunting before, and it seems to put me out.'

"'Put you out?'

"'Yes, sir. I've tried to do it several times, and it doesn't come off.
There's some little thing has slipped me, and I can't get back.'

"That, you know, rather bowled me over. He looked at me in such
an abject way that for the life of me I couldn't keep up quite
the high, hectoring vein I had adopted. 'That's queer,' I said,
and as I spoke I fancied I heard some one moving about down below.
'Come into my room and tell me more about it,' I said. 'I didn't,
of course, understand this,' and I tried to take him by the arm.
But, of course, you might as well have tried to take hold of a puff
of smoke! I had forgotten my number, I think; anyhow, I remember
going into several bedrooms--it was lucky I was the only soul
in that wing--until I saw my traps. 'Here we are,' I said, and sat
down in the arm-chair; 'sit down and tell me all about it. It seems
to me you have got yourself into a jolly awkward position, old chap.'

"Well, he said he wouldn't sit down! he'd prefer to flit up and down
the room if it was all the same to me. And so he did, and in a little
while we were deep in a long and serious talk. And presently,
you know, something of those whiskies and sodas evaporated out of me,
and I began to realise just a little what a thundering rum and weird
business it was that I was in. There he was, semi-transparent--
the proper conventional phantom, and noiseless except for his ghost
of a voice--flitting to and fro in that nice, clean, chintz-hung
old bedroom. You could see the gleam of the copper candlesticks
through him, and the lights on the brass fender, and the corners
of the framed engravings on the wall,--and there he was telling me
all about this wretched little life of his that had recently ended
on earth. He hadn't a particularly honest face, you know, but being
transparent, of course, he couldn't avoid telling the truth."

"Eh?" said Wish, suddenly sitting up in his chair.

"What?" said Clayton.

"Being transparent--couldn't avoid telling the truth--I don't see it,"
said Wish.

"_I_ don't see it," said Clayton, with inimitable assurance. "But
it IS so, I can assure you nevertheless. I don't believe he got once
a nail's breadth off the Bible truth. He told me how he had been
killed--he went down into a London basement with a candle to look
for a leakage of gas--and described himself as a senior English
master in a London private school when that release occurred."

"Poor wretch!" said I.

"That's what I thought, and the more he talked the more I thought it.
There he was, purposeless in life and purposeless out of it. He talked
of his father and mother and his schoolmaster, and all who had ever
been anything to him in the world, meanly. He had been too sensitive,
too nervous; none of them had ever valued him properly or understood
him, he said. He had never had a real friend in the world,
I think; he had never had a success. He had shirked games and failed
examinations. 'It's like that with some people,' he said; 'whenever
I got into the examination-room or anywhere everything seemed to go.'
Engaged to be married of course--to another over-sensitive person, I
suppose--when the indiscretion with the gas escape ended his affairs.
'And where are you now?' I asked. 'Not in--?'

"He wasn't clear on that point at all. The impression he gave me was
of a sort of vague, intermediate state, a special reserve for souls
too non-existent for anything so positive as either sin or virtue.
_I_ don't know. He was much too egotistical and unobservant to give
me any clear idea of the kind of place, kind of country, there is on
the Other Side of Things. Wherever he was, he seems to have fallen in
with a set of kindred spirits: ghosts of weak Cockney young men,
who were on a footing of Christian names, and among these there was
certainly a lot of talk about 'going haunting' and things like that.
Yes--going haunting! They seemed to think 'haunting' a tremendous
adventure, and most of them funked it all the time. And so primed,
you know, he had come."

"But really!" said Wish to the fire.

"These are the impressions he gave me, anyhow," said Clayton, modestly.
"I may, of course, have been in a rather uncritical state, but that
was the sort of background he gave to himself. He kept flitting up and
down, with his thin voice going talking, talking about his wretched
self, and never a word of clear, firm statement from first to last.
He was thinner and sillier and more pointless than if he had been
real and alive. Only then, you know, he would not have been in my
bedroom here--if he HAD been alive. I should have kicked him out."

"Of course," said Evans, "there ARE poor mortals like that."

"And there's just as much chance of their having ghosts as the rest
of us," I admitted.

"What gave a sort of point to him, you know, was the fact that
he did seem within limits to have found himself out. The mess he had
made of haunting had depressed him terribly. He had been told
it would be a 'lark'; he had come expecting it to be a 'lark,'
and here it was, nothing but another failure added to his record!
He proclaimed himself an utter out-and-out failure. He said, and
I can quite believe it, that he had never tried to do anything all
his life that he hadn't made a perfect mess of--and through all
the wastes of eternity he never would. If he had had sympathy,
perhaps--. He paused at that, and stood regarding me. He remarked that,
strange as it might seem to me, nobody, not any one, ever, had given
him the amount of sympathy I was doing now. I could see what he wanted
straight away, and I determined to head him off at once. I may be a
brute, you know, but being the Only Real Friend, the recipient of the
confidences of one of these egotistical weaklings, ghost or body, is
beyond my physical endurance. I got up briskly. 'Don't you brood on
these things too much,' I said. 'The thing you've got to do is to get
out of this get out of this--sharp. You pull yourself together and
TRY.' 'I can't,' he said. 'You try,' I said, and try he did."

"Try!" said Sanderson. "HOW?"

"Passes," said Clayton.

"Passes?"

"Complicated series of gestures and passes with the hands. That's
how he had come in and that's how he had to get out again. Lord!
what a business I had!"

"But how could ANY series of passes--?" I began.

"My dear man," said Clayton, turning on me and putting a great
emphasis on certain words, "you want EVERYTHING clear. _I_ don't
know HOW. All I know is that you DO--that HE did, anyhow, at least.
After a fearful time, you know, he got his passes right and suddenly
disappeared."

"Did you," said Sanderson, slowly, "observe the passes?"

"Yes," said Clayton, and seemed to think. "It was tremendously queer,"
he said. "There we were, I and this thin vague ghost, in that silent
room, in this silent, empty inn, in this silent little Friday-night
town. Not a sound except our voices and a faint panting he made when
he swung. There was the bedroom candle, and one candle on the dressing-
table alight, that was all--sometimes one or other would flare up into
a tall, lean, astonished flame for a space. And queer things happened.
'I can't,' he said; 'I shall never--!' And suddenly he sat down on
a little chair at the foot of the bed and began to sob and sob.
Lord! what a harrowing, whimpering thing he seemed!

"'You pull yourself together,' I said, and tried to pat him on the
back, and . . . my confounded hand went through him! By that time,
you know, I wasn't nearly so--massive as I had been on the landing.
I got the queerness of it full. I remember snatching back my hand out
of him, as it were, with a little thrill, and walking over to the
dressing-table. 'You pull yourself together,' I said to him, 'and
try.' And in order to encourage and help him I began to try as well."

"What!" said Sanderson, "the passes?"

"Yes, the passes."

"But--" I said, moved by an idea that eluded me for a space.

"This is interesting," said Sanderson, with his finger in his pipe-
bowl. "You mean to say this ghost of yours gave away--"

"Did his level best to give away the whole confounded barrier? YES."

"He didn't," said Wish; "he couldn't. Or you'd have gone there too."

"That's precisely it," I said, finding my elusive idea put into words
for me.

"That IS precisely it," said Clayton, with thoughtful eyes upon the
fire.

For just a little while there was silence.

"And at last he did it?" said Sanderson.

"At last he did it. I had to keep him up to it hard, but he did it
at last--rather suddenly. He despaired, we had a scene, and then
he got up abruptly and asked me to go through the whole performance,
slowly, so that he might see. 'I believe,' he said, 'if I could SEE
I should spot what was wrong at once.' And he did. '_I_ know,'
he said. 'What do you know?' said I. '_I_ know,' he repeated.
Then he said, peevishly, 'I CAN'T do it if you look at me--I really
CAN'T; it's been that, partly, all along. I'm such a nervous fellow
that you put me out.' Well, we had a bit of an argument. Naturally
I wanted to see; but he was as obstinate as a mule, and suddenly
I had come over as tired as a dog--he tired me out. 'All right,'
I said, '_I_ won't look at you,' and turned towards the mirror,
on the wardrobe, by the bed.

He started off very fast. I tried to follow him by looking in
the looking-glass, to see just what it was had hung. Round went
his arms and his hands, so, and so, and so, and then with a rush
came to the last gesture of all--you stand erect and open out your
arms--and so, don't you know, he stood. And then he didn't! He didn't!
He wasn't! I wheeled round from the looking-glass to him. There was
nothingl I was alone, with the flaring candles and a staggering mind.
What had happened? Had anything happened? Had I been dreaming? . . .
And then, with an absurd note of finality about it, the clock upon
the landing discovered the moment was ripe for striking ONE. So!--Ping!
And I was as grave and sober as a judge, with all my champagne and
whisky gone into the vast serene. Feeling queer, you know--confoundedly
QUEER! Queer! Good Lord!"

He regarded his cigar-ash for a moment. "That's all that happened," he
said.

"And then you went to bed?" asked Evans.

"What else was there to do?"

I looked Wish in the eye. We wanted to scoff, and there was something,
something perhaps in Clayton's voice and manner, that hampered our
desire.

"And about these passes?" said Sanderson.

"I believe I could do them now."

"Oh!" said Sanderson, and produced a penknife and set himself to grub
the dottel out of the bowl of his clay.

"Why don't you do them now?" said Sanderson, shutting his pen-knife
with a click.

"That's what I'm going to do," said Clayton.

"They won't work," said Evans.

"If they do--" I suggested.

"You know, I'd rather you didn't," said Wish, stretching out his legs.

"Why?" asked Evans.

"I'd rather he didn't," said Wish.

"But he hasn't got 'em right," said Sanderson, plugging too much
tobacco in his pipe.

"All the same, I'd rather he didn't," said Wish.

We argued with Wish. He said that for Clayton to go through those
gestures was like mocking a serious matter. "But you don't believe--?"
I said. Wish glanced at Clayton, who was staring into the fire, weighing
something in his mind. "I do--more than half, anyhow, I do," said Wish.

"Clayton," said I, "you're too good a liar for us. Most of it was
all right. But that disappearance . . . happened to be convincing.
Tell us, it's a tale of cock and bull."

He stood up without heeding me, took the middle of the hearthrug,
and faced me. For a moment he regarded his feet thoughtfully, and
then for all the rest of the time his eyes were on the opposite wall,
with an intent expression. He raised his two hands slowly to the level
of his eyes and so began. . . .

Now, Sanderson is a Freemason, a member of the lodge of the Four Kings,
which devotes itself so ably to the study and elucidation of all the
mysteries of Masonry past and present, and among the students of this
lodge Sanderson is by no means the least. He followed Clayton's motions
with a singular interest in his reddish eye. "That's not bad," he said,
when it was done. "You really do, you know, put things together,
Clayton, in a most amazing fashion. But there's one little detail out."

"I know," said Clayton. "I believe I could tell you which."

"Well?"

"This," said Clayton, and did a queer little twist and writhing
and thrust of the hands.

"Yes."

"That, you know, was what HE couldn't get right," said Clayton.
"But how do YOU--?"

"Most of this business, and particularly how you invented it, I don't
understand at all," said Sanderson, "but just that phase--I do."
He reflected. "These happen to be a series of gestures--connected
with a certain branch of esoteric Masonry. Probably you know.
Or else--HOW?" He reflected still further. "I do not see I can do
any harm in telling you just the proper twist. After all, if you know,
you know; if you don't, you don't."

"I know nothing," said Clayton, "except what the poor devil let
out last night."

"Well, anyhow," said Sanderson, and placed his churchwarden very
carefully upon the shelf over the fireplace. Then very rapidly he
gesticulated with his hands.

"So?" said Clayton, repeating.

"So," said Sanderson, and took his pipe in hand again.

"Ah, NOW," said Clayton, "I can do the whole thing--right."

He stood up before the waning fire and smiled at us all. But I think
there was just a little hesitation in his smile. "If I begin--"
he said.

"I wouldn't begin," said Wish.

"It's all right!" said Evans. "Matter is indestructible. You don't
think any jiggery-pokery of this sort is going to snatch Clayton
into the world of shades. Not it! You may try, Clayton, so far as
I'm concerned, until your arms drop off at the wrists."

"I don't believe that," said Wish, and stood up and put his arm
on Clayton's shoulder. "You've made me half believe in that story
somehow, and I don't want to see the thing done!"

"Goodness!" said I, "here's Wish frightened!"

"I am," said Wish, with real or admirably feigned intensity. "I
believe that if he goes through these motions right he'll GO."

"He'll not do anything of the sort," I cried. "There's only one way
out of this world for men, and Clayton is thirty years from that.
Besides . . . And such a ghost! Do you think--?"

Wish interrupted me by moving. He walked out from among our chairs
and stopped beside the tole and stood there. "Clayton," he said,
"you're a fool."

Clayton, with a humorous light in his eyes, smiled back at him.
"Wish," he said, "is right and all you others are wrong. I shall go.
I shall get to the end of these passes, and as the last swish whistles
through the air, Presto!--this hearthrug will be vacant, the room
will be blank amazement, and a respectably dressed gentleman of
fifteen stone will plump into the world of shades. I'm certain.
So will you be. I decline to argue further. Let the thing be tried."

"NO," said Wish, and made a step and ceased, and Clayton raised
his hands once more to repeat the spirit's passing.

By that time, you know, we were all in a state of tension--largely
because of the behaviour of Wish. We sat all of us with our eyes on
Clayton--I, at least, with a sort of tight, stiff feeling about me
as though from the back of my skull to the middle of my thighs my
body had been changed to steel. And there, with a gravity that was
imperturbably serene, Clayton bowed and swayed and waved his hands
and arms before us. As he drew towards the end one piled up, one
tingled in one's teeth. The last gesture, I have said, was to swing
the arms out wide open, with the face held up. And when at last he
swung out to this closing gesture I ceased even to breathe. It was
ridiculous, of course, but you know that ghost-story feeling. It was
after dinner, in a queer, old shadowy house. Would he, after all--?

There he stood for one stupendous moment, with his arms open and his
upturned face, assured and bright, in the glare of the hanging lamp.
We hung through that moment as if it were an age, and then came from
all of us something that was half a sigh of infinite relief and half a
reassuring "NO!" For visibly--he wasn't going. It was all nonsense.
He had told an idle story, and carried it almost to conviction, that
was all! . . . And then in that moment the face of Clayton, changed.

It changed. It changed as a lit house changes when its lights are
suddenly extinguished. His eyes were suddenly eyes that were fixed,
his smile was frozen on his lips, and he stood there still. He stood
there, very gently swaying.

That moment, too, was an age. And then, you know, chairs were scraping,
things were falling, and we were all moving. His knees seemed to give,
and he fell forward, and Evans rose and caught him in his arms. . . .

It stunned us all. For a minute I suppose no one said a coherent
thing. We believed it, yet could not believe it. . . . I came out
of a muddled stupefaction to find myself kneeling beside him,
and his vest and shirt were torn open, and Sanderson's hand lay
on his heart. . . .

Well--the simple fact before us could very well wait our convenience;
there was no hurry for us to comprehend. It lay there for an hour;
it lies athwart my memory, black and amazing still, to this day.
Clayton had, indeed, passed into the world that lies so near to
and so far from our own, and he had gone thither by the only road
that mortal man may take. But whether he did indeed pass there
by that poor ghost's incantation, or whether he was stricken suddenly
by apoplexy in the midst of an idle tale--as the coroner's jury would
have us believe--is no matter for my judging; it is just one of those
inexplicable riddles that must remain unsolved until the final solution
of all things shall come. All I certainly know is that, in the very
moment, in the very instant, of concluding those passes, he changed,
and staggered, and fell down before us--dead!


7.  JIMMY GOGGLES THE GOD

"It isn't every one who's been a god," said the sunburnt man. "But
it's happened to me. Among other things."

I intimated my sense of his condescension.

"It don't leave much for ambition, does it?" said the sunburnt man.

"I was one of those men who were saved from the Ocean Pioneer.
Gummy! how time flies! It's twenty years ago. I doubt if you'll
remember anything of the Ocean Pioneer?"

The name was familiar, and I tried to recall when and where I had
read it. The Ocean Pioneer? "Something about gold dust," I said
vaguely, "but the precise--"

"That's it," he said. "In a beastly little channel she hadn't no
business in--dodging pirates. It was before they'd put the kybosh
on that business. And there'd been volcanoes or something and all
the rocks was wrong. There's places about by Soona where you fair
have to follow the rocks about to see where they're going next.
Down she went in twenty fathoms before you could have dealt for whist,
with fifty thousand pounds worth of gold aboard, it was said,
in one form or another."

"Survivors?"

"Three."

"I remember the case now," I said. "There was something about salvage--"

But at the word salvage the sunburnt man exploded into language so
extraordinarily horrible that I stopped aghast. He came down to more
ordinary swearing, and pulled himself up abruptly. "Excuse me,"
he said, "but--salvage!"

He leant over towards me. "I was in that job," he said. "Tried to make
myself a rich man, and got made a god instead. I've got my feelings--

"It ain't all jam being a god," said the sunburnt man, and for some
time conversed by means of such pithy but unprogressive axioms.
At last he took up his tale again.

"There was me," said the sunburnt man, "and a seaman named Jacobs,
and Always, the mate of the Ocean Pioneer. And him it was that set
the whole thing going. I remember him now, when we was in the
jolly-boat, suggesting it all to our minds just by one sentence.
He was a wonderful hand at suggesting things. 'There was forty
thousand pounds,' he said, 'on that ship, and it's for me to say
just where she went down.' It didn't need much brains to tumble
to that. And he was the leader from the first to the last. He got
hold of the Sanderses and their brig; they were brothers, and
the brig was the Pride of Banya, and he it was bought the diving-dress--
a second-hand one with a compressed air apparatus instead of pumping.
He'd have done the diving too, if it hadn't made him sick going down.
And the salvage people were mucking about with a chart he'd cooked up,
as solemn as could be, at Starr Race, a hundred and twenty miles away.

"I can tell you we was a happy lot aboard that brig, jokes and drink
and bright hopes all the time. It all seemed so neat and clean
and straightforward, and what rough chaps call a 'cert.' And we
used to speculate how the other blessed lot, the proper salvagers,
who'd started two days before us, were getting on, until our sides
fairly ached. We all messed together in the Sanderses' cabin--it
was a curious crew, all officers and no men--and there stood the
diving-dress waiting its turn. Young Sanders was a humorous sort of
chap, and there certainly was something funny in the confounded
thing's great fat head and its stare, and he made us see it too.
'Jimmie Goggles,' he used to call it, and talk to it like a Christian.
Asked if he was married, and how Mrs. Goggles was, and all the little
Goggleses. Fit to make you split. And every blessed day all of us
used to drink the health of Jimmy Goggles in rum, and unscrew his eye
and pour a glass of rum in him, until, instead of that nasty
mackintosheriness, he smelt as nice in his inside as a cask of rum.
It was jolly times we had in those days, I can tell you--little
suspecting, poor chaps! what was a-coming.

"We weren't going to throw away our chances by any blessed hurry,
you know, and we spent a whole day sounding our way towards where
the Ocean Pioneer had gone down, right between two chunks of ropy
grey rock--lava rocks that rose nearly out of the water. We had
to lay off about half a mile to get a safe anchorage, and there was
a thundering row who should stop on board. And there she lay just
as she had gone down, so that you could see the top of the masts
that was still standing perfectly distinctly. The row ending in
all coming in the boat. I went down in the diving-dress on Friday
morning directly it was light.

"What a surprise it was! I can see it all now quite distinctly.
It was a queer-looking place, and the light was just coming. People
over here think every blessed place in the tropics is a flat shore
and palm trees and surf, bless 'em! This place, for instance,
wasn't a bit that way. Not common rocks they were, undermined
by waves; but great curved banks like ironwork cinder heaps,
with green slime below, and thorny shrubs and things just waving
upon them here and there, and the water glassy calm and clear,
and showing you a kind of dirty grey-black shine, with huge flaring
red-brown weeds spreading motionless, and crawling and darting
things going through it. And far away beyond the ditches and pools
and the heaps was a forest on the mountain flank, growing again after
the fires and cinder showers of the last eruption. And the other way
forest, too, and a kind of broken--what is it?--ambytheatre of black
and rusty cinders rising out of it all, and the sea in a kind of bay
in the middle.

"The dawn, I say, was just coming, and there wasn't much colour
about things, and not a human being but ourselves anywhere in sight
up or down the channel. Except the Pride of Banya, lying out beyond
a lump of rocks towards the line of the sea.

"Not a human being in sight," he repeated, and paused.

"I don't know where they came from, not a bit. And we were feeling
so safe that we were all alone that poor young Sanders was a-singing.
I was in Jimmy Goggles, all except the helmet. 'Easy,' says Always,
'there's her mast.' And after I'd had just one squint over the gunwale,
I caught up the bogey and almost tipped out as old Sanders brought
the boat round. When the windows were screwed and everything was
all right, I shut the valve from the air belt in order to help
my sinking, and jumped overboard, feet foremost--for we hadn't
a ladder. I left the boat pitching, and all of them staring down
into the water after me, as my head sank down into the weeds and
blackness that lay about the mast. I suppose nobody, not the most
cautious chap in the world, would have bothered about a lookout
at such a desolate place. It stunk of solitude.

"Of course you must understand that I was a greenhorn at diving.
None of us were divers. We'd had to muck about with the thing to get
the way of it, and this was the first time I'd been deep. It feels
damnable. Your ears hurt beastly. I don't know if you've ever hurt
yourself yawning or sneezing, but it takes you like that, only ten
times worse. And a pain over the eyebrows here--splitting--and a
feeling like influenza in the head. And it isn't all heaven in your
lungs and things. And going down feels like the beginning of a lift,
only it keeps on. And you can't turn your head to see what's above you,
and you can't get a fair squint at what's happening to your feet
without bending down something painful. And being deep it was dark,
let alone the blackness of the ashes and mud that formed the bottom.
It was like going down out of the dawn back into the night, so to speak.

"The mast came up like a ghost out of the black, and then a lot of
fishes, and then a lot of flapping red seaweed, and then whack I came
with a kind of dull bang on the deck of the Ocean Pioneer, and the
fishes that had been feeding on the dead rose about me like a swarm of
flies from road stuff in summer time. I turned on the compressed air
again--for the suit was a bit thick and mackintoshery after all, in
spite of the rum--and stood recovering myself. It struck coolish down
there, and that helped take off the stuffiness a bit.

"When I began to feel easier, I started looking about me. It was
an extraordinary sight. Even the light was extraordinary, a kind
of reddy-coloured twilight, on account of the streamers of seaweed
that floated up on either side of the ship. And far overhead just
a moony, deep green-blue. The deck of the ship, except for a slight
list to starboard, was level, and lay all dark and long between
the weeds, clear except where the masts had snapped when she rolled,
and vanishing into black night towards the forecastle. There wasn't
any dead on the decks, most were in the weeds alongside, I suppose;
but afterwards I found two skeletons lying in the passengers' cabins,
where death had come to them. It was curious to stand on that deck
and recognise it all, bit by bit; a place against the rail where I'd
been fond of smoking by starlight, and the corner where an old chap
from Sydney used to flirt with a widow we had aboard. A comfortable
couple they'd been, only a month ago, and now you couldn't have
got a meal for a baby crab off either of them.

"I've always had a bit of a philosophical turn, and I dare say I
spent the best part of five minutes in such thoughts before I went
below to find where the blessed dust was stored. It was slow work
hunting, feeling it was for the most part, pitchy dark, with confusing
blue gleams down the companion. And there were things moving about,
a dab at my glass once, and once a pinch at my leg. Crabs, I expect.
I kicked a lot of loose stuff that puzzled me, and stooped and
picked up something all knobs and spikes. What do you think?
Backbone! But I never had any particular feeling for bones. We
had talked the affair over pretty thoroughly, and Always knew just
where the stuff was stowed. I found it that trip. I lifted a box
one end an inch or more."

He broke off in his story. "I've lifted it," he said, "as near as
that! Forty thousand pounds worth of pure gold! Gold! I shouted
inside my helmet as a kind of cheer and hurt my ears. I was getting
confounded stuffy and tired by this time--I must have been down
twenty-five minutes or more--and I thought this was good enough.
I went up the companion again, and as my eyes came up flush with
the deck, a thundering great crab gave a kind of hysterical jump
and went scuttling off sideways. Quite a start it gave me. I stood
up clear on deck and shut the valve behind the helmet to let the air
accumulate to carry me up again--I noticed a kind of whacking
from above, as though they were hitting the water with an oar,
but I didn't look up. I fancied they were signalling me to come up.

"And then something shot down by me--something heavy, and stood
a-quiver in the planks. I looked, and there was a long knife I'd
seen young Sanders handling. Thinks I, he's dropped it, and I was
still calling him this kind of fool and that--for it might have hurt
me serious--when I began to lift and drive up towards the daylight.
Just about the level of the top spars of the Ocean Pioneer, whack!
I came against something sinking down, and a boot knocked in front
of my helmet. Then something else, struggling frightful. It was
a big weight atop of me, whatever it was, and moving and twisting
about. I'd have thought it a big octopus, or some such thing, if it
hadn't been for the boot. But octopuses don't wear boots. It was
all in a moment, of course. I felt myself sinking down again, and
I threw my arms about to keep steady, and the whole lot rolled
free of me and shot down as I went up--"

He paused.

"I saw young Sanders's face, over a naked black shoulder, and a spear
driven clean through his neck, and out of his mouth and neck what
looked like spirts of pink smoke in the water. And down they went
clutching one another, and turning over, and both too far gone
to leave go. And in another second my helmet came a whack, fit
to split, against the niggers' canoe. It was niggers! Two canoes full.

"It was lively times, I tell you! Overboard came Always with three
spears in him. There was the legs of three or four black chaps
kicking about me in the water. I couldn't see much, but I saw
the game was up at a glance, gave my valve a tremendous twist,
and went bubbling down again after poor Always, in as awful a state
of scare and astonishment as you can well imagine. I passed young
Sanders and the nigger going up again and struggling still a bit,
and in another moment I was standing in the dim again on the deck
of the Ocean Pioneer.

"'Gummy,' thinks I, 'here's a fix!' Niggers? At first I couldn't see
anything for it but Stifle below or Stabs above. I didn't properly
understand how much air there was to last me, but I didn't feel like
standing very much more of it down below. I was hot and frightfully
heady--quite apart from the blue funk I was in. We'd never repined
with these beastly natives, filthy Papuan beasts. It wasn't any good,
coming up where I was, but I had to do something. On the spur
of the moment, I clambered over the side of the brig and landed
among the weeds, and set off through the darkness as fast as I could.
I just stopped once and knelt, and twisted back my head in the helmet
and had a look up. It was a most extraordinary bright green-blue above,
and the two canoes and the boat floating there very small and distant
like a kind of twisted H. And it made me feel sick to squint up at it,
and think what the pitching and swaying of the three meant.

"It was just about the most horrible ten minutes I ever had, blundering
about in that darkness, pressure something awful, like being buried
in sand, pain across the chest, sick with funk, and breathing nothing
as it seemed but the smell of rum and mackintosh. Gummy! After a bit,
I found myself going up a steepish sort of slope. I had another
squint to see if anything was visible of the canoes and boats,
and then kept on. I stopped with my head a foot from the surface,
and tried to see where I was going, but, of course, nothing was
to be seen but the reflection of the bottom. Then out I dashed like
knocking my head through a mirror. Directly I got my eyes out of
the water, I saw I'd come up a kind of beach near the forest. I had a
look round, but the natives and the brig were both hidden by a big,
hummucky heap of twisted lava, the born fool in me suggested a run
for the woods. I didn't take the helmet off, but eased open one of
the windows, and, after a bit of a pant, went on out of the water.
You'd hardly imagine how clean and light the air tasted.

"Of course, with four inches of lead in your boot soles, and your
head in a copper knob the size of a football, and been thirty-five
minutes under water, you don't break any records running. I ran like
a ploughboy going to work. And half way to the trees I saw a dozen
niggers or more, coming out in a gaping, astonished sort of way
to meet me.

"I just stopped dead, and cursed myself for all the fools out of
London. I had about as much chance of cutting back to the water as
a turned turtle. I just screwed up my window again to leave my hands
free, and waited for them. There wasn't anything else for me to do.

"But they didn't come on very much. I began to suspect why. 'Jimmy
Goggles,' I says, 'it's your beauty does it.' I was inclined to be a
little light-headed, I think, with all these dangers about and the
change in the pressure of the blessed air. 'Who're ye staring at?' I
said, as if the savages could hear me. 'What d'ye take me for? I'm
hanged if I don't give you something to stare at,' I said, and with
that I screwed up the escape valve and turned on the compressed air
from the belt, until I was swelled out like a blown frog. Regular
imposing it must have been. I'm blessed if they'd come on a step;
and presently one and then another went down on their hands and knees.
They didn't know what to make of me, and they was doing the extra
polite, which was very wise and reasonable of them. I had half a mind
to edge back seaward and cut and run, but it seemed too hopeless. A
step back and they'd have been after me. And out of sheer desperation
I began to march towards them up the beach, with slow, heavy steps,
and waving my blown-out arms about, in a dignified manner. And inside
of me I was singing as small as a tomtit.

"But there's nothing like a striking appearance to help a man over a
difficulty,--I've found that before and since. People like ourselves,
who're up to diving-dresses by the time we're seven, can scarcely
imagine the effect of one on a simple-minded savage. One or two
of these niggers cut and run, the others started in a great hurry
trying to knock their brains out on the ground. And on I went as
slow and solemn and silly-looking and artful as a jobbing plumber.
It was evident they took me for something immense.

"Then up jumped one and began pointing, making extraordinary gestures
to me as he did so, and all the others began sharing their attention
between me and something out at sea. 'What's the matter now?' I said.
I turned slowly on account of my dignity, and there I saw, coming
round a point, the poor old Pride of Banya towed by a couple of canoes.
The sight fairly made me sick. But they evidently expected some
recognition, so I waved my arms in a striking sort of non-committal
manner. And then I turned and stalked on towards the trees again.
At that time I was praying like mad, I remember, over and over again:
'Lord help me through with it! Lord help me through with it!' It's
only fools who know nothing of dangers can afford to laugh at praying.

"But these niggers weren't going to let me walk through and away
like that. They started a kind of bowing dance about me, and sort of
pressed me to take a pathway that lay through the trees. It was
clear to me they didn't take me for a British citizen, whatever
else they thought of me, and for my own part I was never less anxious
to own up to the old country.

"You'd hardly believe it, perhaps, unless you're familiar with
savages, but these poor misguided, ignorant creatures took me
straight to their kind of joss place to present me to the blessed
old black stone there. By this time I was beginning to sort of realise
the depth of their ignorance, and directly I set eyes on this deity
I took my cue. I started a baritone howl, 'wow-wow,' very long
on one note, and began waving my arms about a lot, and then very
slowly and ceremoniously turned their image over on its side and
sat down on it. I wanted to sit down badly, for diving-dresses ain't
much wear in the tropics. Or, to put it different like, they're
a sight too much. It took away their breath, I could see, my sitting
on their joss, but in less time than a minute they made up their
minds and were hard at work worshipping me. And I can tell you
I felt a bit relieved to see things turning out so well, in spite
of the weight on my shoulders and feet.

"But what made me anxious was what the chaps in the canoes might
think when they came back. If they'd seen me in the boat before
I went down, and without the helmet on--for they might have been
spying and hiding since over night--they would very likely take
a different view from the others. I was in a deuce of a stew about
that for hours, as it seemed, until the shindy of the arrival began.

"But they took it down--the whole blessed village took it down.
At the cost of sitting up stiff and stern, as much like those sitting
Egyptian images one sees as I could manage, for pretty nearly
twelve hours, I should guess at least, on end, I got over it. You'd
hardly think what it meant in that heat and stink. I don't think
any of them dreamt of the man inside. I was just a wonderful leathery
great joss that had come up with luck out of the water. But the fatigue!
the heat! the beastly closeness! the mackintosheriness and the rum!
and the fuss! They lit a stinking fire on a kind of lava slab there
was before me, and brought in a lot of gory muck--the worst parts
of what they were feasting on outside, the Beasts--and burnt it
all in my honour. I was getting a bit hungry, but I understand now
how gods manage to do without eating, what with the smell of burnt
offerings about them. And they brought in a lot of the stuff they'd
got off the brig and, among other stuff, what I was a bit relieved
to see, the kind of pneumatic pump that was used for the compressed
air affair, and then a lot of chaps and girls came in and danced
about me something disgraceful. It's extraordinary the different ways
different people have of showing respect. If I'd had a hatchet handy
I'd have gone for the lot of them--they made me feel that wild.
All this time I sat as stiff as company, not knowing anything better
to do. And at last, when nightfall came, and the wattle joss-house
place got a bit too shadowy for their taste--all these here savages
are afraid of the dark, you know--and I started a sort of 'Moo' noise,
they built big bonfires outside and left me alone in peace in the
darkness of my hut, free to unscrew my windows a bit and think
things over, and feel just as bad as I liked. And, Lord! I was sick.

"I was weak and hungry, and my mind kept on behaving like a beetle
on a pin, tremendous activity and nothing done at the end of it.
Come round just where it was before. There was sorrowing for the other
chaps, beastly drunkards certainly, but not deserving such a fate,
and young Sanders with the spear through his neck wouldn't go out
of my mind. There was the treasure down there in the Ocean Pioneer,
and how one might get it and hide it somewhere safer, and get away
and come back for it. And there was the puzzle where to get anything
to eat. I tell you I was fair rambling. I was afraid to ask by signs
for food, for fear of behaving too human, and so there I sat and
hungered until very near the dawn. Then the village got a bit quiet,
and I couldn't stand it any longer, and I went out and got some stuff
like artichokes in a bowl and some sour milk. What was left of these
I put away among the other offerings, just to give them a hint
of my tastes. And in the morning they came to worship, and found
me sitting up stiff and respectable on their previous god, just as
they'd left me overnight. I'd got my back against the central pillar
of the hut, and, practically, I was asleep. And that's how I became
a god among the heathen--a false god no doubt, and blasphemous,
but one can't always pick and choose.

"Now, I don't want to crack myself up as a god beyond my merits,
but I must confess that while I was god to these people they was
extraordinary successful. I don't say there's anything in it,
mind you. They won a battle with another tribe--I got a lot of
offerings I didn't want through it--they had wonderful fishing,
and their crop of pourra was exceptional fine. And they counted
the capture of the brig among the benefits I brought 'em. I must
say I don't think that was a poor record for a perfectly new hand.
And, though perhaps you'd scarcely credit it, I was the tribal god
of those beastly savages for pretty nearly four months. . . .

"What else could I do, man? But I didn't wear that diving-dress
all the time. I made 'em rig me up a sort of holy of holies, and
a deuce of a time I had too, making them understand what it was
I wanted them to do. That indeed was the great difficulty--making
them understand my wishes. I couldn't let myself down by talking their
lingo badly--even if I'd been able to speak at all--and I couldn't
go flapping a lot of gestures at them. So I drew pictures in sand
and sat down beside them and hooted like one o'clock. Sometimes
they did the things I wanted all right, and sometimes they did them
all wrong. They was always very willing, certainly. All the while
I was puzzling how I was to get the confounded business settled.
Every night before the dawn I used to march out in full rig and go off
to a place where I could see the channel in which the Ocean Pioneer
lay sunk, and once even, one moonlight night, I tried to walk out
to her, but the weeds and rocks and dark clean beat me. I didn't get
back till full day, and then I found all those silly niggers out on
the beach praying their sea-god to return to them. I was that vexed
and tired, messing and tumbling about, and coming up and going down
again, I could have punched their silly heads all round when they
started rejoicing. I'm hanged if I like so much ceremony.

"And then came the missionary. That missionary! It was in the afternoon,
and I was sitting in state in my outer temple place, sitting on
that old black stone of theirs when he came. I heard a row outside
and jabbering, and then his voice speaking to an interpreter.
'They worship stocks and stones,' he said, and I knew what was up,
in a flash. I had one of my windows out for comfort, and I sang out
straight away on the spur of the moment. 'Stocks and stones!' I says.
'You come inside,' I says, 'and I'll punch your blooming head.'
There was a kind of silence and more jabbering, and in he came,
Bible in hand, after the manner of them--a little sandy chap in specks
and a pith helmet. I flatter myself that me sitting there in
the shadows, with my copper head and my big goggles, struck him
a bit of a heap at first. 'Well,' I says, 'how's the trade in calico?'
for I don't hold with missionaries.

"I had a lark with that missionary. He was a raw hand, and quite
outclassed with a man like me. He gasped out who was I, and I told
him to read the inscription at my feet if he wanted to know. Down
he goes to read, and his interpreter, being of course as superstitious
as any of them, took it as an act of worship and plumped down like
a shot. All my people gave a howl of triumph, and there wasn't
any more business to be done in my village after that journey,
not by the likes of him.

"But, of course, I was a fool to choke him off like that. If I'd had
any sense I should have told him straight away of the treasure
and taken him into Co. I've no doubt he'd have come into Co. A child,
with a few hours to think it over, could have seen the connection
between my diving-dress and the loss of the Ocean Pioneer. A week
after he left I went out one morning and saw the Motherhood, the
salver's ship from Starr Race, towing up the channel and sounding.
The whole blessed game was up, and all my trouble thrown away. Gummy!
How wild I felt! And guying it in that stinking silly dress! Four
months!"

The sunburnt man's story degenerated again. "Think of it," he said,
when he emerged to linguistic purity once more. "Forty thousand
pounds worth of gold."

"Did the little missionary come back?" I asked.

"Oh, yes! Bless him! And he pledged his reputation there was a man
inside the god, and started out to see as much with tremendous
ceremony. But there wasn't--he got sold again. I always did hate
scenes and explanations, and long before he came I was out of it
all--going home to Banya along the coast, hiding in bushes by day,
and thieving food from the villages by night. Only weapon, a spear.
No clothes, no money. Nothing. My face was my fortune, as the saying
is. And just a squeak of eight thousand pounds of gold--fifth share.
But the natives cut up rusty, thank goodness, because they thought
it was him had driven their luck away."


8.  THE NEW ACCELERATOR

Certainly, if ever a man found a guinea when he was looking for a pin
it is my good friend Professor Gibberne. I have heard before of
investigators overshooting the mark, but never quite to the extent
that he has done. He has really, this time at any rate, without any
touch of exaggeration in the phrase, found something to revolutionise
human life. And that when he was simply seeking an all-round nervous
stimulant to bring languid people up to the stresses of these pushful
days. I have tasted the stuff now several times, and I cannot do
better than describe the effect the thing had on me. That there are
astonishing experiences in store for all in search of new sensations
will become apparent enough.

Professor Gibberne, as many people know, is my neighbour in Folkestone.
Unless my memory plays me a trick, his portrait at various ages
has already appeared in The Strand Magazine--I think late in 1899;
but I am unable to look it up because I have lent that volume to
some one who has never sent it back. The reader may, perhaps,
recall the high forehead and the singularly long black eyebrows
that give such a Mephistophelian touch to his face. He occupies one
of those pleasant little detached houses in the mixed style that
make the western end of the Upper Sandgate Road so interesting.
His is the one with the Flemish gables and the Moorish portico,
and it is in the little room with the mullioned bay window that
he works when he is down here, and in which of an evening we have
so often smoked and talked together. He is a mighty jester, but,
besides, he likes to talk to me about his work; he is one of those
men who find a help and stimulus in talking, and so I have been
able to follow the conception of the New Accelerator right up from
a very early stage. Of course, the greater portion of his experimental
work is not done in Folkestone, but in Gower Street, in the fine
new laboratory next to the hospital that he has been the first to use.

As every one knows, or at least as all intelligent people know,
the special department in which Gibberne has gained so great
and deserved a reputation among physiologists is the action of drugs
upon the nervous system. Upon soporifics, sedatives, and anaesthetics
he is, I am told, unequalled. He is also a chemist of considerable
eminence, and I suppose in the subtle and complex jungle of riddles
that centres about the ganglion cell and the axis fibre there are
little cleared places of his making, little glades of illumination,
that, until he sees fit to publish his results, are still inaccessible
to every other living man. And in the last few years he has been
particularly assiduous upon this question of nervous stimulants,
and already, before the discovery of the New Accelerator, very
successful with them. Medical science has to thank him for at least
three distinct and absolutely safe invigorators of unrivalled value
to practising men. In cases of exhaustion the preparation known
as Gibberne's B Syrup has, I suppose, saved more lives already
than any lifeboat round the coast.

"But none of these little things begin to satisfy me yet," he told
me nearly a year ago. "Either they increase the central energy
without affecting the nerves or they simply increase the available
energy by lowering the nervous conductivity; and all of them are
unequal and local in their operation. One wakes up the heart and
viscera and leaves the brain stupefied, one gets at the brain
champagne fashion and does nothing good for the solar plexus, and
what I want--and what, if it's an earthly possibility, I mean to have--
is a stimulant that stimulates all round, that wakes you up for
a time from the crown of your head to the tip of your great toe,
and makes you go two--or even three--to everybody else's one. Eh?
That's the thing I'm after."

"It would tire a man," I said.

"Not a doubt of it. And you'd eat double or treble--and all that.
But just think what the thing would mean. Imagine yourself with
a little phial like this"--he held up a little bottle of green glass
and marked his points with it--"and in this precious phial is
the power to think twice as fast, move twice as quickly, do twice
as much work in a given time as you could otherwise do."

"But is such a thing possible?"

"I believe so. If it isn't, I've wasted my time for a year. These
various preparations of the hypophosphites, for example, seem
to show that something of the sort . . . Even if it was only one
and a half times as fast it would do."

"It WOULD do," I said.

"If you were a statesman in a corner, for example, time rushing up
against you, something urgent to be done, eh?"

"He could dose his private secretary," I said.

"And gain--double time. And think if YOU, for example, wanted
to finish a book."

"Usually," I said, "I wish I'd never begun 'em."

"Or a doctor, driven to death, wants to sit down and think out
a case. Or a barrister--or a man cramming for an examination."

"Worth a guinea a drop," said I, "and more to men like that."

"And in a duel, again," said Gibberne, "where it all depends on
your quickness in pulling the trigger."

"Or in fencing," I echoed.

"You see," said Gibberne, "if I get it as an all-round thing it will
really do you no harm at all--except perhaps to an infinitesimal
degree it brings you nearer old age. You will just have lived twice
to other people's once--"

"I suppose," I meditated, "in a duel--it would be fair?"

"That's a question for the seconds," said Gibberne.

I harked back further. "And you really think such a thing IS
possible?" I said.

"As possible," said Gibberne, and glanced at something that went
throbbing by the window, "as a motor-bus. As a matter of fact--"

He paused and smiled at me deeply, and tapped slowly on the edge
of his desk with the green phial. "I think I know the stuff. . . . 
Already I've got something coming." The nervous smile upon his
face betrayed the gravity of his revelation. He rarely talked of
his actual experimental work unless things were very near the end.
"And it may be, it may be--I shouldn't be surprised--it may even
do the thing at a greater rate than twice."

"It will be rather a big thing," I hazarded.

"It will be, I think, rather a big thing."

But I don't think he quite knew what a big thing it was to be, for
all that.

I remember we had several talks about the stuff after that. "The New
Accelerator" he called it, and his tone about it grew more confident
on each occasion. Sometimes he talked nervously of unexpected
physiological results its use might have, and then he would get
a little unhappy; at others he was frankly mercenary, and we debated
long and anxiously how the preparation might be turned to commercial
account. "It's a good thing," said Gibberne, "a tremendous thing.
I know I'm giving the world something, and I think it only reasonable
we should expect the world to pay. The dignity of science is all
very well, but I think somehow I must have the monopoly of the stuff
for, say, ten years. I don't see why ALL the fun in life should go
to the dealers in ham."

My own interest in the coming drug certainly did not wane in the time.
I have always had a queer little twist towards metaphysics in my
mind. I have always been given to paradoxes about space and time,
and it seemed to me that Gibberne was really preparing no less
than the absolute acceleration of life. Suppose a man repeatedly
dosed with such a preparation: he would live an active and record
life indeed, but he would be an adult at eleven, middle-aged at
twenty-five, and by thirty well on the road to senile decay. It seemed
to me that so far Gibberne was only going to do for any one who
took his drug exactly what Nature has done for the Jews and Orientals,
who are men in their teens and aged by fifty, and quicker in thought
and act than we are all the time. The marvel of drugs has always
been great to my mind; you can madden a man, calm a man, make him
incredibly strong and alert or a helpless log, quicken this passion
and allay that, all by means of drugs, and here was a new miracle
to be added to this strange armoury of phials the doctors use!
But Gibberne was far too eager upon his technical points to enter
very keenly into my aspect of the question.

It was the 7th or 8th of August when he told me the distillation
that would decide his failure or success for a time was going forward
as we talked, and it was on the 10th that he told me the thing was
done and the New Accelerator a tangible reality in the world. I met
him as I was going up the Sandgate Hill towards Folkestone--I think
I was going to get my hair cut, and he came hurrying down to meet
me--I suppose he was coming to my house to tell me at once of his
success. I remember that his eyes were unusually bright and his face
flushed, and I noted even then the swift alacrity of his step.

"It's done," he cried, and gripped my hand, speaking very fast;
"it's more than done. Come up to my house and see."

"Really?"

"Really!" he shouted. "Incredibly! Come up and see."

"And it does--twice?

"It does more, much more. It scares me. Come up and see the stuff.
Taste it! Try it! It's the most amazing stuff on earth." He gripped
my arm and, walking at such a pace that he forced me into a trot,
went shouting with me up the hill. A whole char-a-banc-ful of people
turned and stared at us in unison after the manner of people in
chars-a-banc. It was one of those hot, clear days that Folkestone
sees so much of, every colour incredibly bright and every outline
hard. There was a breeze, of course, but not so much breeze as
sufficed under these conditions to keep me cool and dry. I panted for
mercy.

"I'm not walking fast, am I?" cried Gibberne, and slackened his pace
to a quick march.

"You've been taking some of this stuff," I puffed.

"No," he said. "At the utmost a drop of water that stood in a beaker
from which I had washed out the last traces of the stuff. I took
some last night, you know. But that is ancient history, now."

"And it goes twice?" I said, nearing his doorway in a grateful
perspiration.

"It goes a thousand times, many thousand times!" cried Gibberne, with
a dramatic gesture, flinging open his Early English carved oak gate.

"Phew!" said I, and followed him to the door.

"I don't know how many times it goes," he said, with his latch-key
in his hand.

"And you--"

"It throws all sorts of light on nervous physiology, it kicks the theory
of vision into a perfectly new shape! . . . Heaven knows how many
thousand times. We'll try all that after--The thing is to try the stuff
now."

"Try the stuff?" I said, as we went along the passage.

"Rather," said Gibberne, turning on me in his study. "There it is
in that little green phial there! Unless you happen to be afraid?"

I am a careful man by nature, and only theoretically adventurous.
I WAS afraid. But on the other hand there is pride.

"Well," I haggled. "You say you've tried it?"

"I've tried it," he said, "and I don't look hurt by it, do I?
I don't even look livery and I FEEL--"

I sat down. "Give me the potion," I said. "If the worst comes to
the worst it will save having my hair cut, and that I think is one
of the most hateful duties of a civilised man. How do you take the
mixture?"

"With water," said Gibberne, whacking down a carafe.

He stood up in front of his desk and regarded me in his easy chair;
his manner was suddenly affected by a touch of the Harley Street
specialist. "It's rum stuff, you know," he said.

I made a gesture with my hand.

"I must warn you in the first place as soon as you've got it down
to shut your eyes, and open them very cautiously in a minute or so's
time. One still sees. The sense of vision is a question of length
of vibration, and not of multitude of impacts; but there's a kind
of shock to the retina, a nasty giddy confusion just at the time,
if the eyes are open. Keep 'em shut."

"Shut," I said. "Good!"

"And the next thing is, keep still. Don't begin to whack about.
You may fetch something a nasty rap if you do. Remember you will
be going several thousand times faster than you ever did before,
heart, lungs, muscles, brain--everything--and you will hit hard
without knowing it. You won't know it, you know. You'll feel just
as you do now. Only everything in the world will seem to be going
ever so many thousand times slower than it ever went before. That's
what makes it so deuced queer."

"Lor'," I said. "And you mean--"

"You'll see," said he, and took up a little measure. He glanced
at the material on his desk. "Glasses," he said, "water. All here.
Mustn't take too much for the first attempt."

The little phial glucked out its precious contents.

"Don't forget what I told you," he said, turning the contents of
the measure into a glass in the manner of an Italian waiter measuring
whisky. "Sit with the eyes tightly shut and in absolute stillness
for two minutes," he said. "Then you will hear me speak."

He added an inch or so of water to the little dose in each glass.

"By-the-by," he said, "don't put your glass down. Keep it in your
hand and rest your hand on your knee. Yes--so. And now--"

He raised his glass.

"The New Accelerator," I said.

"The New Accelerator," he answered, and we touched glasses and
drank, and instantly I closed my eyes.

You know that blank non-existence into which one drops when one
has taken "gas." For an indefinite interval it was like that. Then
I heard Gibberne telling me to wake up, and I stirred and opened
my eyes. There he stood as he had been standing, glass still
in hand. It was empty, that was all the difference.

"Well?" said I.

"Nothing out of the way?"

"Nothing. A slight feeling of exhilaration, perhaps. Nothing more."

"Sounds?"

"Things are still," I said. "By Jove! yes! They ARE still. Except the
sort of faint pat, patter, like rain falling on different things.
What is it?"

"Analysed sounds," I think he said, but I am not sure. He glanced
at the window. "Have you ever seen a curtain before a window fixed
in that way before?"

I followed his eyes, and there was the end of the curtain, frozen,
as it were, corner high, in the act of flapping briskly in the breeze.

"No," said I; "that's odd."

"And here," he said, and opened the hand that held the glass. Naturally
I winced, expecting the glass to smash. But so far from smashing
it did not even seem to stir; it hung in mid-air--motionless.

"Roughly speaking," said Gibberne, "an object in these latitudes
falls 16 feet in the first second. This glass is falling 16 feet in
a second now. Only, you see, it hasn't been falling yet for the
hundredth part of a second. That gives you some idea of the pace
of my Accelerator." And he waved his hand round and round, over and
under the slowly sinking glass. Finally, he took it by the bottom,
pulled it down, and placed it very carefully on the table. "Eh?"
he said to me, and laughed.

"That seems all right," I said, and began very gingerly to raise
myself from my chair. I felt perfectly well, very light and
comfortable, and quite confident in my mind. I was going fast all
over. My heart, for example, was beating a thousand times a second,
but that caused me no discomfort at all. I looked out of the window.
An immovable cyclist, head down and with a frozen puff of dust
behind his driving-wheel, scorched to overtake a galloping char-a-banc
that did not stir. I gaped in amazement at this incredible spectacle.
"Gibberne," I cried, "how long will this confounded stuff last?"

"Heaven knows!" he answered. "Last time I took it I went to bed
and slept it off. I tell you, I was frightened. It must have lasted
some minutes, I think--it seemed like hours. But after a bit it
slows down rather suddenly, I believe."

I was proud to observe that I did not feel frightened--I suppose
because there were two of us. "Why shouldn't we go out?" I asked.

"Why not?"

"They'll see us."

"Not they. Goodness, no! Why, we shall be going a thousand times
faster than the quickest conjuring trick that was ever done. Come
along! Which way shall we go? Window, or door?"

And out by the window we went.

Assuredly of all the strange experiences that I have ever had,
or imagined, or read of other people having or imagining, that little
raid I made with Gibberne on the Folkestone Leas, under the influence
of the New Accelerator, was the strangest and maddest of all.
We went out by his gate into the road, and there we made a minute
examination of the statuesque passing traffic. The tops of the wheels
and some of the legs of the horses of this char-a-banc, the end
of the whip-lash and the lower jaw of the conductor--who was just
beginning to yawn--were perceptibly in motion, but all the rest
of the lumbering conveyance seemed still. And quite noiseless except
for a faint rattling that came from one man's throat! And as parts
of this frozen edifice there were a driver, you know, and a conductor,
and eleven people! The effect as we walked about the thing began
by being madly queer, and ended by being disagreeable. There they
were, people like ourselves and yet not like ourselves, frozen
in careless attitudes, caught in mid-gesture. A girl and a man
smiled at one another, a leering smile that threatened to last
for evermore; a woman in a floppy capelline rested her arm on
the rail and stared at Gibberne's house with the unwinking stare
of eternity; a man stroked his moustache like a figure of wax,
and another stretched a tiresome stiff hand with extended fingers
towards his loosened hat. We stared at them, we laughed at them,
we made faces at them, and then a sort of disgust of them came upon
us, and we turned away and walked round in front of the cyclist
towards the Leas.

"Goodness!" cried Gibberne, suddenly; "look there!"

He pointed, and there at the tip of his finger and sliding down the
air with wings flapping slowly and at the speed of an exceptionally
languid snail--was a bee.

And so we came out upon the Leas. There the thing seemed madder
than ever. The band was playing in the upper stand, though all
the sound it made for us was a low-pitched, wheezy rattle, a sort of
prolonged last sigh that passed at times into a sound like the slow,
muffled ticking of some monstrous clock. Frozen people stood erect,
strange, silent, self-conscious-looking dummies hung unstably in
mid-stride, promenading upon the grass. I passed close to a little
poodle dog suspended in the act of leaping, and watched the slow
movement of his legs as he sank to earth. "Lord, look here!" cried
Gibberne, and we halted for a moment before a magnificent person
in white faint-striped flannels, white shoes, and a Panama hat,
who turned back to wink at two gaily dressed ladies he had passed.
A wink, studied with such leisurely deliberation as we could afford,
is an unattractive thing. It loses any quality of alert gaiety,
and one remarks that the winking eye does not completely close,
that under its drooping lid appears the lower edge of an eyeball
and a little line of white. "Heaven give me memory," said I,
"and I will never wink again."

"Or smile," said Gibberne, with his eye on the lady's answering teeth.

"It's infernally hot, somehow," said I. "Let's go slower."

"Oh, come along!" said Gibberne.

We picked our way among the bath-chairs in the path. Many of
the people sitting in the chairs seemed almost natural in their
passive poses, but the contorted scarlet of the bandsmen was not
a restful thing to see. A purple-faced little gentleman was frozen
in the midst of a violent struggle to refold his newspaper against
the wind; there were many evidences that all these people in their
sluggish way were exposed to a considerable breeze, a breeze that
had no existence so far as our sensations went. We came out and
walked a little way from the crowd, and turned and regarded it.
To see all that multitude changed, to a picture, smitten rigid,
as it were, into the semblance of realistic wax, was impossibly
wonderful. It was absurd, of course; but it filled me with an irrational,
an exultant sense of superior advantage. Consider the wonder of it!
All that I had said, and thought, and done since the stuff had begun
to work in my veins had happened, so far as those people, so far
as the world in general went, in the twinkling of an eye. "The
New Accelerator--" I began, but Gibberne interrupted me.

"There's that infernal old woman!" he said.

"What old woman?"

"Lives next door to me," said Gibberne. "Has a lapdog that yaps.
Gods! The temptation is strong!"

There is something very boyish and impulsive about Gibberne at times.
Before I could expostulate with him he had dashed forward, snatched
the unfortunate animal out of visible existence, and was running
violently with it towards the cliff of the Leas. It was most
extraordinary. The little brute, you know, didn't bark or wriggle or
make the slightest sign of vitality. It kept quite stiffly in an
attitude of somnolent repose, and Gibberne held it by the neck. It
was like running about with a dog of wood. "Gibberne," I cried, "put
it down!" Then I said something else. "If you run like that,
Gibberne," I cried, "you'll set your clothes on fire. Your linen
trousers are going brown as it is!"

He clapped his hand on his thigh and stood hesitating on the verge.
"Gibberne," I cried, coming up, "put it down. This heat is too much!
It's our running so! Two or three miles a second! Friction of the air!"

"What?" he said, glancing at the dog.

"Friction of the air," I shouted. "Friction of the air. Going too
fast. Like meteorites and things. Too hot. And, Gibberne! Gibberne!
I'm all over pricking and a sort of perspiration. You can see people
stirring slightly. I believe the stuff's working off! Put that dog
down."

"Eh?" he said.

"It's working off," I repeated. "We're too hot and the stuff's
working off! I'm wet through."

He stared at me. Then at the band, the wheezy rattle of whose
performance was certainly going faster. Then with a tremendous sweep
of the arm he hurled the dog away from him and it went spinning
upward, still inanimate, and hung at last over the grouped parasols
of a knot of chattering people. Gibberne was gripping my elbow.
"By Jove!" he cried. "I believe--it is! A sort of hot pricking
and--yes. That man's moving his pocket-handkerchief! Perceptibly.
We must get out of this sharp."

But we could not get out of it sharply enough. Luckily, perhaps!
For we might have run, and if we had run we should, I believe,
have burst into flames. Almost certainly we should have burst into
flames! You know we had neither of us thought of that. . . . But
before we could even begin to run the action of the drug had ceased.
It was the business of a minute fraction of a second. The effect of
the New Accelerator passed like the drawing of a curtain, vanished in
the movement of a hand. I heard Gibberne's voice in infinite alarm.
"Sit down," he said, and flop, down upon the turf at the edge of the
Leas I sat--scorching as I sat. There is a patch of burnt grass
there still where I sat down. The whole stagnation seemed to wake
up as I did so, the disarticulated vibration of the band rushed
together into a blast of music, the promenaders put their feet down
and walked their ways, the papers and flags began flapping, smiles
passed into words, the winker finished his wink and went on his
way complacently, and all the seated people moved and spoke.

The whole world had come alive again, was going as fast as we were,
or rather we were going no faster than the rest of the world. It was
like slowing down as one comes into a railway station. Everything
seemed to spin round for a second or two, I had the most transient
feeling of nausea, and that was all. And the little dog which had
seemed to hang for a moment when the force of Gibberne's arm was
expended fell with a swift acceleration clean through a lady's parasol!

That was the saving of us. Unless it was for one corpulent old
gentleman in a bath-chair, who certainly did start at the sight of
us and afterwards regarded us at intervals with a darkly suspicious
eye, and, finally, I believe, said something to his nurse about us,
I doubt if a solitary person remarked our sudden appearance among
them. Plop! We must have appeared abruptly. We ceased to smoulder
almost at once, though the turf beneath me was uncomfortably hot. The
attention of every one--including even the Amusements' Association
band, which on this occasion, for the only time in its history,
got out of tune--was arrested by the amazing fact, and the still
more amazing yapping and uproar caused by the fact that a respectable,
over-fed lap-dog sleeping quietly to the east of the bandstand
should suddenly fall through the parasol of a lady on the west--in
a slightly singed condition due to the extreme velocity of its
movements through the air. In these absurd days, too, when we are
all trying to be as psychic, and silly, and superstitious as possible!
People got up and trod on other people, chairs were overturned,
the Leas policeman ran. How the matter settled itself I do not
know--we were much too anxious to disentangle ourselves from
the affair and get out of range of the eye of the old gentleman
in the bath-chair to make minute inquiries. As soon as we were
sufficiently cool and sufficiently recovered from our giddiness
and nausea and confusion of mind to do so we stood up and, skirting
the crowd, directed our steps back along the road below the Metropole
towards Gibberne's house. But amidst the din I heard very distinctly
the gentleman who had been sitting beside the lady of the ruptured
sunshade using quite unjustifiable threats and language to one of
those chair-attendants who have "Inspector" written on their caps.
"If you didn't throw the dog," he said, "who DID?"

The sudden return of movement and familiar noises, and our natural
anxiety about ourselves (our clothe's were still dreadfully hot,
and the fronts of the thighs of Gibberne's white trousers were
scorched a drabbish brown), prevented the minute observations
I should have liked to make on all these things. Indeed, I really
made no observations of any scientific value on that return. The bee,
of course, had gone. I looked for that cyclist, but he was already
out of sight as we came into the Upper Sandgate Road or hidden
from us by traffic; the char-a-banc, however, with its people now
all alive and stirring, was clattering along at a spanking pace
almost abreast of the nearer church.

We noted, however, that the window-sill on which we had stepped
in getting out of the house was slightly singed, and that the
impressions of our feet on the gravel of the path were unusually deep.

So it was I had my first experience of the New Accelerator. Practically
we had been running about and saying and doing all sorts of things
in the space of a second or so of time. We had lived half an hour
while the band had played, perhaps, two bars. But the effect it
had upon us was that the whole world had stopped for our convenient
inspection. Considering all things, and particularly considering our
rashness in venturing out of the house, the experience might certainly
have been much more disagreeable than it was. It showed, no doubt,
that Gibberne has still much to learn before his preparation is
a manageable convenience, but its practicability it certainly
demonstrated beyond all cavil.

Since that adventure he has been steadily bringing its use under
control, and I have several times, and without the slightest bad
result, taken measured doses under his direction; though I must
confess I have not yet ventured abroad again while under its influence.
I may mention, for example, that this story has been written at one
sitting and without interruption, except for the nibbling of some
chocolate, by its means. I began at 6.25, and my watch is now very
nearly at the minute past the half-hour. The convenience of securing
a long, uninterrupted spell of work in the midst of a day full
of engagements cannot be exaggerated. Gibberne is now working
at the quantitative handling of his preparation, with especial reference
to its distinctive effects upon different types of constitution.
He then hopes to find a Retarder with which to dilute its present
rather excessive potency. The Retarder will, of course, have the
reverse effect to the Accelerator; used alone it should enable
the patient to spread a few seconds over many hours of ordinary
time,--and so to maintain an apathetic inaction, a glacier-like
absence of alacrity, amidst the most animated or irritating
surroundings. The two things together must necessarily work an entire
revolution in civilised existence. It is the beginning of our escape
from that Time Garment of which Carlyle speaks. While this Accelerator
will enable us to concentrate ourselves with tremendous impact
upon any moment or occasion that demands our utmost sense and vigour,
the Retarder will enable us to pass in passive tranquillity through
infinite hardship and tedium. Perhaps I am a little optimistic
about the Retarder, which has indeed still to be discovered, but
about the Accelerator there is no possible sort of doubt whatever.
Its appearance upon the market in a convenient, controllable,
and assimilable form is a matter of the next few months. It will be
obtainable of all chemists and druggists, in small green bottles,
at a high but, considering its extraordinary qualities, by no means
excessive price. Gibberne's Nervous Accelerator it will be called,
and he hopes to be able to supply it in three strengths: one in 200,
one in 900, and one in 2000, distinguished by yellow, pink, and
white labels respectively.

No doubt its use renders a great number of very extraordinary things
possible; for, of course, the most remarkable and, possibly, even
criminal proceedings may be effected with impunity by thus dodging,
as it were, into the interstices of time. Like all potent preparations
it will be liable to abuse. We have, however, discussed this aspect
of the question very thoroughly, and we have decided that this
is purely a matter of medical jurisprudence and altogether outside
our province. We shall manufacture and sell the Accelerator, and,
as for the consequences--we shall see.


9.  MR. LEDBETTER'S VACATION

My friend, Mr. Ledbetter, is a round-faced little man, whose natural
mildness of eye is gigantically exaggerated when you catch the beam
through his glasses, and whose deep, deliberate voice irritates
irritable people. A certain elaborate clearness of enunciation has
come with him to his present vicarage from his scholastic days, an
elaborate clearness of enunciation and a certain nervous determination
to be firm and correct upon all issues, important and unimportant
alike. He is a sacerdotalist and a chess player, and suspected by many
of the secret practice of the higher mathematics--creditable rather
than interesting things. His conversation is copious and given
much to needless detail. By many, indeed, his intercourse is
condemned, to put it plainly, as "boring," and such have even done
me the compliment to wonder why I countenance him. But, on the other
hand, there is a large faction who marvel at his countenancing
such a dishevelled, discreditable acquaintance as myself. Few appear
to regard our friendship with equanimity. But that is because they
do not know of the link that binds us, of my amiable connection
via Jamaica with Mr. Ledbetter's past.

About that past he displays an anxious modesty. "I do not KNOW what
I should do if it became known," he says; and repeats, impressively,
"I do not know WHAT I should do." As a matter of fact, I doubt if
he would do anything except get very red about the ears. But that
will appear later; nor will I tell here of our first encounter,
since, as a general rule--though I am prone to break it--the end
of a story should come after, rather than before, the beginning.
And the beginning of the story goes a long way back; indeed, it is
now nearly twenty years since Fate, by a series of complicated and
startling manoeuvres, brought Mr. Ledbetter, so to speak, into my
hands.

In those days I was living in Jamaica, and Mr. Ledbetter was a
schoolmaster in England. He was in orders, and already recognisably
the same man that he is to-day: the same rotundity of visage,
the same or similar glasses, and the same faint shadow of surprise
in his resting expression. He was, of course, dishevelled when
I saw him, and his collar less of a collar than a wet bandage,
and that may have helped to bridge the natural gulf between us--but
of that, as I say, later.

The business began at Hithergate-on-Sea, and simultaneously with
Mr. Ledbetter's summer vacation. Thither he came for a greatly
needed rest, with a bright brown portmanteau marked "F. W. L.",
a new white-and-black straw hat, and two pairs of white flannel
trousers. He was naturally exhilarated at his release from school--
for he was not very fond of the boys he taught. After dinner he
fell into a discussion with a talkative person established in the
boarding-house to which, acting on the advice of his aunt, he had
resorted. This talkative person was the only other man in the house.
Their discussion concerned the melancholy disappearance of wonder
and adventure in these latter days, the prevalence of globe-trotting,
the abolition of distance by steam and electricity, the vulgarity
of advertisement, the degradation of men by civilisation, and many
such things. Particularly was the talkative person eloquent on
the decay of human courage through security, a security Mr. Ledbetter
rather thoughtlessly joined him in deploring. Mr. Ledbetter, in the
first delight of emancipation from "duty," and being anxious, perhaps,
to establish a reputation for manly conviviality, partook, rather
more freely than was advisable, of the excellent whisky the talkative
person produced. But he did not become intoxicated, he insists.

He was simply eloquent beyond his sober wont, and with the finer
edge gone from his judgment. And after that long talk of the brave
old days that were past forever, he went out into moonlit Hithergate--
alone and up the cliff road where the villas cluster together.

He had bewailed, and now as he walked up the silent road he still
bewailed, the fate that had called him to such an uneventful life
as a pedagogue's. What a prosaic existence he led, so stagnant,
so colourless! Secure, methodical, year in year out, what call was
there for bravery? He thought enviously of those roving, mediaeval
days, so near and so remote, of quests and spies and condottieri
and many a risky blade-drawing business. And suddenly came a doubt,
a strange doubt, springing out of some chance thought of tortures,
and destructive altogether of the position he had assumed that evening.

Was he--Mr. Ledbetter--really, after all, so brave as he assumed?
Would he really be so pleased to have railways, policemen, and
security vanish suddenly from the earth?

The talkative man had spoken enviously of crime. "The burglar,"
he said, "is the only true adventurer left on earth. Think of his
single-handed fight against the whole civilised world!" And Mr.
Ledbetter had echoed his envy. "They DO have some fun out of life,"
Mr. Ledbetter had said. "And about the only people who do. Just
think how it must feel to wire a lawn!" And he had laughed wickedly.
Now, in this franker intimacy of self-communion he found himself
instituting a comparison between his own brand of courage and that of
the habitual criminal. He tried to meet these insidious questionings
with blank assertion. "I could do all that," said Mr. Ledbetter.
"I long to do all that. Only I do not give way to my criminal impulses.
My moral courage restrains me." But he doubted even while he told
himself these things.

"Mr. Ledbetter passed a large villa standing by itself. Conveniently
situated above a quiet, practicable balcony was a window, gaping
black, wide open. At the time he scarcely marked it, but the picture
of it came with him, wove into his thoughts. He figured himself
climbing up that balcony, crouching--plunging into that dark,
mysterious interior. "Bah! You would not dare," said the Spirit
of Doubt. "My duty to my fellow-men forbids," said Mr. Ledbetter's
self-respect.

It was nearly eleven, and the little seaside town was already very
still. The whole world slumbered under the moonlight. Only one
warm oblong of window-blind far down the road spoke of waking life.
He turned and came back slowly towards the villa of the open window.
He stood for a time outside the gate, a battlefield of motives.
"Let us put things to the test," said Doubt. "For the satisfaction
of these intolerable doubts, show that you dare go into that house.
Commit a burglary in blank. That, at any rate, is no crime." Very
softly he opened and shut the gate and slipped into the shadow
of the shrubbery. "This is foolish," said Mr. Ledbetter's caution.
"I expected that," said Doubt. His heart was beating fast, but he
was certainly not afraid. He was NOT afraid. He remained in that
shadow for some considerable time.

The ascent of the balcony, it was evident, would have to be done
in a rush, for it was all in clear moonlight, and visible from
the gate into the avenue. A trellis thinly set with young, ambitious
climbing roses made the ascent ridiculously easy. There, in that
black shadow by the stone vase of flowers, one might crouch and
take a closer view of this gaping breach in the domestic defences,
the open window. For a while Mr. Ledbetter was as still as the night,
and then that insidious whisky tipped the balance. He dashed forward.
He went up the trellis with quick, convulsive movements, swung his
legs over the parapet of the balcony, and dropped panting in the
shadow even as he had designed. He was trembling violently, short
of breath, and his heart pumped noisily, but his mood was exultation.
He could have shouted to find he was so little afraid.

A happy line that he had learnt from Wills's "Mephistopheles" came
into his mind as he crouched there. "I feel like a cat on the tiles,"
he whispered to himself. It was far better than he had expected--
this adventurous exhilaration. He was sorry for all poor men to whom
burglary was unknown. Nothing happened. He was quite safe. And
he was acting in the bravest manner!

And now for the window, to make the burglary complete! Must he dare do
that? Its position above the front door defined it as a landing or
passage, and there were no looking-glasses or any bedroom signs about
it, or any other window on the first floor, to suggest the possibility
of a sleeper within. For a time he listened under the ledge, then
raised his eyes above the sill and peered in. Close at hand, on
a pedestal, and a little startling at first, was a nearly life-size
gesticulating bronze. He ducked, and after some time he peered
again. Beyond was a broad landing, faintly gleaming; a flimsy fabric
of bead curtain, very black and sharp, against a further window; a
broad staircase, plunging into a gulf of darkness below; and another
ascending to the second floor. He glanced behind him, but the
stillness of the night was unbroken. "Crime," he whispered, "crime,"
and scrambled softly and swiftly over the sill into the house. His
feet fell noiselessly on a mat of skin. He was a burglar indeed!

He crouched for a time, all ears and peering eyes. Outside was
a scampering and rustling, and for a moment he repented of his
enterprise. A short "miaow," a spitting, and a rush into silence,
spoke reassuringly of cats. His courage grew. He stood up. Every
one was abed, it seemed. So easy is it to commit a burglary, if one
is so minded. He was glad he had put it to the test. He determined
to take some petty trophy, just to prove his freedom from any abject
fear of the law, and depart the way he had come.

He peered about him, and suddenly the critical spirit arose again.
Burglars did far more than such mere elementary entrance as this:
they went into rooms, they forced safes. Well--he was not afraid.
He could not force safes, because that would be a stupid want
of consideration for his hosts. But he would go into rooms--he would
go upstairs. More: he told himself that he was perfectly secure;
an empty house could not be more reassuringly still. He had to clench
his hands, nevertheless, and summon all his resolution before he
began very softly to ascend the dim staircase, pausing for several
seconds between each step. Above was a square landing with one
open and several closed doors; and all the house was still. For
a moment he stood wondering what would happen if some sleeper
woke suddenly and emerged. The open door showed a moonlit bedroom,
the coverlet white and undisturbed. Into this room he crept in three
interminable minutes and took a piece of soap for his plunder--
his trophy. He turned to descend even more softly than he had
ascended. It was as easy as--

Hist! . . .

Footsteps! On the gravel outside the house--and then the noise of a
latchkey, the yawn and bang of a door, and the spitting of a match
in the hall below. Mr. Ledbetter stood petrified by the sudden
discovery of the folly upon which he had come. "How on earth am
I to get out of this?" said Mr. Ledbetter.

The hall grew bright with a candle flame, some heavy object bumped
against the umbrella-stand, and feet were ascending the staircase. In
a flash Mr. Ledbetter realised that his retreat was closed. He stood
for a moment, a pitiful figure of penitent confusion. "My goodness!
What a FOOL I have been!" he whispered, and then darted swiftly
across the shadowy landing into the empty bedroom from which he
had just come. He stood listening--quivering. The footsteps reached
the first-floor landing.

Horrible thought! This was possibly the latecomer's room! Not a moment
was to be lost! Mr. Ledbetter stooped beside the bed, thanked Heaven
for a valance, and crawled within its protection not ten seconds
too soon. He became motionless on hands and knees. The advancing
candle-light appeared through the thinner stitches of the fabric, the
shadows ran wildly about, and became rigid as the candle was put down.

"Lord, what a day!" said the newcomer, blowing noisily, and it seemed
he deposited some heavy burthen on what Mr. Ledbetter, judging
by the feet, decided to be a writing-table. The unseen then went
to the door and locked it, examined the fastenings of the windows
carefully and pulled down the blinds, and returning sat down upon
the bed with startling ponderosity.

"WHAT a day!" he said. "Good Lord!" and blew again, and Mr. Ledbetter
inclined to believe that the person was mopping his face. His boots
were good stout boots; the shadows of his legs upon the valance
suggested a formidable stoutness of aspect. After a time he removed
some upper garments--a coat and waistcoat, Mr. Ledbetter inferred--
and casting them over the rail of the bed remained breathing less
noisily, and as it seemed cooling from a considerable temperature.
At intervals he muttered to himself, and once he laughed softly. And
Mr. Ledbetter muttered to himself, but he did not laugh. "Of all the
foolish things," said Mr. Ledbetter. "What on earth am I to do now?"

His outlook was necessarily limited. The minute apertures between
the stitches of the fabric of the valance admitted a certain amount
of light, but permitted no peeping. The shadows upon this curtain,
save for those sharply defined legs, were enigmatical, and intermingled
confusingly with the florid patterning of the chintz. Beneath the edge
of the valance a strip of carpet was visible, and, by cautiously
depressing his eye, Mr. Ledbetter found that this strip broadened
until the whole area of the floor came into view. The carpet was
a luxurious one, the room spacious, and, to judge by the castors
and so forth of the furniture, well equipped.

What he should do he found it difficult to imagine. To wait until
this person had gone to bed, and then, when he seemed to be sleeping,
to creep to the door, unlock it, and bolt headlong for that balcony
seemed the only possible thing to do. Would it be possible to jump
from the balcony? The danger of it! When he thought of the chances
against him, Mr. Ledbetter despaired. He was within an ace of thrusting
forth his head beside the gentleman's legs, coughing if necessary
to attract his attention, and then, smiling, apologising and explaining
his unfortunate intrusion by a few well-chosen sentences. But he
found these sentences hard to choose. "No doubt, sir, my appearance
is peculiar," or, "I trust, sir, you will pardon my somewhat ambiguous
appearance from beneath you," was about as much as he could get.

Grave possibilities forced themselves on his attention. Suppose
they did not believe him, what would they do to him? Would his
unblemished high character count for nothing? Technically he was
a burglar, beyond dispute. Following out this train of thought,
he was composing a lucid apology for "this technical crime I have
committed," to be delivered before sentence in the dock, when
the stout gentleman got up and began walking about the room. He
locked and unlocked drawers, and Mr. Ledbetter had a transient hope
that he might be undressing. But, no! He seated himself at the
writing-table, and began to write and then tear up documents.
Presently the smell of burning cream-laid paper mingled with the odour
of cigars in Mr. Ledbetter's nostrils.

"The position I had assumed," said Mr. Ledbetter when he told me of
these things, "was in many respects an ill-advised one. A transverse
bar beneath the bed depressed my head unduly, and threw a
disproportionate share of my weight upon my hands. After a time, I
experienced what is called, I believe, a crick in the neck. The
pressure of my hands on the coarsely-stitched carpet speedily became
painful. My knees, too, were painful, my trousers being drawn tightly
over them. At that time I wore rather higher collars than I do now--two
and a half inches, in fact--and I discovered what I had not remarked
before, that the edge of the one I wore was frayed slightly under
the chin. But much worse than these things was an itching of my face,
which I could only relieve by violent grimacing--I tried to raise
my hand, but the rustle of the sleeve alarmed me. After a time
I had to desist from this relief also, because--happily in time--
I discovered that my facial contortions were shifting my glasses
down my nose. Their fall would, of course, have exposed me, and as it
was they came to rest in an oblique position of by no means stable
equilibrium. In addition I had a slight cold, and an intermittent
desire to sneeze or sniff caused me inconvenience. In fact, quite
apart from the extreme anxiety of my position, my physical discomfort
became in a short time very considerable indeed. But I had to stay
there motionless, nevertheless."

After an interminable time, there began a chinking sound. This
deepened into a rhythm: chink, chink, chink--twenty-five chinks--
a rap on the writing-table, and a grunt from the owner of the stout
legs. It dawned upon Mr. Ledbetter that this chinking was the chinking
of gold. He became incredulously curious as it went on. His curiosity
grew. Already, if that was the case, this extraordinary man must
have counted some hundreds of pounds. At last Mr. Ledbetter could
resist it no longer, and he began very cautiously to fold his arms
and lower his head to the level of the floor, in the hope of peeping
under the valance. He moved his feet, and one made a slight scraping
on the floor. Suddenly the chinking ceased. Mr. Ledbetter became
rigid. After a while the chinking was resumed. Then it ceased again,
and everything was still, except Mr. Ledbetter's heart--that organ
seemed to him to be beating like a drum.

The stillness continued. Mr. Ledbetter's head was now on the floor,
and he could see the stout legs as far as the shins. They were
quite still. The feet were resting on the toes and drawn back,
as it seemed, under the chair of the owner. Everything was quite
still, everything continued still. A wild hope came to Mr. Ledbetter
that the unknown was in a fit or suddenly dead, with his head upon
the writing-table. . . .

The stillness continued. What had happened? The desire to peep
became irresistible. Very cautiously Mr. Ledbetter shifted his hand
forward, projected a pioneer finger, and began to lift the valance
immediately next his eye. Nothing broke the stillness. He saw now
the stranger's knees, saw the back of the writing-table, and then--
he was staring at the barrel of a heavy revolver pointed over
the writing-table at his head.

"Come out of that, you scoundrel!" said the voice of the stout
gentleman in a tone of quiet concentration. "Come out. This side,
and now. None of your hanky-panky--come right out, now."

Mr. Ledbetter came right out, a little reluctantly perhaps, but
without any hanky-panky, and at once, even as he was told.

"Kneel," said the stout gentleman. "and hold up your hands."

The valance dropped again behind Mr. Ledbetter, and he rose from
all-fours and held up his hands. "Dressed like a parson," said
the stout gentleman. "I'm blest if he isn't! A little chap, too!
You SCOUNDREL! What the deuce possessed you to come here to-night?
What the deuce possessed you to get under my bed?"

He did not appear to require an answer, but proceeded at once to
several very objectionable remarks upon Mr. Ledbetter's personal
appearance. He was not a very big man, but he looked strong to Mr.
Ledbetter: he was as stout as his legs had promised, he had rather
delicately-chiselled small features distributed over a considerable
area of whitish face, and quite a number of chins. And the note
of his voice had a sort of whispering undertone.

"What the deuce, I say, possessed you to get under my bed?"

Mr. Ledbetter, by an effort, smiled a wan propitiatory smile. He
coughed. "I can quite understand--" he said.

"Why! What on earth? It's SOAP! No!--you scoundrel. Don't you move
that hand."

"It's soap," said Mr. Ledbetter. "From your washstand. No doubt it--"

"Don't talk," said the stout man. "I see it's soap. Of all incredible
things."

"If I might explain--"

"Don't explain. It's sure to be a lie, and there's no time for
explanations. What was I going to ask you? Ah! Have you any mates?"

"In a few minutes, if you--"

"Have you any mates? Curse you. If you start any soapy palaver
I'll shoot. Have you any mates?"

"No," said Mr. Ledbetter.

"I suppose it's a lie," said the stout man. "But you'll pay for it
if it is. Why the deuce didn't you floor me when I came upstairs?
You won't get a chance to now, anyhow. Fancy getting under the bed!
I reckon it's a fair cop, anyhow, so far as you are concerned."

"I don't see how I could prove an alibi," remarked Mr. Ledbetter,
trying to show by his conversation that he was an educated man.
There was a pause. Mr. Ledbetter perceived that on a chair beside
his captor was a large black bag on a heap of crumpled papers,
and that there were torn and burnt papers on the table. And in front
of these, and arranged methodically along the edge were rows and
rows of little yellow rouleaux--a hundred times more gold than Mr.
Ledbetter had seen in all his life before. The light of two candles,
in silver candlesticks, fell upon these. The pause continued. "It is
rather fatiguing holding up my hands like this," said Mr. Ledbetter,
with a deprecatory smile.

"That's all right," said the fat man. "But what to do with you
I don't exactly know."

"I know my position is ambiguous."

"Lord!" said the fat man, "ambiguous! And goes about with his own
soap, and wears a thundering great clerical collar. You ARE a blooming
burglar, you are--if ever there was one!"

"To be strictly accurate," said Mr. Ledbetter, and suddenly his
glasses slipped off and clattered against his vest buttons.

The fat man changed countenance, a flash of savage resolution
crossed his face, and something in the revolver clicked. He put
his other hand to the weapon. And then he looked at Mr. Ledbetter,
and his eye went down to the dropped pince-nez.

"Full-cock now, anyhow," said the fat man, after a pause, and his
breath seemed to catch. "But I'll tell you, you've never been so
near death before. Lord! I'M almost glad. If it hadn't been that
the revolver wasn't cocked you'd be lying dead there now."

Mr. Ledbetter said nothing, but he felt that the room was swaying.

"A miss is as good as a mile. It's lucky for both of us it wasn't.
Lord!" He blew noisily. "There's no need for you to go pale-green
for a little thing like that."

"If I can assure you, sir--" said Mr. Ledbetter, with an effort.

"There's only one thing to do. If I call in the police, I'm bust--
a little game I've got on is bust. That won't do. If I tie you up
and leave you again, the thing may be out to-morrow. Tomorrow's
Sunday, and Monday's Bank Holiday--I've counted on three clear
days. Shooting you's murder--and hanging; and besides, it will bust
the whole blooming kernooze. I'm hanged if I can think what to do--
I'm hanged if I can."

"Will you permit me--"

"You gas as much as if you were a real parson, I'm blessed if you
don't. Of all the burglars you are the--Well! No!--I WON'T permit
you. There isn't time. If you start off jawing again, I'll shoot
right in your stomach. See? But I know now-I know now! What we're
going to do first, my man, is an examination for concealed arms--
an examination for concealed arms. And look here! When I tell you
to do a thing, don't start off at a gabble--do it brisk."

And with many elaborate precautions, and always pointing the pistol
at Mr. Ledbetter's head, the stout man stood him up and searched
him for weapons. "Why, you ARE a burglar!" he said "You're a perfect
amateur. You haven't even a pistol-pocket in the back of your
breeches. No, you don't! Shut up, now."

So soon as the issue was decided, the stout man made Mr. Ledbetter
take off his coat and roll up his shirt-sleeves, and, with the revolver
at one ear, proceed with the packing his appearance had interrupted.
From the stout man's point of view that was evidently the only
possible arrangement, for if he had packed, he would have had
to put down the revolver. So that even the gold on the table was
handled by Mr. Ledbetter. This nocturnal packing was peculiar.
The stout man's idea was evidently to distribute the weight of
the gold as unostentatiously as possible through his luggage. It was
by no means an inconsiderable weight. There was, Mr. Ledbetter says,
altogether nearly L18,000 in gold in the black bag and on the table.
There were also many little rolls of L5 bank-notes. Each rouleau
of L25 was wrapped by Mr. Ledbetter in paper. These rouleaux were
then put neatly in cigar boxes and distributed between a travelling
trunk, a Gladstone bag, and a hatbox. About L600 went in a tobacco
tin in a dressing-bag. L10 in gold and a number of L5 notes the stout
man pocketed. Occasionally he objurgated Mr. Ledbetter's clumsiness,
and urged him to hurry, and several times he appealed to Mr.
Ledbetter's watch for information.

Mr. Ledbetter strapped the trunk and bag, and returned the stout man
the keys. It was then ten minutes to twelve, and until the stroke of
midnight the stout man made him sit on the Gladstone bag, while he
sat at a reasonably safe distance on the trunk and held the revolver
handy and waited. He appeared to be now in a less aggressive mood,
and having watched Mr. Ledbetter for some time, he offered a few
remarks.

"From your accent I judge you are a man of some education," he said,
lighting a cigar. "No--DON'T begin that explanation of yours. I know
it will be long-winded from your face, and I am much too old a liar
to be interested in other men's lying. You are, I say, a person
of education. You do well to dress as a curate. Even among educated
people you might pass as a curate."

"I AM a curate," said Mr. Ledbetter, "or, at least--"

"You are trying to be. I know. But you didn't ought to burgle.
You are not the man to burgle. You are, if I may say it--the thing
will have been pointed out to you before--a coward."

"Do you know," said Mr. Ledbetter, trying to get a final opening,
"it was that very question--"

The stout man waved him into silence.

"You waste your education in burglary. You should do one of two
things. Either you should forge or you should embezzle. For my
own part, I embezzle. Yes; I embezzle. What do you think a man
could be doing with all this gold but that? Ah! Listen! Midnight! . . .
Ten. Eleven. Twelve. There is something very impressive to me
in that slow beating of the hours. Time--space; what mysteries
they are! What mysteries. . . . It's time for us to be moving.
Stand up!"

And then kindly, but firmly, he induced Mr. Ledbetter to sling the
dressing bag over his back by a string across his chest, to shoulder
the trunk, and, overruling a gasping protest, to take the Gladstone
bag in his disengaged hand. So encumbered, Mr. Ledbetter struggled
perilously downstairs. The stout gentleman followed with an overcoat,
the hatbox, and the revolver, making derogatory remarks about Mr.
Ledbetter's strength, and assisting him at the turnings of the stairs.

"The back door," he directed, and Mr. Ledbetter staggered through
a conservatory, leaving a wake of smashed flower-pots behind him.
"Never mind the crockery," said the stout man; "it's good for trade.
We wait here until a quarter past. You can put those things down. You
have!"

Mr. Ledbetter collapsed panting on the trunk. "Last night," he gasped,
"I was asleep in my little room, and I no more dreamt--"

"There's no need for you to incriminate yourself," said the stout
gentleman, looking at the lock of the revolver. He began to hum.
Mr. Ledbetter made to speak, and thought better of it.

There presently came the sound of a bell, and Mr. Ledbetter was
taken to the back door and instructed to open it. A fair-haired man
in yachting costume entered. At the sight of Mr. Ledbetter he started
violently and clapped his hand behind him. Then he saw the stout
man. "Bingham!" he cried, "who's this?"

"Only a little philanthropic do of mine--burglar I'm trying to reform.
Caught him under my bed just now. He's all right. He's a frightful
ass. He'll be useful to carry some of our things."

The newcomer seemed inclined to resent Mr. Ledbetter's presence
at first, but the stout man reassured him.

"He's quite alone. There's not a gang in the world would own him.
No!--don't start talking, for goodness' sake."

They went out into the darkness of the garden with the trunk still
bowing Mr. Ledbetter's shoulders. The man in the yachting costume
walked in front with the Gladstone bag and a pistol; then came
Mr. Ledbetter like Atlas; Mr. Bingham followed with the hat-box,
coat, and revolver as before. The house was one of those that have
their gardens right up to the cliff. At the cliff was a steep wooden
stairway, descending to a bathing tent dimly visible on the beach.
Below was a boat pulled up, and a silent little man with a black face
stood beside it. "A few moments' explanation," said Mr. Ledbetter;
"I can assure you--" Somebody kicked him, and he said no more.

They made him wade to the boat, carrying the trunk, they pulled
him aboard by the shoulders and hair, they called him no better
name than "scoundrel" and "burglar" all that night. But they spoke
in undertones so that the general public was happily unaware of his
ignominy. They hauled him aboard a yacht manned by strange,
unsympathetic Orientals, and partly they thrust him and partly he
fell down a gangway into a noisome, dark place, where he was to
remain many days--how many he does not know, because he lost count
among other things when he was seasick. They fed him on biscuits and
incomprehensible words; they gave him water to drink mixed with
unwished-for rum. And there were cockroaches where they put him,
night and day there were cockroaches, and in the night-time there
were rats. The Orientals emptied his pockets and took his watch--
but Mr. Bingham, being appealed to, took that himself. And five or
six times the five Lascars--if they were Lascars--and the Chinaman
and the negro who constituted the crew, fished him out and took him
aft to Bingham and his friend to play cribbage and euchre and three-
anded whist, and to listen to their stories and boastings in an
interested manner.

Then these principals would talk to him as men talk to those who
have lived a life of crime. Explanations they would never permit,
though they made it abundantly clear to him that he was the rummiest
burglar they had ever set eyes on. They said as much again and again.
The fair man was of a taciturn disposition and irascible at play;
but Mr. Bingham, now that the evident anxiety of his departure
from England was assuaged, displayed a vein of genial philosophy.
He enlarged upon the mystery of space and time, and quoted Kant
and Hegel--or, at least, he said he did. Several times Mr. Ledbetter
got as far as: "My position under your bed, you know--," but then
he always had to cut, or pass the whisky, or do some such intervening
thing. After his third failure, the fair man got quite to look for
this opening, and whenever Mr. Ledbetter began after that, he would
roar with laughter and hit him violently on the back. "Same old start,
same old story; good old burglar!" the fair-haired man would say.

So Mr. Ledbetter suffered for many days, twenty perhaps; and one
evening he was taken, together with some tinned provisions, over
the side and put ashore on a rocky little island with a spring.
Mr. Bingham came in the boat with him, giving him good advice
all the way, and waving his last attempts at an explanation aside.

"I am really NOT a burglar," said Mr. Ledbetter.

"You never will be," said Mr. Bingham. "You'll never make a burglar.
I'm glad you are beginning to see it. In choosing a profession
a man must study his temperament. If you don't, sooner or later
you will fail. Compare myself, for example. All my life I have
been in banks--I have got on in banks. I have even been a bank
manager. But was I happy? No. Why wasn't I happy? Because it did
not suit my temperament. I am too adventurous--too versatile.
Practically I have thrown it over. I do not suppose I shall ever
manage a bank again. They would be glad to get me, no doubt;
but I have learnt the lesson of my temperament--at last. . . .
No! I shall never manage a bank again.

"Now, your temperament unfits you for crime--just as mine unfits
me for respectability. I know you better than I did, and now I do
not even recommend forgery. Go back to respectable courses, my man.
YOUR lay is the philanthropic lay--that is your lay. With that voice--
the Association for the Promotion of Snivelling among the Young--
something in that line. You think it over.

"The island we are approaching has no name apparently--at least,
there is none on the chart. You might think out a name for it while
you are there--while you are thinking about all these things. It has
quite drinkable water, I understand. It is one of the Grenadines--
one of the Windward Islands. Yonder, dim and blue, are others of
the Grenadines. There are quantities of Grenadines, but the majority
are out of sight. I have often wondered what these islands are
for--now, you see, I am wiser. This one at least is for you. Sooner
or later some simple native will come along and take you off.
Say what you like about us then--abuse us, if you like--we shan't
care a solitary Grenadine! And here--here is half a sovereign's
worth of silver. Do not waste that in foolish dissipation when
you return to civilisation. Properly used, it may give you a fresh
start in life. And do not--Don't beach her, you beggars, he can
wade!--Do not waste the precious solitude before you in foolish
thoughts. Properly used, it may be a turning-point in your career.
Waste neither money nor time. You will die rich. I'm sorry, but
I must ask you to carry your tucker to land in your arms. No; it's
not deep. Curse that explanation of yours! There's not time.
No, no, no! I won't listen. Overboard you go!"

And the falling night found Mr. Ledbetter--the Mr. Ledbetter who
had complained that adventure was dead--sitting beside his cans
of food, his chin resting upon his drawn-up knees, staring through
his glasses in dismal mildness over the shining, vacant sea.

He was picked up in the course of three days by a negro fisherman
and taken to St. Vincent's, and from St. Vincent's he got, by
the expenditure of his last coins, to Kingston, in Jamaica. And there
he might have foundered. Even nowadays he is not a man of affairs,
and then he was a singularly helpless person. He had not the remotest
idea what he ought to do. The only thing he seems to have done was
to visit all the ministers of religion he could find in the place
to borrow a passage home. But he was much too dirty and incoherent--
and his story far too incredible for them. I met him quite by chance.
It was close upon sunset, and I was walking out after my siesta
on the road to Dunn's Battery, when I met him--I was rather bored,
and with a whole evening on my hands--luckily for him. He was trudging
dismally towards the town. His woebegone face and the quasi-clerical
cut of his dust-stained, filthy costume caught my humour. Our eyes met.
He hesitated. "Sir," he said, with a catching of the breath, "could
you spare a few minutes for what I fear will seem an incredible story?"

"Incredible!" I said.

"Quite," he answered eagerly. "No one will believe it, alter it
though I may. Yet I can assure you, sir--"

He stopped hopelessly. The man's tone tickled me. He seemed an odd
character. "I am," he said, "one of the most unfortunate beings alive."

"Among other things, you haven't dined?" I said, struck with an idea.

"I have not," he said solemnly, "for many days."

"You'll tell it better after that," I said; and without more ado led
the way to a low place I knew, where such a costume as his was
unlikely to give offence. And there--with certain omissions which
he subsequently supplied--I got his story. At first I was incredulous,
but as the wine warmed him, and the faint suggestion of cringing
which his misfortunes had added to his manner disappeared, I began
to believe. At last, I was so far convinced of his sincerity that
I got him a bed for the night, and next day verified the banker's
reference he gave me through my Jamaica banker. And that done, I took
him shopping for underwear and such like equipments of a gentleman
at large. Presently came the verified reference. His astonishing
story was true. I will not amplify our subsequent proceedings.
He started for England in three days' time.

"I do not know how I can possibly thank you enough," began the letter
he wrote me from England, "for all your kindness to a total stranger,"
and proceeded for some time in a similar strain. "Had it not been
for your generous assistance, I could certainly never have returned
in time for the resumption of my scholastic duties, and my few
minutes of reckless folly would, perhaps, have proved my ruin.
As it is, I am entangled in a tissue of lies and evasions, of the most
complicated sort, to account for my sunburnt appearance and my
whereabouts. I have rather carelessly told two or three different
stories, not realising the trouble this would mean for me in the end.
The truth I dare not tell. I have consulted a number of law-books
in the British Museum, and there is not the slightest doubt that
I have connived at and abetted and aided a felony. That scoundrel
Bingham was the Hithergate bank manager, I find, and guilty of
the most flagrant embezzlement. Please, please burn this letter
when read--I trust you implicitly. The worst of it is, neither my aunt
nor her friend who kept the boarding-house at which I was staying
seem altogether to believe a guarded statement I have made them
practically of what actually happened. They suspect me of some
discreditable adventure, but what sort of discreditable adventure
they suspect me of, I do not know. My aunt says she would forgive me
if I told her everything. I have--I have told her MORE than everything,
and still she is not satisfied. It would never do to let them know
the truth of the case, of course, and so I represent myself as having
been waylaid and gagged upon the beach. My aunt wants to know
WHY they waylaid and gagged me, why they took me away in their yacht.
I do not know. Can you suggest any reason? I can think of nothing.
If, when you wrote, you could write on TWO sheets so that I could
show her one, and on that one if you could show clearly that I really
WAS in Jamaica this summer, and had come there by being removed
from a ship, it would be of great service to me. It would certainly
add to the load of my obligation to you--a load that I fear I can
never fully repay. Although if gratitude . . ." And so forth.
At the end he repeated his request for me to burn the letter.

So the remarkable story of Mr. Ledbetter's Vacation ends. That breach
with his aunt was not of long duration. The old lady had forgiven him
before she died.


10.  THE STOLEN BODY

Mr. Bessel was the senior partner in the firm of Bessel, Hart,
and Brown, of St. Paul's Churchyard, and for many years he was
well known among those interested in psychical research as a
liberal-minded and conscientious investigator. He was an unmarried
man, and instead of living in the suburbs, after the fashion of
his class, he occupied rooms in the Albany, near Piccadilly. He
was particularly interested in the questions of thought transference
and of apparitions of the living, and in November, 1896, he commenced
a series of experiments in conjunction with Mr. Vincey, of Staple Inn,
in order to test the alleged possibility of projecting an apparition
of one's self by force of will through space.

Their experiments were conducted in the following manner: At a pre-
arranged hour Mr. Bessel shut himself in one of his rooms in the
Albany and Mr. Vincey in his sitting-room in Staple Inn, and each then
fixed his mind as resolutely as possible on the other. Mr. Bessel
had acquired the art of self-hypnotism, and, so far as he could,
he attempted first to hypnotise himself and then to project himself
as a "phantom of the living" across the intervening space of nearly
two miles into Mr. Vincey's apartment. On several evenings this
was tried without any satisfactory result, but on the fifth or sixth
occasion Mr. Vincey did actually see or imagine he saw an apparition
of Mr. Bessel standing in his room. He states that the appearance,
although brief, was very vivid and real. He noticed that Mr. Bessel's
face was white and his expression anxious, and, moreover, that
his hair was disordered. For a moment Mr. Vincey, in spite of his
state of expectation, was too surprised to speak or move, and in that
moment it seemed to him as though the figure glanced over its shoulder
and incontinently vanished.

It had been arranged that an attempt should be made to photograph
any phantasm seen, but Mr. Vincey had not the instant presence
of mind to snap the camera that lay ready on the table beside him,
and when he did so he was too late. Greatly elated, however, even
by this partial success, he made a note of the exact time, and
at once took a cab to the Albany to inform Mr. Bessel of this result.

He was surprised to find Mr. Bessel's outer door standing open
to the night, and the inner apartments lit and in an extraordinary
disorder. An empty champagne magnum lay smashed upon the floor;
its neck had been broken off against the inkpot on the bureau
and lay beside it. An octagonal occasional table, which carried
a bronze statuette and a number of choice books, had been rudely
overturned, and down the primrose paper of the wall inky fingers had
been drawn, as it seemed for the mere pleasure of defilement. One of
the delicate chintz curtains had been violently torn from its rings
and thrust upon the fire, so that the smell of its smouldering
filled the room. Indeed the whole place was disarranged in the
strangest fashion. For a few minutes Mr. Vincey, who had entered
sure of finding Mr. Bessel in his easy chair awaiting him, could
scarcely believe his eyes, and stood staring helplessly at these
unanticipated things.

Then, full of a vague sense of calamity, he sought the porter at
the entrance lodge. "Where is Mr. Bessel?" he asked. "Do you know
that all the furniture is broken in Mr. Bessel's room?" The porter
said nothing, but, obeying his gestures, came at once to Mr. Bessel's
apartment to see the state of affairs. "This settles it," he said,
surveying the lunatic confusion. "I didn't know of this. Mr. Bessel's
gone off. He's mad!"

He then proceeded to tell Mr. Vincey that about half an hour
previously, that is to say, at about the time of Mr. Bessel's
apparition in Mr. Vincey's rooms, the missing gentleman had rushed
out of the gates of the Albany into Vigo Street, hatless and with
disordered hair, and had vanished into the direction of Bond Street.
"And as he went past me," said the porter, "he laughed--a sort of
gasping laugh, with his mouth open and his eyes glaring--I tell you,
sir, he fair scared me!--like this."

According to his imitation it was anything but a pleasant laugh.
"He waved his hand, with all his fingers crooked and clawing--like
that. And he said, in a sort of fierce whisper, 'LIFE!' Just that
one word, 'LIFE!'"

"Dear me," said Mr. Vincey. "Tut, tut," and "Dear me!" He could
think of nothing else to say. He was naturally very much surprised.
He turned from the room to the porter and from the porter to the
room in the gravest perplexity. Beyond his suggestion that probably
Mr. Bessel would come back presently and explain what had happened,
their conversation was unable to proceed. "It might be a sudden
toothache," said the porter, "a very sudden and violent toothache,
jumping on him suddenly-like and driving him wild. I've broken
things myself before now in such a case . . ." He thought. "If it was,
why should he say 'LIFE' to me as he went past?"

Mr. Vincey did not know. Mr. Bessel did not return, and at last
Mr. Vincey, having done some more helpless staring, and having
addressed a note of brief inquiry and left it in a conspicuous
position on the bureau, returned in a very perplexed frame of mind
to his own premises in Staple Inn. This affair had given him a shock.
He was at a loss to account for Mr. Bessel's conduct on any sane
hypothesis. He tried to read, but he could not do so; he went for
a short walk, and was so preoccupied that he narrowly escaped
a cab at the top of Chancery Lane; and at last--a full hour before
his usual time--he went to bed. For a considerable time he could not
sleep because of his memory of the silent confusion of Mr. Bessel's
apartment, and when at length he did attain an uneasy slumber it was
at once disturbed by a very vivid and distressing dream of Mr. Bessel.

He saw Mr. Bessel gesticulating wildly, and with his face white
and contorted. And, inexplicably mingled with his appearance,
suggested perhaps by his gestures, was an intense fear, an urgency
to act. He even believes that he heard the voice of his fellow
experimenter calling distressfully to him, though at the time he
considered this to be an illusion. The vivid impression remained
though Mr. Vincey awoke. For a space he lay awake and trembling
in the darkness, possessed with that vague, unaccountable terror of
unknown possibilities that comes out of dreams upon even the bravest
men. But at last he roused himself, and turned over and went to sleep
again, only for the dream to return with enhanced vividness.

He awoke with such a strong conviction that Mr. Bessel was in
overwhelming distress and need of help that sleep was no longer
possible. He was persuaded that his friend had rushed out to some dire
calamity. For a time he lay reasoning vainly against this belief, but
at last he gave way to it. He arose, against all reason, lit his gas,
and dressed, and set out through the deserted streets--deserted, save
for a noiseless policeman or so and the early news carts--towards Vigo
Street to inquire if Mr. Bessel had returned.

But he never got there. As he was going down Long Acre some
unaccountable impulse turned him aside out of that street towards
Covent Garden, which was just waking to its nocturnal activities. He
saw the market in front of him--a queer effect of glowing yellow
lights and busy black figures. He became aware of a shouting, and
perceived a figure turn the corner by the hotel and run swiftly towards
him. He knew at once that it was Mr. Bessel. But it was Mr. Bessel
transfigured. He was hatless and dishevelled, his collar was torn open,
he grasped a bone-handled walking-cane near the ferrule end, and his
mouth was pulled awry. And he ran, with agile strides, very rapidly.
Their encounter was the affair of an instant. "Bessel!" cried Vincey.

The running man gave no sign of recognition either of Mr. Vincey
or of his own name. Instead, he cut at his friend savagely with
the stick, hitting him in the face within an inch of the eye.
Mr. Vincey, stunned and astonished, staggered back, lost his footing,
and fell heavily on the pavement. It seemed to him that Mr. Bessel
leapt over him as he fell. When he looked again Mr. Bessel had
vanished, and a policeman and a number of garden porters and salesmen
were rushing past towards Long Acre in hot pursuit.

With the assistance of several passers-by--for the whole street
was speedily alive with running people--Mr. Vincey struggled to
his feet. He at once became the centre of a crowd greedy to see
his injury.  A multitude of voices competed to reassure him of his
safety, and then to tell him of the behaviour of the madman, as
they regarded Mr. Bessel. He had suddenly appeared in the middle
of the market screaming "LIFE! LIFE!" striking left and right with a
blood-stained walking-stick, and dancing and shouting with laughter
at each successful blow. A lad and two women had broken heads,
and he had smashed a man's wrist; a little child had been knocked
insensible, and for a time he had driven every one before him,
so furious and resolute had his behaviour been. Then he made a raid
upon a coffee stall, hurled its paraffin flare through the window
of the post office, and fled laughing, after stunning the foremost
of the two policemen who had the pluck to charge him.

Mr. Vincey's first impulse was naturally to join in the pursuit
of his friend, in order if possible to save him from the violence
of the indignant people. But his action was slow, the blow had
half stunned him, and while this was still no more than a resolution
came the news, shouted through the crowd, that Mr. Bessel had eluded
his pursuers. At first Mr. Vincey could scarcely credit this, but
the universality of the report, and presently the dignified return
of two futile policemen, convinced him. After some aimless inquiries
he returned towards Staple Inn, padding a handkerchief to a now
very painful nose.

He was angry and astonished and perplexed. It appeared to him
indisputable that Mr. Bessel must have gone violently mad in the midst
of his experiment in thought transference, but why that should make
him appear with a sad white face in Mr. Vincey's dreams seemed
a problem beyond solution. He racked his brains in vain to explain
this. It seemed to him at last that not simply Mr. Bessel, but
the order of things must be insane. But he could think of nothing
to do. He shut himself carefully into his room, lit his fire--it was
a gas fire with asbestos bricks--and, fearing fresh dreams if he
went to bed, remained bathing his injured face, or holding up books
in a vain attempt to read, until dawn. Throughout that vigil he had
a curious persuasion that Mr. Bessel was endeavouring to speak
to him, but he would not let himself attend to any such belief.

About dawn, his physical fatigue asserted itself, and he went to bed
and slept at last in spite of dreaming. He rose late, unrested
and anxious, and in considerable facial pain. The morning papers
had no news of Mr. Bessel's aberration--it had come too late for them.
Mr. Vincey's perplexities, to which the fever of his bruise added
fresh irritation, became at last intolerable, and, after a fruitless
visit to the Albany, he went down to St. Paul's Churchyard to Mr. Hart,
Mr. Bessel's partner, and, so far as Mr. Vincey knew, his nearest
friend.

He was surprised to learn that Mr. Hart, although he knew nothing
of the outbreak, had also been disturbed by a vision, the very
vision that Mr. Vincey had seen--Mr. Bessel, white and dishevelled,
pleading earnestly by his gestures for help. That was his impression
of the import of his signs. "I was just going to look him up in the
Albany when you arrived," said Mr. Hart. "I was so sure of something
being wrong with him."

As the outcome of their consultation the two gentlemen decided
to inquire at Scotland Yard for news of their missing friend.
"He is bound to be laid by the heels," said Mr. Hart. "He can't go
on at that pace for long." But the police authorities had not laid
Mr. Bessel by the heels. They confirmed Mr. Vincey's overnight
experiences and added fresh circumstances, some of an even graver
character than those he knew--a list of smashed glass along the upper
half of Tottenham Court Road, an attack upon a policeman in Hampstead
Road, and an atrocious assault upon a woman. All these outrages were
committed between half-past twelve and a quarter to two in the morning,
and between those hours--and, indeed, from the very moment of Mr.
Bessel's first rush from his rooms at half-past nine in the evening--
they could trace the deepening violence of his fantastic career. For
the last hour, at least from before one, that is, until a quarter to
two, he had run amuck through London, eluding with amazing agility
every effort to stop or capture him.

But after a quarter to two he had vanished. Up to that hour witnesses
were multitudinous. Dozens of people had seen him, fled from him or
pursued him, and then things suddenly came to an end. At a quarter to
two he had been seen running down the Euston Road towards Baker Street,
flourishing a can of burning colza oil and jerking splashes of flame
therefrom at the windows of the houses he passed. But none of
the policemen on Euston Road beyond the Waxwork Exhibition, nor
any of those in the side streets down which he must have passed
had he left the Euston Road, had seen anything of him. Abruptly he
disappeared. Nothing of his subsequent doings came to light in spite
of the keenest inquiry.

Here was a fresh astonishment for Mr. Vincey. He had found considerable
comfort in Mr. Hart's conviction: "He is bound to be laid by the heels
before long," and in that assurance he had been able to suspend
his mental perplexities. But any fresh development seemed destined
to add new impossibilities to a pile already heaped beyond the powers
of his acceptance. He found himself doubting whether his memory
might not have played him some grotesque trick, debating whether any
of these things could possibly have happened; and in the afternoon he
hunted up Mr. Hart again to share the intolerable weight on his mind.
He found Mr. Hart engaged with a well-known private detective,
but as that gentleman accomplished nothing in this case, we need
not enlarge upon his proceedings.

All that day Mr. Bessel's whereabouts eluded an unceasingly active
inquiry, and all that night. And all that day there was a persuasion
in the back of Vincey's mind that Mr. Bessel sought his attention,
and all through the night Mr. Bessel with a tear-stained face
of anguish pursued him through his dreams. And whenever he saw
Mr. Bessel in his dreams he also saw a number of other faces, vague
but malignant, that seemed to be pursuing Mr. Bessel.

It was on the following day, Sunday, that Mr. Vincey recalled certain
remarkable stories of Mrs. Bullock, the medium, who was then attracting
attention for the first time in London. He determined to consult her.
She was staying at the house of that well-known inquirer, Dr. Wilson
Paget, and Mr. Vincey, although he had never met that gentleman before,
repaired to him forthwith with the intention of invoking her help.
But scarcely had he mentioned the name of Bessel when Doctor Paget
interrupted him. "Last night--just at the end," he said, "we had
a communication."

He left the room, and returned with a slate on which were certain
words written in a handwriting, shaky indeed, but indisputably
the handwriting of Mr. Bessel!

"How did you get this?" said Mr. Vincey. "Do you mean--?"

"We got it last night," said Doctor Paget. With numerous interruptions
from Mr. Vincey, he proceeded to explain how the writing had been
obtained. It appears that in her seances, Mrs. Bullock passes into
a condition of trance, her eyes rolling up in a strange way under
her eyelids, and her body becoming rigid. She then begins to talk
very rapidly, usually in voices other than her own. At the same time
one or both of her hands may become active, and if slates and pencils
are provided they will then write messages simultaneously with
and quite independently of the flow of words from her mouth. By many
she is considered an even more remarkable medium than the celebrated
Mrs. Piper. It was one of these messages, the one written by her
left hand, that Mr. Vincey now had before him. It consisted of eight
words written disconnectedly: "George Bessel . . . trial excavn. . . .
Baker Street . . . help . . . starvation." Curiously enough, neither
Doctor Paget nor the two other inquirers who were present had heard
of the disappearance of Mr. Bessel--the news of it appeared only
in the evening papers of Saturday--and they had put the message
aside with many others of a vague and enigmatical sort that
Mrs. Bullock has from time to time delivered.

When Doctor Paget heard Mr. Vincey's story, he gave himself at once
with great energy to the pursuit of this clue to the discovery of
Mr. Bessel. It would serve no useful purpose here to describe the
inquiries of Mr. Vincey and himself; suffice it that the clue was a
genuine one, and that Mr. Bessel was actually discovered by its aid.

He was found at the bottom of a detached shaft which had been sunk
and abandoned at the commencement of the work for the new electric
railway near Baker Street Station. His arm and leg and two ribs were
broken. The shaft is protected by a hoarding nearly 20 feet high, and
over this, incredible as it seems, Mr. Bessel, a stout, middle-aged
gentleman, must have scrambled in order to fall down the shaft.
He was saturated in colza oil, and the smashed tin lay beside him,
but luckily the flame had been extinguished by his fall. And his
madness had passed from him altogether. But he was, of course,
terribly enfeebled, and at the sight of his rescuers he gave way
to hysterical weeping.

In view of the deplorable state of his flat, he was taken to the
house of Dr. Hatton in Upper Baker Street. Here he was subjected to a
sedative treatment, and anything that might recall the violent crisis
through which he had passed was carefully avoided. But on the second
day he volunteered a statement.

Since that occasion Mr. Bessel has several times repeated this
statement--to myself among other people--varying the details as
the narrator of real experiences always does, but never by any
chance contradicting himself in any particular. And the statement
he makes is in substance as follows.

In order to understand it clearly it is necessary to go back to his
experiments with Mr. Vincey before his remarkable attack. Mr. Bessel's
first attempts at self-projection, in his experiments with Mr. Vincey,
were, as the reader will remember, unsuccessful. But through all
of them he was concentrating all his power and will upon getting
out of the body--"willing it with all my might," he says. At last,
almost against expectation, came success. And Mr. Bessel asserts that
he, being alive, did actually, by an effort of will, leave his body
and pass into some place or state outside this world.

The release was, he asserts, instantaneous. "At one moment I was
seated in my chair, with my eyes tightly shut, my hands gripping
the arms of the chair, doing all I could to concentrate my mind
on Vincey, and then I perceived myself outside my body--saw my body
near me, but certainly not containing me, with the hands relaxing
and the head drooping forward on the breast."

Nothing shakes him in his assurance of that release. He describes
in a quiet, matter-of-fact way the new sensation he experienced.
He felt he had become impalpable--so much he had expected, but
he had not expected to find himself enormously large. So, however,
it would seem he became. "I was a great cloud--if I may express it
that way--anchored to my body. It appeared to me, at first, as if
I had discovered a greater self of which the conscious being in my
brain was only a little part. I saw the Albany and Piccadilly and
Regent Street and all the rooms and places in the houses, very minute
and very bright and distinct, spread out below me like a little
city seen from a balloon. Every now and then vague shapes like
drifting wreaths of smoke made the vision a little indistinct, but
at first I paid little heed to them. The thing that astonished me
most, and which astonishes me still, is that I saw quite distinctly
the insides of the houses as well as the streets, saw little people
dining and talking in the private houses, men and women dining,
playing billiards, and drinking in restaurants and hotels, and several
places of entertainment crammed with people. It was like watching
the affairs of a glass hive."

Such were Mr. Bessel's exact words as I took them down when he told
me the story. Quite forgetful of Mr. Vincey, he remained for a space
observing these things. Impelled by curiosity, he says, he stooped
down, and, with the shadowy arm he found himself possessed of,
attempted to touch a man walking along Vigo Street. But he could
not do so, though his finger seemed to pass through the man. Something
prevented his doing this, but what it was he finds it hard to describe.
He compares the obstacle to a sheet of glass.

"I felt as a kitten may feel," he said, "when it goes for the first
time to pat its reflection in a mirror." Again and again, on the
occasion when I heard him tell this story, Mr. Bessel returned to that
comparison of the sheet of glass. Yet it was not altogether a precise
comparison, because, as the reader will speedily see, there were
interruptions of this generally impermeable resistance, means of
getting through the barrier to the material world again. But,
naturally, there is a very great difficulty in expressing these
unprecedented impressions in the language of everyday experience.

A thing that impressed him instantly, and which weighed upon him
throughout all this experience, was the stillness of this place--he
was in a world without sound.

At first Mr. Bessel's mental state was an unemotional wonder.
His thought chiefly concerned itself with where he might be. He was
out of the body--out of his material body, at any rate--but that
was not all. He believes, and I for one believe also, that he was
somewhere out of space, as we understand it, altogether. By a strenuous
effort of will he had passed out of his body into a world beyond
this world, a world undreamt of, yet lying so close to it and so
strangely situated with regard to it that all things on this earth
are clearly visible both from without and from within in this other
world about us. For a long time, as it seemed to him, this realisation
occupied his mind to the exclusion of all other matters, and then
he recalled the engagement with Mr. Vincey, to which this astonishing
experience was, after all, but a prelude.

He turned his mind to locomotion in this new body in which he found
himself. For a time he was unable to shift himself from his attachment
to his earthly carcass. For a time this new strange cloud body
of his simply swayed, contracted, expanded, coiled, and writhed
with his efforts to free himself, and then quite suddenly the link
that bound him snapped. For a moment everything was hidden by
what appeared to be whirling spheres of dark vapour, and then
through a momentary gap he saw his drooping body collapse limply,
saw his lifeless head drop sideways, and found he was driving along
like a huge cloud in a strange place of shadowy clouds that had
the luminous intricacy of London spread like a model below.

But now he was aware that the fluctuating vapour about him was
something more than vapour, and the temerarious excitement of his first
essay was shot with fear. For he perceived, at first indistinctly,
and then suddenly very clearly, that he was surrounded by FACES!
that each roll and coil of the seeming cloud-stuff was a face.
And such faces! Faces of thin shadow, faces of gaseous tenuity.
Faces like those faces that glare with intolerable strangeness
upon the sleeper in the evil hours of his dreams. Evil, greedy eyes
that were full of a covetous curiosity, faces with knit brows and
snarling, smiling lips; their vague hands clutched at Mr. Bessel
as he passed, and the rest of their bodies was but an elusive streak
of trailing darkness. Never a word they said, never a sound from
the mouths that seemed to gibber. All about him they pressed in that
dreamy silence, passing freely through the dim mistiness that was
his body, gathering ever more numerously about him. And the shadowy
Mr. Bessel, now suddenly fear-stricken, drove through the silent,
active multitude of eyes and clutching hands.

So inhuman were these faces, so malignant their staring eyes,
and shadowy, clawing gestures, that it did not occur to Mr. Bessel
to attempt intercourse with these drifting creatures. Idiot phantoms,
they seemed, children of vain desire, beings unborn and forbidden
the boon of being, whose only expressions and gestures told of
the envy and craving for life that was their one link with existence.

It says much for his resolution that, amidst the swarming cloud
of these noiseless spirits of evil, he could still think of Mr. Vincey.
He made a violent effort of will and found himself, he knew not how,
stooping towards Staple Inn, saw Vincey sitting attentive and alert
in his arm-chair by the fire.

And clustering also about him, as they clustered ever about all
that lives and breathes, was another multitude of these vain voiceless
shadows, longing, desiring, seeking some loophole into life.

For a space Mr. Bessel sought ineffectually to attract his friend's
attention. He tried to get in front of his eyes, to move the objects
in his room, to touch him. But Mr. Vincey remained unaffected,
ignorant of the being that was so close to his own. The strange
something that Mr. Bessel has compared to a sheet of glass separated
them impermeably.

And at last Mr. Bessel did a desperate thing. I have told how that
in some strange way he could see not only the outside of a man
as we see him, but within. He extended his shadowy hand and thrust
his vague black fingers, as it seemed, through the heedless brain.

Then, suddenly, Mr. Vincey started like a man who recalls his attention
from wandering thoughts, and it seemed to Mr. Bessel that a little
dark-red body situated in the middle of Mr. Vincey's brain swelled
and glowed as he did so. Since that experience he has been shown
anatomical figures of the brain, and he knows now that this is
that useless structure, as doctors call it, the pineal eye. For,
strange as it will seem to many, we have, deep in our brains--where
it cannot possibly see any earthly light--an eye! At the time this,
with the rest of the internal anatomy of the brain, was quite new
to him. At the sight of its changed appearance, however, he thrust
forth his finger, and, rather fearful still of the consequences,
touched this little spot. And instantly Mr. Vincey started, and
Mr. Bessel knew that he was seen.

And at that instant it came to Mr. Bessel that evil had happened
to his body, and behold! a great wind blew through all that world
of shadows and tore him away. So strong was this persuasion that
he thought no more of Mr. Vincey, but turned about forthwith, and all
the countless faces drove back with him like leaves before a gale.
But he returned too late. In an instant he saw the body that he had
left inert and collapsed--lying, indeed, like the body of a man
just dead--had arisen, had arisen by virtue of some strength and
will beyond his own. It stood with staring eyes, stretching its limbs
in dubious fashion.

For a moment he watched it in wild dismay, and then he stooped
towards it. But the pane of glass had closed against him again,
and he was foiled. He beat himself passionately against this, and
all about him the spirits of evil grinned and pointed and mocked.
He gave way to furious anger. He compares himself to a bird that
has fluttered heedlessly into a room and is beating at the window-
pane that holds it back from freedom.

And behold! the little body that had once been his was now dancing
with delight. He saw it shouting, though he could not hear its shouts;
he saw the violence of its movements grow. He watched it fling
his cherished furniture about in the mad delight of existence,
rend his books apart, smash bottles, drink heedlessly from the jagged
fragments, leap and smite in a passionate acceptance of living.
He watched these actions in paralysed astonishment. Then once more
he hurled himself against the impassable barrier, and then with all
that crew of mocking ghosts about him, hurried back in dire confusion
to Vincey to tell him of the outrage that had come upon him.

But the brain of Vincey was now closed against apparitions, and
the disembodied Mr. Bessel pursued him in vain as he hurried out
into Holborn to call a cab. Foiled and terror-stricken, Mr. Bessel
swept back again, to find his desecrated body whooping in a glorious
frenzy down the Burlington Arcade. . . .

And now the attentive reader begins to understand Mr. Bessel's
interpretation of the first part of this strange story. The being
whose frantic rush through London had inflicted so much injury
and disaster had indeed Mr. Bessel's body, but it was not Mr. Bessel.
It was an evil spirit out of that strange world beyond existence,
into which Mr. Bessel had so rashly ventured. For twenty hours it held
possession of him, and for all those twenty hours the dispossessed
spirit-body of Mr. Bessel was going to and fro in that unheard-of
middle world of shadows seeking help in vain. He spent many hours
beating at the minds of Mr. Vincey and of his friend Mr. Hart.
Each, as we know, he roused by his efforts. But the language that
might convey his situation to these helpers across the gulf he did
not know; his feeble fingers groped vainly and powerlessly in their
brains. Once, indeed, as we have already told, he was able to turn
Mr. Vincey aside from his path so that he encountered the stolen
body in its career, but he could not make him understand the thing
that had happened: he was unable to draw any help from that
encounter. . . .

All through those hours the persuasion was overwhelming in Mr. Bessel's
mind that presently his body would be killed by its furious tenant,
and he would have to remain in this shadow-land for evermore.
So that those long hours were a growing agony of fear. And ever
as he hurried to and fro in his ineffectual excitement, innumerable
spirits of that world about him mobbed him and confused his mind.
And ever an envious applauding multitude poured after their successful
fellow as he went upon his glorious career.

For that, it would seem, must be the life of these bodiless things
of this world that is the shadow of our world. Ever they watch,
coveting a way into a mortal body, in order that they may descend,
as furies and frenzies, as violent lusts and mad, strange impulses,
rejoicing in the body they have won. For Mr. Bessel was not the only
human soul in that place. Witness the fact that he met first one,
and afterwards several shadows of men, men like himself, it seemed,
who had lost their bodies even it may be as he had lost his, and
wandered, despairingly, in that lost world that is neither life
nor death. They could not speak because that world is silent, yet
he knew them for men because of their dim human bodies, and because
of the sadness of their faces.

But how they had come into that world he could not tell, nor where
the bodies they had lost might be, whether they still raved about
the earth, or whether they were closed forever in death against
return. That they were the spirits of the dead neither he nor I
believe. But Doctor Wilson Paget thinks they are the rational souls
of men who are lost in madness on the earth.

At last Mr. Bessel chanced upon a place where a little crowd of such
disembodied silent creatures was gathered, and thrusting through them
he saw below a brightly-lit room, and four or five quiet gentlemen
and a woman, a stoutish woman dressed in black bombazine and sitting
awkwardly in a chair with her head thrown back. He knew her from
her portraits to be Mrs. Bullock, the medium. And he perceived
that tracts and structures in her brain glowed and stirred as he had
seen the pineal eye in the brain of Mr. Vincey glow. The light was
very fitful; sometimes it was a broad illumination, and sometimes
merely a faint twilight spot, and it shifted slowly about her brain.
She kept on talking and writing with one hand. And Mr. Bessel saw
that the crowding shadows of men about him, and a great multitude
of the shadow spirits of that shadowland, were all striving and
thrusting to touch the lighted regions of her brain. As one gained
her brain or another was thrust away, her voice and the writing of
her hand changed. So that what she said was disorderly and confused
for the most part; now a fragment of one soul's message, and now
a fragment of another's, and now she babbled the insane fancies
of the spirits of vain desire. Then Mr. Bessel understood that she
spoke for the spirit that had touch of her, and he began to struggle
very furiously towards her. But he was on the outside of the crowd
and at that time he could not reach her, and at last, growing anxious,
he went away to find what had happened meanwhile to his body. For a
long time he went to and fro seeking it in vain and fearing that it
must have been killed, and then he found it at the bottom of the shaft
in Baker Street, writhing furiously and cursing with pain. Its leg and
an arm and two ribs had been broken by its fall. Moreover, the evil
spirit was angry because his time had been so short and because of the
painmaking violent movements and casting his body about.

And at that Mr. Bessel returned with redoubled earnestness to the
room where the seance was going on, and so soon as he had thrust
himself within sight of the place he saw one of the men who stood
about the medium looking at his watch as if he meant that the seance
should presently end. At that a great number of the shadows who had
been striving turned away with gestures of despair. But the thought
that the seance was almost over only made Mr. Bessel the more
earnest, and he struggled so stoutly with his will against the others
that presently he gained the woman's brain. It chanced that just
at that moment it glowed very brightly, and in that instant she wrote
the message that Doctor Wilson Paget preserved. And then the other
shadows and the cloud of evil spirits about him had thrust Mr. Bessel
away from her, and for all the rest of the seance he could regain
her no more.

So he went back and watched through the long hours at the bottom
of the shaft where the evil spirit lay in the stolen body it had
maimed, writhing and cursing, and weeping and groaning, and learning
the lesson of pain. And towards dawn the thing he had waited for
happened, the brain glowed brightly and the evil spirit came out,
and Mr. Bessel entered the body he had feared he should never enter
again. As he did so, the silence--the brooding silence--ended;
he heard the tumult of traffic and the voices of people overhead,
and that strange world that is the shadow of our world--the dark
and silent shadows of ineffectual desire and the shadows of lost
men--vanished clean away.

He lay there for the space of about three hours before he was found.
And in spite of the pain and suffering of his wounds, and of the dim
damp place in which he lay; in spite of the tears--wrung from him
by his physical distress--his heart was full of gladness to know
that he was nevertheless back once more in the kindly world of men.


11.  MR. BRISHER'S TREASURE

"You can't be TOO careful WHO you marry," said Mr. Brisher, and
pulled thoughtfully with a fat-wristed hand at the lank moustache
that hides his want of chin.

"That's why--" I ventured.

"Yes," said Mr. Brisher, with a solemn light in his bleary, blue-grey
eyes, moving his head expressively and breathing alcohol INTIMATELY
at me. "There's lots as 'ave 'ad a try at me--many as I could name
in this town--but none 'ave done it--none."

I surveyed the flushed countenance, the equatorial expansion,
the masterly carelessness of his attire, and heaved a sigh to think
that by reason of the unworthiness of women he must needs be the last
of his race.

"I was a smart young chap when I was younger," said Mr. Brisher.
"I 'ad my work cut out. But I was very careful--very. And I got
through . . ."

He leant over the taproom table and thought visibly on the subject
of my trustworthiness. I was relieved at last by his confidence.

"I was engaged once," he said at last, with a reminiscent eye on
the shuv-a'penny board.

"So near as that?"

He looked at me. "So near as that. Fact is--" He looked about him,
brought his face close to mine, lowered his voice, and fenced off an
unsympathetic world with a grimy hand. "If she ain't dead or married
to some one else or anything--I'm engaged still. Now." He confirmed
this statement with nods and facial contortions. "STILL," he said,
ending the pantomime, and broke into a reckless smile at my surprise.
"ME!"

"Run away," he explained further, with coruscating eyebrows.
"Come 'ome.

"That ain't all.

"You'd 'ardly believe it," he said, "but I found a treasure. Found
a regular treasure."

I fancied this was irony, and did not, perhaps, greet it with proper
surprise. "Yes," he said, "I found a treasure. And come 'ome. I tell
you I could surprise you with things that has happened to me."
And for some time he was content to repeat that he had found
a treasure--and left it.

I made no vulgar clamour for a story, but I became attentive to Mr.
Brisher's bodily needs, and presently I led him back to the deserted
lady.

"She was a nice girl," he said--a little sadly, I thought. "AND
respectable."

He raised his eyebrows and tightened his mouth to express extreme
respectability--beyond the likes of us elderly men.

"It was a long way from 'ere. Essex, in fact. Near Colchester.
It was when I was up in London--in the buildin' trade. I was a smart
young chap then, I can tell you. Slim. 'Ad best clo'es 's good
as anybody. 'At--SILK 'at, mind you." Mr. Brisher's hand shot above
his head towards the infinite to indicate it silk hat of the highest.
"Umbrella--nice umbrella with a 'orn 'andle. Savin's. Very careful
I was. . . ."

He was pensive for a little while, thinking, as we must all come
to think sooner or later, of the vanished brightness of youth.
But he refrained, as one may do in taprooms, from the obvious moral.

"I got to know 'er through a chap what was engaged to 'er sister.
She was stopping in London for a bit with an aunt that 'ad a 'am
an' beef shop. This aunt was very particular--they was all very
particular people, all 'er people was--and wouldn't let 'er sister
go out with this feller except 'er other sister, MY girl that is,
went with them. So 'e brought me into it, sort of to ease the crowding.
We used to go walks in Battersea Park of a Sunday afternoon. Me in
my topper, and 'im in 'is; and the girl's--well--stylish. There wasn't
many in Battersea Park 'ad the larf of us. She wasn't what you'd
call pretty, but a nicer girl I never met. _I _ liked 'er from
the start, and, well--though I say it who shouldn't--she liked me.
You know 'ow it is, I dessay?"

I pretended I did.

"And when this chap married 'er sister--'im and me was great
friends--what must 'e do but arst me down to Colchester, close by
where She lived. Naturally I was introjuced to 'er people, and well,
very soon, her and me was engaged."

He repeated "engaged."

"She lived at 'ome with 'er father and mother, quite the lady, in a
very nice little 'ouse with a garden--and remarkable respectable
people they was. Rich you might call 'em a'most. They owned their
own 'ouse--got it out of the Building Society, and cheap because
the chap who had it before was a burglar and in prison--and they 'ad
a bit of free'old land, and some cottages and money 'nvested--all
nice and tight: they was what you'd call snug and warm. I tell you,
I was On. Furniture too. Why! They 'ad a pianner. Jane--'er name
was Jane--used to play it Sundays, and very nice she played too.
There wasn't 'ardly a 'im toon in the book she COULDN'T play . . .

"Many's the evenin' we've met and sung 'ims there, me and 'er
and the family.

"'Er father was quite a leadin' man in chapel. You should ha' seen
him Sundays, interruptin' the minister and givin' out 'ims. He had
gold spectacles, I remember, and used to look over 'em at you while
he sang hearty--he was always great on singing 'earty to the Lord--
and when HE got out o' toon 'arf the people went after 'im--always.
'E was that sort of man. And to walk be'ind 'im in 'is nice black
clo'es--'is 'at was a brimmer--made one regular proud to be engaged
to such a father-in-law. And when the summer came I went down there
and stopped a fortnight.

"Now, you know there was a sort of Itch," said Mr. Brisher. "We wanted
to marry, me and Jane did, and get things settled. But 'E said I 'ad
to get a proper position first. Consequently there was a Itch.
Consequently, when I went down there, I was anxious to show that
I was a good useful sort of chap like. Show I could do pretty nearly
everything like. See?"

I made a sympathetic noise.

"And down at the bottom of their garden was a bit of wild part like.
So I says to 'im, 'Why don't you 'ave a rockery 'ere?' I says.
'It 'ud look nice.'

"'Too much expense,' he says.

"'Not a penny,' says I. 'I'm a dab at rockeries. Lemme make you one.'
You see, I'd 'elped my brother make a rockery in the beer garden
be'ind 'is tap, so I knew 'ow to do it to rights. 'Lemme make you
one,' I says. 'It's 'olidays, but I'm that sort of chap, I 'ate doing
nothing,' I says. 'I'll make you one to rights.' And the long and
the short of it was, he said I might.

"And that's 'ow I come on the treasure."

"What treasure?" I asked.

"Why!" said Mr. Brisher, "the treasure I'm telling you about, what's
the reason why I never married."

"What!--a treasure--dug up?"

"Yes--buried wealth--treasure trove. Come out of the ground. What
I kept on saying--regular treasure. . . ." He looked at me with
unusual disrespect.

"It wasn't more than a foot deep, not the top of it," he said.
"I'd 'ardly got thirsty like, before I come on the corner."

"Go on," I said. "I didn't understand."

"Why! Directly I 'it the box I knew it was treasure. A sort of instinct
told me. Something seemed to shout inside of me--'Now's your chance--
lie low.' It's lucky I knew the laws of treasure trove or I'd 'ave been
shoutin' there and then. I daresay you know--"

"Crown bags it," I said, "all but one per cent. Go on. It's a shame.
What did you do?"

"Uncovered the top of the box. There wasn't anybody in the garden
or about like. Jane was 'elping 'er mother do the 'ouse. I WAS
excited--I tell you. I tried the lock and then gave a whack at
the hinges. Open it came. Silver coins--full! Shining. It made me
tremble to see 'em. And jest then--I'm blessed if the dustman didn't
come round the back of the 'ouse. It pretty nearly gave me 'eart
disease to think what a fool I was to 'ave that money showing. And
directly after I 'eard the chap next door--'e was 'olidaying, too--
I 'eard him watering 'is beans. If only 'e'd looked over the fence!"

"What did you do?"

"Kicked the lid on again and covered it up like a shot, and went
on digging about a yard away from it--like mad. And my face, so
to speak, was laughing on its own account till I had it hid. I tell
you I was regular scared like at my luck. I jest thought that it
'ad to be kep' close and that was all. 'Treasure,' I kep' whisperin'
to myself, 'Treasure' and ''undreds of pounds, 'undreds, 'undreds
of pounds.' Whispering to myself like, and digging like blazes. It
seemed to me the box was regular sticking out and showing, like your
legs do under the sheets in bed, and I went and put all the earth
I'd got out of my 'ole for the rockery slap on top of it. I WAS
in a sweat. And in the midst of it all out toddles 'er father.
He didn't say anything to me, jest stood behind me and stared,
but Jane tole me afterwards when he went indoors, 'e says, 'That
there jackanapes of yours, Jane'--he always called me a jackanapes
some'ow--'knows 'ow to put 'is back into it after all.' Seemed quite
impressed by it, 'e did."

"How long was the box?" I asked, suddenly.

"'Ow long?" said Mr. Brisher.

"Yes--in length?"

"Oh! 'bout so-by-so." Mr. Brisher indicated a moderate-sized trunk.

"FULL?" said I.

"Full up of silver coins--'arf-crowns, I believe."

"Why!" I cried, "that would mean--hundreds of pounds."

"Thousands," said Mr. Brisher, in a sort of sad calm. "I calc'lated it
out."

"But how did they get there?"

"All I know is what I found. What I thought at the time was this.
The chap who'd owned the 'ouse before 'er father 'd been a regular
slap-up burglar. What you'd call a 'igh-class criminal. Used to drive
'is trap--like Peace did." Mr. Brisher meditated on the difficulties
of narration and embarked on a complicated parenthesis. "I don't
know if I told you it'd been a burglar's 'ouse before it was my girl's
father's, and I knew 'e'd robbed a mail train once, I did know that.
It seemed to me--"

"That's very likely," I said. "But what did you do?"

"Sweated," said Mr. Brisher. "Regular run orf me. All that morning,"
said Mr. Brisher, "I was at it, pretending to make that rockery
and wondering what I should do. I'd 'ave told 'er father p'r'aps,
only I was doubtful of 'is honesty--I was afraid he might rob me of
it like, and give it up to the authorities--and besides, considering
I was marrying into the family, I thought it would be nicer like
if it came through me. Put me on a better footing, so to speak.
Well, I 'ad three days before me left of my 'olidays, so there
wasn't no hurry, so I covered it up and went on digging, and tried
to puzzle out 'ow I was to make sure of it. Only I couldn't.

"I thought," said Mr. Brisher, "AND I thought. Once I got regular
doubtful whether I'd seen it or not, and went down to it and 'ad it
uncovered again, just as her ma came out to 'ang up a bit of washin'
she'd done. Jumps again! Afterwards I was just thinking I'd 'ave
another go at it, when Jane comes to tell me dinner was ready.
'You'll want it,' she said, 'seeing all the 'ole you've dug.'

"I was in a regular daze all dinner, wondering whether that chap
next door wasn't over the fence and filling 'is pockets. But in
the afternoon I got easier in my mind--it seemed to me it must 'ave
been there so long it was pretty sure to stop a bit longer--and
I tried to get up a bit of a discussion to dror out the old man
and see what 'E thought of treasure trove."

Mr. Brisher paused, and affected amusement at the memory.

"The old man was a scorcher," he said; "a regular scorcher."

"What!" said I; "did he--?"

"It was like this," explained Mr. Brisher, laying a friendly hand
on my arm and breathing into my face to calm me. "Just to dror
'im out, I told a story of a chap I said I knew--pretendin', you
know--who'd found a sovring in a novercoat 'e'd borrowed. I said
'e stuck to it, but I said I wasn't sure whether that was right
or not. And then the old man began. Lor'! 'e DID let me 'ave it!"
Mr. Brisher affected an insincere amusement. "'E was, well--what you
might call a rare 'and at Snacks. Said that was the sort of friend
'e'd naturally expect me to 'ave. Said 'e'd naturally expect that
from the friend of a out-of-work loafer who took up with daughters
who didn't belong to 'im. There! I couldn't tell you 'ARF 'e said.
'E went on most outrageous. I stood up to 'im about it, just to dror
'im out. 'Wouldn't you stick to a 'arf-sov', not if you found it in
the street?' I says. 'Certainly not,' 'e says; 'certainly I wouldn't.'
'What! not if you found it as a sort of treasure?' 'Young man,'
'e says, 'there's 'i'er 'thority than mine--Render unto Caesar'--
what is it? Yes. Well, he fetched up that. A rare 'and at 'itting
you over the 'ed with the Bible, was the old man. And so he went on.
'E got to such Snacks about me at last I couldn't stand it. I'd
promised Jane not to answer 'im back, but it got a bit TOO thick.
I--I give it 'im . . ."

Mr. Brisher, by means of enigmatical facework, tried to make me
think he had had the best of that argument, but I knew better.

"I went out in a 'uff at last. But not before I was pretty sure I
'ad to lift that treasure by myself. The only thing that kep' me up
was thinking 'ow I'd take it out of 'im when I 'ad the cash."

There was a lengthy pause.

"Now, you'd 'ardly believe it, but all them three days I never
'ad a chance at the blessed treasure, never got out not even
a 'arf-crown. There was always a Somethink--always.

"'Stonishing thing it isn't thought of more," said Mr. Brisher.
"Finding treasure's no great shakes. It's gettin' it. I don't
suppose I slep' a wink any of those nights, thinking where I was
to take it, what I was to do with it, 'ow I was to explain it.
It made me regular ill. And days I was that dull, it made Jane
regular 'uffy. 'You ain't the same chap you was in London,' she
says, several times. I tried to lay it on 'er father and 'is Snacks,
but bless you, she knew better. What must she 'ave but that I'd
got another girl on my mind! Said I wasn't True. Well, we had
a bit of a row. But I was that set on the Treasure, I didn't seem
to mind a bit Anything she said.

"Well, at last I got a sort of plan. I was always a bit good at
planning, though carrying out isn't so much in my line. I thought it
all out and settled on a plan. First, I was going to take all my
pockets full of these 'ere 'arf-crowns--see?--and afterwards as I
shall tell.

"Well, I got to that state I couldn't think of getting at the Treasure
again in the daytime, so I waited until the night before I had to go,
and then, when everything was still, up I gets and slips down
to the back door, meaning to get my pockets full. What must I do
in the scullery but fall over a pail! Up gets 'er father with a gun--'e
was a light sleeper was 'er father, and very suspicious and there
was me: 'ad to explain I'd come down to the pump for a drink because
my water-bottle was bad. 'E didn't let me off a Snack or two over
that bit, you lay a bob."

"And you mean to say--" I began.

"Wait a bit," said Mr. Brisher. "I say, I'd made my plan. That put
the kybosh on one bit, but it didn't 'urt the general scheme not a bit.
I went and I finished that rockery next day, as though there wasn't
a Snack in the world; cemented over the stones, I did, dabbed
it green and everythink. I put a dab of green just to show where
the box was. They all came and looked at it, and sai 'ow nice
it was--even 'e was a bit softer like to see it, and all he said was,
"It's a pity you can't always work like that, then you might get
something definite to do," he says.

"'Yes,' I says--I couldn't 'elp it--'I put a lot in that rockery,'
I says, like that. See? 'I put a lot in that rockery'--meaning--"

"I see," said I--for Mr. Brisher is apt to overelaborate his jokes.

"_'E_ didn't," said Mr. Brisher. "Not then, anyhow.

"Ar'ever--after all that was over, off I set for London. . . .
Orf I set for London."

Pause.

"On'y I wasn't going to no London," said Mr. Brisher, with sudden
animation, and thrusting his face into mine. "No fear! What do YOU
think?

"I didn't go no further than Colchester--not a yard.

"I'd left the spade just where I could find it. I'd got everything
planned and right. I 'ired a little trap in Colchester, and pretended
I wanted to go to Ipswich and stop the night, and come back next
day, and the chap I 'ired it from made me leave two sovrings on it
right away, and off I set.

"I didn't go to no Ipswich neither.

"Midnight the 'orse and trap was 'itched by the little road that ran
by the cottage where 'e lived--not sixty yards off, it wasn't--and
I was at it like a good 'un. It was jest the night for such
games--overcast--but a trifle too 'ot, and all round the sky there
was summer lightning and presently a thunderstorm. Down it came.
First big drops in a sort of fizzle, then 'ail. I kep'on. I whacked
at it--I didn't dream the old man would 'ear. I didn't even trouble
to go quiet with the spade, and the thunder and lightning and 'ail
seemed to excite me like. I shouldn't wonder if I was singing. I got
so 'ard at it I clean forgot the thunder and the 'orse and trap. I
precious soon got the box showing, and started to lift it . . . ."

"Heavy?" I said.

"I couldn't no more lift it than fly. I WAS sick. I'd never thought
of that I got regular wild--I tell you, I cursed. I got sort of
outrageous. I didn't think of dividing it like for the minute,
and even then I couldn't 'ave took money about loose in a trap.
I hoisted one end sort of wild like, and over the whole show went
with a tremenjous noise. Perfeck smash of silver. And then right
on the heels of that, Flash! Lightning like the day! and there was
the back door open and the old man coming down the garden with
'is blooming old gun. He wasn't not a 'undred yards away!

"I tell you I was that upset--I didn't think what I was doing.
I never stopped-not even to fill my pockets. I went over the fence
like a shot, and ran like one o'clock for the trap, cussing and
swearing as I went. I WAS in a state. . . .

"And will you believe me, when I got to the place where I'd left
the 'orse and trap, they'd gone. Orf! When I saw that I 'adn't
a cuss left for it. I jest danced on the grass, and when I'd danced
enough I started off to London. . . . I was done."

Mr. Brisher was pensive for an interval. "I was done," he repeated,
very bitterly.

"Well?" I said.

"That's all," said Mr. Brisher.

"You didn't go back?"

"No fear. I'd 'ad enough of THAT blooming treasure, any'ow for a bit.
Besides, I didn't know what was done to chaps who tried to collar
a treasure trove. I started off for London there and then. . . ."

"And you never went back?"

"Never."

"But about Jane? Did you write?"

"Three times, fishing like. And no answer. We'd parted in a bit
of a 'uff on account of 'er being jealous. So that I couldn't make
out for certain what it meant.

"I didn't know what to do. I didn't even know whether the old man
knew it was me. I sort of kep' an eye open on papers to see when he'd
give up that treasure to the Crown, as I hadn't a doubt 'e would,
considering 'ow respectable he'd always been."

"And did he?"

Mr. Brisher pursed his mouth and moved his head slowly from side
to side. "Not 'IM," he said.

"Jane was a nice girl," he said, "a thorough nice girl mind you,
if jealous, and there's no knowing I mightn't 'ave gone back to 'er
after a bit. I thought if he didn't give up the treasure I might 'ave
a sort of 'old on 'im. . . . Well, one day I looks as usual under
Colchester--and there I saw 'is name. What for, d'yer think?"

I could not guess.

Mr. Brisher's voice sank to a whisper, and once more he spoke behind
his hand. His manner was suddenly suffused with a positive joy.
"Issuing counterfeit coins," he said. "Counterfeit coins!"

"You don't mean to say--?"

"Yes-It. Bad. Quite a long case they made of it. But they got 'im,
though he dodged tremenjous. Traced 'is 'aving passed, oh!--nearly
a dozen bad 'arf-crowns."

"And you didn't--?"

"No fear. And it didn't do 'IM much good to say it was treasure trove."


12.  MISS WINCHELSEA'S HEART

Miss Winchelsea was going to Rome. The matter had filled her mind
for a month or more, and had overflowed so abundantly into her
conversation that quite a number of people who were not going to Rome,
and who were not likely to go to Rome, had made it a personal
grievance against her. Some indeed had attempted quite unavailingly
to convince her that Rome was not nearly such a desirable place
as it was reported to be, and others had gone so far as to suggest
behind her back that she was dreadfully "stuck up" about "that Rome
of hers." And little Lily Hardhurst had told her friend Mr. Binns
that so far as she was concerned Miss Winchelsea might "go to her
old Rome and stop there; SHE (Miss Lily Hardhurst) wouldn't grieve."
And the way in which Miss Winchelsea put herself upon terms of personal
tenderness with Horace and Benvenuto Cellini and Raphael and Shelley
and Keats--if she had been Shelley's widow she could not have professed
a keener interest in his grave--was a matter of universal astonishment.
Her dress was a triumph of tactful discretion, sensible, but not too
"touristy"--Miss Winchelsea, had a great dread of being "touristy"--
and her Baedeker was carried in a cover of grey to hide its glaring
red. She made a prim and pleasant little figure on the Charing Cross
platform, in spite of her swelling pride, when at last the great
day dawned, and she could start for Rome. The day was bright,
the Channel passage would be pleasant, and all the omens promised
well. There was the gayest sense of adventure in this unprecedented
departure.

She was going with two friends who had been fellow-students with her
at the training college, nice honest girls both, though not so good
at history and literature as Miss Winchelsea. They both looked up
to her immensely, though physically they had to look down, and she
anticipated some pleasant times to be spent in "stirring them up"
to her own pitch of aesthetic and historical enthusiasm. They had
secured seats already, and welcomed her effusively at the carriage
door. In the instant criticism of the encounter she noted that Fanny
had a slightly "touristy" leather strap, and that Helen had succumbed
to a serge jacket with side pockets, into which her hands were thrust.
But they were much too happy with themselves and the expedition
for their friend to attempt any hint at the moment about these things.
As soon as the first ecstasies were over--Fanny's enthusiasm was
a little noisy and crude, and consisted mainly in emphatic repetitions
of "Just FANCY! we're going to Rome, my dear!--Rome!"--they gave
their attention to their fellow-travellers. Helen was anxious to
secure a compartment to themselves, and, in order to discourage
intruders, got out and planted herself firmly on the step. Miss
Winchelsea peeped out over her shoulder, and made sly little remarks
about the accumulating people on the platform, at which Fanny laughed
gleefully.

They were travelling with one of Mr. Thomas Gunn's parties--fourteen
days in Rome for fourteen pounds. They did not belong to the personally
conducted party of course--Miss Winchelsea had seen to that--but
they travelled with it because of the convenience of that arrangement.
The people were the oddest mixture, and wonderfully amusing.
There was a vociferous red-faced polyglot personal conductor in
a pepper-and-salt suit, very long in the arms and legs and very
active. He shouted proclamations. When he wanted to speak to people he
stretched out an arm and held them until his purpose was accomplished.
One hand was full of papers, tickets, counterfoils of tourists.
The people of the personally conducted party were, it seemed,
of two sorts; people the conductor wanted and could not find,
and people he did not want and who followed him in a steadily
growing tail up and down the platform. These people seemed, indeed,
to think that their one chance of reaching Rome lay in keeping
close to him. Three little old ladies were particularly energetic
in his pursuit, and at last maddened him to the pitch of clapping
them into a carriage and daring them to emerge again. For the rest
of the time, one, two, or three of their heads protruded from
the window wailing enquiries about "a little wickerwork box"
whenever he drew near. There was a very stout man with a very stout
wife in shiny black; there was a little old man like an aged hostler.

"What CAN such people want in Rome?" asked Miss Winchelsea. "What
can it mean to them?" There was a very tall curate in a very small
straw hat, and a very short curate encumbered by a long camera
stand. The contrast amused Fanny very much. Once they heard some
one calling for "Snooks." "I always thought that name was invented
by novelists," said Miss Winchelsea. "Fancy! Snooks. I wonder which
IS Mr. Snooks." Finally they picked out a very stout and resolute
little man in a large check suit. "If he isn't Snooks, he ought
to be," said Miss Winchelsea.

Presently the conductor discovered Helen's attempt at a corner
in carriages. "Room for five," he bawled with a parallel translation
on his fingers. A party of four together--mother, father, and two
daughters--blundered in, all greatly excited. "It's all right, Ma,
you let me," said one of the daughters, hitting her mother's bonnet
with a handbag she struggled to put in the rack. Miss Winchelsea
detested people who banged about and called their mother "Ma."
A young man travelling alone followed. He was not at all "touristy"
in his costume, Miss Winchelsea observed; his Gladstone bag was
of good pleasant leather with labels reminiscent of Luxembourg and
Ostend, and his boots, though brown, were not vulgar. He carried
an overcoat on his arm. Before these people had properly settled
in their places, came an inspection of tickets and a slamming
of doors, and behold! they were gliding out of Charing Cross
station on their way to Rome.

"Fancy!" cried Fanny, "we are going to Rome, my dear! Rome! I don't
seem to believe it, even now."

Miss Winchelsea suppressed Fanny's emotions with a little smile,
and the lady who was called "Ma" explained to people in general
why they had "cut it so close" at the station. The two daughters
called her "Ma" several times, toned her down in a tactless effective
way, and drove her at last to the muttered inventory of a basket
of travelling requisites. Presently she looked up. "Lor'!" she said,
"I didn't bring THEM!" Both the daughters said "Oh, Ma!" but what
"them" was did not appear. Presently Fanny produced Hare's Walks
in Rome, a sort of mitigated guide-book very popular among Roman
visitors; and the father of the two daughters began to examine
his books of tickets minutely, apparently in a search after English
words. When he had looked at the tickets for a long time right way up,
he turned them upside down. Then he produced a fountain pen and
dated them with considerable care. The young man, having completed
an unostentatious survey of his fellow travellers, produced a book and
fell to reading. When Helen and Fanny were looking out of the window
at Chiselhurst--the place interested Fanny because the poor dear
Empress of the French used to live there--Miss Winchelsea took
the opportunity to observe the book the young man held. It was not
a guide-book, but a little thin volume of poetry--BOUND. She glanced
at his face--it seemed a refined pleasant face to her hasty glance.
He wore a little gilt pince-nez. "Do you think she lives there
now?" said Fanny, and Miss Winchelsea's inspection came to an end.

For the rest of the journey Miss Winchelsea talked little, and what
she said was as pleasant and as stamped with refinement as she
could make it. Her voice was always low and clear and pleasant,
and she took care that on this occasion it was particularly low and
clear and pleasant. As they came under the white cliffs the young
man put his book of poetry away, and when at last the train stopped
beside the boat, he displayed a graceful alacrity with the impedimenta
of Miss Winchelsea and her friends. Miss Winchelsea hated nonsense,
but she was pleased to see the young man perceived at once that
they were ladies, and helped them without any violent geniality;
and how nicely he showed that his civilities were to be no excuse
for further intrusions. None of her little party had been out
of England before, and they were all excited and a little nervous
at the Channel passage. They stood in a little group in a good place
near the middle of the boat--the young man had taken Miss Winchelsea's
carry-all there and had told her it was a good place--and they watched
the white shores of Albion recede and quoted Shakespeare and made
quiet fun of their fellow travellers in the English way.

They were particularly amused at the precautions the bigger-sized
people had taken against the little waves--cut lemons and flasks
prevailed, one lady lay full-length in a deck chair with a handkerchief
over her face, and a very broad resolute man in a bright brown
"touristy" suit walked all the way from England to France along
the deck, with his legs as widely apart as Providence permitted. These
were all excellent precautions, and, nobody was ill. The personally
conducted party pursued the conductor about the deck with enquiries
in a manner that suggested to Helen's mind the rather vulgar image
of hens with a piece of bacon peel, until at last he went into hiding
below. And the young man with the thin volume of poetry stood
at the stern watching England receding, looking rather lonely
and sad to Miss Winchelsea's eye.

And then came Calais and tumultuous novelties, and the young man
had not forgotten Miss Winchelsea's hold-all and the other little
things. All three girls, though they had passed government examinations
in French to any extent, were stricken with a dumb shame of their
accents, and the young man was very useful. And he did not intrude.
He put them in a comfortable carriage and raised his hat and went
away. Miss Winchelsea thanked him in her best manner--a pleasing,
cultivated manner--and Fanny said he was "nice" almost before he
was out of earshot. "I wonder what he can be," said Helen. "He's
going to Italy, because I noticed green tickets in his book."
Miss Winchelsea almost told them of the poetry, and decided not
to do so. And presently the carriage windows seized hold upon them
and the young man was forgotten. It made them feel that they were
doing an educated sort of thing to travel through a country whose
commonest advertisements were in idiomatic French, and Miss Winchelsea
made unpatriotic comparisons because there were weedy little sign-board
advertisements by the rail side instead of the broad hoardings that
deface the landscape in our land. But the north of France is really
uninteresting country, and after a time Fanny reverted to Hare's Walks
and Helen initiated lunch. Miss Winchelsea awoke out of a happy
reverie; she had been trying to realise, she said, that she was
actually going to Rome, but she perceived at Helen's suggestion
that she was hungry, and they lunched out of their baskets very
cheerfully. In the afternoon they were tired and silent until Helen
made tea. Miss Winchelsea might have dozed, only she knew Fanny
slept with her mouth open; and as their fellow passengers were
two rather nice critical-looking ladies of uncertain age--who knew
French well enough to talk it--she employed herself in keeping Fanny
awake. The rhythm of the train became insistent, and the streaming
landscape outside became at last quite painful to the eye. They were
already dreadfully tired of travelling before their night's stoppage
came.

The stoppage for the night was brightened by the appearance of
the young man, and his manners were all that could be desired and
his French quite serviceable. His coupons availed for the same hotel
as theirs, and by chance as it seemed he sat next Miss Winchelsea
at the table d'hote. In spite of her enthusiasm for Rome, she had
thought out some such possibility very thoroughly, and when he
ventured to make a remark upon the tediousness of travelling--he
let the soup and fish go by before he did this--she did not simply
assent to his proposition, but responded with another. They were
soon comparing their journeys, and Helen and Fanny were cruelly
overlooked in the conversation. It was to be the same journey,
they found; one day for the galleries at Florence--"from what I
hear," said the young man, "it is barely enough,"--and the rest
at Rome. He talked of Rome very pleasantly; he was evidently quite
well read, and he quoted Horace about Soracte. Miss Winchelsea had
"done" that book of Horace for her matriculation, and was delighted
to cap his quotation. It gave a sort of tone to things, this
incident--a touch of refinement to mere chatting. Fanny expressed
a few emotions, and Helen interpolated a few sensible remarks, but
the bulk of the talk on the girls' side naturally fell to Miss
Winchelsea.

Before they reached Rome this young man was tacitly of their party.
They did not know his name nor what he was, but it seemed he taught,
and Miss Winchelsea had a shrewd idea he was an extension lecturer.
At any rate he was something of that sort, something gentlemanly
and refined without being opulent and impossible. She tried once
or twice to ascertain whether he came from Oxford or Cambridge,
but he missed her timid importunities. She tried to get him to make
remarks about those places to see if he would say "come up" to them
instead of "go down"--she knew that was how you told a 'Varsity man.
He used the word "'Varsity"--not university--in quite the proper way.

They saw as much of Mr. Ruskin's Florence as the brief time permitted;
he met them in the Pitti Gallery and went round with them, chatting
brightly, and evidently very grateful for their recognition. He knew
a great deal about art, and all four enjoyed the morning immensely.
It was fine to go round recognising old favourites and finding
new beauties, especially while so many people fumbled helplessly
with Baedeker. Nor was he a bit of a prig, Miss Winchelsea said,
and indeed she detested prigs. He had a distinct undertone of humour,
and was funny, for example, without being vulgar, at the expense of
the quaint work of Beato Angelico. He had a grave seriousness beneath
it all, and was quick to seize the moral lessons of the pictures.
Fanny went softly among these masterpieces; she admitted "she knew
so little about them," and she confessed that to her they were "all
beautiful." Fanny's "beautiful" inclined to be a little monotonous,
Miss Winchelsea thought. She had been quite glad when the last
sunny Alp had vanished, because of the staccato of Fanny's admiration.
Helen said little, but Miss Winchelsea had found her a little wanting
on the aesthetic side in the old days and was not surprised; sometimes
she laughed at the young man's hesitating delicate little jests and
sometimes she didn't, and sometimes she seemed quite lost to the art
about them in the contemplation of the dresses of the other visitors.

At Rome the young man was with them intermittently. A rather
"touristy" friend of his took him away at times. He complained
comically to Miss Winchelsea. "I have only two short weeks in Rome,"
he said, "and my friend Leonard wants to spend a whole day at Tivoli,
looking at a waterfall."

"What is your friend Leonard?" asked Miss Winchelsea abruptly.

"He's the most enthusiastic pedestrian I ever met," the young man
replied, amusingly, but a little unsatisfactorily, Miss Winchelsea
thought. They had some glorious times, and Fanny could not think
what they would have done without him. Miss Winchelsea's interest
and Fanny's enormous capacity for admiration were insatiable. They
never flagged--through pictures and sculpture galleries, immense
crowded churches, ruins and museums, Judas trees and prickly pears,
wine carts and palaces, they admired their way unflinchingly. They
never saw a stone pine or a eucalyptus but they named and admired it;
they never glimpsed Soracte but they exclaimed. Their common ways
were made wonderful by imaginative play. "Here Caesar may have
walked," they would say. "Raphael may have seen Soracte from this
very point." They happened on the tomb of Bibulus. "Old Bibulus,"
said the young man. "The oldest monument of Republican Rome!"
said Miss Winchelsea.

"I'm dreadfully stupid," said Fanny, "but who WAS Bibulus?"

There was a curious little pause.

"Wasn't he the person who built the wall?" said Helen.

The young man glanced quickly at her and laughed. "That was Balbus,"
he said. Helen reddened, but neither he nor Miss Winchelsea threw
any light upon Fanny's ignorance about Bibulus.

Helen was more taciturn than the other three, but then she was
always taciturn, and usually she took care of the tram tickets
and things like that, or kept her eye on them if the young man took
them, and told him where they were when he wanted them. Glorious times
they had, these young people, in that pale brown cleanly city of
memories that was once the world. Their only sorrow was the shortness
of the time. They said indeed that the electric trams and the '70
buildings, and that criminal advertisement that glares upon the Forum,
outraged their aesthetic feelings unspeakably; but that was only part
of the fun. And indeed Rome is such a wonderful place that it made
Miss Winchelsea forget some of her most carefully prepared enthusiasms
at times, and Helen, taken unawares, would suddenly admit the beauty
of unexpected things. Yet Fanny and Helen would have liked a shop
window or so in the English quarter if Miss Winchelsea's uncompromising
hostility to all other English visitors had not rendered that district
impossible.

The intellectual and aesthetic fellowship of Miss Winchelsea and
the scholarly young man passed insensibly towards a deeper feeling.
The exuberant Fanny did her best to keep pace with their recondite
admiration by playing her "beautiful," with vigour, and saying "Oh!
LET'S go," with enormous appetite whenever a new place of interest
was mentioned. But Helen developed a certain want of sympathy
towards the end, that disappointed Miss Winchelsea a little. She
refused to "see anything" in the face of Beatrice Cenci--Shelley's
Beatrice Cenci!--in the Barberini gallery; and one day, when they
were deploring the electric trams, she said rather snappishly that
"people must get about somehow, and it's better than torturing
horses up these horrid little hills." She spoke of the Seven Hills
of Rome as "horrid little hills!"

And the day they went on the Palatine--though Miss Winchelsea
did not know of this--she remarked suddenly to Fanny, "Don't hurry
like that, my dear; THEY don't want us to overtake them. And we
don't say the right things for them when we DO get near."

"I wasn't trying to overtake them," said Fanny, slackening her
excessive pace; "I wasn't indeed." And for a minute she was short of
breath.

But Miss Winchelsea had come upon happiness. It was only when she
came to look back across an intervening tragedy that she quite
realised how happy she had been, pacing among the cypress-shadowed
ruins, and exchanging the very highest class of information the human
mind can possess, the most refined impressions it is possible
to convey. Insensibly emotion crept into their intercourse, sunning
itself openly and pleasantly at last when Helen's modernity was not
too near. Insensibly their interest drifted from the wonderful
associations about them to their more intimate and personal feelings.
In a tentative way information was supplied; she spoke allusively
of her school, of her examination successes, of her gladness that
the days of "Cram" were over. He made it quite clear that he also
was a teacher. They spoke of the greatness of their calling, of the
necessity of sympathy to face its irksome details, of a certain
loneliness they sometimes felt.

That was in the Colosseum, and it was as far as they got that day,
because Helen returned with Fanny--she had taken her into the upper
galleries. Yet the private dreams of Miss Winchelsea, already vivid
and concrete enough, became now realistic in the highest degree.
She figured that pleasant young man, lecturing in the most edifying
way to his students, herself modestly prominent as his intellectual
mate and helper; she figured a refined little home, with two bureaus,
with white shelves of high-class books, and autotypes of the pictures
of Rossetti and Burne-Jones, with Morris's wall papers and flowers in
pots of beaten copper. Indeed she figured many things. On the Pincio
the two had a few precious moments together, while Helen marched
Fanny off to see the muro Torto, and he spoke at once plainly. He
said he hoped their friendship was only beginning, that he already
found her company very precious to him, that indeed it was more than
that.

He became nervous, thrusting at his glasses with trembling fingers
as though he fancied his emotions made them unstable. "I should
of course," he said, "tell you things about myself. I know it is
rather unusual my speaking to you like this. Only our meeting has
been so accidental--or providential--and I am snatching at things.
I came to Rome expecting a lonely tour . . . and I have been so very
happy, so very happy. Quite recently I found myself in a position--
I have dared to think--. And--"

He glanced over his shoulder and stopped. He said "Damn!" quite
distinctly--and she did not condemn him for that manly lapse into
profanity. She looked and saw his friend Leonard advancing. He drew
nearer; he raised his hat to Miss Winchelsea, and his smile was
almost a grin. "I've been looking for you everywhere, Snooks," he
said. "You promised to be on the Piazza steps half an hour ago."

Snooks! The name struck Miss Winchelsea like a blow in the face.
She did not hear his reply. She thought afterwards that Leonard
must have considered her the vaguest-minded person. To this day
she is not sure whether she was introduced to Leonard or not, nor
what she said to him. A sort of mental paralysis was upon her.
Of all offensive surnames--Snooks!

Helen and Fanny were returning, there were civilities, and the young
men were receding. By a great effort she controlled herself to face
the enquiring eyes of her friends. All that afternoon she lived
the life of a heroine under the indescribable outrage of that name,
chatting, observing, with "Snooks" gnawing at her heart. From the
moment that it first rang upon her ears, the dream of her happiness
was prostrate in the dust. All the refinement she had figured was
ruined and defaced by that cognomen's unavoidable vulgarity.

What was that refined little home to her now, spite of autotypes,
Morris papers, and bureaus? Athwart it in letters of fire ran an
incredible inscription: "Mrs. Snooks." That may seem a little thing to
the reader, but consider the delicate refinement of Miss Winchelsea's
mind. Be as refined as you can and then think of writing yourself
down:--"Snooks." She conceived herself being addressed as Mrs. Snooks
by all the people she liked least, conceived the patronymic touched
with a vague quality of insult. She figured a card of grey and silver
bearing "Winchelsea," triumphantly effaced by an arrow, Cupid's arrow,
in favour of "Snooks." Degrading confession of feminine weakness! She
imagined the terrible rejoicings of certain girl friends, of certain
grocer cousins from whom her growing refinement had long since
estranged her. How they would make it sprawl across the envelope
that would bring their sarcastic congratulations. Would even his
pleasant company compensate her for that? "It is impossible,"
she muttered; "impossible! SNOOKS!"

She was sorry for him, but not so sorry as she was for herself.
For him she had a touch of indignation. To be so nice, so refined,
while all the time he was "Snooks," to hide under a pretentious
gentility of demeanour the badge sinister of his surname seemed
a sort of treachery. To put it in the language of sentimental science
she felt he had "led her on."

There were of course moments of terrible vacillation, a period even
when something almost like passion bid her throw refinement to
the winds. And there was something in her, an unexpurgated vestige
of vulgarity, that made a strenuous attempt at proving that Snooks
was not so very bad a name after all. Any hovering hesitation flew
before Fanny's manner, when Fanny came with an air of catastrophe to
tell that she also knew the horror. Fanny's voice fell to a whisper
when she said SNOOKS. Miss Winchelsea would not give him any answer
when at last, in the Borghese, she could have a minute with him;
but she promised him a note.

She handed him that note in the little book of poetry he had lent
her, the little book that had first drawn them together. Her refusal
was ambiguous, allusive. She could no more tell him why she rejected
him than she could have told a cripple of his hump. He too must
feel something of the unspeakable quality of his name. Indeed he
had avoided a dozen chances of telling it, she now perceived. So she
spoke of "obstacles she could not reveal"--"reasons why the thing he
spoke of was impossible." She addressed the note with a shiver, "E. K.
Snooks."

Things were worse than she had dreaded; he asked her to explain.
How COULD she explain? Those last two days in Rome were dreadful.
She was haunted by his air of astonished perplexity. She knew she
had given him intimate hopes, she had not the courage to examine
her mind thoroughly for the extent of her encouragement. She knew
he must think her the most changeable of beings. Now that she was
in full retreat, she would not even perceive his hints of a possible
correspondence. But in that matter he did a thing that seemed to her
at once delicate and romantic. He made a go-between of Fanny.
Fanny could not keep the secret, and came and told her that night
under a transparent pretext of needed advice. "Mr. Snooks," said
Fanny, "wants to write to me. Fancy! I had no idea. But should I let
him?" They talked it over long and earnestly, and Miss Winchelsea was
careful to keep the veil over her heart. She was already repenting his
disregarded hints. Why should she not hear of him sometimes--painful
though his name must be to her? Miss Winchelsea decided it might
be permitted, and Fanny kissed her good-night with unusual emotion.
After she had gone Miss Winchelsea sat for a long time at the window
of her little room. It was moonlight, and down the street a man
sang "Santa Lucia" with almost heart-dissolving tenderness. . . .
She sat very still.

She breathed a word very softly to herself. The word was "SNOOKS."
Then she got up with a profound sigh, and went to bed. The next morning
he said to her meaningly, "I shall hear of you through your friend."

Mr. Snooks saw them off from Rome with that pathetic interrogative
perplexity still on his face, and if it had not been for Helen
he would have retained Miss Winchelsea's hold-all in his hand
as a sort of encyclopaedic keepsake. On their way back to England
Miss Winchelsea on six separate occasions made Fanny promise
to write to her the longest of long letters. Fanny, it seemed, would
be quite near Mr. Snooks. Her new school--she was always going
to new schools--would be only five miles from Steely Bank, and
it was in the Steely Bank Polytechnic, and one or two first-class
schools, that Mr. Snooks did his teaching. He might even see her
at times. They could not talk much of him--she and Fanny always
spoke of "him," never of Mr. Snooks,--because Helen was apt to say
unsympathetic things about him. Her nature had coarsened very much,
Miss Winchelsea perceived, since the old Training College days;
she had become hard and cynical. She thought he had a weak face,
mistaking refinement for weakness as people of her stamp are apt
to do, and when she heard his name was Snooks, she said she had
expected something of the sort. Miss Winchelsea was careful to spare
her own feelings after that, but Fanny was less circumspect.

The girls parted in London, and Miss Winchelsea returned, with
a new interest in life, to the Girls' High School in which she had
been an increasingly valuable assistant for the last three years.
Her new interest in life was Fanny as a correspondent, and to give her
a lead she wrote her a lengthy descriptive letter within a fortnight
of her return. Fanny answered, very disappointingly. Fanny indeed
had no literary gift, but it was new to Miss Winchelsea to find
herself deploring the want of gifts in a friend. That letter was
even criticised aloud in the safe solitude of Miss Winchelsea's
study, and her criticism, spoken with great bitterness, was "Twaddle!"
It was full of just the things Miss Winchelsea's letter had been
full of, particulars of the school. And of Mr. Snooks, only this
much: "I have had a letter from Mr. Snooks, and he has been over
to see me on two Saturday afternoons running. He talked about Rome
and you; we both talked about you. Your ears must have burnt, my
dear. . . ."

Miss Winchelsea repressed a desire to demand more explicit information,
and wrote the sweetest long letter again. "Tell me all about yourself,
dear. That journey has quite refreshed our ancient friendship,
and I do so want to keep in touch with you." About Mr. Snooks she
simply wrote on the fifth page that she was glad Fanny had seen
him, and that if he SHOULD ask after her, she was to be remembered
to him VERY KINDLY (underlined). And Fanny replied most obtusely
in the key of that "ancient friendship," reminding Miss Winchelsea
of a dozen foolish things of those old schoolgirl days at the training
college, and saying not a word about Mr. Snooks!

For nearly a week Miss Winchelsea was so angry at the failure
of Fanny as a go-between that she could not write to her. And then
she wrote less effusively, and in her letter she asked point-blank,
"Have you seen Mr. Snooks?" Fanny's letter was unexpectedly
satisfactory. "I HAVE seen Mr. Snooks," she wrote, and having once
named him she kept on about him; it was all Snooks--Snooks this and
Snooks that. He was to give a public lecture, said Fanny, among other
things. Yet Miss Winchelsea, after the first glow of gratification,
still found this letter a little unsatisfactory. Fanny did not report
Mr. Snooks as saying anything about Miss Winchelsea, nor as looking
a little white and worn, as he ought to have been doing. And behold!
before she had replied, came a second letter from Fanny on the same
theme, quite a gushing letter, and covering six sheets with her loose
feminine hand.

And about this second letter was a rather odd little thing that
Miss Winchelsea only noticed as she re-read it the third time.
Fanny's natural femininity had prevailed even against the round
and clear traditions of the training college; she was one of those
she-creatures born to make all her m's and n's and u's and r's and e's
alike, and to leave her o's and a's open and her i's undotted. So that
it was only after an elaborate comparison of word with word that Miss
Winchelsea felt assured Mr. Snooks was not really "Mr. Snooks"
at all! In Fanny's first letter of gush he was Mr. "Snooks," in her
second the spelling was changed to Mr. "Senoks." Miss Winchelsea's
hand positively trembled as she turned the sheet over--it meant
so much to her. For it had already begun to seem to her that even
the name of Mrs. Snooks might be avoided at too great a price,
and suddenly--this possibility! She turned over the six sheets,
all dappled with that critical name, and everywhere the first letter
had the form of an E! For a time she walked the room with a hand
pressed upon her heart.

She spent a whole day pondering this change, weighing a letter
of inquiry that should be at once discreet and effectual, weighing
too what action she should take after the answer came. She was
resolved that if this altered spelling was anything more than
a quaint fancy of Fanny's, she would write forthwith to Mr. Snooks.
She had now reached a stage when the minor refinements of behaviour
disappear. Her excuse remained uninvented, but she had the subject
of her letter clear in her mind, even to the hint that "circumstances
in my life have changed very greatly since we talked together." But
she never gave that hint. There came a third letter from that fitful
correspondent Fanny. The first line proclaimed her "the happiest
girl alive."

Miss Winchelsea crushed the letter in her hand--the rest unread--and
sat with her face suddenly very still. She had received it just before
morning school, and had opened it when the junior mathematicians were
well under way. Presently she resumed reading with an appearance of
great calm. But after the first sheet she went on reading the third
without discovering the error:--"told him frankly I did not like his
name," the third sheet began. "He told me he did not like it himself
--you know that sort of sudden frank way he has"--Miss Winchelsea
did know. "So I said 'Couldn't you change it?' He didn't see it
at first. Well, you know, dear, he had told me what it really meant;
it means Sevenoaks, only it has got down to Snooks--both Snooks
and Noaks, dreadfully vulgar surnames though they be, are really
worn forms of Sevenoaks. So I said--even I have my bright ideas
at times--'if it got down from Sevenoaks to Snooks, why not get it
back from Snooks to Sevenoaks?' And the long and the short of it
is, dear, he couldn't refuse me, and he changed his spelling there
and then to Senoks for the bills of the new lecture. And afterwards,
when we are married, we shall put in the apostrophe and make it
Se'noks. Wasn't it kind of him to mind that fancy of mine, when
many men would have taken offence? But it is just like him all over;
he is as kind as he is clever. Because he knew as well as I did
that I would have had him in spite of it, had he been ten times
Snooks. But he did it all the same."

The class was startled by the sound of paper being viciously torn,
and looked up to see Miss Winchelsea white in the face, and with
some very small pieces of paper clenched in one hand. For a few
seconds they stared at her stare, and then her expression changed
back to a more familiar one. "Has any one finished number three?" she
asked in an even tone. She remained calm after that. But impositions
ruled high that day. And she spent two laborious evenings writing
letters of various sorts to Fanny, before she found a decent
congratulatory vein. Her reason struggled hopelessly against the
persuasion that Fanny had behaved in an exceedingly treacherous manner.

One may be extremely refined and still capable of a very sore heart.
Certainly Miss Winchelsea's heart was very sore. She had moods
of sexual hostility, in which she generalised uncharitably about
mankind. "He forgot himself with me," she said. "But Fanny is pink
and pretty and soft and a fool--a very excellent match for a Man."
And by way of a wedding present she sent Fanny a gracefully bound
volume of poetry by George Meredith, and Fanny wrote back a grossly
happy letter to say that it was "ALL beautiful." Miss Winchelsea
hoped that some day Mr. Senoks might take up that slim book and
think for a moment of the donor. Fanny wrote several times before
and about her marriage, pursuing that fond legend of their "ancient
friendship," and giving her happiness in the fullest detail. And
Miss Winchelsea wrote to Helen for the first time after the Roman
journey, saying nothing about the marriage, but expressing very
cordial feelings.

They had been in Rome at Easter, and Fanny was married in the
August vacation. She wrote a garrulous letter to Miss Winchelsea,
describing her home-coming, and the astonishing arrangements
of their "teeny weeny" little house. Mr. Se'noks was now beginning
to assume a refinement in Miss Winchelsea's memory out of all
proportion to the facts of the case, and she tried in vain to imagine
his cultured greatness in a "teeny weeny" little house. "Am busy
enamelling a cosey corner," said Fanny, sprawling to the end of her
third sheet, "so excuse more." Miss Winchelsea answered in her
best style, gently poking fun at Fanny's arrangements and hoping
intensely that Mr. Sen'oks might see the letter. Only this hope
enabled her to write at all, answering not only that letter but
one in November and one at Christmas.

The two latter communications contained urgent invitations for her
to come to Steely Bank on a Visit during the Christmas holidays.
She tried to think that HE had told her to ask that, but it was
too much like Fanny's opulent good-nature. She could not but believe
that he must be sick of his blunder by this time; and she had more
than a hope that he would presently write her a letter beginning
"Dear Friend." Something subtly tragic in the separation was
a great support to her, a sad misunderstanding. To have been jilted
would have been intolerable. But he never wrote that letter beginning
"Dear Friend."

For two years Miss Winchelsea could not go to see her friends,
in spite of the reiterated invitations of Mrs. Sevenoaks--it became
full Sevenoaks in the second year. Then one day near the Easter
rest she felt lonely and without a soul to understand her in the
world, and her mind ran once more on what is called Platonic
friendship. Fanny was clearly happy and busy in her new sphere
of domesticity, but no doubt HE had his lonely hours. Did he ever
think of those days in Rome--gone now beyond recalling? No one
had understood her as he had done; no one in all the world. It
would be a sort of melancholy pleasure to talk to him again, and
what harm could it do? Why should she deny herself? That night
she wrote a sonnet, all but the last two lines of the octave--which
would not come, and the next day she composed a graceful little note
to tell Fanny she was coming down.

And so she saw him again.

Even at the first encounter it was evident he had changed; he seemed
stouter and less nervous, and it speedily appeared that his
conversation had already lost much of its old delicacy. There even
seemed a justification for Helen's description of weakness in his
face--in certain lights it WAS weak. He seemed busy and preoccupied
about his affairs, and almost under the impression that Miss Winchelsea
had come for the sake of Fanny. He discussed his dinner with Fanny
in an intelligent way. They only had one good long talk together,
and that came to nothing. He did not refer to Rome, and spent some
time abusing a man who had stolen an idea he had had for a text-book.
It did not seem a very wonderful idea to Miss Winchelsea. She
discovered he had forgotten the names of more than half the painters
whose work they had rejoiced over in Florence.

It was a sadly disappointing week, and Miss Winchelsea was glad
when it came to an end. Under various excuses she avoided visiting
them again. After a time the visitor's room was occupied by their
two little boys, and Fanny's invitations ceased. The intimacy of
her letters had long since faded away.


13.  A DREAM OF ARMAGEDDON

The man with the white face entered the carriage at Rugby. He moved
slowly in spite of the urgency of his porter, and even while he was
still on the platform I noted how ill he seemed. He dropped into
the corner over against me with a sigh, made an incomplete attempt
to arrange his travelling shawl, and became motionless, with his
eyes staring vacantly. Presently he was moved by a sense of my
observation, looked up at me, and put out a spiritless hand for
his newspaper. Then he glanced again in my direction.

I feigned to read. I feared I had unwittingly embarrassed him,
and in a moment I was surprised to find him speaking.

"I beg your pardon?" said I.

"That book," he repeated, pointing a lean finger, "is about dreams."

"Obviously," I answered, for it was Fortnum-Roscoe's Dream States,
and the title was on the cover. He hung silent for a space as if
he sought words. "Yes," he said at last, "but they tell you nothing."
I did not catch his meaning for a second.

"They don't know," he added.

I looked a little more attentively at his face.

"There are dreams," he said, "and dreams."

That sort of proposition I never dispute.

"I suppose--" he hesitated. "Do you ever dream? I mean vividly."

"I dream very little," I answered. "I doubt if I have three vivid
dreams in a year."

"Ah!" he said, and seemed for a moment to collect his thoughts.

"Your dreams don't mix with your memories?" he asked abruptly.
"You don't find yourself in doubt; did this happen or did it not?"

"Hardly ever. Except just for a momentary hesitation now and then.
I suppose few people do."

"Does HE say--" he indicated the book.

"Says it happens at times and gives the usual explanation about
intensity of impression and the like to account for its not happening
as a rule. I suppose you know something of these theories--"

"Very little--except that they are wrong."

His emaciated hand played with the strap of the window for a time.
I prepared to resume reading, and that seemed to precipitate his
next remark. He leant forward almost as though he would touch me.

"Isn't there something called consecutive dreaming--that goes on
night after night?"

"I believe there is. There are cases given in most books on mental
trouble."

"Mental trouble! Yes. I dare say there are. It's the right place
for them. But what I mean--" He looked at his bony knuckles.
"Is that sort of thing always dreaming? IS it dreaming? Or is it
something else? Mightn't it be something else?"

I should have snubbed his persistent conversation but for the drawn
anxiety of his face. I remember now the look of his faded eyes
and the lids red-stained--perhaps you know that look.

"I'm not just arguing about a matter of opinion," he said. "The
thing's killing me."

"Dreams?"

"If you call them dreams. Night after night. Vivid!--so vivid . . .
this--" (he indicated the landscape that went streaming by the
window) "seems unreal in comparison! I can scarcely remember who I am,
what business I am on. . . ."

He paused. "Even now--"

"The dream is always the same--do you mean?" I asked.

"It's over."

"You mean?"

"I died."

"Died?"

"Smashed and killed, and now, so much of me as that dream was,
is dead. Dead for ever. I dreamt I was another man, you know, living
in a different part of the world and in a different time. I dreamt
that night after night. Night after night I woke into that other
life. Fresh scenes and fresh happenings--until I came upon the last--"

"When you died?"

"When I died."

"And since then--"

"No," he said. "Thank God! That was the end of the dream. . . ."

It was clear I was in for this dream. And after all, I had an hour
before me, the light was fading fast, and Fortnum-Roscoe has
a dreary way with him. "Living in a different time," I said:
"do you mean in some different age?"

"Yes."

"Past?"

"No, to come--to come."

"The year three thousand, for example?"

"I don't know what year it was. I did when I was asleep, when I was
dreaming, that is, but not now--not now that I am awake. There's
a lot of things I have forgotten since I woke out of these dreams,
though I knew them at the time when I was--I suppose it was dreaming.
They called the year differently from our way of calling the year. . . .
What DID they call it?" He put his hand to his forehead. "No," said
he, "I forget."

He sat smiling weakly. For a moment I feared he did not mean to tell
me his dream. As a rule I hate people who tell their dreams, but
this struck me differently. I proffered assistance even. "It began--"
I suggested.

"It was vivid from the first. I seemed to wake up in it suddenly.
And it's curious that in these dreams I am speaking of I never
remembered this life I am living now. It seemed as if the dream
life was enough while it lasted. Perhaps--But I will tell you how
I find myself when I do my best to recall it all. I don't remember
anything dearly until I found myself sitting in a sort of loggia
looking out over the sea. I had been dozing, and suddenly I woke
up--fresh and vivid--not a bit dream-like--because the girl had
stopped fanning me."

"The girl?"

"Yes, the girl. You must not interrupt or you will put me out."

He stopped abruptly. "You won't think I'm mad?" he said.

"No," I answered; "you've been dreaming. Tell me your dream."

"I woke up, I say, because the girl had stopped fanning me. I was
not surprised to find myself there or anything of that sort, you
understand. I did not feel I had fallen into it suddenly. I simply
took it up at that point. Whatever memory I had of THIS life,
this nineteenth-century life, faded as I woke, vanished like
a dream. I knew all about myself, knew that my name was no longer
Cooper but Hedon, and all about my position in the world. I've
forgotten a lot since I woke--there's a want of connection--but
it was all quite clear and matter of fact then."

He hesitated again, gripping the window strap, putting his face
forward and looking up at me appealingly.

"This seems bosh to you?"

"No, no!" I cried. "Go on. Tell me what this loggia was like."

"It was not really a loggia--I don't know what to call it. It faced
south. It was small. It was all in shadow except the semicircle
above the balcony that showed the sky and sea and the corner where
the girl stood. I was on a couch--it was a metal couch with light
striped cushions-and the girl was leaning over the balcony with
her back to me. The light of the sunrise fell on her ear and cheek.
Her pretty white neck and the little curls that nestled there,
and her white shoulder were in the sun, and all the grace of her
body was in the cool blue shadow. She was dressed--how can I describe
it? It was easy and flowing. And altogether there she stood, so that
it came to me how beautiful and desirable she was, as though I had
never seen her before. And when at last I sighed and raised myself
upon my arm she turned her face to me--"

He stopped.

"I have lived three-and-fifty years in this world. I have had mother,
sisters, friends, wife, and daughters--all their faces, the play
of their faces, I know. But the face of this girl--it is much more
real to me. I can bring it back into memory so that I see it
again--I could draw it or paint it. And after all--"

He stopped--but I said nothing.

"The face of a dream--the face of a dream. She was beautiful. Not
that beauty which is terrible, cold, and worshipful, like the beauty
of a saint; nor that beauty that stirs fierce passions; but a sort
of radiation, sweet lips that softened into smiles, and grave grey
eyes. And she moved gracefully, she seemed to have part with all
pleasant and gracious things--"

He stopped, and his face was downcast and hidden. Then he looked up
at me and went on, making no further attempt to disguise his absolute
belief in the reality of his story.

"You see, I had thrown up my plans and ambitions, thrown up all
I had ever worked for or desired for her sake. I had been a master
man away there in the north, with influence and property and a great
reputation, but none of it had seemed worth having beside her.
I had come to the place, this city of sunny pleasures, with her,
and left all those things to wreck and ruin just to save a remnant
at least of my life. While I had been in love with her before I knew
that she had any care for me, before I had imagined that she would
dare--that we should dare, all my life had seemed vain and hollow,
dust and ashes. It WAS dust and ashes. Night after night and through
the long days I had longed and desired--my soul had beaten against
the thing forbidden!

"But it is impossible for one man to tell another just these things.
It's emotion, it's a tint, a light that comes and goes. Only while
it's there, everything changes, everything. The thing is I came
away and left them in their Crisis to do what they could."

"Left whom?" I asked, puzzled.

"The people up in the north there. You see--in this dream, anyhow--
I had been a big man, the sort of man men come to trust in, to group
themselves about. Millions of men who had never seen me were ready
to do things and risk things because of their confidence in me.
I had been playing that game for years, that big laborious game,
that vague, monstrous political game amidst intrigues and betrayals,
speech and agitation. It was a vast weltering world, and at last
I had a sort of leadership against the Gang--you know it was called
the Gang--a sort of compromise of scoundrelly projects and base
ambitions and vast public emotional stupidities and catchwords--
the Gang that kept the world noisy and blind year by year, and all
the while that it was drifting, drifting towards infinite disaster.
But I can't expect you to understand the shades and complications
of the year--the year something or other ahead. I had it all down
to the smallest details--in my dream. I suppose I had been dreaming
of it before I awoke, and the fading outline of some queer new
development I had imagined still hung about me as I rubbed my eyes.
It was some grubby affair that made me thank God for the sunlight.
I sat up on the couch and remained looking at the woman and rejoicing--
rejoicing that I had come away out of all that tumult and folly
and violence before it was too late. After all, I thought, this
is life--love and beauty, desire and delight, are they not worth
all those dismal struggles for vague, gigantic ends? And I blamed
myself for having ever sought to be a leader when I might have
given my days to love. But then, thought I, if I had not spent
my early days sternly and austerely, I might have wasted myself
upon vain and worthless women, and at the thought all my being
went out in love and tenderness to my dear mistress, my dear lady,
who had come at last and compelled me--compelled me by her invincible
charm for me--to lay that life aside.

"'You are worth it,' I said, speaking without intending her to hear;
'you are worth it, my dearest one; worth pride and praise and all
things. Love! to have YOU is worth them all together.' And at
the murmur of my voice she turned about.

"'Come and see,' she cried--I can hear her now--'come and see
the sunrise upon Monte Solaro.'

"I remember how I sprang to my feet and joined her at the balcony.
She put a white hand upon my shoulder and pointed towards great
masses of limestone, flushing, as it were, into life. I looked.
But first I noted the sunlight on her face caressing the lines
of her cheeks and neck. How can I describe to you the scene we had
before us? We were at Capri--"

"I have been there," I said. "I have clambered up Monte Solaro
and drunk vero Capri--muddy stuff like cider--at the summit."

"Ah!" said the man with the white face; "then perhaps you can tell
me--you will know if this was indeed Capri. For in this life I have
never been there. Let me describe it. We were in a little room,
one of a vast multitude of little rooms, very cool and sunny, hollowed
out of the limestone of a sort of cape, very high above the sea.
The whole island, you know, was one enormous hotel, complex beyond
explaining, and on the other side there were miles of floating hotels,
and huge floating stages to which the flying machines came. They
called it a pleasure city. Of course, there was none of that in your
time rather, I should say, IS none of that NOW. Of course. Now!--yes.

"Well, this room of ours was at the extremity of the cape, so that
one could see east and west. Eastward was a great cliff--a thousand
feet high perhaps--coldly grey except for one bright edge of gold,
and beyond it the Isle of the Sirens, and a falling coast that
faded and passed into the hot sunrise. And when one turned to
the west, distinct and near was a little bay, a little beach still
in shadow. And out of that shadow rose Solaro straight and tall,
flushed and golden crested, like a beauty throned, and the white
moon was floating behind her in the sky. And before us from east to
west stretched the many-tinted sea all dotted with little sailing
boats.

"To the eastward, of course, these little boats were grey and very
minute and clear, but to the westward they were little boats of gold--
shining gold--almost like little flames. And just below us was
a rock with an arch worn through it. The blue sea-water broke
to green and foam all round the rock, and a galley came gliding
out of the arch."

"I know that rock," I said. "I was nearly drowned there. It is called
the Faraglioni."

"I Faraglioni? Yes, she called it that," answered the man with
the white face. "There was some story--but that--"

He put his hand to his forehead again. "No," he said, "I forget
that story."

"Well, that is the first thing I remember, the first dream I had,
that little shaded room and the beautiful air and sky and that
dear lady of mine, with her shining arms and her graceful robe,
and how we sat and talked in half whispers to one another. We talked
in whispers not because there was any one to hear, but because there
was still such a freshness of mind between us that our thoughts were
a little frightened, I think, to find themselves at last in words.
And so they went softly.

"Presently we were hungry and we went from our apartment, going
by a strange passage with a moving floor, until we came to the great
breakfast room--there was a fountain and music. A pleasant and
joyful place it was, with its sunlight and splashing, and the murmur
of plucked strings. And we sat and ate and smiled at one another,
and I would not heed a man who was watching me from a table near by.

"And afterwards we went on to the dancing-hall. But I cannot
describe that hall. The place was enormous--larger than any building
you have ever seen--and in one place there was the old gate of Capri,
caught into the wall of a gallery high overhead. Light girders,
stems and threads of gold, burst from the pillars like fountains,
streamed like an Aurora across the roof and interlaced, like--
like conjuring tricks. All about the great circle for the dancers
there were beautiful figures, strange dragons, and intricate and
wonderful grotesques bearing lights. The place was inundated
with artificial light that shamed the newborn day. And as we went
through the throng the people turned about and looked at us, for
all through the world my name and face were known, and how I had
suddenly thrown up pride and struggle to come to this place. And
they looked also at the lady beside me, though half the story of how
at last she had come to me was unknown or mistold. And few of the
men who were there, I know, but judged me a happy man, in spite
of all the shame and dishonour that had come upon my name.

"The air was full of music, full of harmonious scents, full of
the rhythm of beautiful motions. Thousands of beautiful people
swarmed about the hall, crowded the galleries, sat in a myriad
recesses; they were dressed in splendid colours and crowned
with flowers; thousands danced about the great circle beneath
the white images of the ancient gods, and glorious processions
of youths and maidens came and went. We two danced, not the dreary
monotonies of your days--of this time, I mean--but dances that were
beautiful, intoxicating. And even now I can see my lady dancing--
dancing joyously. She danced, you know, with a serious face; she
danced with a serious dignity, and yet she was smiling at me and
caressing me--smiling and caressing with her eyes.

"The music was different," he murmured. "It went--I cannot describe
it; but it was infinitely richer and more varied than any music
that has ever come to me awake.

"And then--it was when we had done dancing--a man came to speak to
me. He was a lean, resolute man, very soberly clad for that place,
and already I had marked his face watching me in the breakfasting
hall, and afterwards as we went along the passage I had avoided his
eye. But now, as we sat in a little alcove, smiling at the pleasure
of all the people who went to and fro across the shining floor, he
came and touched me, and spoke to me so that I was forced to listen.
And he asked that he might speak to me for a little time apart.

"'No,' I said. 'I have no secrets from this lady. What do you want
to tell me?'

"He said it was a trivial matter, or at least a dry matter, for
a lady to hear.

"'Perhaps for me to hear,' said I.

"He glanced at her, as though almost he would appeal to her. Then he
asked me suddenly if I had heard of a great and avenging declaration
that Evesham had made. Now, Evesham had always before been the man
next to myself in the leadership of that great party in the north.
He was a forcible, hard and tactless man, and only I had been able
to control and soften him. It was on his account even more than
my own, I think, that the others had been so dismayed at my retreat.
So this question about what he had done reawakened my old interest
in the life I had put aside just for a moment.

"'I have taken no heed of any news for many days,' I said. 'What
has Evesham been saying?'

"And with that the man began, nothing loath, and I must confess
even I was struck by Evesham's reckless folly in the wild and
threatening words he had used. And this messenger they had sent
to me not only told me of Evesham's speech, but went on to ask
counsel and to point out what need they had of me. While he talked,
my lady sat a little forward and watched his face and mine.

"My old habits of scheming and organising reasserted themselves.
I could even see myself suddenly returning to the north, and all
the dramatic effect of it. All that this man said witnessed to
the disorder of the party indeed, but not to its damage. I should
go back stronger than I had come. And then I thought of my lady.
You see--how can I tell you? There were certain peculiarities of our
relationship--as things are I need not tell you about that--which
would render her presence with me impossible. I should have had
to leave her; indeed, I should have had to renounce her clearly
and openly, if I was to do all that I could do in the north. And
the man knew THAT, even as he talked to her and me, knew it as well
as she did, that my steps to duty were--first, separation, then
abandonment. At the touch of that thought my dream of a return
was shattered. I turned on the man suddenly, as he was imagining
his eloquence was gaining ground with me.

"'What have I to do with these things now?' I said. 'I have done
with them. Do you think I am coquetting with your people in coming
here?'

"'No,' he said; 'but--'

"'Why cannot you leave me alone? I have done with these things.
I have ceased to be anything but a private man.'

"'Yes,' he answered. 'But have you thought?--this talk of war,
these reckless challenges, these wild aggressions--'

"I stood up.

"'No,' I cried. 'I won't hear you. I took count of all those things,
I weighed them--and I have come away.'

"He seemed to consider the possibility of persistence. He looked
from me to where the lady sat regarding us.

"'War,' he said, as if he were speaking to himself, and then turned
slowly from me and walked away.   I stood, caught in the whirl of
thoughts his appeal had set going.

"I heard my lady's voice.

"'Dear,' she said; 'but if they have need of you--'

"She did not finish her sentence, she let it rest there. I turned
to her sweet face, and the balance of my mood swayed and reeled.

"'They want me only to do the thing they dare not do themselves,' I
said. 'If they distrust Evesham they must settle with him themselves.'

"She looked at me doubtfully.

"'But war--' she said.

"I saw a doubt on her face that I had seen before, a doubt of herself
and me, the first shadow of the discovery that, seen strongly and
completely, must drive us apart for ever.

"Now, I was an older mind than hers, and I could sway her to this
belief or that.

"'My dear one,' I said, 'you must not trouble over these things.
There will be no war. Certainly there will be no war. The age
of wars is past. Trust me to know the justice of this case. They
have no right upon me, dearest, and no one has a right upon me.
I have been free to choose my life, and I have chosen this.'

"'But WAR--' she said.

"I sat down beside her. I put an arm behind her and took her hand
in mine. I set myself to drive that doubt away--I set myself to fill
her mind with pleasant things again. I lied to her, and in lying
to her I lied also to myself. And she was only too ready to believe
me, only too ready to forget.

"Very soon the shadow had gone again, and we were hastening to our
bathing-place in the Grotta del Bovo Marino, where it was our custom
to bathe every day. We swam and splashed one another, and in that
buoyant water I seemed to become something lighter and stronger
than a man. And at last we came out dripping and rejoicing and raced
among the rocks. And then I put on a dry bathing-dress, and we sat
to bask in the sun, and presently I nodded, resting my head against
her knee, and she put her hand upon my hair and stroked it softly
and I dozed. And behold! as it were with the snapping of the string
of a violin, I was awakening, and I was in my own bed in Liverpool,
in the life of to-day.

"Only for a time I could not believe that all these vivid moments
had been no more than the substance of a dream.

"In truth, I could not believe it a dream for all the sobering
reality of things about me. I bathed and dressed as it were by habit,
and as I shaved I argued why I of all men should leave the woman
I loved to go back to fantastic politics in the hard and strenuous
north. Even if Evesham did force the world back to war, what was
that to me? I was a man, with the heart of a man, and why should
I feel the responsibility of a deity for the way the world might go?

"You know that is not quite the way I think about affairs, about
my real affairs. I am a solicitor, you know, with a point of view.

"The vision was so real, you must understand, so utterly unlike
a dream that I kept perpetually recalling little irrelevant details;
even the ornament of a book-cover that lay on my wife's sewing-machine
in the breakfast-room recalled with the utmost vividness the gilt
line that ran about the seat in the alcove where I had talked with
the messenger from my deserted party. Have you ever heard of
a dream that had a quality like that?"

"Like--?"

"So that afterwards you remembered little details you had forgotten."

I thought. I had never noticed the point before, but he was right.

"Never," I said. "That is what you never seem to do with dreams."

"No," he answered. "But that is just what I did. I am a solicitor,
you must understand, in Liverpool, and I could not help wondering
what the clients and business people I found myself talking to in
my office would think if I told them suddenly I was in love with a
girl who would be born a couple of hundred years or so hence, and
worried about the politics of my great-great-great-grandchildren.
I was chiefly busy that day negotiating a ninety-nine-year building
lease. It was a private builder in a hurry, and we wanted to tie him
in every possible way. I had an interview with him, and he showed a
certain want of temper that sent me to bed still irritated. That night
I had no dream. Nor did I dream the next night, at least, to remember.

"Something of that intense reality of conviction vanished. I began
to feel sure it WAS a dream. And then it came again.

"When the dream came again, nearly four days later, it was very
different. I think it certain that four days had also elapsed in
the dream. Many things had happened in the north, and the shadow
of them was back again between us, and this time it was not so
easily dispelled. I began, I know, with moody musings. Why, inspite
of all, should I go back, go back for all the rest of my days to toil
and stress, insults and perpetual dissatisfaction, simply to save
hundreds of millions of common people, whom I did not love, whom
too often I could do no other than despise, from the stress and
anguish of war and infinite misrule? And after all I might fail.
THEY all sought their own narrow ends, and why should not I--why
should not I also live as a man? And out of such thoughts her voice
summoned me, and I lifted my eyes.

"I found myself awake and walking. We had come out above the Pleasure
City, we were near the summit of Monte Solaro and looking towards the
bay. It was the late afternoon and very clear. Far away to the left
Ischia hung in a golden haze between sea. and sky, and Naples was
coldly white against the hills, and before us was Vesuvius with a
tall and slender streamer feathering at last towards the south, and
the ruins of Torre dell' Annunziata and Castellamare glittering and
near."

I interrupted suddenly: "You have been to Capri, of course?"

"Only in this dream," he said, "only in this dream. All across
the bay beyond Sorrento were the floating palaces of the Pleasure City
moored and chained. And northward were the broad floating stages
that received the aeroplanes. Aeroplanes fell out of the sky every
afternoon, each bringing its thousands of pleasure-seekers from
the uttermost parts of the earth to Capri and its delights. All
these things, I say, stretched below.

"But we noticed them only incidentally because of an unusual sight
that evening had to show. Five war aeroplanes that had long slumbered
useless in the distant arsenals of the Rhinemouth were manoeuvring
now in the eastward sky. Evesham had astonished the world by
producing them and others, and sending them to circle here and
there. It was the threat material in the great game of bluff he was
playing, and it had taken even me by surprise. He was one of those
incredibly stupid energetic people who seem sent by Heaven to create
disasters. His energy to the first glance seemed so wonderfully
like capacity! But he had no imagination, no invention, only a stupid,
vast, driving force of will, and a mad faith in his stupid idiot
'luck' to pull him through. I remember how we stood out upon
the headland watching the squadron circling far away, and how
I weighed the full meaning of the sight, seeing clearly the way
things must go. And then even it was not too late. I might have
gone back, I think, and saved the world. The people of the north
would follow me, I knew, granted only that in one thing I respected
their moral standards. The east and south would trust me as they would
trust no other northern man. And I knew I had only to put it to her
and she would have let me go. . . . Not because she did not love me!

"Only I did not want to go; my will was all the other way about.
I had so newly thrown off the incubus of responsibility: I was still
so fresh a renegade from duty that the daylight clearness of what
I OUGHT to do had no power at all to touch my will. My will was
to live, to gather pleasures and make my dear lady happy. But
though this sense of vast neglected duties had no power to draw
me, it could make me silent and preoccupied, it robbed the days I had
spent of half their brightness and roused me into dark meditations
in the silence of the night. And as I stood and watched Evesham's
aeroplanes sweep to and fro--those birds of infinite ill omen--she
stood beside me watching me, perceiving the trouble indeed, but not
perceiving it clearly her eyes questioning my face, her expression
shaded with perplexity. Her face was grey because the sunset was
fading out of the sky. It was no fault of hers that she held me.
She had asked me to go from her, and again in the night time and
with tears she had asked me to go.

"At last it was the sense of her that roused me from my mood. I
turned upon her suddenly and challenged her to race down the mountain
slopes. 'No,' she said, as if I jarred with her gravity, but I was
resolved to end that gravity, and made her run--no one can be very
grey and sad who is out of breath--and when she stumbled I ran with
my hand beneath her arm. We ran down past a couple of men, who turned
back staring in astonishment at my behaviour--they must have
recognised my face. And halfway down the slope came a tumult in the
air, clang-clank, clang-clank, and we stopped, and presently over the
hill-crest those war things came flying one behind the other."

The man seemed hesitating on the verge of a description.

"What were they like?" I asked.

"They had never fought," he said. "They were just like our ironclads
are nowadays; they had never fought. No one knew what they might
do, with excited men inside them; few even cared to speculate.
They were great driving things shaped like spearheads without a shaft,
with a propeller in the place of the shaft."

"Steel?"

"Not steel."

"Aluminium?"

"No, no, nothing of that sort. An alloy that was very common--as
common as brass, for example. It was called--let me see--." He
squeezed his forehead with the fingers of one hand. "I am forgetting
everything," he said.

"And they carried guns?"

"Little guns, firing high explosive shells. They fired the guns
backwards, out of the base of the leaf, so to speak, and rammed
with the beak. That was the theory, you know, but they had never
been fought. No one could tell exactly what was going to happen.
And meanwhile I suppose it was very fine to go whirling through
the air like a flight of young swallows, swift and easy. I guess
the captains tried not to think too clearly what the real thing
would be like. And these flying war machines, you know, were only
one sort of the endless war contrivances that had been invented
and had fallen into abeyance during the long peace. There were
all sorts of these things that people were routing out and furbishing
up; infernal things, silly things; things that had never been tried;
big engines, terrible explosives, great guns. You know the silly way
of these ingenious sort of men who make these things; they turn 'em
out as beavers build dams, and with no more sense of the rivers
they're going to divert and the lands they're going to flood!

"As we went down the winding stepway to our hotel again, in the
twilight, I foresaw it all: I saw how clearly and inevitably things
were driving for war in Evesham's silly, violent hands, and I had some
inkling of what war was bound to be under these new conditions. And
even then, though I knew it was drawing near the limit of my
opportunity, I could find no will to go back."

He sighed.

"That was my last chance.

"We didn't go into the city until the sky was full of stars, so we
walked out upon the high terrace, to and fro, and--she counselled
me to go back.

"'My dearest,' she said, and her sweet face looked up to me,
'this is Death. This life you lead is Death. Go back to them,
go back to your duty--.'

"She began to weep, saying, between her sobs, and clinging to my arm
as she said it, 'Go back--Go back.'

"Then suddenly she fell mute, and, glancing down at her face, I read
in an instant the thing she had thought to do. It was one of those
moments when one SEES.

"'No!' I said.

"'No?' she asked, in surprise, and I think a little fearful at
the answer to her thought.

"'Nothing,' I said, 'shall send me back. Nothing! I have chosen.
Love, I have chosen, and the world must go. Whatever happens
I will live this life--I will live for YOU! It--nothing shall turn
me aside; nothing, my dear one. Even if you died--even if you died--'

"'Yes,' she murmured, softly.

"'Then--I also would die.'

"And before she could speak again I began to talk, talking eloquently--
as I COULD do in that life--talking to exalt love, to make the life
we were living seem heroic and glorious; and the thing I was
deserting something hard and enormously ignoble that it was a fine
thing to set aside. I bent all my mind to throw that glamour upon it,
seeking not only to convert her but myself to that. We talked, and
she clung to me, torn too between all that she deemed noble and all
that she knew was sweet. And at last I did make it heroic, made
all the thickening disaster of the world only a sort of glorious
setting to our unparalleled love, and we two poor foolish souls
strutted there at last, clad in that splendid delusion, drunken
rather with that glorious delusion, under the still stars.

"And so my moment passed.

"It was my last chance. Even as we went to and fro there, the leaders
of the south and east were gathering their resolve, and the hot
answer that shattered Evesham's bluffing for ever, took shape
and waited. And all over Asia, and the ocean, and the south, the air
and the wires were throbbing with their warnings to prepare--prepare.

"No one living, you know, knew what war was; no one could imagine,
with all these new inventions, what horror war might bring. I believe
most people still believed it would be a matter of bright uniforms
and shouting charges and triumphs and flags and bands--in a time when
half the world drew its food supply from regions ten thousand miles
away--."

The man with the white face paused. I glanced at him, and his face
was intent on the floor of the carriage. A little railway station,
a string of loaded trucks, a signal-box, and the back of a cottage,
shot by the carriage window, and a bridge passed with a clap
of noise, echoing the tumult of the train.

"After that," he said, "I dreamt often. For three weeks of nights
that dream was my life. And the worst of it was there were nights
when I could not dream, when I lay tossing on a bed in THIS
accursed life; and THERE--somewhere lost to me--things were
happening--momentous, terrible things. . . . I lived at nights--my days,
my waking days, this life I am living now, became a faded, far-away
dream, a drab setting, the cover of the book."

He thought.

"I could tell you all, tell you every little thing in the dream,
but as to what I did in the daytime--no. I could not tell--I do not
remember. My memory--my memory has gone. The business of life
slips from me--"

He leant forward, and pressed his hands upon his eyes. For a long
time he said nothing.

"And then?" said I.

"The war burst like a hurricane."

He stared before him at unspeakable things.

"And then?" I urged again.

"One touch of unreality," he said, in the low tone of a man who
speaks to himself, "and they would have been nightmares. But they
were not nightmares--they were not nightmares. NO!"

He was silent for so long that it dawned upon me that there was
a danger of losing the rest of the story. But he went on talking
again in the same tone of questioning self-communion.

"What was there to do but flight? I had not thought the war would
touch Capri--I had seemed to see Capri as being out of it all,
as the contrast to it all; but two nights after the whole place
was shouting and bawling, every woman almost and every other man
wore a badge--Evesham's badge--and there was no music but a jangling
war-song over and over again, and everywhere men enlisting, and in
the dancing halls they were drilling. The whole island was awhirl
with rumours; it was said, again and again, that fighting had begun.
I had not expected this. I had seen so little of the life of pleasure
that I had failed to reckon with this violence of the amateurs.
And as for me, I was out of it. I was like a man who might have
prevented the firing of a magazine. The time had gone. I was no one;
the vainest stripling with a badge counted for more than I. The crowd
jostled us and bawled in our ears; that accursed song deafened us;
a woman shrieked at my lady because no badge was on her, and we
two went back to our own place again, ruffled and insulted--
my lady white and silent, and I aquiver with rage. So furious was I,
I could have quarrelled with her if I could have found one shade
of accusation in her eyes.

"All my magnificence had gone from me. I walked up and down our rock
cell, and outside was the darkling sea and a light to the southward
that flared and passed and came again.

"'We must get out of this place,' I said over and over. 'I have
made my choice, and I will have no hand in these troubles. I will
have nothing of this war. We have taken our lives out of all these
things. This is no refuge for us. Let us go.'

"And the next day we were already in flight from the war that covered
the world.

"And all the rest was Flight--all the rest was Flight."

He mused darkly.

"How much was there of it?"

He made no answer.

"How many days?"

His face was white and drawn and his hands were clenched. He took
no heed of my curiosity.

I tried to draw him back to his story with questions.

"Where did you go?" I said.

"When?"

"When you left Capri."

"Southwest," he said, and glanced at me for a second. "We went
in a boat."

"But I should have thought an aeroplane?"

"They had been seized."

I questioned him no more. Presently I thought he was beginning
again. He broke out in an argumentative monotone:

"But why should it be? If, indeed, this battle, this slaughter and
stress IS life, why have we this craving for pleasure and beauty?
If there IS no refuge, if there is no place of peace, and if all
our dreams of quiet places are a folly and a snare, why have we
such dreams? Surely it was no ignoble cravings, no base intentions,
had brought us to this; it was Love had isolated us. Love had come
to me with her eyes and robed in her beauty, more glorious than all
else in life, in the very shape and colour of life, and summoned me
away. I had silenced all the voices, I had answered all the questions--
I had come to her. And suddenly there was nothing but War and Death!"

I had an inspiration. "After all," I said, "it could have been only a
dream."

"A dream!" he cried, flaming upon me, "a dream--when even now--"

For the first time he became animated. A faint flush crept into
his cheek. He raised his open hand and clenched it, and dropped
it to his knee. He spoke, looking away from me, and for all the rest
of the time he looked away. "We are but phantoms," he said, "and
the phantoms of phantoms, desires like cloud shadows and wills
of straw that eddy in the wind; the days pass, use and wont carry
us through as a train carries the shadow of its lights, so be it!
But one thing is real and certain, one thing is no dreamstuff,
but eternal and enduring. It is the centre of my life, and all
other things about it are subordinate or altogether vain. I loved
her, that woman of a dream. And she and I are dead together!

"A dream! How can it be a dream, when it drenched a living life
with unappeasable sorrow, when it makes all that I have lived for
and cared for, worthless and unmeaning?

"Until that very moment when she was killed I believed we had still
a chance of getting away," he said. "All through the night and
morning that we sailed across the sea from Capri to Salerno,
we talked of escape. We were full of hope, and it clung about us
to the end, hope for the life together we should lead, out of
it all, out of the battle and struggle, the wild and empty passions,
the empty arbitrary 'thou shalt' and 'thou shalt not' of the world.
We were uplifted, as though our quest was a holy thing, as though
love for one another was a mission. . . .

"Even when from our boat we saw the fair face of that great rock
Capri--already scarred and gashed by the gun emplacements and
hiding-places that were to make it a fastness--we reckoned nothing
of the imminent slaughter, though the fury of preparation hung about
in puffs and clouds of dust at a hundred points amidst the grey;
but, indeed, I made a text of that and talked. There, you know,
was the rock, still beautiful, for all its scars, with its countless
windows and arches and ways, tier upon tier, for a thousand feet,
a vast carving of grey, broken by vine-clad terraces, and lemon
and orange groves, and masses of agave and prickly pear, and puffs
of almond blossom. And out under the archway that is built over
the Piccola Marina other boats were coming; and as we came round
the cape and within sight of the mainland, another little string of
boats came into view, driving before the wind towards the southwest.
In a little while a multitude had come out, the remoter just little
specks of ultramarine in the shadow of the eastward cliff.

"'It is love and reason,' I said, 'fleeing from all this madness, of
war.'

"And though we presently saw a squadron of aeroplanes flying across
the southern sky we did not heed it. There it was--a line of little
dots in the sky--and then more, dotting the southeastern horizon,
and then still more, until all that quarter of the sky was stippled
with blue specks. Now they were all thin little strokes of blue,
and now one and now a multitude would heel and catch the sun
and become short flashes of light. They came rising and falling
and growing larger, like some huge flight of gulls or rooks,
or such-like birds moving with a marvellous uniformity, and ever
as they drew nearer they spread over a greater width of sky.
The southward wing flung itself in an arrow-headed cloud athwart
the sun. And then suddenly they swept round to the eastward and
streamed eastward, growing smaller and smaller and clearer and
clearer again until they vanished from the sky. And after that we
noted to the northward and very high Evesham's fighting machines
hanging high over Naples like an evening swarm of gnats.

"It seemed to have no more to do with us than a flight of birds.

"Even the mutter of guns far away in the southeast seemed to us
to signify nothing. . . .

"Each day, each dream after that, we were still exalted, still
seeking that refuge where we might live and love. Fatigue had
come upon us, pain and many distresses. For though we were dusty
and stained by our toilsome tramping, and half starved and with the
horror of the dead men we had seen and the flight of the peasants--
for very soon a gust of fighting swept up the peninsula--with these
things haunting our minds it still resulted only in a deepening
resolution to escape. O, but she was brave and patient! She who had
never faced hardship and exposure had courage for herself--and me.
We went to and fro seeking an outlet, over a country all commandeered
and ransacked by the gathering hosts of war. Always we went on foot.
At first there were other fugitives, but we did not mingle with them.
Some escaped northward, some were caught in the torrent of peasantry
that swept along the main roads; many gave themselves into the hands
of the soldiery and were sent northward. Many of the men were
impressed. But we kept away from these things; we had brought no
money to bribe a passage north, and I feared for my lady at the hands
of these conscript crowds. We had landed at Salerno, and we had
been turned back from Cava, and we had tried to cross towards
Taranto by a pass over Mount Alburno, but we had been driven back
for want of food, and so we had come down among the marshes by Paestum,
where those great temples stand alone. I had some vague idea that
by Paestum it might be possible to find a boat or something, and take
once more to sea. And there it was the battle overtook us.

"A sort of soul-blindness had me. Plainly I could see that we were
being hemmed in; that the great net of that giant Warfare had us in
its toils. Many times we had seen the levies that had come down from
the north going to and fro, and had come upon them in the distance
amidst the mountains making ways for the ammunition and preparing
the mounting of the guns. Once we fancied they had fired at us,
taking us for spies--at any rate a shot had gone shuddering over us.
Several times we had hidden in woods from hovering aeroplanes.

"But all these things do not matter now, these nights of flight
and pain. . . . We were in an open place near those great temples
at Paestum, at last, on a blank stony place dotted with spiky
bushes, empty and desolate and so flat that a grove of eucalyptus
far away showed to the feet of its stems. How I can see it! My lady
was sitting down under a bush, resting a little, for she was very
weak and weary, and I was standing up watching to see if I could
tell the distance of the firing that came and went. They were still,
you know, fighting far from each other, with those terrible new
weapons that had never before been used: guns that would carry
beyond sight, and aeroplanes that would do--What THEY would do
no man could foretell.

"I knew that we were between the two armies, and that they drew
together. I knew we were in danger, and that we could not stop there
and rest!

"Though all these things were in my mind, they were in the background.
They seemed to be affairs beyond our concern. Chiefly, I was thinking
of my lady. An aching distress filled me. For the first time she
had owned herself beaten and had fallen a-weeping. Behind me
I could hear her sobbing, but I would not turn round to her because
I knew she had need of weeping, and had held herself so far and
so long for me. It was well, I thought, that she would weep and
rest and then we would toil on again, for I had no inkling of the thing
that hung so near. Even now I can see her as she sat there, her
lovely hair upon her shoulder, can mark again the deepening hollow
of her cheek.

"'If we had parted,' she said, "if I had let you go.'

"'No,' said I. 'Even now, I do not repent. I will not repent;
I made my choice, and I will hold on to the end."

"And then--

"Overhead in the sky something flashed and burst, and all about
us I heard the bullets making a noise like a handful of peas
suddenly thrown. They chipped the stones about us, and whirled
fragments from the bricks and passed. . . ."

He put his hand to his mouth, and then moistened his lips.

"At the flash I had turned about. . . .

"You know--she stood up--

"She stood up; you know, and moved a step towards me--

"As though she wanted to reach me--

"And she had been shot through the heart."

He stopped and stared at me. I felt all that foolish incapacity
an Englishman feels on such occasions. I met his eyes for a moment,
and then stared out of the window. For a long space we kept silence.
When at last I looked at him he was sitting back in his corner,
his arms folded, and his teeth gnawing at his knuckles.

He bit his nail suddenly, and stared at it.

"I carried her," he said, "towards the temples, in my arms--as though
it mattered. I don't know why. They seemed a sort of sanctuary, you
know, they had lasted so long, I suppose.

"She must have died almost instantly. Only--I talked to her--all the
way."

Silence again.

"I have seen those temples," I said abruptly, and indeed he had brought
those still, sunlit arcades of worn sandstone very vividly before me.

"It was the brown one, the big brown one. I sat down on a fallen pillar
and held her in my arms. . . . Silent after the first babble was over.
And after a little while the lizards came out and ran about again,
as though nothing unusual was going on, as though nothing had
changed. . . . It was tremendously still there, the sun high, and the
shadows still; even the shadows of the weeds upon the entablature were
still--in spite of the thudding and banging that went all about the sky.

"I seem to remember that the aeroplanes came up out of the south,
and that the battle went away to the west. One aeroplane was struck,
and overset and fell. I remember that--though it didn't interest me
in the least. It didn't seem to signify. It was like a wounded gull,
you know--flapping for a time in the water. I could see it down
the aisle of the temple--a black thing in the bright blue water.

"Three or four times shells burst about the beach, and then that
ceased. Each time that happened all the lizards scuttled in and hid
for a space. That was all the mischief done, except that once a stray
bullet gashed the stone hard by--made just a fresh bright surface.

"As the shadows grew longer, the stillness seemed greater.

"The curious thing," he remarked, with the manner of a man who
makes a trivial conversation, "is that I didn't THINK--I didn't
think at all. I sat with her in my arms amidst the stones--in a sort
of lethargy--stagnant.

"And I don't remember waking up. I don't remember dressing that day.
I know I found myself in my office, with my letters all slit open
in front of me, and how I was struck by the absurdity of being
there, seeing that in reality I was sitting, stunned, in that Paestum
temple with a dead woman in my arms. I read my letters like a machine.
I have forgotten what they were about."

He stopped, and there was a long silence.

Suddenly I perceived that we were running down the incline from
Chalk Farm to Euston. I started at this passing of time. I turned
on him with a brutal question, with the tone of Now or never.

"And did you dream again?"

"Yes."

He seemed to force himself to finish. His voice was very low.

"Once more, and as it were only for a few instants. I seemed
to have suddenly awakened out of a great apathy, to have risen
into a sitting position, and the body lay there on the stones beside
me. A gaunt body. Not her, you know. So soon--it was not her. . . .

"I may have heard voices. I do not know. Only I knew clearly that
men were coming into the solitude and that that was a last outrage.

"I stood up and walked through the temple, and then there came into
sight--first one man with a yellow face, dressed in a uniform
of dirty white, trimmed with blue, and then several, climbing
to the crest of the old wall of the vanished city, and crouching
there. They were little bright figures in the sunlight, and there
they hung, weapon in hand, peering cautiously before them.

"And further away I saw others and then more at another point
in the wall. It was a long lax line of men in open order.

"Presently the man I had first seen stood up and shouted a command,
and his men came tumbling down the wall and into the high weeds
towards the temple. He scrambled down with them and led them.
He came facing towards me, and when he saw me he stopped.

"At first I had watched these men with a mere curiosity, but when
I had seen they meant to come to the temple I was moved to forbid
them. I shouted to the officer.

"'You must not come here,' I cried, '_I_ am here. I am here with my
dead.'

"He stared, and then shouted a question back to me in some unknown
tongue.

"I repeated what I had said.

"He shouted again, and I folded my arms and stood still. Presently
he spoke to his men and came forward. He carried a drawn sword.

"I signed to him to keep away, but he continued to advance. I told
him again very patiently and clearly: 'You must not come here.
These are old temples and I am here with my dead.'

"Presently he was so close I could see his face clearly. It was
a narrow face, with dull grey eyes, and a black moustache. He had
a scar on his upper lip, and he was dirty and unshaven. He kept
shouting unintelligible things, questions perhaps, at me.

"I know now that he was afraid of me, but at the time that did not
occur to me. As I tried to explain to him he interrupted me in
imperious tones, bidding me, I suppose, stand aside.

"He made to go past me, And I caught hold of him.

"I saw his face change at my grip.

"'You fool,' I cried. 'Don't you know? She is dead!'

"He started back. He looked at me with cruel eyes. I saw a sort
of exultant resolve leap into them--delight. Then, suddenly,
with a scowl, he swept his sword back--SO--and thrust."

He stopped abruptly. I became aware of a change in the rhythm
of the train. The brakes lifted their voices and the carriage
jarred and jerked. This present world insisted upon itself, became
clamorous. I saw through the steamy window huge electric lights
glaring down from tall masts upon a fog, saw rows of stationary
empty carriages passing by, and then a signal-box, hoisting its
constellation of green and red into the murky London twilight marched
after them. I looked again at his drawn features.

"He ran me through the heart. It was with a sort of astonishment--
no fear, no pain--but just amazement, that I felt it pierce me,
felt the sword drive home into my body. It didn't hurt, you know.
It didn't hurt at all."

The yellow platform lights came into the field of view, passing
first rapidly, then slowly, and at last stopping with a jerk.
Dim shapes of men passed to and fro without.

"Euston!" cried a voice.

"Do you mean--?"

"There was no pain, no sting or smart. Amazement and then darkness
sweeping over everything. The hot, brutal face before me, the face
of the man who had killed me, seemed to recede. It swept out of
existence--"

"Euston!" clamoured the voices outside; "Euston!"

The carriage door opened, admitting a flood of sound, and a porter
stood regarding us. The sounds of doors slamming, and the hoof-clatter
of cab-horses, and behind these things the featureless remote roar
of the London cobble-stones, came to my ears. A truckload of lighted
lamps blazed along the platform.

"A darkness, a flood of darkness that opened and spread and blotted
out all things."

"Any luggage, sir?" said the porter.

"And that was the end?" I asked.

He seemed to hesitate. Then, almost inaudibly, he answered, "No."

"You mean?"

"I couldn't get to her. She was there on the other side of the Temple--
And then--"

"Yes," I insisted. "Yes?"

"Nightmares," he cried; "nightmares indeed! My God! Great birds
that fought and tore."





End of the Project Gutenberg etext of Twelve Stories and a Dream by H.G.
Wells

Project Gutenberg Etext Bunyan Characters: First Series by Whyte
#1 in our series by Alexander Whyte D.D.


Copyright laws are changing all over the world, be sure to check
the copyright laws for your country before posting these files!!

Please take a look at the important information in this header.
We encourage you to keep this file on your own disk, keeping an
electronic path open for the next readers.  Do not remove this.


**Welcome To The World of Free Plain Vanilla Electronic Texts**

**Etexts Readable By Both Humans and By Computers, Since 1971**

*These Etexts Prepared By Hundreds of Volunteers and Donations*

Information on contacting Project Gutenberg to get Etexts, and
further information is included below.  We need your donations.


Bunyan Characters: First Series

by Alexander Whyte D.D.

September, 1999  [Etext #1885]


Project Gutenberg Etext Bunyan Characters: First Series by Whyte
******This file should be named 1bnch10.txt or 1bnch10.zip******

Corrected EDITIONS of our etexts get a new NUMBER, 1bnch11.txt
VERSIONS based on separate sources get new LETTER, 1bnch10a.txt


This etext was prepared by David Price, email ccx074@coventry.ac.uk
from the 1894 Oliphant Anderson and Ferrier edition.

Project Gutenberg Etexts are usually created from multiple editions,
all of which are in the Public Domain in the United States, unless a
copyright notice is included.  Therefore, we do usually do NOT! keep
these books in compliance with any particular paper edition.


We are now trying to release all our books one month in advance
of the official release dates, leaving time for better editing.

Please note:  neither this list nor its contents are final till
midnight of the last day of the month of any such announcement.
The official release date of all Project Gutenberg Etexts is at
Midnight, Central Time, of the last day of the stated month.  A
preliminary version may often be posted for suggestion, comment
and editing by those who wish to do so.  To be sure you have an
up to date first edition [xxxxx10x.xxx] please check file sizes
in the first week of the next month.  Since our ftp program has
a bug in it that scrambles the date [tried to fix and failed] a
look at the file size will have to do, but we will try to see a
new copy has at least one byte more or less.


Information about Project Gutenberg (one page)

We produce about two million dollars for each hour we work.  The
time it takes us, a rather conservative estimate, is fifty hours
to get any etext selected, entered, proofread, edited, copyright
searched and analyzed, the copyright letters written, etc.  This
projected audience is one hundred million readers.  If our value
per text is nominally estimated at one dollar then we produce $2
million dollars per hour this year as we release thirty-six text
files per month, or 432 more Etexts in 1999 for a total of 2000+
If these reach just 10% of the computerized population, then the
total should reach over 200 billion Etexts given away this year.

The Goal of Project Gutenberg is to Give Away One Trillion Etext
Files by December 31, 2001.  [10,000 x 100,000,000 = 1 Trillion]
This is ten thousand titles each to one hundred million readers,
which is only ~5% of the present number of computer users.

At our revised rates of production, we will reach only one-third
of that goal by the end of 2001, or about 3,333 Etexts unless we
manage to get some real funding; currently our funding is mostly
from Michael Hart's salary at Carnegie-Mellon University, and an
assortment of sporadic gifts; this salary is only good for a few
more years, so we are looking for something to replace it, as we
don't want Project Gutenberg to be so dependent on one person.

We need your donations more than ever!


All donations should be made to "Project Gutenberg/CMU": and are
tax deductible to the extent allowable by law.  (CMU = Carnegie-
Mellon University).

For these and other matters, please mail to:

Project Gutenberg
P. O. Box  2782
Champaign, IL 61825

When all other email fails. . .try our Executive Director:
Michael S. Hart <hart@pobox.com>
hart@pobox.com forwards to hart@prairienet.org and archive.org
if your mail bounces from archive.org, I will still see it, if
it bounces from prairienet.org, better resend later on. . . .

We would prefer to send you this information by email.

******

To access Project Gutenberg etexts, use any Web browser
to view http://promo.net/pg.  This site lists Etexts by
author and by title, and includes information about how
to get involved with Project Gutenberg.  You could also
download our past Newsletters, or subscribe here.  This
is one of our major sites, please email hart@pobox.com,
for a more complete list of our various sites.

To go directly to the etext collections, use FTP or any
Web browser to visit a Project Gutenberg mirror (mirror
sites are available on 7 continents; mirrors are listed
at http://promo.net/pg).

Mac users, do NOT point and click, typing works better.

Example FTP session:

ftp sunsite.unc.edu
login: anonymous
password: your@login
cd pub/docs/books/gutenberg
cd etext90 through etext99
dir [to see files]
get or mget [to get files. . .set bin for zip files]
GET GUTINDEX.??  [to get a year's listing of books, e.g., GUTINDEX.99]
GET GUTINDEX.ALL [to get a listing of ALL books]

***

**Information prepared by the Project Gutenberg legal advisor**

(Three Pages)


***START**THE SMALL PRINT!**FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN ETEXTS**START***
Why is this "Small Print!" statement here?  You know: lawyers.
They tell us you might sue us if there is something wrong with
your copy of this etext, even if you got it for free from
someone other than us, and even if what's wrong is not our
fault.  So, among other things, this "Small Print!" statement
disclaims most of our liability to you.  It also tells you how
you can distribute copies of this etext if you want to.

*BEFORE!* YOU USE OR READ THIS ETEXT
By using or reading any part of this PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
etext, you indicate that you understand, agree to and accept
this "Small Print!" statement.  If you do not, you can receive
a refund of the money (if any) you paid for this etext by
sending a request within 30 days of receiving it to the person
you got it from.  If you received this etext on a physical
medium (such as a disk), you must return it with your request.

ABOUT PROJECT GUTENBERG-TM ETEXTS
This PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm etext, like most PROJECT GUTENBERG-
tm etexts, is a "public domain" work distributed by Professor
Michael S. Hart through the Project Gutenberg Association at
Carnegie-Mellon University (the "Project").  Among other
things, this means that no one owns a United States copyright
on or for this work, so the Project (and you!) can copy and
distribute it in the United States without permission and
without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules, set forth
below, apply if you wish to copy and distribute this etext
under the Project's "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark.

To create these etexts, the Project expends considerable
efforts to identify, transcribe and proofread public domain
works.  Despite these efforts, the Project's etexts and any
medium they may be on may contain "Defects".  Among other
things, Defects may take the form of incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged
disk or other etext medium, a computer virus, or computer
codes that damage or cannot be read by your equipment.

LIMITED WARRANTY; DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES
But for the "Right of Replacement or Refund" described below,
[1] the Project (and any other party you may receive this
etext from as a PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm etext) disclaims all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including
legal fees, and [2] YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE OR
UNDER STRICT LIABILITY, OR FOR BREACH OF WARRANTY OR CONTRACT,
INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE
OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE
POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.

If you discover a Defect in this etext within 90 days of
receiving it, you can receive a refund of the money (if any)
you paid for it by sending an explanatory note within that
time to the person you received it from.  If you received it
on a physical medium, you must return it with your note, and
such person may choose to alternatively give you a replacement
copy.  If you received it electronically, such person may
choose to alternatively give you a second opportunity to
receive it electronically.

THIS ETEXT IS OTHERWISE PROVIDED TO YOU "AS-IS".  NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ARE MADE TO YOU AS
TO THE ETEXT OR ANY MEDIUM IT MAY BE ON, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A
PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Some states do not allow disclaimers of implied warranties or
the exclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so the
above disclaimers and exclusions may not apply to you, and you
may have other legal rights.

INDEMNITY
You will indemnify and hold the Project, its directors,
officers, members and agents harmless from all liability, cost
and expense, including legal fees, that arise directly or
indirectly from any of the following that you do or cause:
[1] distribution of this etext, [2] alteration, modification,
or addition to the etext, or [3] any Defect.

DISTRIBUTION UNDER "PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm"
You may distribute copies of this etext electronically, or by
disk, book or any other medium if you either delete this
"Small Print!" and all other references to Project Gutenberg,
or:

[1]  Only give exact copies of it.  Among other things, this
     requires that you do not remove, alter or modify the
     etext or this "small print!" statement.  You may however,
     if you wish, distribute this etext in machine readable
     binary, compressed, mark-up, or proprietary form,
     including any form resulting from conversion by word pro-
     cessing or hypertext software, but only so long as
     *EITHER*:

     [*]  The etext, when displayed, is clearly readable, and
          does *not* contain characters other than those
          intended by the author of the work, although tilde
          (~), asterisk (*) and underline (_) characters may
          be used to convey punctuation intended by the
          author, and additional characters may be used to
          indicate hypertext links; OR

     [*]  The etext may be readily converted by the reader at
          no expense into plain ASCII, EBCDIC or equivalent
          form by the program that displays the etext (as is
          the case, for instance, with most word processors);
          OR

     [*]  You provide, or agree to also provide on request at
          no additional cost, fee or expense, a copy of the
          etext in its original plain ASCII form (or in EBCDIC
          or other equivalent proprietary form).

[2]  Honor the etext refund and replacement provisions of this
     "Small Print!" statement.

[3]  Pay a trademark license fee to the Project of 20% of the
     net profits you derive calculated using the method you
     already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  If you
     don't derive profits, no royalty is due.  Royalties are
     payable to "Project Gutenberg Association/Carnegie-Mellon
     University" within the 60 days following each
     date you prepare (or were legally required to prepare)
     your annual (or equivalent periodic) tax return.

WHAT IF YOU *WANT* TO SEND MONEY EVEN IF YOU DON'T HAVE TO?
The Project gratefully accepts contributions in money, time,
scanning machines, OCR software, public domain etexts, royalty
free copyright licenses, and every other sort of contribution
you can think of.  Money should be paid to "Project Gutenberg
Association / Carnegie-Mellon University".

*END*THE SMALL PRINT! FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN ETEXTS*Ver.04.29.93*END*





This etext was prepared by David Price, email ccx074@coventry.ac.uk
from the 1894 Oliphant Anderson and Ferrier edition.





BUNYAN CHARACTERS: FIRST SERIES
BEING LECTURES DELIVERED IN ST. GEORGE'S FREE CHURCH EDINBURGH




INTRODUCTORY



'The express image' [Gr. 'the character'].--Heb. 1. 3.

The word 'character' occurs only once in the New Testament, and
that is in the passage in the prologue of the Epistle to the
Hebrews, where the original word is translated 'express image' in
our version.  Our Lord is the Express Image of the Invisible
Father.  No man hath seen God at any time.  The only-begotten Son,
who is in the bosom of the Father, He hath declared Him.  The
Father hath sealed His divine image upon His Son, so that he that
hath seen the Son hath seen the Father.  The Son is thus the
Father's character stamped upon and set forth in human nature.  The
Word was made flesh.  This is the highest and best use to which our
so expressive word 'character' has ever been put, and the use to
which it is put when we speak of Bunyan's Characters partakes of
the same high sense and usage.  For it is of the outstanding good
or evil in a man that we think when we speak of his character.  It
is really either of his likeness or unlikeness to Jesus Christ we
speak, and then, through Him, his likeness or unlikeness to God
Himself.  And thus it is that the adjective 'moral' usually
accompanies our word 'character'--moral or immoral.  A man's
character does not have its seat or source in his body; character
is not a physical thing:  not even in his mind; it is not an
intellectual thing.  Character comes up out of the will and out of
the heart.  There are more good minds, as we say, in the world than
there are good hearts.  There are more clever people than good
people; character,--high, spotless, saintly character,--is a far
rarer thing in this world than talent or even genius.  Character is
an infinitely better thing than either of these, and it is of
corresponding rarity.  And yet so true is it that the world loves
its own, that all men worship talent, and even bodily strength and
bodily beauty, while only one here and one there either understands
or values or pursues moral character, though it is the strength and
the beauty and the sweetness of the soul.

We naturally turn to Bishop Butler when we think of moral
character.  Butler is an author who has drawn no characters of his
own.  Butler's genius was not creative like Shakespeare's or
Bunyan's.  Butler had not that splendid imagination which those two
masters in character-painting possessed, but he had very great
gifts of his own, and he has done us very great service by means of
his gifts.  Bishop Butler has helped many men in the intelligent
formation of their character, and what higher praise could be given
to any author?  Butler will lie on our table all winter beside
Bunyan; the bishop beside the tinker, the philosopher beside the
poet, the moralist beside the evangelical minister.

In seeking a solid bottom for our subject, then, we naturally turn
to Butler.  Bunyan will people the house for us once it is built,
but Butler lays bare for us the naked rock on which men like Bunyan
build and beautify and people the dwelling-place of God and man.
What exactly is this thing, character, we hear so much about? we
ask the sagacious bishop.  And how shall we understand our own
character so as to form it well till it stands firm and endures?
'Character,' answers Butler, in his bald, dry, deep way, 'by
character is meant that temper, taste, disposition, whole frame of
mind from whence we act in one way rather than another . . . those
principles from which a man acts, when they become fixed and
habitual in him we call his character . . . And consequently there
is a far greater variety in men's characters than there is in the
features of their faces.'  Open Bunyan now, with Butler's keywords
in your mind, and see the various tempers, tastes, dispositions,
frames of mind from which his various characters act, and which, at
bottom, really make them the characters, good or bad, which they
are.  See the principles which Bunyan has with such inimitable
felicity embodied and exhibited in their names, the principles
within them from which they have acted till they have become a
habit and then a character, that character which they themselves
are and will remain.  See the variety of John Bunyan's characters,
a richer and a more endless variety than are the features of their
faces.  Christian and Christiana, Obstinate and Pliable, Mr.
Fearing and Mr. Feeblemind, Temporary and Talkative, Mr. Byends and
Mr. Facing-both-ways, Simple, Sloth, Presumption, that brisk lad
Ignorance, and the genuine Mr. Brisk himself.  And then Captain
Boasting, Mr. High-mind, Mr. Wet-Eyes, and so on, through a less
known (but equally well worth knowing) company of municipal and
military characters in the Holy War.

We shall see, as we proceed, how this and that character in Bunyan
was formed and deformed.  But let us ask in this introductory
lecture if we can find out any law or principle upon which all our
own characters, good or bad, are formed.  Do our characters come to
be what they are by chance, or have we anything to do in the
formation of our own characters, and if so, in what way?  And here,
again, Butler steps forward at our call with his key to our own and
to all Bunyan's characters in his hand, and in three familiar and
fruitful words he answers our question and gives us food for
thought and solemn reflection for a lifetime.  There are but three
steps, says Butler, from earth to heaven, or, if you will, from
earth to hell--acts, habits, character.  All Butler's prophetic
burden is bound up in these three great words--acts, habits,
character.  Remember and ponder these three words, and you will in
due time become a moral philosopher.  Ponder and practise them, and
you will become what is infinitely better--a moral man.  For acts,
often repeated, gradually become habits, and habits, long enough
continued, settle and harden and solidify into character.  And thus
it is that the severe and laconic bishop has so often made us
shudder as he demonstrated it to us that we are all with our own
hands shaping our character not only for this world, but much more
for the world to come, by every act we perform, by every word we
speak, almost by every breath we draw.  Butler is one of the most
terrible authors in the world.  He stands on our nearest shelf with
Dante on one side of him and Pascal on the other.  He is indeed
terrible, but it is with a terror that purifies the heart and keeps
the life in the hour of temptation.  Paul sometimes arms himself
with the same terror; only he composes in another style than that
of Butler, and, with all his vivid intensity, he calls it the
terror of the Lord.  Paul and Bunyan are of the same school of
moralists and stylists; Butler went to school to the Stoics, to
Aristotle, and to Plato.

Our Lord Himself came to be the express image He was and is by
living and acting under this same universal law of human life--
acts, habits, character.  He was made perfect on this same
principle.  He learned obedience both by the things that He did,
and the things that He suffered.  Butler says in one deep place,
that benevolence and justice and veracity are the basis of all good
character in God and in man, and thus also in the God-man.  And
those three foundation stones of our Lord's character settled
deeper and grew stronger to bear and to suffer as He went on
practising acts and speaking words of justice, goodness, and truth.
And so of all the other elements of His moral character.  Our Lord
left Gethsemane a much more submissive and a much more surrendered
man than He entered it.  His forgiveness of injuries, and thus His
splendid benevolence, had not yet come to its climax and crown till
He said on the cross, 'Father, forgive them'.  And, as He was, so
are we in this world.  This world's evil and ill-desert made it but
the better arena and theatre for the development and the display of
His moral character; and the same instruments that fashioned Him
into the perfect and express image He was and is, are still,
happily, in full operation.  Take that divinest and noblest of all
instruments for the carving out and refining of moral character,
the will of God.  How our Lord made His own unselfish and unsinful
will to bow to silence and to praise before the holy will of His
Father, till that gave the finishing touch to His always sanctified
will and heart!  And, happily, that awful and blessed instrument
for the formation of moral character is still active and available
to those whose ambition rises to moral character, and who are
aiming at heaven in all they do and all they suffer upon the earth.
Gethsemane has gone out till it has covered all the earth.  Its
cup, if not in all the depth and strength of its first mixture,
still in quite sufficient bitterness, is put many times in life
into every man's hand.  There is not a day, there is not an hour of
the day, that the disciple of the submissive and all-surrendered
Son has not the opportunity to say with his Master, If it be
possible, let this cup pass:  nevertheless, not as I will, but as
Thou wilt.

It is not in the great tragedies of life only that character is
tested and strengthened and consolidated.  No man who is not
himself under God's moral and spiritual instruments could believe
how often in the quietest, clearest, and least tempestuous day he
has the chance and the call to say, Yea, Lord, Thy will be done.
And, then, when the confessedly tragic days and nights come, when
all men admit that this is Gethsemane indeed, the practised soul is
able, with a calmness and a peace that confound and offend the
bystanders, to say, to act so that he does not need to say, Not my
will, but Thine.  And so of all the other forms and features of
moral character; so of humility and meekness, so of purity and
temperance, so of magnanimity and munificence, so of all self-
suppression and self-extinction, and all corresponding exalting and
magnifying and benefiting of other men.  Whatever other passing
uses this present world, so full of trial and temptation and
suffering, may have, this surely is the supreme and final use of
it--to be a furnace, a graving-house, a refining place for human
character.  Literally all things in this life and in this world--I
challenge you to point out a single exception--work together for
this supreme and only good, the purification, the refining, the
testing, and the approval of human character.  Not only so, but we
are all in the very heat of the furnace, and under the very graving
iron and in the very refining fire that our prefigured and
predestinated character needs.  Your life and its trials would not
suit the necessities of my moral character, and you would lose your
soul beyond redemption if you exchanged lots with me.  You do not
put a pearl under the potter's wheel; you do not cast clay into a
refining fire.  Abraham's character was not like David's, nor
David's like Christ's, nor Christ's like Paul's.  As Butler says,
there is 'a providential disposition of things' around every one of
us, and it is as exactly suited to the flaws and excrescences, the
faults and corruptions of our character as if Providence had had no
other life to make a disposition of things for but one, and that
one our own.  Have you discovered that in your life, or any measure
of that?  Have you acknowledged to God that you have at last
discovered the true key of your life?  Have you given Him the
satisfaction to know that He is not making His providential
dispositions around a stock or a stone, but that He has one under
His hand who understands His hand, and responds to it, and rises up
to meet and salute it?

And we cease to wonder so much at the care God takes of human
character, and the cost He lays out upon it, when we think that it
is the only work of His hands that shall last for ever.  It is fit,
surely, that the ephemeral should minister to the eternal, and time
to eternity, and all else in this world to the only thing in this
world that shall endure and survive this world.  All else we
possess and pursue shall fade and perish, our moral character shall
alone survive.  Riches, honours, possessions, pleasures of all
kinds:  death, with one stroke of his desolating hand, shall one
day strip us bare to a winding-sheet and a coffin of all the things
we are so mad to possess.  But the last enemy, with all his malice
and all his resistless power, cannot touch our moral character--
unless it be in some way utterly mysterious to us that he is made
under God to refine and perfect it.  The Express Image carried up
to His Father's House, not only the divine life He had brought
hither with Him when He came to obey and submit and suffer among
us; He carried back more than He brought, for He carried back a
human heart, a human life, a human character, which was and is a
new wonder in heaven.  He carried up to heaven all the love to God
and angels and men He had learned and practised on earth, with all
the earthly fruits of it.  He carried back His humility, His
meekness, His humanity, His approachableness, and His sympathy.
And we see to our salvation some of the uses to which those parts
of His moral character are at this moment being put in His Father's
House; and what we see not now of all the ends and uses and
employments of our Lord's glorified humanity we shall, mayhap, see
hereafter.  And we also shall carry our moral character to heaven;
it is the only thing we have worth carrying so far.  But, then,
moral character is well worth achieving here and then carrying
there, for it is nothing else and nothing less than the divine
nature itself; it is the divine nature incarnate, incorporate, and
made manifest in man.  And it is, therefore, immortal with the
immortality of God, and blessed for ever with the blessedness of
God.



EVANGELIST



'Do the work of an evangelist.'--Paul to Timothy.

On the 1st of June 1648 a very bitter fight was fought at
Maidstone, in Kent, between the Parliamentary forces under Fairfax
and the Royalists.  Till Cromwell rose to all his military and
administrative greatness, Fairfax was generalissimo of the Puritan
army, and that able soldier never executed a more brilliant exploit
than he did that memorable night at Maidstone.  In one night the
Royalist insurrection was stamped out and extinguished in its own
blood.  Hundreds of dead bodies filled the streets of the town,
hundreds of the enemy were taken prisoners, while hundreds more,
who were hiding in the hop-fields and forests around the town, fell
into Fairfax's hands next morning.

Among the prisoners so taken was a Royalist major who had had a
deep hand in the Maidstone insurrection, named John Gifford, a man
who was destined in the time to come to run a remarkable career.
Only, to-day, the day after the battle, he has no prospect before
him but the gallows.  On the night before his execution, by the
courtesy of Fairfax, Gifford's sister was permitted to visit her
brother in his prison.  The soldiers were overcome with weariness
and sleep after the engagement, and Gifford's sister so managed it
that her brother got past the sentries and escaped out of the town.
He lay hid for some days in the ditches and thickets around the
town till he was able to escape to London, and thence to the
shelter of some friends of his at Bedford.  Gifford had studied
medicine before he entered the army, and as soon as he thought it
safe he began to practise his old art in the town of Bedford.
Gifford had been a dissolute man as a soldier, and he became, if
possible, a still more scandalously dissolute man as a civilian.
Gifford's life in Bedford was a public disgrace, and his hatred and
persecution of the Puritans in that town made his very name an
infamy and a fear.  He reduced himself to beggary with gambling and
drink, but, when near suicide, he came under the power of the
truth, till we see him clothed with rags and with a great burden on
his back, crying out, 'What must I do to be saved?'  'But at last'-
-I quote from the session records of his future church at Bedford--
'God did so plentifully discover to him the forgiveness of sins for
the sake of Christ, that all his life after he lost not the light
of God's countenance, no, not for an hour, save only about two days
before he died.'  Gifford's conversion had been so conspicuous and
notorious that both town and country soon heard of it:  and instead
of being ashamed of it, and seeking to hide it, Gifford at once,
and openly, threw in his lot with the extremest Puritans in the
Puritan town of Bedford.  Nor could Gifford's talents be hid; till
from one thing to another, we find the former Royalist and
dissolute Cavalier actually the parish minister of Bedford in
Cromwell's so evangelical but otherwise so elastic establishment.

At this point we open John Bunyan's Grace Abounding to the Chief of
Sinners, and we read this classical passage:- 'Upon a day the good
providence of God did cast me to Bedford to work in my calling:
and in one of the streets of that town I came where there were
three or four poor women sitting at the door in the sun and talking
about the things of God.  But I may say I heard, but I understood
not, for they were far above and out of my reach . . . About this
time I began to break my mind to those poor people in Bedford, and
to tell them of my condition, which, when they had heard, they told
Mr. Gifford of me, who himself also took occasion to talk with me,
and was willing to be well persuaded of me though I think on too
little grounds.  But he invited me to his house, where I should
hear him confer with others about the dealings of God with their
souls, from all which I still received more conviction, and from
that time began to see something of the vanity and inner
wretchedness of my own heart, for as yet I knew no great matter
therein . . . At that time also I sat under the ministry of holy
Mr. Gifford, whose doctrine, by the grace of God, was much for my
stability.'  And so on in that inimitable narrative.

The first minister whose words were truly blessed of God for our
awakening and conversion has always a place of his own in our
hearts.  We all have some minister, some revivalist, some faithful
friend, or some good book in a warm place in our heart.  It may be
a great city preacher; it may be a humble American or Irish
revivalist; it may be The Pilgrim's Progress, or The Cardiphonia,
or the Serious Call--whoever or whatever it was that first arrested
and awakened and turned us into the way of life, they all our days
stand in a place by themselves in our grateful heart.  And John
Gifford has been immortalised by John Bunyan, both in his Grace
Abounding and in his Pilgrim's Progress.  In his Grace Abounding,
as we have just seen, and in The Pilgrim, Gifford has his portrait
painted in holy oil on the wall of the Interpreter's house, and
again in eloquent pen and ink in the person of Evangelist.

John Gifford had himself made a narrow escape out of the City of
Destruction, and John Bunyan had, by Gifford's assistance, made the
same escape also.  The scene, therefore, both within that city and
outside the gate of it, was so fixed in Bunyan's mind and memory
that no part of his memorable book is more memorably put than just
its opening page.  Bunyan himself is the man in rags, and Gifford
is the evangelist who comes to console and to conduct him.
Bunyan's portraits are all taken from the life.  Brilliant and
well-furnished as Bunyan's imagination was, Bedford was still
better furnished with all kinds of men and women, and with all
kinds of saints and sinners.  And thus, instead of drawing upon his
imagination in writing his books, Bunyan drew from life.  And thus
it is that we see first John Gifford, and then John Bunyan himself
at the gate of the city; and then, over the page, Gifford becomes
the evangelist who is sent by the four poor women to speak to the
awakened tinker.

'Wherefore dost thou so cry?' asks Evangelist.  'Because,' replied
the man, 'I am condemned to die.'  'But why are you so unwilling to
die, since this life is so full of evils?'  And I suppose we must
all hear Evangelist putting the same pungent question to ourselves
every day, at whatever point of the celestial journey we at present
are.  Yes; why are we all so unwilling to die?  Why do we number
our days to put off our death to the last possible period?  Why do
we so refuse to think of the only thing we are sure soon to come
to?  We are absolutely sure of nothing else in the future but
death.  We may not see to-morrow, but we shall certainly see the
day of our death.  And yet we have all our plans laid for to-
morrow, and only one here and one there has any plan laid for the
day of his death.  And can it be for the same reason that made the
man in rags unwilling to die?  Is it because of the burden on our
back?  Is it because we are not fit to go to judgment?  And yet the
trumpet may sound summoning us hence before the midnight clock
strikes.  If this be thy condition, why standest thou still?  Dost
thou see yonder shining light?  Keep that light in thine eye.  Go
up straight to it, knock at the gate, and it shall be told thee
there what thou shalt do next.  Burdened sinner, son of man in rags
and terror:  What has burdened thee so?  What has torn thy garments
into such shameful rags?  What is it in thy burden that makes it so
heavy?  And how long has it lain so heavy upon thee?  'I cannot
run,' said the man, 'because of the burden on my back.'  And it has
been noticed of you that you do not laugh, or run, or dress, or
dance, or walk, or eat, or drink as once you did.  All men see that
there is some burden on your back; some sore burden on your heart
and your mind.  Do you see yonder wicket gate?  Do you see yonder
shining light?  There is no light in all the horizon for you but
yonder light over the gate.  Keep it in your eye; make straight,
and make at once for it, and He who keeps the gate and keeps the
light burning over it, He will tell you what to do with your
burden.  He told John Gifford, and He told John Bunyan, till both
their burdens rolled off their backs, and they saw them no more.
What would you not give to-night to be released like them?  Do you
not see yonder shining light?

Having set Christian fairly on the way to the wicket gate,
Evangelist leaves him in order to seek out and assist some other
seeker.  But yesterday he had set Faithful's face to the celestial
city, and he is off now to look for another pilgrim.  We know some
of Christian's adventures and episodes after Evangelist left him,
but we do not take up these at present.  We pass on to the next
time that Evangelist finds Christian, and he finds him in a sorry
plight.  He has listened to bad advice.  He has gone off the right
road, he has lost sight of the gate, and all the thunders and
lightnings of Sinai are rolling and flashing out against him.  What
doest thou here of all men in the world? asked Evangelist, with a
severe and dreadful countenance.  Did I not direct thee to His
gate, and why art thou here?  Christian told him that a fair-spoken
man had met him, and had persuaded him to take an easier and
shorter way of getting rid of his burden.  Read the whole place for
yourselves.  The end of it was that Evangelist set Christian right
again, and gave him two counsels which would be his salvation if he
attended to them:  Strive to enter in at the strait gate, and, Take
up thy cross daily.  He would need more counsel afterwards than
that; but, meantime, that was enough.  Let Christian follow that,
and he would before long be rid of his burden.

In the introductory lecture Bishop Butler has been commended and
praised as a moralist, and certainly not one word beyond his
deserts; but an evangelical preacher cannot send any man with the
burden of a bad past upon him to Butler for advice and direction
about that.  While lecturing on and praising the sound
philosophical and ethical spirit of the great bishop, Dr. Chalmers
complains that he so much lacks the sal evangelicum, the strength
and the health and the sweetness of the doctrines of grace.
Legality and Civility and Morality are all good and necessary in
their own places; but he is a cheat who would send a guilt-burdened
and sick-at-heart sinner to any or all of them.  The wicket gate
first, and then He who keeps that gate will tell us what to do, and
where next to go; but any other way out of the City of Destruction
but by the wicket gate is sure to land us where it landed
Evangelist's quaking and sweating charge.  When Bishop Butler lay
on his deathbed he called for his chaplain, and said, 'Though I
have endeavoured to avoid sin, and to please God to the utmost of
my power, yet from the consciousness of my perpetual infirmities I
am still afraid to die.'  'My lord,' said his happily evangelical
chaplain, 'have you forgotten that Jesus Christ is a Saviour?'
'True,' said the dying philosopher, 'but how shall I know that He
is a Saviour for me?'  'My lord, it is written, "Him that cometh to
Me, I will in no wise cast out."'  'True,' said Butler, 'and I am
surprised that though I have read that Scripture a thousand times,
I never felt its virtue till this moment, and now I die in peace.'

The third and the last time on which the pilgrims meet with their
old friend and helper, Evangelist, is when they are just at the
gates of the town of Vanity.  They have come through many wonderful
experiences since last they saw and spoke with him.  They have had
the gate opened to them by Goodwill.  They have been received and
entertained in the Interpreter's House, and in the House Beautiful.
The burden has fallen off their backs at the cross, and they have
had their rags removed and have received change of raiment.  They
have climbed the Hill Difficulty, and they have fought their way
through the Valley of the Shadow of Death.  More than the half of
their adventures and sufferings are past; but they are not yet out
of gunshot of the devil, and the bones of many a promising pilgrim
lie whitening the way between this and the city.  Many of our young
communicants have made a fair and a promising start for salvation.
They have got over the initial difficulties that lay in their way
to the Lord's table, and we have entered their names with honest
pride in our communion roll.  But a year or two passes over, and
the critical season arrives when our young communicant 'comes out,'
as the word is.  Up till now she has been a child, a little maid, a
Bible-class student, a young communicant, a Sabbath-school teacher.
But she is now a young lady, and she comes out into the world.  We
soon see that she has so come out, as we begin to miss her from
places and from employments her presence used to brighten; and,
very unwillingly, we overhear men and women with her name on their
lips in a way that makes us fear for her soul, till many, oh, in a
single ministry, how many, who promised well at the gate and ran
safely past many snares, at last sell all--body and soul and
Saviour--in Vanity Fair.

Well, Evangelist remains Evangelist still.  Only, without losing
any of his sweetness and freeness and fulness of promise, he adds
to that some solemn warnings and counsels suitable now, as never
before, to these two pilgrims.  If one may say so, he would add now
such moral treatises as Butler's Sermons and Serious Call to such
evangelical books as Grace Abounding and A Jerusalem Sinner Saved.

To-morrow the two pilgrims will come out of the wilderness and will
be plunged into a city where they will be offered all kinds of
merchandise,--houses, lands, places, honours, preferments, titles,
pleasures, delights, wives, children, bodies, souls, and what not.
An altogether new world from anything they have yet come through,
and a world where many who once began well have gone no further.
Such counsels as these, then, Evangelist gave Christian and
Faithful as they left the lonely wilderness behind them and came
out towards the gate of the seductive city--'Let the Kingdom of
Heaven be always before your eyes, and believe steadfastly
concerning things that are invisible.'  Visible, tangible, sweet,
and desirable things will immediately be offered to them, and
unless they have a faith in their hearts that is the substance of
things hoped for, and the evidence of things not seen, it will soon
be all over with them and their pilgrimage.  'Let no man take your
crown,' he said also, as he foresaw at how many booths and
counters, houses, lands, places, preferments, wives, husbands, and
what not, would be offered them and pressed upon them in exchange
for their heavenly crown.  'Above all, look well to your own
hearts,' he said.  Canon Venables laments over the teaching that
Bunyan received from John Gifford.  'Its principle,' he says, 'was
constant introspection and scrupulous weighing of every word and
deed, and even of every thought, instead of leading the mind off
from self to the Saviour.'  The canon seems to think that it was
specially unfortunate for Bunyan to be told to keep his heart and
to weigh well every thought of it; but I must point out to you that
Evangelist puts as above all other things the most important for
the pilgrims the looking well to their own hearts; and our plain-
spoken author has used a very severe word about any minister who
should whisper anything to any pilgrim that could be construed or
misunderstood into putting Christ in the place of thought and word
and deed, and the scrupulous weighing of every one of them.  'Let
nothing that is on this side the other world get within you; and
above all, look well to your own hearts, and to the lusts thereof.'

'Set your faces like a flint,' Evangelist proceeds.  How little
like all that you hear in the counsels of the pulpit to young women
coming out and to young men entering into business life.  I am
convinced that if we ministers were more direct and plain-spoken to
such persons at such times; if we, like Bunyan, told them plainly
what kind of a world it is they are coming out to buy and sell in,
and what its merchandise and its prices are; if our people would
let us so preach to their sons and daughters, I feel sure far fewer
young communicants would make shipwreck, and far fewer grey heads
would go down with sorrow to the grave.  'Be not afraid,' said
Robert Hall in his charge to a young minister, 'of devoting whole
sermons to particular parts of moral conduct and religious duty.
It is impossible to give right views of them unless you dissect
characters and describe particular virtues and vices.  The works of
the flesh and the fruits of the Spirit must be distinctly pointed
out.  To preach against sin in general without descending to
particulars may lead many to complain of the evil of their hearts,
while at the same time they are awfully inattentive to the evil of
their conduct.'  Take Evangelist's noble counsels at the gate of
Vanity Fair, and then take John Bunyan's masterly description of
the Fair itself, with all that is bought and sold in it, and you
will have a lesson in evangelical preaching that the evangelical
pulpit needed in Bunyan's day, in Robert Hall's day, and not less
in our own.

'My sons, you have heard the truth of the gospel, that you must
through many tribulations enter the Kingdom of God.  When,
therefore, you are come to the Fair and shall find fulfilled what I
have here related, then remember your friend; quit yourselves like
men, and commit the keeping of your souls to your God in well-doing
as unto a faithful Creator.'



OBSTINATE



'Be ye not as the mule.'--David.

Little Obstinate was born and brought up in the City of
Destruction.  His father was old Spare-the-Rod, and his mother's
name was Spoil-the-Child.  Little Obstinate was the only child of
his parents; he was born when they were no longer young, and they
doted on their only child, and gave him his own way in everything.
Everything he asked for he got, and if he did not immediately get
it you would have heard his screams and his kicks three doors off.
His parents were not in themselves bad people, but, if Solomon
speaks true, they hated their child, for they gave him all his own
way in everything, and nothing would ever make them say no to him,
or lift up the rod when he said no to them.  When the Scriptures,
in their pedagogical parts, speak so often about the rod, they do
not necessarily mean a rod of iron or even of wood.  There are
other ways of teaching an obstinate child than the way that Gideon
took with the men of Succoth when he taught them with the thorns of
the wilderness and with the briars thereof.  George Offor, John
Bunyan's somewhat quaint editor, gives the readers of his edition
this personal testimony:- 'After bringing up a very large family,
who are a blessing to their parents, I have yet to learn what part
of the human body was created to be beaten.'  At the same time the
rod must mean something in the word of God; it certainly means
something in God's hand when His obstinate children are under it,
and it ought to mean something in a godly parent's hand also.
Little Obstinate's two parents were far from ungodly people, though
they lived in such a city; but they were daily destroying their
only son by letting him always have his own way, and by never
saying no to his greed, and his lies, and his anger, and his noisy
and disorderly ways.  Eli in the Old Testament was not a bad man,
but he destroyed both the ark of the Lord and himself and his sons
also, because his sons made themselves vile, and he restrained them
not.  God's children are never so soft, and sweet, and good, and
happy as just after He restrains them, and has again laid the rod
of correction upon them.  They then kiss both the rod and Him who
appointed it.  And earthly fathers learn their craft from God.  The
meekness, the sweetness, the docility, and the love of a chastised
child has gone to all our hearts in a way we can never forget.
There is something sometimes almost past description or belief in
the way a chastised child clings to and kisses the hand that
chastised it.  But poor old Spare-the-Rod never had experiences
like that.  And young Obstinate, having been born like Job's wild
ass's colt, grew up to be a man like David's unbitted and unbridled
mule, till in after life he became the author of all the evil and
mischief that is associated in our minds with his evil name.

In old Spare-the-Rod's child also this true proverb was fulfilled,
that the child is the father of the man.  For all that little
Obstinate had been in the nursery, in the schoolroom, and in the
playground--all that, only in an aggravated way--he was as a youth
and as a grown-up man.  For one thing, Obstinate all his days was a
densely ignorant man.  He had not got into the way of learning his
lessons when he was a child; he had not been made to learn his
lessons when he was a child; and the dislike and contempt he had
for his books as a boy accompanied him through an ignorant and a
narrow-minded life.  It was reason enough to this so unreasonable
man not to buy and read a book that you had asked him to buy and
read it.  And so many of the books about him were either written,
or printed, or published, or sold, or read, or praised by people he
did not like, that there was little left for this unhappy man to
read, even if otherwise he would have read it.  And thus, as his
mulish obstinacy kept him so ignorant, so his ignorance in turn
increased his obstinacy.  And then when he came, as life went on,
to have anything to do with other men's affairs, either in public
or in private life, either in the church, or in the nation, or in
the city, or in the family, this unhappy man could only be a drag
on all kinds of progress, and in obstacle to every good work.  Use
and wont, a very good rule on occasion, was a rigid and a universal
rule with Obstinate.  And to be told that the wont in this case and
in that had ceased to be the useful, only made him rail at you as
only an ignorant and an obstinate man can rail.  He could only
rail; he had not knowledge enough, or good temper enough, or good
manners enough to reason out a matter; he was too hot-tempered for
an argument, and he hated those who had an acquaintance with the
subject in hand, and a self-command in connection with it that he
had not.  'The obstinate man's understanding is like Pharaoh's
heart, and it is proof against all sorts of arguments whatsoever.'
Like the demented king of Egypt, the obstinate man has glimpses
sometimes both of his bounden duty and of his true interest, but
the sinew of iron that is in his neck will not let him perform the
one or pursue the other.  'Nothing,' says a penetrating writer, 'is
more like firm conviction than simple obstinacy.  Plots and parties
in the state, and heresies and divisions in the church alike
proceed from it.'  Let any honest man take that sentence and carry
it like a candle down into his own heart and back into his own
life, and then with the insight and honesty there learned carry the
same candle back through some of the plots and parties, the
heresies and schisms of the past as well as of the present day, and
he will have learned a lesson that will surely help to cure
himself, at any rate, of his own remaining obstinacy.  All our firm
convictions, as we too easily and too fondly call them, must
continually be examined and searched out in the light of more
reading of the best authors, in the light of more experience of
ourselves and of the world we live in, and in that best of all
light, that increasing purity, simplicity, and sincerity of heart
alone can kindle.  And in not a few instances we shall to a
certainty find that what has hitherto been clothing itself with the
honourable name and character of a conviction was all the time only
an ignorant prejudice, a distaste or a dislike, a too great
fondness for ourselves and for our own opinion and our own
interest.  Many of our firmest convictions, as we now call them,
when we shall have let light enough fall upon them, we shall be
compelled and enabled to confess to be at bottom mere mulishness
and pride of heart.  The mulish, obstinate, and proud man never
says, I don't know.  He never asks anything to be explained to him.
He never admits that he has got any new light.  He never admits
having spoken or acted wrongly.  He never takes back what he has
said.  He was never heard to say, You are right in that line of
action, and I have all along been wrong.  Had he ever said that,
the day he said it would have been a white-stone day both for his
mind and his heart.  Only, the spoiled son of Spare-the-Rod never
said that, or anything like that.

But, most unfortunately, it is in the very best things of life that
the true mulishness of the obstinate man most comes out.  He shows
worst in his home life and in the matters of religion.  When our
Obstinate was in love he was as sweet as honey and as soft as
butter.  His old friends that he used so to trample upon scarcely
recognised him.  They had sometimes seen men converted, but they
had never seen such an immediate and such a complete conversion as
this.  He actually invited correction, and reproof, and advice, and
assistance, who had often struck at you with his hands and his feet
when you even hinted at such a thing to him.  The best upbringing,
the best books, the best preaching, the best and most obedient
life, taken all together, had not done for other men what a woman's
smile and the touch of her hand had in a moment done for this once
so obstinate man.  He would read anything now, and especially the
best books.  He would hear and enjoy any preacher now, and
especially the best and most earnest in preaching.  His old likes
and dislikes, prejudices and prepossessions, self-opinionativeness
and self-assertiveness all miraculously melted off him, and he
became in a day an open-minded, intelligent, good-mannered, devout-
minded gentleman.  He who was once such a mule to everybody was now
led about by a child in a silken bridle.  All old things had passed
away, and all things had become new.  For a time; for a time.  But
time passes, and there passes away with it all the humility,
meekness, pliability, softness, and sweetness of the obstinate man.
Till when long enough time has elapsed you find him all the
obstinate and mulish man he ever was.  It is not that he has ceased
to love his wife and his children.  It is not that.  But there is
this in all genuine and inbred obstinacy, that after a time it
often comes out worst beside those we love best.  A man will be
affable, accessible, entertaining, the best of company, and the
soul of it abroad, and, then, instantly he turns the latch-key in
his own door he will relapse into silence, and sink back into utter
boorishness and bearishness, mulishness and doggedness.  He
swallows his evening meal at the foot of the table in silence, and
then he sits all night at the fireside with a cloud out of nothing
on his brow.  His sunshine, his smile, and his universal urbanity
is all gone now; he is discourteous to nobody but to his own wife.
Nothing pleases him; he finds nothing at home to his mind.  The
furniture, the hours, the habits of the house are all disposed so
as to please him; but he was never yet heard to say to wife, or
child, or servant that he was pleased.  He never says that a meal
is to his taste or a seat set so as to shelter and repose him.  The
obstinate man makes his house a very prison and treadmill to
himself and to all those who are condemned to suffer with him.  And
all the time it is not that he does not love and honour his
household; but by an evil law of the obstinate heart its worst
obstinacy and mulishness comes out among those it loves best.

But, my brethren, worse than all that, we have all what good Bishop
Hall calls 'a stone of obstination' in our hearts against God.
With all his own depth and clearness and plain-spokenness, Paul
tells us that our hearts are by nature enmity against God.  Were we
proud and obstinate and malicious against men only it would be bad
enough, and it would be difficult enough to cure, but our case is
dreadful beyond all description or belief when our obstinacy
strikes out against God.  We know as well as we know anything, that
in doing this and in not doing that we are going every day right in
the teeth both of God's law and God's grace; and yet in the sheer
obstinacy and perversity of our heart we still go on in what we
know quite well to be the suicide of our souls.  We are told by our
minister to do this and not to do that; to begin to do this at this
new year and to break off from doing that; but, partly through
obstinacy towards him, reinforced by a deeper and subtler and
deadlier obstinacy against God, and against all the deepest and
most godly of the things of God, we neither do the one nor cease
from doing the other.  There is a sullenness in some men's minds, a
gloom and a bitter air that rises up from the unploughed,
undrained, unweeded, uncultivated fens of their hearts that chills
and blasts all the feeble beginnings of a better life.  The natural
and constitutional obstinacy of the obstinate heart is exasperated
when it comes to deal with the things of God.  For it is then
reinforced with all the guilt and all the fear, all the suspicion
and all the aversion of the corrupt and self-condemned heart.
There is an obdurateness of obstinacy against all the men, and the
books, and the doctrines, and the precepts, and the practices that
are in any way connected with spiritual religion that does not come
out even in the obstinate man's family life.

John Bunyan's Obstinate, both by his conduct as well as by the
etymology of his name, not only stands in the way of his own
salvation, but he does all he can to stand in the way of other men
setting out to salvation also.  Obstinate set out after Christian
to fetch him back by force, and if it had not been that he met his
match in Christian, The Pilgrim's Progress would never have been
written.  'That can by no means be,' said Christian to his pursuer,
and he is first called Christian when he shows that one man can be
as obstinate in good as another man can be in evil.  'I never now
can go back to my former life.'  And then the two obstinate men
parted company for ever, Christian in holy obstinacy being
determined to have eternal life at any cost, and Obstinate as
determined against it.  The opening pages of The Pilgrim's Progress
set the two men very graphically and very impressively before us.

As to the cure of obstinacy, the rod in a firm, watchful, wise, and
loving hand will cure it.  And in later life a long enough and
close enough succession of humble, yielding, docile, submissive,
self-chastening and thanksgiving acts will cure it.  Reading and
obeying the best books on the subjugation and the regulation of the
heart will cure it.  Descending with Dante to where the obstinate,
and the embittered, and the gloomy, and the sullen have made their
beds in hell will cure it.  And much and most agonising prayer will
above all cure it.


'O Lord, if thus so obstinate I,
Choose Thou, before my spirit die,
A piercing pain, a killing sin,
And to my proud heart run them in.



PLIABLE



'He hath not root in himself.'--Our Lord.

With one stroke of His pencil our Lord gives us this Flaxman-like
outline of one of his well-known hearers.  And then John Bunyan
takes up that so expressive profile, and puts flesh and blood into
it, till it becomes the well-known Pliable of The Pilgrim's
Progress.  We call the text a parable, but our Lord's parables are
all portraits--portraits and groups of portraits, rather than
ordinary parables.  Our Lord knew this man quite well who had no
root in himself.  Our Lord had crowds of such men always running
after Him, and He threw off this rapid portrait from hundreds of
men and women who caused discredit to fall on His name and His
work, and burdened His heart continually.  And John Bunyan, with
all his genius, could never have given us such speaking likenesses
as that of Pliable and Temporary and Talkative, unless he had had
scores of them in his own congregation.

Our Lord's short preliminary description of Pliable goes, like all
His descriptions, to the very bottom of the whole matter.  Our Lord
in this passage is like one of those masterly artists who begin
their portrait-painting with the study of anatomy.  All the great
artists in this walk build up their best portraits from the inside
of their subjects.  He hath not root in himself, says our Lord, and
we need no more than that to be told us to foresee how all his
outside religion will end.  'Without self-knowledge,' says one of
the greatest students of the human heart that ever lived, 'you have
no real root in yourselves.  Real self-knowledge is the root of all
real religious knowledge.  It is a deceit and a mischief to think
that the Christian doctrines can either be understood or aright
accepted by any outward means.  It is just in proportion as we
search our own hearts and understand our own nature that we shall
ever feel what a blessing the removal of sin will be; redemption,
pardon, sanctification, are all otherwise mere words without
meaning or power to us.  God speaks to us first in our own hearts.'
Happily for us our Lord has annotated His own text and has told us
that an honest heart is the alone root of all true religion.
Honest, that is, with itself, and with God and man about itself.
As David says in his so honest psalm, 'Behold, Thou desirest truth
in the inward parts, and in the hidden part Thou shalt make me to
know wisdom.'  And, indeed, all the preachers and writers in
Scripture, and all Scriptural preachers and writers outside of
Scripture, are at one in this:  that all true wisdom begins at
home, and that it all begins at the heart.  And they all teach us
that he is the wisest of men who has the worst opinion of his own
heart, as he is the foolishest of men who does not know his own
heart to be the worst heart that ever any man was cursed with in
this world.  'Here is wisdom':  not to know the number of the
beast, but to know his mark, and to read it written so indelibly in
our own heart.

And where this first and best of all wisdom is not, there, in our
Lord's words, there is no deepness of earth, no root, and no fruit.
And any religion that most men have is of this outside, shallow,
rootless description.  This was all the religion that poor Pliable
ever had.  This poor creature had a certain slight root of
something that looked like religion for a short season, but even
that slight root was all outside of himself.  His root, what he had
of a root, was all in Christian's companionship and impassioned
appeals, and then in those impressive passages of Scripture that
Christian read to him.  At your first attention to these things you
would think that no possible root could be better planted than in
the Bible and in earnest preaching.  But even the Bible, and, much
more, the best preaching, is all really outside of a man till true
religion once gets its piercing roots down into himself.  We have
perhaps all heard of men, and men of no small eminence, who were
brought up to believe the teaching of the Bible and the pulpit, but
who, when some of their inherited and external ideas about some
things connected with the Bible began to be shaken, straightway
felt as if all the grounds of their faith were shaken, and all the
roots of their faith pulled up.  But where that happened, all that
was because such men's religion was all rooted outside of
themselves; in the best things outside of themselves, indeed, but
because, in our Lord's words, their religion was rooted in
something outside of themselves and not inside, they were by and by
offended, and threw off their faith.  There is another well-known
class of men all whose religion is rooted in their church, and in
their church not as a member of the body of Christ, but as a social
institution set up in this world.  They believe in their church.
They worship their church.  They suffer and make sacrifices for
their church.  They are proud of the size and the income of their
church; her past contendings and sufferings, and present dangers,
all endear their church to their heart.  But if tribulation and
persecution arise, that is to say, if anything arises to vex or
thwart or disappoint them with their church, they incontinently
pull up their roots and their religion with it, and transplant both
to any other church that for the time better pleases them, or to no
church at all.  Others, again, have all their religiosity rooted in
their family life.  Their religion is all made up of domestic
sentiment.  They love their earthly home with that supreme
satisfaction and that all-absorbing affection that truly religious
men entertain for their heavenly home.  And thus it is that when
anything happens to disturb or break up their earthly home their
rootless religiosity goes with it.  Other men's religion, again,
and all their interest in it, is rooted in their shop; you can make
them anything or nothing in religion, according as you do or do not
do business in their shop.  Companionship, also, accounts for the
fluctuations of many men's, and almost all women's, religious
lives.  If they happen to fall in with godly lovers and friends,
they are sincerely godly with them; but if their companions are
indifferent or hostile to true religion, they gradually fall into
the same temper and attitude.  We sometimes see students destined
for the Christian ministry also with all their religion so without
root in themselves that a session in an unsympathetic class, a
sceptical book, sometimes just a sneer or a scoff, will wither all
the promise of their coming service.  And so on through the whole
of human life.  He that hath not the root of the matter in himself
dureth for a while, but by and by, for one reason or another, he is
sure to be offended.

So much, then,--not enough, nor good enough--for our Lord's swift
stroke at the heart of His hearers.  But let us now pass on to
Pliable, as he so soon and so completely discovers himself to us
under John Bunyan's so skilful hand.  Look well at our author's
speaking portrait of a well-known man in Bedford who had no root in
himself, and who, as a consequence, was pliable to any influence,
good or bad, that happened to come across him.  'Don't revile,' are
the first words that come from Pliable's lips, and they are not
unpromising words.  Pliable is hurt with Obstinate's coarse abuse
of the Christian life, till he is downright ashamed to be seen in
his company.  Pliable, at least, is a gentleman compared with
Obstinate, and his gentlemanly feelings and his good manners make
him at once take sides with Christian.  Obstinate's foul tongue has
almost made Pliable a Christian.  And this finely-conceived scene
on the plain outside the city gate is enacted over again every day
among ourselves.  Where men are in dead earnest about religion it
always arouses the bad passions of bad men; and where earnest
preachers and devoted workers are assailed with violence or with
bad language, there is always enough love of fair play in the
bystanders to compel them to take sides, for the time at least,
with those who suffer for the truth.  And we are sometimes too apt
to count all that love of common fairness, and that hatred of foul
play, as a sure sign of some sympathy with the hated truth itself.
When an onlooker says 'Don't revile,' we are too ready to set down
that expression of civility as at least the first beginning of true
religion.  But the religion of Jesus Christ cuts far deeper into
the heart of man than to the dividing asunder of justice and
injustice, civility and incivility, ribaldry and good manners.  And
it is always found in the long-run that the cross of Christ and its
crucifixion of the human heart goes quite as hard with the
gentlemanly-mannered man, the civil and urbane man, as it does with
the man of bad behaviour and of brutish manners.  'Civil men,' says
Thomas Goodwin, 'are this world's saints.'  And poor Pliable was
one of them.  'My heart really inclines to go with my neighbour,'
said Pliable next.  'Yes,' he said, 'I begin to come to a point.  I
really think I will go along with this good man.  Yes, I will cast
in my lot with him.  Come, good neighbour, let us be going.'

The apocalyptic side of some men's imaginations is very easily
worked upon.  No kind of book sells better among those of our
people who have no root in themselves than just picture-books about
heaven.  Our missionaries make use of lantern-slides to bring home
the scenes in the Gospels to the dull minds of their village
hearers, and with good success.  And at home a magic-lantern filled
with the splendours of the New Jerusalem would carry multitudes of
rootless hearts quite captive for a time.  'Well said; and what
else?  This is excellent; and what else?'  Christian could not tell
Pliable fast enough about the glories of heaven.  'There we shall
be with seraphim and cherubim, creatures that will dazzle your eyes
to look on them.  There also you shall meet with thousands and ten
thousands who have gone before us to that place.  Elders with
golden crowns, and holy virgins with golden harps, and all clothed
with immortality as with a garment.'  'The hearing of all this,'
cried Pliable, 'is enough to ravish one's heart.'  'An overly
faith,' says old Thomas Shepard, 'is easily wrought.'

As if the text itself was not graphic enough, Bunyan's racy,
humorous, pathetic style overflows the text and enriches the very
margins of his pages, as every possessor of a good edition of The
Pilgrim knows.  'Christian and Obstinate pull for Pliable's soul'
is the eloquent summary set down on the side of the sufficiently
eloquent page.  As the picture of a man's soul being pulled for
rises before my mind, I can think of no better companion picture to
that of Pliable than that of poor, hard-beset Brodie of Brodie, as
he lets us see the pull for his soul in the honest pages of his
inward diary.  Under the head of 'Pliable' in my Bunyan note-book I
find a crowd of references to Brodie; and if only to illustrate our
author's marginal note, I shall transcribe one or two of them.
'The writer of this diary desires to be cast down under the
facileness and plausibleness of his nature, by which he labours to
please men more than God, and whence it comes that the wicked speak
good of him . . . The Lord pity the proneness of his heart to
comply with the men who have the power . . . Lord, he is unsound
and double in his heart, politically crafty, selfish, not savouring
nor discerning the things of God . . . Let not self-love, wit,
craft, and timorousness corrupt his mind, but indue him with
fortitude, patience, steadfastness, tenderness, mortification . . .
Shall I expose myself and my family to danger at this time?  A
grain of sound faith would solve all my questions.'  'Die Dom.  I
stayed at home, partly to decline the ill-will and rage of men and
to decline observation.'  Or, take another Sabbath-day entry:  'Die
Dom.  I stayed at home, because of the time, and the observation,
and the Earl of Moray . . . Came to Cuttiehillock.  I am neither
cold nor hot.  I am not rightly principled as to the time.  I
suspect that it is not all conscience that makes me conform, but
wit, and to avoid suffering; Lord, deliver me from all this
unsoundness of heart.'  And after this miserable fashion do heaven
and earth, duty and self-interest, the covenant and the crown pull
for Lord Brodie's soul through 422 quarto pages.  Brodie's diary is
one of the most humiliating, heart-searching, and heart-instructing
books I ever read.  Let all public men tempted and afflicted with a
facile, pliable, time-serving heart have honest Brodie at their
elbow.

'Glad I am, my good companion,' said Pliable, after the passage
about the cherubim and the seraphim, and the golden crowns and the
golden harps, 'it ravishes my very heart to hear all this.  Come
on, let us mend our pace.'  This is delightful, this is perfect.
How often have we ourselves heard these very words of challenge and
reproof from the pliable frequenters of emotional meetings, and
from the emotional members of an emotional but rootless ministry.
Come on, let us mend our pace!  'I am sorry to say,' replied the
man with the burden on his back, 'that I cannot go so fast as I
would.'  'Christian,' says Mr. Kerr Bain, 'has more to carry than
Pliable has, as, indeed, he would still have if he were carrying
nothing but himself; and he does have about him, besides, a few
sobering thoughts as to the length and labour and some of the
unforeseen chances of the way.'  And as Dean Paget says in his
profound and powerful sermon on 'The Disasters of Shallowness':
'Yes, but there is something else first; something else without
which that inexpensive brightness, that easy hopefulness, is apt to
be a frail resourceless growth, withering away when the sun is up
and the hot winds of trial are sweeping over it.  We must open our
hearts to our religion; we must have the inward soil broken up,
freely and deeply its roots must penetrate our inner being.  We
must take to ourselves in silence and in sincerity its words of
judgment with its words of hope, its sternness with its
encouragement, its denunciations with its promises, its
requirements, with its offers, its absolute intolerance of sin with
its inconceivable and divine long-suffering towards sinners.'  But
preaching like this would have frightened away poor Pliable.  He
would not have understood it, and what he did understand of it he
would have hated with all his shallow heart.

'Where are we now?' called Pliable to his companion, as they both
went over head and ears into the Slough of Despond.  'Truly,' said
Christian, 'I do not know.'--No work of man is perfect, not even
the all-but-perfect Pilgrim's Progress.  Christian was bound to
fall sooner or later into a slough filled with his own despondency
about himself, his past guilt, his present sinfulness, and his
anxious future.  But Pliable had not knowledge enough of himself to
make him ever despond.  He was always ready and able to mend his
pace.  He had no burden on his back, and therefore no doubt in his
heart.  But Christian had enough of both for any ten men, and it
was Christian's overflowing despondency and doubt at this point of
the road that suddenly filled his own slough, and, I suppose,
overflowed into a slough for Pliable also.  Had Pliable only had a
genuine and original slough of his own to so sink and be bedaubed
in, he would have got out of it at the right side of it, and been a
tender-stepping pilgrim all his days.--'Is this the happiness you
have told me all this while of?  May I get out of this with my
life, you may possess the brave country alone for me.'  And with
that he gave a desperate struggle or two, and got out of the mire
on that side of the slough which was next his own house; so he went
away, and Christian saw him no more.  'The side of the slough which
was next his own house.'  Let us close with that.  Let us go home
thinking about that.  And in this trial of faith and patience, and
in that, in this temptation to sin, and in that, in this actual
transgression, and in that, let us always ask ourselves which is
the side of the slough that is farthest away from our own house,
and let us still struggle to that side of the slough, and it will
all be well with us at the last.



HELP



'I was brought low, and He helped me.'--David.

The Slough of Despond is one of John Bunyan's masterpieces.  In his
description of the slough, Bunyan touches his highest water-mark
for humour, and pathos, and power, and beauty of language.  If we
did not have the English Bible in our own hands we would have to
ask, as Lord Jeffrey asked Lord Macaulay, where the brazier of
Bedford got his inimitable style.  Bunyan confesses to us that he
got all his Latin from the prescription papers of his doctors, and
we know that he got all his perfect English from his English Bible.
And then he got his humour and his pathos out of his own deep and
tender heart.  The God of all grace gave a great gift to the
English-speaking world and to the Church of Christ in all lands
when He created and converted John Bunyan, and put it into his head
and his heart to compose The Pilgrim's Progress.  His heart-
affecting page on the slough has been wetted with the tears of
thousands of its readers, and their tears have been mingled with
smiles as they read their own sin and misery, and the never-to-be-
forgotten time and place where their sin and misery first found
them out, all told so recognisably, so pathetically, and so
amusingly almost to laughableness in the passage upon the slough.
We see the ocean of scum and filth pouring down into the slough
through the subterranean sewers of the City of Destruction and of
the Town of Stupidity, which lies four degrees beyond the City of
Destruction, and from many other of the houses and haunts of men.
We see His Majesty's sappers and miners at their wits' end how to
cope with the deluges of pollution that pour into this slough that
they have been ordained to drain and dry up.  For ages and ages the
royal surveyors have been laying out all their skill on this
slough.  More cartloads than you could count of the best material
for filling up a slough have been shot into it, and yet you would
never know that so much as a single labourer had emptied his barrow
here.  True, excellent stepping-stones have been laid across the
slough by skilful engineers, but they are always so slippery with
the scum and slime of the slough, that it is only now and then that
a traveller can keep his feet upon them.  Altogether, our author's
picture of the Slough of Despond is such a picture that no one who
has seen it can ever forget it.  But better than reading the best
description of the slough is to see certain well-known pilgrims
trying to cross it.  Mr. Fearing at the Slough of Despond was a
tale often told at the tavern suppers of that country.  Never
pilgrim attempted the perilous journey with such a chicken-heart in
his bosom as this Mr. Fearing.  He lay above a month on the bank of
the slough, and would not even attempt the steps.  Some kind
Pilgrims, though they had enough to do to keep the steps
themselves, offered him a hand; but no.  And after they were safely
over it made them almost weep to hear the man still roaring in his
horror at the other side.  Some bade him go home if he would not
take the steps, but he said that he would rather make his grave in
the slough than go back one hairsbreadth.  Till, one sunshiny
morning,--no one knew how, and he never knew how himself--the steps
were so high and dry, and the scum and slime were so low, that this
hare-hearted man made a venture, and so got over.  But, then, as an
unkind friend of his said, this pitiful pilgrim had a slough of
despond in his own mind which he carried always and everywhere
about with him, and made him the proverb of despondency that he was
and is.  Only, that sunshiny morning he got over both the slough
inside of him and outside of him, and was heard by Help and his
family singing this song on the hither side of the slough:  'He
brought me up also out of an horrible pit, out of the miry clay,
and set my feet upon a rock, and established my goings.'

Our pilgrim did not have such a good crossing as Mr. Fearing.
Whether it was that the discharge from the city was deeper and
fouler, or that the day was darker, or what, we are not told, but
both Christian and Pliable were in a moment out of sight in the
slough.  They both wallowed, says their plain-spoken historian, in
the slough, only the one of the two who had the burden on his back
at every wallow went deeper into the mire; when his neighbour, who
had no such burden, instead of coming to his assistance, got out of
the slough at the same side as he had entered it, and made with all
his might for his own house.  But the man called Christian made
what way he could, and still tumbled on to the side of the slough
that was farthest from his own house, till a man called Help gave
him his hand and set him upon sound ground.  Christiana, again, and
Mercy and the boys found the slough in a far worse condition than
it had ever been found before.  And the reason was not that the
country that drained into the slough was worse, but that those who
had the mending of the slough and the keeping in repair of the
steps had so bungled their work that they had marred the way
instead of mending it.  At the same time, by the tact and good
sense of Mercy, the whole party got over, Mercy remarking to the
mother of the boys, that if she had as good ground to hope for a
loving reception at the gate as Christiana had, no slough of
despond would discourage her, she said.  To which the older woman
made the characteristic reply:  'You know your sore and I know
mine, and we shall both have enough evil to face before we come to
our journey's end.'

Now, I do not for a moment suppose that there is any one here who
can need to be told what the Slough of Despond in reality is.
Indeed, its very name sufficiently declares it.  But if any one
should still be at a loss to understand this terrible experience of
all the pilgrims, the explanation offered by the good man who gave
Christian his hand may here be repeated.  'This miry slough,' he
said, 'is such a place as cannot be mended.  This slough is the
descent whither the scum and filth that attends conviction of sin
doth continually run, and therefore it is called by the name of
Despond, for still as the sinner is awakened about his lost
condition there ariseth in his soul many fears and doubts and
discouraging apprehensions, which all of them get together, and
settle in this place, and this is the reason of the badness of the
ground.'  That is the parable, with its interpretation; but there
is a passage in Grace Abounding which is no parable, and which may
even better than this so pictorial slough describe some men's
condition here.  'My original and inward pollution,' says Bunyan
himself in his autobiography, 'that, that was my plague and my
affliction; that, I say, at a dreadful rate was always putting
itself forth within me; that I had the guilt of to amazement; by
reason of that I was more loathsome in my own eyes than a toad; and
I thought I was so in God's eyes also.  Sin and corruption would
bubble up out of my heart as naturally as water bubbles up out of a
fountain.  I thought now that every one had a better heart than I
had.  I could have changed heart with anybody.  I thought none but
the devil himself could equalise me for inward wickedness and
pollution of mind.  I fell, therefore, at the sight of my own
vileness, deeply into despair, for I concluded that this condition
in which I was in could not stand with a life of grace.  Sure,
thought I, I am forsaken of God; sure I am given up to the devil,
and to a reprobate mind.'


'Let no man, then, count me a fable maker,
Nor made my name and credit a partaker
Of their derision:  what is here in view,
Of mine own knowledge I dare say is true.'


Sometimes, as with Christian at the slough, a man's way in life is
all slashed up into sudden ditches and pitfalls out of the sins of
his youth.  His sins, by God's grace, find him out, and under their
arrest and overthrow he begins to seek his way to a better life and
a better world; and then both the burden and the slough have their
explanation and fulfilment in his own life every day.  But it is
even more dreadful than a slough in a man's way to have a slough in
his mind, as both Bunyan himself and Mr. Fearing, his exquisite
creation, had.  After the awful-enough slough, filled with the
guilt and fear of actual sin, had been bridged and crossed and left
behind, a still worse slough of inward corruption and pollution
rose up in John Bunyan's soul and threatened to engulf him
altogether.  So terrible to Bunyan was this experience, that he has
not thought it possible to make a parable of it, and so put it into
the Pilgrim; he has kept it rather for the plain, direct,
unpictured, personal testimony of the Grace Abounding.  I do not
know another passage anywhere to compare with the eighty-fourth
paragraph of Grace Abounding for hope and encouragement to a great
inward sinner under a great inward sanctification.  I commend that
powerful passage to the appropriation of any man here who may have
stuck fast in the Slough of Despond today, and who could not on
that account come to the Lord's Table.  Let him still struggle out
at the side of the slough farthest from his own house, and to-
night, who can tell, Help may come and give that man his hand.
When the Slough of Despond is drained, and its bottom laid bare,
what a find of all kinds of precious treasures shall be laid bare!
Will you be able to lay claim to any of it when the long-lost
treasure-trove is distributed by command of the King to its
rightful owners?

'What are you doing there?' the man whose name was Help demanded of
Christian, as he still wallowed and plunged to the hither side of
the slough, 'and why did you not look for the steps?'  And so
saying he set Christian's feet upon sound ground again, and showed
him the nearest way to the gate.  Help is one of the King's
officers who are planted all along the way to the Celestial City,
in order to assist and counsel all pilgrims.  Evangelist was one of
those officers; this Help is another; Goodwill will be another,
unless, indeed, he is more than a mere officer; Interpreter will be
another, and Greatheart, and so on.  All these are preachers and
pastors and evangelists who correspond to all those names and all
their offices.  Only some unhappy preachers are better at pushing
poor pilgrims into the slough, and pushing them down to the bottom
of it, than they are at helping a sinking pilgrim out; while some
other more happy preachers and pastors have their manses built at
the hither side of the slough and do nothing else all their days
but help pilgrims out of their slough and direct them to the gate.
And then there are multitudes of so-called ministers who eat the
King's bread who can neither push a proud sinner into the slough
nor help a prostrate sinner out of it; no, nor point him the way
when he has himself wallowed out.  And then, there are men called
ministers, too, who also eat the King's bread, whose voice you
never hear in connection with such matters, unless it be to revile
both the pilgrims and their helpers, and all who run with fear and
trembling up the heavenly road.  But our pilgrim was happy enough
to meet with a minister to whom he could look back all his
remaining pilgrimage and say:  'He brought me up also out of an
horrible pit, out of the miry clay, and set my feet upon a rock,
and established my goings.  And he hath put a new song in my mouth,
even praise to our God.'

Now, as might have been expected, there is a great deal said about
all kinds of help in the Bible.  After the help of God, of which
the Bible and especially the more experimental Psalms are full,
this fine name is then applied to many Scriptural persons, and on
many Scriptural occasions.  The first woman whom God Almighty made
bore from her Maker to her husband this noble name.  Her Father, so
to speak, gave her away under this noble name.  And of all the
sweet and noble names that a woman bears, there is none so rich, so
sweet, so lasting, and so fruitful as just her first Divine name of
a helpmeet.  And how favoured of God is that man to be accounted
whose life still continues to draw meet help out of his wife's
fulness of help, till all her and his days together he is able to
say, I have of God a helpmeet indeed!  For in how many sloughs do
many men lie till this daughter of Help gives them her hand, and
out of how many more sloughs are they all their days by her
delivered and kept!  Sweet, maidenly, and most sensible Mercy was a
great help to widow Christiana at the slough, and to her and her
sons all the way up to the river--a very present help in many a
need to her future mother-in-law and her pilgrim sons.  Let every
young man seek his future wife of God, and let him seek her of her
Divine Father under that fine, homely, divine name.  For God, who
knoweth what we have need of before we ask Him, likes nothing
better than to make a helpmeet for those who so ask Him, and still
to bring the woman to the man under that so spouse-like name.


'What next I bring shall please thee, be assured,
Thy likeness, thy fit help, thy other self,
Thy wish exactly to thy heart's desire.'


And then when the apostle is making an enumeration of the various
offices and agencies in the New Testament church of his day, after
apostles and teachers and gifts of healing, he says, 'helps,'--
assistants, that is, succourers, especially of the sick and the
aged and the poor.  And we do not read that either election or
ordination was needed to make any given member of the apostolic
church a helper.  But we do read of helpers being found by the
apostle among all classes and conditions of that rich and living
church; both sexes, all ages, and all descriptions of church
members bore this fine apostolic name.  'Salute Urbane, our helper
in Christ . . . Greet Priscilla and Aquila, my helpers in Christ.'
And both Paul and John and all the apostles were forward to confess
in their epistles how much they owed of their apostolic success, as
well as of their personal comfort and joy, to the helpers, both men
and women, their Lord had blessed them with.

Now, the most part of us here to-night have been at the Lord's
Table to-day.  We kept our feet firm on the steps as we skirted or
crossed the slough that self-examination always fills and defiles
for us before every new communion.  And before our Lord let us rise
from His Table this morning.  He again said to us:  'Ye call Me
Master and Lord, and ye say well, for so I am.  If I then have
given you My hand, and have helped you, ye ought also to help one
another.'  Who, then, any more will withhold such help as it is in
his power to give to a sinking brother?  And you do not need to go
far afield seeking the slough of desponding, despairing, drowning
men.  This whole world is full of such sloughs.  There is scarce
sound ground enough in this world on which to build a slough-
watcher's tower.  And after it is built, the very tower itself is
soon stained and blinded with the scudding slime.  Where are your
eyes, and full of what?  Do you not see sloughs full of sinking men
at your very door; ay, and inside of your best built and best kept
house?  Your very next neighbour; nay, your own flesh and blood, if
they have nothing else of Greatheart's most troublesome pilgrim
about them, have at least this, that they carry about a slough with
them in their own mind and in their own heart.  Have you only
henceforth a heart and a hand to help, and see if hundreds of
sinking hearts do not cry out your name, and hundreds of slimy
hands grasp at your stretched-out arm.  Sloughs of all kinds of
vice, open and secret; sloughs of poverty, sloughs of youthful
ignorance, temptation, and transgression; sloughs of inward gloom,
family disquiet and dispute; lonely grief; all manner of sloughs,
deep and miry, where no man would suspect them.  And how good, how
like Christ Himself, and how well-pleasing to Him to lay down steps
for such sliding feet, and to lift out another and another human
soul upon sound and solid ground.  'Know ye what I have done to
you?  For I have given you an example, that ye should do as I have
done to you.  If ye know these things, happy are ye if ye do them.'



MR. WORLDLY-WISEMAN



'Wise in this world.'--Paul.

Mr. Worldly-Wiseman has a long history behind him on which we
cannot now enter at any length.  As a child, the little worldling,
it was observed, took much after his secular father, but much more
after his scheming mother.  He was already a self-seeking, self-
satisfied youth; and when he became a man and began business for
himself, no man's business flourished like his.  'Nothing of news,'
says his biographer in another place, 'nothing of doctrine, nothing
of alteration or talk of alteration could at any time be set on
foot in the town but be sure Mr. Worldly-Wiseman would be at the
head or tail of it.  But, to be sure, he would always decline those
he deemed to be the weakest, and stood always with those, in his
way of thinking, that he supposed were the strongest side.'  He was
a man, it was often remarked, of but one book also.  Sunday and
Saturday he was to be found deep in The Architect of Fortune; or,
Advancement in Life, a book written by its author so as to 'come
home to all men's business and bosoms.'  He drove over scrupulously
once a Sunday to the State church, of which he was one of the most
determined pillars.  He had set his mind on being Lord Mayor of the
town before long, and he was determined that his eldest son should
be called Sir Worldly-Wiseman after him, and he chose his church
accordingly.  Another of his biographers in this connection wrote
of him thus:  'Our Lord Mayor parted his religion betwixt his
conscience and his purse, and he went to church not to serve God,
but to please the king.  The face of the law made him wear the mask
of the Gospel, which he used not as a means to save his soul, but
his charges.'  Such, in a short word, was this 'sottish man' who
crossed over the field to meet with our pilgrim when he was walking
solitary by himself after his escape from the slough.

'How now, good fellow?  Whither away after this burdened manner?'
What a contrast those two men were to one another in the midst of
that plain that day!  Our pilgrim was full of the most laborious
going; sighs and groans rose out of his heart at every step; and
then his burden on his back, and his filthy, slimy rags all made
him a picture such that it was to any man's credit and praise that
he should stop to speak to him.  And then, when our pilgrim looked
up, he saw a gentleman standing beside him to whom he was ashamed
to speak.  For the gentleman had no burden on his back, and he did
not go over the plain laboriously.  There was not a spot or a
speck, a rent or a wrinkle on all his fine raiment.  He could not
have been better appointed if he had just stepped out of the gate
at the head of the way; they can wear no cleaner garments than his
in the Celestial City itself.  'How now, good fellow?  Whither away
after this burdened manner?'  'A burdened manner, indeed, as ever I
think poor creature had.  And whereas you ask me whither away, I
tell you, sir, I am going to yonder wicket gate before me; for
there, as I am informed, I shall be put into a way to be rid of my
heavy burden.'  'Hast thou a wife and children?'  Yes; he is
ashamed to say that he has.  But he confesses that he cannot to-day
take the pleasure in them that he used to do.  Since his sin so
came upon him, he is sometimes as if he had neither wife nor child
nor a house over his head.  John Bunyan was of Samuel Rutherford's
terrible experience,--that our sins and our sinfulness poison all
our best enjoyments.  We do not hear much of Rutherford's wife and
children, and that, no doubt, for the sufficient reason that he
gives us in his so open-minded letter.  But Bunyan laments over his
blind child with a lament worthy to stand beside the lament of
David over Absalom, and again over Saul and Jonathan at Mount
Gilboa.  At the same time, John Bunyan often felt sore and sad at
heart that he could not love and give all his heart to his wife and
children as they deserved to be loved and to have all his heart.
He often felt guilty as he looked on them and knew in himself that
they did not have in him such a father as, God knew, he wished he
was, or ever in this world could hope to be.  'Yes,' he said, 'but
I cannot take the pleasure in them that I would.  I am sometimes as
if I had none.  My sin sometimes drives me like a man bereft of his
reason and clean demented.'  'Who bid thee go this way to be rid of
thy burden?  I beshrew him for his counsel.  There is not a more
troublesome and dangerous way in the world than this is to which he
hath directed thee.  And besides, though I used to have some of the
same burden when I was young, not since I settled in that town,'
pointing to the town of Carnal-Policy over the plain, 'have I been
at any time troubled in that way.'  And then he went on to describe
and denounce the way to the Celestial City, and he did it like a
man who had been all over it, and had come back again.  His
alarming description of the upward way reads to us like a page out
of Job, or Jeremiah, or David, or Paul.  'Hear me,' he says, 'for I
am older than thou.  Thou art like to meet with in the way which
thou goest wearisomeness, painfulness, hunger, perils, nakedness,
sword, lions, dragons, darkness, and in a word, death, and what
not.'  You would think that you were reading the eighth of the
Romans at the thirty-fifth verse; only Mr. Worldly-Wiseman does not
go on to finish the chapter.  He does not go on to add, 'I am
persuaded that neither death, nor life, nor angels, nor
principalities, nor powers, nor things present, nor things to come,
nor height, nor depth, nor any other creature, shall be able to
separate us from the love of God, which is in Jesus Christ our
Lord.'  No; Worldly-Wiseman never reads the Romans, and he never
hears a sermon on that chapter when he goes to church.

Mr. Worldly-Wiseman became positively eloquent and impressive and
all but convincing as he went so graphically and cumulatively over
all the sorrows that attended on the way to which this pilgrim was
now setting his face.  But, staggering as it all was, the man in
rags and slime only smiled a sad and sobbing smile in answer, and
said:  'Why, sir, this burden upon my back is far more terrible to
me than all the things which you have mentioned; nay, methinks I
care not what I meet with in the way, so be I can also meet with
deliverance from my burden.'  This is what our Lord calls a pilgrim
having the root of the matter in himself.  This poor soul had by
this time so much wearisomeness, painfulness, hunger, perils,
nakedness, sword, lions, dragons, darkness, death, and what not in
himself, that all these threatened things outside of himself were
but so many bugbears and hobgoblins wherewith to terrify children;
they were but things to be laughed at by every man who is in ernest
in the way.  'I care not what else I meet with if only I also meet
with deliverance.'  There speaks the true pilgrim.  There speaks
the man who drew down the Son of God to the cross for that man's
deliverance.  There speaks the man, who, mire, and rags, and
burdens and all, will yet be found in the heaven of heavens where
the chief of sinners shall see their Deliverer face to face, and
shall at last and for ever be like Him.  Peter examined Dante in
heaven on faith, James examined him on hope, and John took him
through his catechism on love, and the seer came out of the tent
with a laurel crown on his brow.  I do not know who the examiner on
sin will be, but, speaking for myself on this matter, I would
rather take my degree in that subject than in all the other
subjects set for a sinner's examination on earth or in heaven.  For
to know myself, and especially, as the wise man says, to know the
plague of my own heart, is the true and the only key to all other
true knowledge:  God and man; the Redeemer and the devil; heaven
and hell; faith, hope, and charity; unbelief, despair, and
malignity, and all things of that kind else, all knowledge will
come to that man who knows himself, and to that man alone, and to
that man in the exact measure in which he does really know himself.
Listen again to this slough-stained, sin-burdened, sighing and
sobbing pilgrim, who, in spite of all these things--nay, in virtue
of all these things--is as sure of heaven and of the far end of
heaven as if he were already enthroned there.  'Wearisomeness,' he
protests, 'painfulness, hunger, perils, nakedness, sword, lions,
dragons, darkness, death, and what not--why, sir, this burden on my
back is far more terrible to me than all these things which you
have mentioned; nay, methinks I care not what I meet with in the
way, so be I can also meet with deliverance from my burden.'  O
God! let this same mind be found in me and in all the men and women
for whose souls I shall have to answer at the day of judgment, and
I shall be content and safe before Thee.

That strong outburst from this so forfoughten man for a moment
quite overawed Worldly-Wiseman.  He could not reply to an
earnestness like this.  He did not understand it, and could not
account for it.  The only thing he ever was in such earnestness as
that about was his success in business and his title that he and
his wife were scheming for.  But still, though silenced by this
unaccountable outburst of our pilgrim, Worldly-Wiseman's enmity
against the upward way, and especially against all the men and all
the books that made pilgrims take to that way, was not silenced.
'How camest thou by thy burden at first?'  By reading this Book in
my hand.'  Worldly-Wiseman did not fall foul of the Book indeed,
but he fell all the more foul of those who meddled with matters
they had not a head for.  'Leave these high and deep things for the
ministers who are paid to understand and explain them, and attend
to matters more within thy scope.'  And then he went on to tell of
a far better way to get rid of the burden that meddlesome men
brought on themselves by reading that book too much--a far better
and swifter way than attempting the wicket-gate.  'Thou wilt never
be settled in thy mind till thou art rid of that burden, nor canst
thou enjoy the blessings of wife and child as long as that burden
lies so heavy upon thee.'  That was so true that it made the
pilgrim look up.  A gentleman who can speak in that true style must
know more than he says about such burdens as this of mine; and,
after all, he may be able, who knows, to give me some good advice
in my great straits.  'Pray, sir, open this secret to me, for I
sorely stand in need of good counsel.'  Let him here who has no
such burden as this poor pilgrim had cast the first stone at
Christian; I cannot.  If one who looked like a gentleman came to me
to-night and told me how I would on the spot get to a peace of
conscience never to be lost again, and how I would get a heart to-
night that would never any more plague and pollute me, I would be
mightily tempted to forget what all my former teachers had told me
and try this new Gospel.  And especially if the gentleman said that
the remedy was just at hand.  'Pray, sir,' said the breathless and
spiritless man, 'wilt thou, then, open this secret to me?'

The wit and the humour and the satire of the rest of the scene must
be fully enjoyed over the great book itself.  The village named
Morality, hard by the hill; that judicious man Legality, who dwells
in the first house you come at after you have turned the hill;
Civility, the pretty young man that Legality hath to his son; the
hospitality of the village; the low rents and the cheap provisions,
and all the charities and amenities of the place,--all together
make up such a picture as you cannot get anywhere out of John
Bunyan.  And then the pilgrim's stark folly in entering into
Worldly-Wiseman's secret; his horror as the hill began to thunder
and lighten and threaten to fall upon him; the sudden descent of
Evangelist; and then the plain-spoken words that passed between the
preacher and the pilgrim,--don't say again that the poorest of the
Puritans were without letters, or that they had not their own
esoteric writings full of fun and frolic; don't say that again till
you are a pilgrim yourself, and have our John Bunyan for one of
your classics by heart.

We are near an end, but before you depart, stand still a little, as
Evangelist said to Christian, that I may show you the words of God.
And first, watch yourselves well, for you all have a large piece of
this worldly-wise man in yourselves.  You all take something of
some ancestor, remote or immediate, who was wise only for this
world.  Yes, to be sure, for you still decline as they did, and
desert as they did, those you deem to be the weakest, and stand
with those that you suppose to be the strongest side.  The
Architect of Fortune is perhaps too strong meat for your stomach;
but still, if you ever light upon its powerful pages, you will
surely blush in secret to see yourself turned so completely inside
out.  You may not have chosen your church wholly with an eye to
your shop; but you must admit that you see as good and better men
than you are doing that every day.  And it is a sure sign to you
that you do not yet know the plague of your own heart, unless you
know yourself to be a man more set upon the position and the praise
that this world gives than you yet are on the position and the
praise that come from God only.  Set a watch on your own worldly
heart.  Watch and pray, lest you also enter into all Worldly-
Wiseman's temptation.  This is one of the words of God to you.

Another word of God is this.  The way of the cross, said severe
Evangelist, is odious to every worldly-wise man; while, all the
time, it is the only way there is, and there never will be any
other way to eternal life.  The only way to life is the way of the
cross.  There are two crosses, indeed, on the way to the Celestial
City; there is, first, the Cross of Christ, once for you, and then
there is your cross daily for Christ, and it takes both crosses to
secure and to assure any man that he is on the right road, and that
he will come at last to the right end.  'The Christian's great
conquest over the world,' says William Law, 'is all contained in
the mystery of Christ upon the cross.  And true Christianity is
nothing else but an entire and absolute conformity to that spirit
which Christ showed in the mysterious sacrifice of Himself upon the
cross.  Every man is only so far a Christian as he partakes of this
same spirit of Christ--the same suffering spirit, the same
sacrifice of himself, the same renunciation of the world, the same
humility and meekness, the same patient bearing of injuries,
reproaches, and contempts, the same dying to all the greatness,
honours, and happiness of this world that Christ showed on the
cross.  We also are to suffer, to be crucified, to die, to rise
with Christ, or else His crucifixion, His death, and His
resurrection will profit us nothing.  'This is the second word of
God unto thee.  And the third thing to-night is this, that though
thy sin be very great, though thou hast a past life round thy neck
enough to sink thee for ever out of the sight of God and all good
men; a youth of sensuality now long and closely cloaked over with
an after life of worldly prosperity, worldly decency, and worldly
religion, all which only makes thee that whited sepulchre that
Christ has in His eye when He speaks of thee with such a severe and
dreadful countenance; yet if thou confess thyself to be all the
whited sepulchre He sees thee to be, and yet knock at His gate in
all thy rags and slime, He will immediately lay aside that severe
countenance and will show thee all His goodwill.  Notwithstanding
all that thou hast done, and all thou still art, He will not deny
His own words, or do otherwise than at once fulfil them all to
thee.  Ask, then, and it shall be given thee; seek, and thou shalt
find; knock, and it shall be opened unto thee.  And with a great
goodwill, He will say to those that stand by Him, Take away the
filthy garments from him.  And to thee He will say, Behold, I have
caused all thine iniquity to pass from thee, and I will clothe thee
with change of raiment.



GOODWILL, THE GATEKEEPER



'Goodwill.'--Luke 2. 14.

'So in process of time Christian got up to the gate.  Now there was
written over the gate, Knock, and it shall be opened unto you.  He
knocked, therefore, more than once or twice, saying, May I now
enter here? when at last there came a grave person to the gate,
named Goodwill, who asked him who was there?'  The gravity of the
gatekeeper was the first thing that struck the pilgrim.  And it was
the same thing that so struck some of the men who saw most of our
Lord that they handed down to their children the true tradition
that He was often seen in tears, but that no one had ever seen or
heard Him laugh.  The prophecy in the prophet concerning our Lord
was fulfilled to the letter.  He was indeed a man of sorrows, and
He early and all His life long had a close acquaintance with grief.
Our Lord had come into this world on a very sad errand.  We are so
stupefied and besotted with sin, that we have no conception how sad
an errand our Lord had been sent on, and how sad a task He soon
discovered it to be.  To be a man without sin, a man hating sin,
and hating nothing else but sin, and yet to have to spend all His
days in a world lying in sin, and in the end to have all that world
of sin laid upon Him till He was Himself made sin,--how sad a task
was that!  Great, no doubt, as was the joy that was set before our
Lord, and sure as He was of one day entering on that joy, yet the
daily sight of so much sin in all men around Him, and the cross and
the shame that lay right before Him, made Him, in spite of the
future joy, all the Man of Sorrow Isaiah had said He would be, and
made light-mindedness and laughter impossible to our Lord,--as it
is, indeed, to all men among ourselves who have anything of His
mind about this present world and the sin of this world, they also
are men of sorrow, and of His sorrow.  They, too, are acquainted
with grief.  Their tears, like His, will never be wiped off in this
world.  They will not laugh with all their heart till they laugh
where He now laughs.  Then it will be said of them, too, that they
began to be merry.  'What was the matter with you that you did
laugh in your sleep last night? asked Christiana of Mercy in the
morning.  I suppose you were in a dream.  So I was, said Mercy, but
are you sure that I laughed?  Yes, you laughed heartily; but,
prithee, Mercy, tell me thy dream.  Well, I dreamed that I was in a
solitary place and all alone, and was there bemoaning the hardness
of my heart, when methought I saw one coming with wings towards me.
So he came directly to me, and said, Mercy, what aileth thee?  Now,
when he heard my complaint, he said, Peace be to thee.  He also
wiped mine eyes with his handkerchief, and clad me in silver and
gold; he put a chain about my neck also, and earrings in mine ears,
and a beautiful crown upon my head.  So he went up.  I followed him
till we came to a golden gate; and I thought I saw your husband
there.  But did I laugh?  Laugh! ay, and well you might, to see
yourself so well.'

But to return and begin again.  Goodwill, who opened the gate, was,
as we saw, a person of a very grave and commanding aspect; so much
so, that in his sudden joy our pilgrim was a good deal overawed as
he looked on the countenance of the man who stood in the gate, and
it was some time afterwards before he understood why he wore such a
grave and almost sad aspect.  But afterwards, as he went up the
way, and sometimes returned in thought to the wicket-gate, he came
to see very good reason why the keeper of that gate looked as he
did look.  The site and situation of the gate, for one thing, was
of itself enough to banish all light-mindedness from the man who
was stationed there.  For the gatehouse stood just above the Slough
of Despond, and that itself filled the air of the place with a
dampness and a depression that could be felt.  And then out of the
downward windows of the gate, the watcher's eye always fell on the
City of Destruction in the distance, and on her sister cities
sitting like her daughters round about her.  And that also made
mirth and hilarity impossible at that gate.  And then the kind of
characters who came knocking all hours of the day and the night at
that gate.  Goodwill never saw a happy face or heard a cheerful
voice from one year's end to the other.  And when any one so far
forgot himself as to put on an untimely confidence and self-
satisfaction, the gatekeeper would soon put him through such
questions as quickly sobered him if he had anything at all of the
root of the matter in him.  Terror, horror, despair, remorse,
chased men and women up to that gate.  They would often fall before
his threshold more dead than alive.  And then, after the gate was
opened and the pilgrims pulled in, the gate had only opened on a
path of such painfulness, toil, and terrible risk, that at whatever
window Goodwill looked out, he always saw enough to make him and
keep him a grave, if not a sad, man.  It was, as he sometimes said,
his meat and his drink to keep the gate open for pilgrims; but the
class of men who came calling themselves pilgrims; the condition
they came in; the past, that in spite of all both he and they could
do, still came in through his gate after them, and went up all the
way with them; their ignorance of the way, on which he could only
start them; the multitudes who started, and the handfuls who held
on; the many who for a time ran well, but afterwards left their
bones to bleach by the wayside; and all the impossible-to-be-told
troubles, dangers, sorrows, shipwrecks that certainly lay before
the most steadfast and single-hearted pilgrim--all that was more
than enough to give the man at the gate his grave and anxious
aspect.

Not that his great gravity, with all the causes of it, ever made
him a melancholy, a morose, a despairing, or even a desponding man.
Far from that.  The man of sorrows Himself sometimes rejoiced in
spirit.  Not sometimes only, but often He lifted up His heart and
thanked His Father for the work His Father had given Him to do, and
for the success that had been granted to Him in the doing of it.
And as often as He looked forward to the time when he should finish
His work and receive His discharge, and return to His Father's
house, at the thought of that He straightway forgot all His present
sorrows.  And somewhat so was it with Goodwill at his gate.  No man
could be but at bottom happy, and even joyful, who had a post like
his to occupy, a gate like his to keep, and, altogether, a work
like his to do.  No man with his name and his nature can ever in
any circumstances be really unhappy.  'Happiness is the bloom that
always lies on a life of true goodness,' and this gatehouse was
full of the happiness that follows on and always dwells with true
goodness.  Goodwill cannot have more happiness till he shuts in his
last pilgrim into the Celestial City, and then himself enters in
after him as a shepherd after a lost sheep.

The happy, heavenly, divine disposition of the gatekeeper was such,
that it overflowed from the pilgrim who stood beside him and
descended upon his wife and children who remained behind him in the
doomed city.  So full of love was the gate-keeper's heart, that it
ran out upon Obstinate and Pliable also.  His heart was so large
and so hospitable, that he was not satisfied with one pilgrim
received and assisted that day.  How is it, he asked, that you have
come here alone?  Did any of your neighbours know of your coming?
And why did he who came so far not come through?  Alas, poor man,
said Goodwill, is the celestial glory of so little esteem with him
that he counteth it not worth running the hazards of a few
difficulties to obtain it?  Our pilgrim got a life-long lesson in
goodwill to all men at that gate that day.  The gatekeeper showed
such deep and patient and genuine interest in all the pilgrim's
past history, and in all his family and personal affairs, that
Christian all his days could never show impatience, or haste, or
lack of interest in the most long-winded and egotistical pilgrim he
ever met.  He always remembered, when he was becoming impatient,
how much of his precious time and of his loving attention his old
friend Goodwill had given to him.  Our pilgrim got tired of talking
about himself long before Goodwill had ceased to ask questions and
to listen to the answers.  So much was Christian taken with the
courtesy and the kindness of Goodwill, that had it not been for his
crushing burden, he would have offered to remain in Goodwill's
house to run his errands, to light his fires, and to sweep his
floors.  So much was he taken captive with Goodwill's extraordinary
kindness and unwearied attention.  And since he could not remain at
the gate, but must go on to the city of all goodwill itself, our
pilgrim set himself all his days to copy this gatekeeper when he
met with any fellow-pilgrim who had any story that he wished to
tell.  And many were the lonely and forgotten souls that Christian
cheered and helped on, not by his gold or his silver, nor by
anything else, but just by his open ear.  To listen with patience
and with attention to a fellow-pilgrim's wrongs and sorrows, and
even his smallest interests, said this Christian to himself, is
just what Goodwill so winningly did to me.

With all his goodwill the grave gatekeeper could not say that the
way to the Celestial City was other than a narrow, a stringent, and
a heart-searching way.  'Come,' he said, 'and I will tell thee the
way thou must go.'  There are many wide ways to hell, and many
there be who crowd them, but there is only one way to heaven, and
you will sometimes think you must have gone off it, there are so
few companions; sometimes there will be only one footprint, with
here and there a stream of blood, and always as you proceed, it
becomes more and more narrow, till it strips a man bare, and
sometimes threatens to close upon him and crush him to the earth
altogether.  Our Lord in as many words tells us all that.  Strive,
He says, strive every day.  For many shall seek to enter into the
way of salvation, but because they do not early enough, and long
enough, and painfully enough strive, they come short, and are shut
out.  Have you, then, anything in your religious life that Christ
will at last accept as the striving He intended and demanded?  Does
your religion cause you any real effort--Christ calls it AGONY?
Have you ever had, do you ever have, anything that He would so
describe?  What cross do you every day take up?  In what thing do
you every day deny yourself?  Name it.  Put your finger on it.
Write it in cipher on the margin of your Bible.  Would the most
liberal judgment be able to say of you that you have any fear and
trembling in the work of your salvation?  If not, I am afraid there
must be some mistake somewhere.  There must be great guilt
somewhere.  At your parents' door, or at your minister's, or, if
their hands are clean, then at your own.  Christ has made it plain
to a proverb, and John Bunyan has made it a nursery and a schoolboy
story, that the way to heaven is steep and narrow and lonely and
perilous.  And that, remember, not a few of the first miles of the
way, but all the way, and even through the dark valley itself.
'Almost all that is said in the New Testament of men's watching,
giving earnest heed to themselves, running the race that is set
before them, striving and agonising, fighting, putting on the whole
armour of God, pressing forward, reaching forth, crying to God day
and night; I say, almost all that we have in the New Testament on
these subjects is spoken and directed to the saints.  Where those
things are applied to sinners seeking salvation once, they are
spoken of the saints' prosecution of their salvation ten times'
(Jonathan Edwards).  If you have a life at all like that, you will
be sorely tempted to think that such suffering and struggle,
increasing rather than diminishing as life goes on, is a sign that
you are so bad as not to be a true Christian at all.  You will be
tempted to think and say so.  But all the time the truth is, that
he who has not that labouring, striving, agonising, fearing, and
trembling in himself, knows nothing at all about the religion of
Christ and the way to heaven; and if he thinks he does, then that
but proves him a hypocrite, a self-deceived, self-satisfied
hypocrite; there is not an ounce of a true Christian in him.  Says
Samuel Rutherford on this matter:  'Christ commandeth His hearers
to a strict and narrow way, in mortifying heart-lusts, in loving
our enemy, in feeding him when he is hungry, in suffering for
Christ's sake and the gospel's, in bearing His cross, in denying
ourselves, in becoming humble as children, in being to all men and
at all times meek and lowly in heart.'  Let any man lay all that
intelligently and imaginatively alongside of his own daily life.
Let him name some such heart-lust.  Let him name also some enemy,
and ask himself what it is to love that man, and to feed him in his
hunger; what it is in which he is called to suffer for Christ's
sake and the gospel's, in his reputation, in his property, in his
business, in his feelings.  Let him put his finger on something in
which he is every day to deny himself, and to be humble and
teachable, and to keep himself out of sight like a little child;
and if that man does not find out how narrow and heart-searching
the way to heaven is, he will be the first who has so found his way
thither.  No, no; be not deceived.  Deceive not yourself, and let
no man deceive you.  God is not mocked, neither are His true
saints.  'Would to God I were back in my pulpit but for one
Sabbath,' said a dying minister in Aberdeen.  'What would you do?'
asked a brother minister at his bedside.  'I would preach to the
people the difficulty of salvation,' he said.  All which things are
told, not for purposes of debate or defiance, but to comfort and
instruct God's true people who are finding salvation far more
difficult than anybody had ever told them it would be.  Comfort My
people, saith your God.  Speak comfortably to My people.  Come,
said Goodwill, and I will teach thee about the way thou must go.
Look before thee, dost thou see that narrow way?  That is the way
thou must go.  And then thou mayest always distinguish the right
way from the wrong.  The wrong is crooked and wide, and the right
is straight as a rule can make it,--straight and narrow.

Goodwill said all that in order to direct and to comfort the
pilgrim; but that was not all that this good man said with that
end.  For, when Christian asked him if he could not help him off
with his burden that was upon his back, he told him:  'As to thy
burden, be content to bear it until thou comest to the place of
deliverance, for there it will fall from thy back of itself.'  Get
you into the straight and narrow way, says Goodwill, with his much
experience of the ways and fortunes of true pilgrims; get you sure
into the right way, and leave your burden to God.  He appoints the
place of deliverance, and it lies before thee.  The place of thy
deliverance cannot be behind thee, and it is not in my house, else
thy burden would have been already off.  But it is before thee.  Be
earnest, therefore, in the way.  Look not behind thee.  Go not into
any crooked way; and one day, before you know, and when you are not
pulling at it, your burden will fall off of itself.  Be content to
bear it till then, says bold and honest Goodwill, speaking so true
to pilgrim experience.  Yes; be content, O ye people of God, crying
with this pilgrim for release from your burden of guilt, and no
less those of you who are calling with Paul for release from the
still more bitter and crushing burden made up of combined guilt and
corruption.  Be content till the place and the time of deliverance;
nay, even under your burden and your bonds be glad, as Paul was,
and go up the narrow way, still chanting to yourself, I thank God
through Jesus Christ our Lord.  It is only becoming that a great
sinner should tarry the Lord's leisure; all the more that the
greatest sinner may be sure the Lord will come, and will not tarry.
The time is long, but the thing is sure.

And now two lessons from Goodwill's gate:-

1.  The gate was shut when Christian came up to it, and no one was
visible anywhere about it.  The only thing visible was the writing
over the gate which told all pilgrims to knock.  Now, when we come
up to the same gate we are disappointed and discouraged that the
gatekeeper is not standing already upon his doorstep and his arms
round our neck.  We knelt to-day in secret prayer, and there was
only our bed or our chair visible before us.  There was no human
being, much less to all appearance any Divine Presence, in the
place.  And we prayed a short, indeed, but a not unearnest prayer,
and then we rose up and came away disappointed because no one
appeared.  But look at him who is now inheriting the promises.  He
knocked, says his history, more than once or twice.  That is to
say, he did not content himself with praying one or two seconds and
then giving over, but he continued in prayer till the gatekeeper
came.  And as he knocked, he said, so loud and so impatient that
all those in the gatehouse could hear him,


'May I now enter here?  Will he within
Open to sorry me, though I have been
A wandering rebel?  Then shall I
Not fail to sing his lasting praise on high.'


2.  'We make no objections against any,' said Goodwill;
'notwithstanding all that they have done before they come hither,
they are in no wise cast out.'  He told me all things that ever I
did, said the woman of Samaria, telling her neighbours about our
Lord's conversation with her.  And, somehow, there was something in
the gatekeeper's words that called back to Christian, if not all
the things he had ever done, yet from among them the worst things
he had ever done.  They all rose up black as hell before his eyes
as the gatekeeper did not name them at all, but only said
'notwithstanding all that thou hast done.'  Christian never felt
his past life so black, or his burden so heavy, or his heart so
broken, as when Goodwill just said that one word 'notwithstanding.'
'We make no objections against any; notwithstanding all that they
have done before they come hither, they are in no wise cast out.'



THE INTERPRETER



'An interpreter, one among a thousand.'--Elihu.

We come to-night to the Interpreter's House.  And since every
minister of the gospel is an interpreter, and every evangelical
church is an interpreter's house, let us gather up some of the
precious lessons to ministers and to people with which this passage
of the Pilgrim's Progress so much abounds.

1.  In the first place, then, I observe that the House of the
Interpreter stands just beyond the Wicket Gate.  In the whole
topography of the Pilgrim's Progress there lies many a deep lesson.
The church that Mr. Worldly-Wiseman supported, and on the communion
roll of which he was so determined to have our pilgrim's so
unprepared name, stood far down on the other side of Goodwill's
gate.  It was a fine building, and it had an eloquent man for its
minister, and the whole service was an attraction and an enjoyment
to all the people of the place; but our Interpreter was never asked
to show any of his significant things there; and, indeed, neither
minister nor people would have understood him had he ever done so.
And had any of the parishioners from below the gate ever by any
chance stumbled into the Interpreter's house, his most significant
rooms would have had no significance to them.  Both he and his
house would have been a mystery and an offence to Worldly-Wiseman,
his minister, and his fellow-worshippers.  John Bunyan has the
clear warrant both of Jesus Christ and the Apostle Paul for the
place on which he has planted the Interpreter's house.  'It is
given to you,' said our Lord to His disciples, 'to know the
mysteries of the Kingdom of Heaven, but to them it is not given.'
And Paul tells us that 'the natural man receiveth not the things of
the Spirit of God, for they are foolishness unto him:  neither can
he know them, because they are spiritually discerned.'  And,
accordingly, no reader of the Pilgrim's Progress will really
understand what he sees in the Interpreter's House, unless he is
already a man of a spiritual mind.  Intelligent children enjoy the
pictures and the people that are set before them in this
illustrated house, but they must become the children of God, and
must be well on in the life of God, before they will be able to say
that the house next the gate has been a profitable and a helpful
house to them.  All that is displayed here--all the furniture and
all the vessels, all the ornaments and all the employments and all
the people of the Interpreter's House--is fitted and intended to be
profitable as well as interesting to pilgrims only.  No man has any
real interest in the things of this house, or will take any abiding
profit out of it, till he is fairly started on the upward road.  In
his former life, and while still on the other side of the gate, our
pilgrim had no interest in such things as he is now to see and
hear; and if he had seen and heard them in his former life, he
would not, with all the Interpreter's explanation, have understood
them.  As here among ourselves to-night, they who will understand
and delight in the things they hear in this house to-night are
those only who have really begun to live a religious life.  The
realities of true religion are now the most real things in life--to
them; they love divine things now; and since they began to love
divine things, you cannot entertain them better than by exhibiting
and explaining divine things to them.  There is no house in all the
earth, after the gate itself, that is more dear to the true pilgrim
heart than just the Interpreter's House.  'I was glad when it was
said to me, Let us go into the house of the Lord.  Peace be within
thy walls, and prosperity within thy palaces.'

2.  And besides being built on the very best spot in all the land
for its owner's purposes, every several room in that great house
was furnished and fitted up for the entertainment and instruction
of pilgrims.  Every inch of that capacious and many-chambered house
was given up to the delectation of pilgrims.  The public rooms were
thrown open for their convenience and use at all hours of the day
and night, and the private rooms were kept retired and secluded for
such as sought retirement and seclusion.  There were dark rooms
also with iron cages in them, till Christian and his companions
came out of those terrible places, bringing with them an
everlasting caution to watchfulness and a sober mind.  There were
rooms also given up to vile and sordid uses.  One room there was
full of straws and sticks and dust, with an old man who did nothing
else day nor night but wade about among the straws and sticks and
dust, and rake it all into little heaps, and then sit watching lest
any one should overturn them.  And then, strange to tell it, and
not easy to get to the full significance of it, the bravest room in
all the house had absolutely nothing in it but a huge, ugly,
poisonous spider hanging to the wall with her hands.  'Is there but
one spider in all this spacious room?' asked the Interpreter.  And
the water stood in Christiana's eyes; she had come by this time
thus far on her journey also.  She was a woman of a quick
apprehension, and the water stood in her eyes at the Interpreter's
question, and she said:  'Yes, Lord, there is here more than one.
Yea, and spiders whose venom is far more destructive than that
which is in her.'  The Interpreter then looked pleasantly on her,
and said:  'Thou hast said the truth.'  This made Mercy blush, and
the boys to cover their faces, for they all began now to understand
the riddle.  'This is to show you,' said the Interpreter, 'that
however full of the venom of sin you may be, yet you may, by the
hand of faith, lay hold of, and dwell in the best room that belongs
to the King's House above.'  Then they all seemed to be glad, but
the water stood in their eyes.  A wall also stood apart on the
grounds of the house with an always dying fire on one side of it,
while a man on the other side of the wall continually fed the fire
through hidden openings in the wall.  A whole palace stood also on
the grounds, the inspection of which so kindled our pilgrim's
heart, that he refused to stay here any longer, or to see any more
sights--so much had he already seen of the evil of sin and of the
blessedness of salvation.  Not that he had seen as yet the half of
what that house held for the instruction of pilgrims.  Only, time
would fail us to visit the hen and her chickens; the butcher
killing a sheep and pulling her skin over her ears, and she lying
still under his hands and taking her death patiently; also the
garden with the flowers all diverse in stature, and quality, and
colour, and smell, and virtue, and some better than some, and all
where the gardener had set them, there they stand, and quarrel not
with one another.  The robin-red-breast also, so pretty of note and
colour and carriage, but instead of bread and crumbs, and such like
harmless matter, with a great spider in his mouth.  A tree also,
whose inside was rotten, and yet it grew and had leaves.  So they
went on their way and sang:


'This place hath been our second stage,
Here have we heard and seen
Those good things that from age to age
To others hid have been.
The butcher, garden, and the field,
The robin and his bait,
Also the rotten tree, doth yield
Me argument of weight;
To move me for to watch and pray,
To strive to be sincere,
To take my cross up day by day,
And serve the Lord with few.'


The significant rooms of that divine house instruct us also that
all the lessons requisite for our salvation are not to be found in
any one scripture or in any one sermon, but that all that is
required by any pilgrim or any company of pilgrims should all be
found in every minister's ministry as he leads his flock on from
one Sabbath-day to another, rightly dividing the word of truth.
Our ministers should have something in their successive sermons for
everybody.  Something for the children, something for the slow-
witted and the dull of understanding, and something specially
suited for those who are of a quick apprehension; something at one
time to make the people smile, at another time to make them blush,
and at another time to make the water stand in their eyes.

3.  And, then, the Interpreter's life was as full of work as his
house was of entertainment and instruction.  Not only so, but his
life, it was well known, had been quite as full of work before he
had a house to work for as ever it had been since.  The Interpreter
did nothing else but continually preside over his house and all
that was in it and around it, and it was all gone over and seen to
with his own eyes and hands every day.  He had been present at the
laying of every stone and beam of that solid and spacious house of
his.  There was not a pin nor a loop of its furniture, there was
not a picture on its walls, nor a bird nor a beast in its woods and
gardens, that he did not know all about and could not hold
discourse about.  And then, after he had taken you all over his
house, with its significant rooms and woods and gardens, he was
full all supper-time of all wise saws and witty proverbs.  'One
leak will sink a ship,' he said that night, 'and one sin will
destroy a sinner.'  And all their days the pilgrims remembered that
word from the Interpreter's lips, and they often said it to
themselves as they thought of their own besetting sin.  Now, if it
is indeed so, that every gospel minister is an interpreter, and
every evangelical church an interpreter's house, what an important
passage this is for all those who are proposing and preparing to be
ministers.  Let them reflect upon it:  what a house this is that
the Interpreter dwells in; how early and how long ago he began to
lay out his grounds and to build his house upon them; how complete
in all its parts it is, and how he still watches and labours to
have it more complete.  Understandest thou what thou here readest?
it is asked of all ministers, young and old, as they turn over John
Bunyan's pungent pages.  And every new room, every new bird, and
beast, and herb, and flower makes us blush for shame as we contrast
our own insignificant and ill-furnished house with the noble house
of the Interpreter.  Let all our students who have not yet fatally
destroyed themselves and lost their opportunity lay the
Interpreter's House well to heart.  Let them be students not in
idle name only, as so many are, but in intense reality, as so few
are.  Let them read everything that bears upon the Bible, and let
them read nothing that does not.  They have not the time nor the
permission.  Let them be content to be men of one book.  Let them
give themselves wholly to the interpretation of divine truth as its
riddles are set in nature and in man, in scripture, in providence,
and in spiritual experience.  Let them store their memories at
college with all sacred truth, and with all secular truth that can
be made sacred.  And if their memories are weak and treacherous,
let them be quiet under God's will in that, and all the more labour
to make up in other ways for that defect, so that they may have
always something to say to the purpose when their future people
come up to church hungry for instruction and comfort and
encouragement.  Let them look around and see the sin that sinks the
ship of so many ministers; and let them begin while yet their ship
is in the yard and see that she is fitted up and furnished, stored
and stocked, so that she shall in spite of sure storms and sunken
rocks deliver her freight in the appointed haven.  When they are
lying in bed of a Sabbath morning, let them forecast the day when
they shall have to give a strict account of their eight years of
golden opportunity among the churches, and the classes, and the
societies, and the libraries of our university seats.  Let them be
able to name some great book, ay, more than one great book, they
mastered, for every year of their priceless and irredeemable
student life.  Let them all their days have old treasure-houses
that they filled full with scholarship and with literature and with
all that will minister to a congregation's many desires and
necessities, collected and kept ready from their student days.
'Meditate upon these things; give thyself wholly up to them, that
thy profiting may appear unto all.'

4.  And then with a sly stroke at us old ministers, our significant
author points out to us how much better furnished the Interpreter's
House was by the time Christiana and the boys visited it compared
with that early time when Christian was entertained in it.  Our
pilgrim got far more in the Interpreter's House of delight and
instruction than he could carry out of it, but that did not tempt
the Interpreter to sit down and content himself with taking all his
future pilgrims into the same room, and showing them the same
pictures, and repeating to them the same explanations.  No, for he
reflected that each coming pilgrim would need some new significant
room to himself, and therefore, as soon as he got one pilgrim off
his hands, he straightway set about building and furnishing new
rooms, putting up new pictures, and replenishing his woods and his
waters with new beasts and birds and fishes.  I am ashamed, he
said, that I had so little to show when I first opened my gates to
receive pilgrims, and I do not know why they came to me as they
did.  I was only a beginner in these things when my first visitor
came to my gates.  Let every long-settled, middle-aged, and even
grey-headed minister read the life of the Interpreter at this point
and take courage and have hope.  Let it teach us all to break some
new ground in the field of divine truth with every new year.  Let
it teach us all to be students all our days.  Let us buy, somehow,
the poorest and the oldest of us, some new and first-rate book
every year.  Let us not indeed shut up altogether our old rooms if
they ever had anything significant in them, but let us add now a
new wing to our spiritual house, now a new picture to its walls,
and now a new herb to its gardens.  'Resolved,' wrote Jonathan
Edwards, 'that as old men have seldom any advantage of new
discoveries, because these are beside a way of thinking they have
been long used to; resolved, therefore, if ever I live to years,
that I will be impartial to hear the reasons of all pretended
discoveries, and receive them, if rational, how long soever I have
been used to another way of thinking.'

5.  The fickle, frivolous, volatile character of so many divinity
students is excellently hit off by Bunyan in our pilgrim's
impatience to be out of the Interpreter's House.  No sooner had he
seen one or two of the significant rooms than this easily satisfied
student was as eager to get out of that house as he had been to get
in.  Twice over the wise and learned Interpreter had to beg and
beseech this ignorant and impulsive pilgrim to stop and get another
lesson in the religious life before he left the great school-house.
All our professors of divinity and all our ministers understand the
parable at this point only too well.  Their students are eager to
get into their classes; like our pilgrim, they have heard the fame
of this and that teacher, and there is not standing-room in the
class for the first weeks of the session.  But before Christmas
there is room enough for strangers, and long before the session
closes, half the students are counting the weeks and plotting to
petition the Assembly against the length and labour of the
curriculum.  Was there ever a class that was as full and attentive
at the end of the session as it was at the beginning?  Never since
our poor human nature was so stricken with laziness and shallowness
and self-sufficiency.  But what is the chaff to the wheat?  It is
the wheat that deserves and repays the husbandman's love and
labour.  When Plato looked up from his desk in the Academy, after
reading and expounding one of his greatest Dialogues, he found only
one student left in the class-room, but then, that student was
Aristotle.  'Now let me go,' said Christian.  'Nay, stay,' said the
Interpreter, 'till I have showed thee a little more.'  'Sir, is it
not time for me to go?'  'Do tarry till I show thee just one thing
more.'

6.  'Here have I seen things rare and profitable,
. . . Then let me be
Thankful, O good Interpreter, to thee.'

Sydney Smith, with his usual sagacity, says that the last vice of
the pulpit is to be uninteresting.  Now, the Interpreter's House
had this prime virtue in it, that it was all interesting.  Do not
our children beg of us on Sabbath nights to let them see the
Interpreter's show once more; it is so inexhaustibly and
unfailingly interesting?  It is only stupid men and women who ever
weary of it.  But, 'profitable' was the one and universal word with
which all the pilgrims left the Interpreter's House.  'Rare and
pleasant,' they said, and sometimes 'dreadful;' but it was always
'profitable.'  Now, how seldom do we hear our people at the church
door step down into the street saying, 'profitable'?  If they said
that oftener their ministers would study profit more than they do.
The people say 'able,' or 'not at all able'; 'eloquent,' or
'stammering and stumbling'; 'excellent' in style and manner and
accent, or the opposite of all that; and their ministers, to please
the people and to earn their approval, labour after these approved
things.  But if the people only said that the prayers and the
preaching were profitable and helpful, even when they too seldom
are, then our preachers would set the profit of the people far more
before them both in selecting and treating and delivering their
Sabbath-day subjects.  A lady on one occasion said to her minister,
'Sir, your preaching does my soul good.'  And her minister never
forgot the grave and loving look with which that was said.  Not
only did he never forget it, but often when selecting his subject,
and treating it, and delivering it, the question would rise in his
heart and conscience, Will that do my friend's soul any good?
'Rare and profitable,' said the pilgrim as he left the gate; and
hearing that sent the Interpreter back with new spirit and new
invention to fill his house of still more significant, rare, and
profitable things than ever before.  'Meditate on these things,'
said Paul to Timothy his son in the gospel, 'that thy profiting may
appear unto all.'  'Thou art a minister of the word,' wrote the
learned William Perkins beside his name on all his books, 'mind thy
business.'



PASSION



'A man subject to like passions as we are.'--James 5. 17.

That was a very significant room in the Interpreter's House where
our pilgrim saw Passion and Patience sitting each one in his chair.
Passion was a young lad who seemed to our pilgrim to be much
discontented.  He was never satisfied.  He would have all his good
things now.  His governor would have him wait for his best things
till the beginning of next year; but no, he will have them all now.
And then, when he had got all his good things, he soon lavished and
wasted them all till he had nothing left but rags.  Then said
Christian to the Interpreter, 'Expound this matter more fully to
me.'  So he said, 'Those two lads are figures; Passion, of the men
of this world; and Patience of the men of that which is to come.'
'Then I perceive,' said Christian, ''tis not best to covet things
that are now, but to wait for things to come.'  'You say truth,'
replied the Interpreter, 'for the things that are seen are
temporal, but the things that are not seen are eternal.'

Now from the texts that I have taken out of James and out of this
so significant room in the Interpreter's House, let me try to tell
you something profitable, if so it may be, about passion; the
nature of it, the place it holds, and the part it performs both in
human nature and in the life and the character of a Christian man.

The name of Passion has already told us his nature, his past life,
and his present character.  The whole nomenclature of The Pilgrim's
Progress and of The Holy War is composed on the divine, original,
and natural principle of embodying the nature of a man in his name.
God takes His own names to Himself on that principle.  The Creator
gave Adam his name also on that same principle; and then Adam gave
their names to all cattle, to the fowls of the air, and to every
beast of the field on the same principle on which he had got his
own name.  And so it was at first with all the Bible names of men
and of nations of men.  Their name contained their nature.  And
John Bunyan was such a student of the Bible, and of no other book
but the Bible, that all his best books are all full, like the
Bible, of the most descriptive and suggestive names.  As soon as
Bunyan tells us the name of some new acquaintance or fellow-
traveller, we already know him, so exactly is his nature put into
his name.  And thus it is that when we stop for a moment at the
door of this little significant room in the Interpreter's House and
ask ourselves the meaning of the name Passion, we see at once where
we are and what we have here before us.  For a 'passion' is just
some excitement or agitation of the mind caused by some outward
thing acting on the mind.  The inward world of the mind and heart
of man, and this outward world down into which God has placed man,
instantly and continually respond to one another.  And what are
called, with so much correctness and propriety, our passions, are
just those inward responses, excitements, and agitations that the
outward world causes in the inward world when those two worlds meet
together.  'Passion' and 'perturbation' are the old classical names
that the ancient philosophers and moralists gave to what they felt
in themselves as their minds and their hearts were affected by the
world of men and things around them.  And they used to illustrate
their teaching on the subject of the passions by the figure of a
storm at sea.  They said that it was because God had made the sea
sensitive and responsive to the winds that blew over it that a
storm at sea ever arose.  The storm did not arise and the ships
were not wrecked by anything from within the sea itself; it was the
outward world of the winds striking against the quiet and inward
world of the waters that roused the storms and sank the ships.  And
with that illustration well printed in the minds and imaginations
of their scholars the old moralists felt their work among their
scholars was already all but done.  For, so full of adaptation and
appeal is the whole outward world to the mind and heart of man, and
so sensitive and instantly responsive is the mind and heart of man
to all the approaches of the outward world, that the mind and heart
of man are constantly full of all kinds of passions, both bad and
good.  And, then, this is our present life of probation and
opportunity, that all our passions are placed within us and are
committed and entrusted to us as so many first elements and so much
unformed material out of which we are summoned to build up our life
and to shape and complete our character.  The springs of all our
actions are in our passions.  All our activities in life, trace
them all up to their source, and they will all be found to run up
into the wellhead of our passions.  All our virtues are cut as with
a chisel out of our passions, and all our vices are just the
disorders and rebellions of our passions.  Our several passions, as
they lie still asleep in our hearts, have as yet no moral
character; they are only the raw material so to speak, of moral
character.  Our passions are the life and the riches and the
ornaments of human nature, and it is only because human nature in
its present estate is so corrupt and disordered and degraded, that
the otherwise so honourable name of passion has such a sinister
sound to us.  And the full regeneration and restitution of human
nature will be accomplished when every several passion is in its
right place, and when reason and conscience and the Spirit of God
shall inspire and rule and regulate all that is within us.


'On life's vast ocean diversely we sail,
Reason the card, but passion is the gale.'


And not Elijah only, as James says, and not Paul and Barnabas only,
as they themselves said, were men of like passions with ourselves,
but our Lord Himself was a man of like passions with us also.  He
took to Himself a true body, full of all the appetites of the body,
and a reasonable soul, full of all the affections, passions, and
emotions of the soul.  Only, in Him reason and conscience and the
law and the Spirit of God were the card and the compass according
to which He steered His life.  We have all our ruling passion, and
our Lord also had His.  As His disciples saw His ruling passion
kindled in His heart and coming out in His life, they remembered
that it was written of Him in an old Messianic psalm:  'The zeal of
Thine house hath eaten me up.'  They were all eaten up of their
ruling passions also.  One of ambition, one of emulation, one of
avarice, and so on,--each several disciple was eaten up of his own
besetting sin.  But they all saw that it was not so with their
Master.  He was eaten up always and wholly of the zeal of His
Father's house, and of absolute surrender and devotion to His
Father's service, till His ruling passion was seen to be as strong
in His death as it had been in His life.  The Laird of Brodie's
Diary has repeatedly been of great use to us in these inward
matters, and his words on this subject are well worth repeating.
'We poor creatures,' he says, 'are commanded by our affections and
passions.  They are not at our command.  But the Holy One doth
exercise all His attributes at His own will; they are at His
command; they are not passions nor perturbations in His mind,
though they transport us.  When I would hate, I cannot.  When I
would love, I cannot.  When I would grieve, I cannot.  When I would
desire, I cannot.  But it is the better for us that all is as He
wills it to be.'

And now, to come still closer home, let us look for a moment or two
at some of our own ruling and tyrannising passions.  And let us
look first at self-love--that master-passion in every human heart.
Let us give self-love the first place in the inventory and
catalogue of our passions, because it has the largest place in all
our hearts and lives.  Nay, not only has self-love the largest
place of any of the passions of our hearts, but it is out of self-
love that all our other evil passions spring.  It is out of this
parent passion that all the poisonous brood of our other evil
passions are born.  The whole fall and ruin and misery of our
present human nature lies in this, that in every human being self-
love has taken, in addition to its own place, the place of the love
of God and of the love of man also.  We naturally now love nothing
and no one but ourselves.  And as long as self-love is in the
ascendant in our hearts, all the passions that are awakened in us
by our self-love will be selfish with its selfishness, inhumane
with its inhumanity, and ungodly with its ungodliness.  And it is
to kill and extirpate our so passionate self-love that is the end
and aim of all God's dealings with us in this world.  All that God
is doing with us and for us in providence and in grace, in the
world and in the church,--it is all to cure us of this deadly
disease of self-love.  We may never have had that told us before,
and we may not like it, and we may not believe it; but there can be
no better proof of the truth of what is now said than just this,
that we do not like it and will not have it.  Self-love will not
let us listen to the truth about ourselves; it puts us in a passion
both against the truth and against him who tells the truth, as the
history of the truth abundantly testifies.  Yes, your indignant
protest is quite true.  Self-love has her divine rights,--no doubt
she has.  But you are not commanded to attend to them.  Your self-
love will look after herself.  She will manage to have her full
share of what is right and proper for any passion to possess even
after she cries out that she is trampled upon and despoiled.  My
brethren, till you begin to crucify yourselves and to pluck up your
self-love by the roots, you will never know what a cruel and
hopeless task the Christian life is--I do not say the Christian
profession.  Nor, on the other hand, will you ever discover what a
noble task it is--what a divine task and how divinely assisted and
divinely recompensed.  You will not know what a kennel of hell-
hounds your own heart is till you have long sought to enter it and
cleanse it out.  And after you have done your utmost, and your
best, death will hurry you away from your but half-accomplished
task.  Only, in that case you will be able to die in the hope that
what is impossible with man is possible with God, as promised by
Him, and that He will not leave your soul in hell, but will perfect
that good thing which alone concerneth you, even your everlasting
deliverance from all sinful self-love.

And if self-love is the fruitful mother of all our passions, then
sensuality is surely her eldest son.  Indeed, so shallow are we,
and so shallow are our words, that when we speak of sinful passion
most men instantly think of sensuality.  There are so many
seductive things that appeal to our appetites, and our appetites
are so easily awakened, and are so imperious when they are
awakened, that when passion is spoken about, few men think of the
soul, all men think instantly of the body.  And no wonder.  For,
stupid and besotted as we are, we must all at some time of our life
have felt the bondage and degradation of the senses.  Passion in
the Interpreter's House had soon nothing left but rags.  And in
this house to-night there are many men whose consciences and hearts
and characters are all in such rags from sensual sin, that when the
Scriptures speak of uncleanness, or rags, or corruption, their
thoughts flee at once to sensual sin and its conscience-rending
results.  Cease from sensuality, said Cicero, for if once you give
your minds up to sensuality, you will never be able to think of
anything else.

Ambition, emulation, and envy are the leading members of a whole
prolific family of satanic passions in the human heart.  Indeed,
these passions, taken along with their kindred passions of hatred
and ill-will, are, in our Lord's words, the very lusts of the devil
himself.  The Jews hated our Lord the more for what He said about
these detestable passions, but His own disciples love Him only the
more that He so well knows the evil affections of their hearts, and
so well describes and denounces them.  Anybody can denounce sensual
sin, and everybody will understand and approve.  But spiritual
sin,--ambition and emulation and envy and ill-will--these things
are more easy to denounce than they are to detect and describe, and
more easy to detect and describe than they are to cast out.  These
sins seem rather to multiply and to strike a deeper root when you
begin to cast them out.  What an utterly and abominably evil
passion is envy which is awakened not by bad things but by the best
things!  That another man's talents, attainments, praises, rewards
should kindle it, and that the blame, the depreciation, the hurt
that another man suffers should satisfy it,--what a piece of very
hell must that be in the human heart!  What more do we need than
just a little envy in our hearts to make us prostrate penitents
before God and man all our days?  What more doctrine, argument,
proof, authority, persuasion should a sane man need beyond a little
envy in his heart at his best friend to make him an evangelical
believer and an evangelical preacher?  How, in the name of wonder,
is it that men can be so ignorant of the plague of their own hearts
as to remain indifferent, and, much more, hostile, to the gospel of
love and holiness?  Pride, also,--what a hateful and intolerable
passion is that!  How stone-blind to his own state must that sinner
be whose heart is filled with pride, and how impossible it is for
that man to make any real progress in any kind of truth or
goodness!  And resentment,--what a deep-seated, long-lived, and
suicidal passion is that!  How it hunts down him it hates, and how
surely it shuts the door of salvation against him who harbours it!
Forgive us our debts, the resentful man says in his prayer, as we
forgive our debtors.  And detraction,--how some men's ink-horns are
filled with detraction for ink, and how it drops from their tongue
like poison!  At their every word a reputation dies.  Life and all
its opportunities of doing good and having good done to us is laid
like a bag of treasure at our feet, but, like the prodigal son in
the Interpreter's House, with all those passions raging in our own
hearts at other men, and in other men's hearts at us, we have soon
nothing left us but rags.  God be thanked for every man here who
sees and feels that he has nothing left him but rags; and, still
more, thanks for all those who see and feel how, by their bad
passions, sensual and spiritual, they have left on other people
nothing but rags.

Now, from all this let us lay it to heart that our sanctification
and salvation lie in our mastery over all these and over many other
passions that have not even been named.  He is an accepted saint of
God, who, taking his and other people's rags to God's mercy every
day, every day also in God's strength grapples with, bridles, and
tames his own wild and ungodly passions.  Be not deceived, my
friends; he alone is a saint of God who is a sanctified man; and
his passions,--as they are the spring of his actions, so they are
the sphere and seat of his sanctification.  Be not deceived; that
man, and no other manner of man, is, or ever will be, a partaker of
God's salvation.  You often hear me recommending those students who
have first to subdue their own passions and then the passions of
those who hear them to study Jonathan Edwards' ethical and
spiritual writings.  Well, just at this present point, to show you
how well that great man practised what he preached, let me read to
you a few lines from his biographer:  'Few men,' says Henry Rogers,
'ever attained a more complete mastery over their passions than
Jonathan Edwards did.  This was partly owing to the ascendency of
his intellect; partly, and in a still greater degree, to the
elevation of his piety.  For the subjugation of his passions he was
no doubt very greatly indebted to the prodigious superiority of his
reason.  Such was the commanding attitude his reason assumed, and
such the tremendous power with which it controlled the whole man,
that any insurrection among his senses was hopeless; they had their
tenure only by doing fealty and homage to his intellect.  Those
other and more dangerous enemies, because more subtle and more
spiritual, such as pride, vanity, wrath, and envy, which lurk in
the inmost recesses of our nature, and some of which have such
affinities for a genius like that of Edwards, yield not to such
exorcism.  Such more powerful kind of demons go not forth but by
prayer and fasting; to their complete mortification, therefore,
Edwards brought incessant watchfulness and devotion; and seldom,
assuredly, have they been more nearly expelled from the bosom of a
depraved intelligence.'  We shall be in the best company, both
intellectually and spiritually, if we work out our own salvation
among the sinful passions of our depraved hearts.  And then, as
life goes on, and we continue in well-doing, we shall be able to
measure and register our growth in grace best by watching the
effect of outward temptations upon our still sinful and but half-
sanctified hearts.  And among much to be humbled for, and much to
make us fear and tremble for the issue, we shall, from time to
time, have a good conscience and a holy and humble joy that this
passion and that is at last showing some signs of crucifixion and
mortification.  And thus that death to sin shall gradually set in
which shall issue at last in an everlasting life unto holiness.

'Then will I sprinkle clean water upon you, and ye shall be clean:
from all your filthiness, and from all your idols will I cleanse
you.  A new heart also will I give you, and a new spirit will I put
within you . . . Behold, I have caused thine iniquity to pass from
thee, and I will clothe thee with change of raiment.  In that day
there shall be a fountain opened to the house of David, and to the
inhabitants of Jerusalem, for sin and for uncleanness . . . Bring
forth the best robe and put it upon him, for this my son was dead,
and is alive again; he was lost, and is found . . . What are these
that are arrayed in white robes, and whence came they?  These are
they which came out of great tribulation, and have washed their
robes, and made them white in the blood of the Lamb.'



PATIENCE



'In your patience possess ye your souls.'  (Revised Version:  'In
your patience ye shall win your souls.')--Our Lord.

'I saw moreover in my dream that the Interpreter took the pilgrim
by the hand, and had him into a little room, where sate two little
children, each one in his chair.  The name of the eldest was
Passion and of the other Patience.  Passion seemed to be much
discontent, but Patience was very quiet.  Then Christian asked,
What is the reason of the discontent of Passion?  The interpreter
answered, The governor of them would have him stay for his best
things till the beginning of the next year; but he will have all
now.  But Patience is willing to wait.'

Passion and Patience, like Esau and Jacob, are twin-brothers.  And
their names, like their natures, spring up from the same root.
'Patience,' says Crabb in his English Synonyms, 'comes from the
active participle to suffer; while passion comes from the passive
participle of the same verb; and hence the difference between the
two names.  Patience signifies suffering from an active principle,
a determination to suffer; while passion signifies what is suffered
from want of power to prevent the suffering.  Patience, therefore,
is always taken in a good sense, and Passion always in a bad
sense.'  So far this excellent etymologist.  This is, therefore,
another case of blessing and cursing proceeding out of the same
mouth, and of the same fountain sending forth at the same place
both sweet water and bitter.

Our Lord tells us in this striking text that our very souls by
reason of sin are not our own.  He tells us that we have lost hold
of our souls before we have as yet come to know that we have souls.
We only discover that we have souls after we have lost them.  And
our Lord,--our best, indeed our only, authority in the things of
the soul,--here tells us that it is only by patience that we shall
ever win back our lost souls.  More, far more, is needed to the
winning back of a lost soul than its owner's patience, and our Lord
knew that to His cost.  But that is not His point with us to-night.
His sole point with each one of us to-night is our personal part in
the conquest and redemption of our sin-enslaved souls.  He who has
redeemed our souls with His own blood tells us with all plainness
of speech, that His blood will be shed in vain, as far as we are
concerned, unless we add to His atoning death our own patient life.
Every human life, as our Lord looks at it, and would have us look
at it, is a vast field of battle in which a soul is lost or won;
little as we think of it or will believe it, in His sight every
trial, temptation, provocation, insult, injury, and all kinds and
all degrees of pain and suffering, are all so many divinely
appointed opportunities afforded us for the reconquest and recovery
of our souls.  Sometimes faith is summoned into the battle-field,
sometimes hope, sometimes self-denial, sometimes prayer, sometimes
one grace and sometimes another; but as with the sound of a trumpet
the Captain of our salvation here summons Patience to the forefront
of the fight.

1.  To begin with, how much impatience we are all from time to time
guilty of in our family life.  Among the very foundations of our
family life how much impatience the husband often exhibits toward
the wife, and the wife toward her husband.  Patience is the very
last grace they look forward to having any need of when they are
still dreaming about their married life; but, in too many cases,
they have not well entered on that life, when they find that they
need no grace of God so much as just patience, if the yoke of their
new life is not to gall them beyond endurance.  However many good
qualities of mind and heart and character any husband or wife may
have, no human being is perfect, and most of us are very far from
being perfect.  When therefore, we are closely and indissolubly
joined to another life and another will, it is no wonder that
sometimes the ill-fitting yoke eats into a lifelong sore.  We have
all many defects in our manners, in our habits, and in our
constitutional ways of thinking and speaking and acting,--defects
that tempt those who live nearest us to fall into annoyances with
us that sometimes deepen into dislike, and even positive disgust,
till it has been seen, in some extreme cases, that home-life has
become a very prison-house, in which the impatient prisoner chafes
and jibs and strikes out as he does nowhere else.  Now, when any
unhappy man or woman wakens up to discover how different life is
now to be from what it once promised to become, let them know that
all their past blindness, and precipitancy, and all the painful
results of all that, may yet be made to work together for good.  In
your patience with one another, says our Lord, you will make a
conquest of your adverse lot, and of your souls to the bargain.
Say to yourselves, therefore, that perfection, faultlessness, and
absolute satisfaction are not to be found in this world.  And say
also that since you have not brought perfection to your side of the
house any more than your partner has to his side, you are not so
foolish as to expect perfection in return for such imperfection.
You have your own share of what causes fireside silence, aversion,
disappointment, and dislike; and, with God's help, say that you
will patiently submit to what may not now be mended.  And then, the
sterner the battle the nobler will the victory be; and the lonelier
the fight, the more honour to him who flinches not from it.  In
your patience possess ye your souls.

What a beautiful, instructive, and even impressive sight it is to
see a nurse patiently cherishing her children!  How she has her eye
and her heart at all their times upon them, till she never has any
need to lay her hand upon them!  Passion has no place in her little
household, because patience fills all its own place and the place
of passion too.  What a genius she displays in her talks to her
children!  How she cheats their little hours of temptation, and
tides them over the rough places that her eye sees lying like
sunken rocks before her little ship!  How skilfully she stills and
heals their impulsive little passions by her sudden and absorbing
surprise at some miracle in a picture-book, or some astonishing
sight under her window!  She has a thousand occupations also for
her children, and each of them with a touch of enterprise and
adventure and benevolence in it.  She is so full of patience
herself, that the little gusts of passion are soon over in her
presence, and the sunshine is soon back brighter than ever in her
little paradise.  And, over and above her children rising up and
calling her blessed, what wounds she escapes in her own heart and
memory by keeping her patient hands from ever wounding her
children!  What peace she keeps in the house, just by having peace
always within herself!  Paul can find no better figure wherewith to
set forth God's marvellous patience with Israel during her fretful
childhood in the wilderness, than just that of such a nurse among
her provoking children.  And we see the deep hold that same
touching and instructive sight had taken of the apostle's heart as
he returns to it again to the Thessalonians:  'We were gentle among
you, even as a nurse cherisheth her children.  So, being
affectionately desirous of you, we were willing to have imparted
unto you, not the gospel of God only, but also our own souls,
because ye were dear unto us.'  What a school of divine patience is
every man's own family at home if he only were teachable,
observant, and obedient!

2.  Clever, quick-witted, and, themselves, much-gifted men, are
terribly intolerant of slow and stupid men, as they call them.  But
the many-talented man makes a great mistake here, and falls into a
great sin.  In his fulness of all kinds of intellectual gifts, he
quite forgets from Whom he has his many gifts, and why it is that
his despised neighbour has so few gifts.  If you have ten or twenty
talents, and I have only two, who is to be praised and who is to be
blamed for that allotment?  Your cleverness has misled you and has
hitherto done you far more evil than good.  You bear yourself among
ordinary men, among less men than yourself, as if you had added all
these cubits to your own stature.  You ride over us as if you had
already given in your account, and had heard it said, Take the one
talent from them and give it to this my ten-talented servant.  You
seem to have set it down to your side of the great account, that
you had such a good start in talent, and that your fine mind had so
many tutors and governors all devoting themselves to your
advancement.  And you conduct yourself to us as if the Righteous
Judge had cast us away from His presence, because we were not found
among the wise and mighty of this world.  The truth is, that the
whole world is on a wholly wrong tack in its praise and in its
blame.  We praise the man of great gifts, and we blame the man of
small gifts, completely forgetful that in so doing we give men the
praise that belongs to God, and lay on men the blame, which, if
there is any blame in the matter, ought to be laid elsewhere.
Learn and lay to heart, my richly-gifted brethren, to be patient
with all men, but especially to be patient with all stupid, slow-
witted, ungifted, God-impoverished men.  Do not add your insults
and your ill-usage to the low estate of those on whom, in the
meantime, God's hand lies so cold and so straitened.  For who
maketh thee to differ from another? and what hast thou that thou
didst not receive?  Now, if thou didst receive it, why dost thou
glory as if thou hadst not received it?  Call that to mind the next
time you are tempted to cry out that you have no patience with your
slow-witted servant.

3.  'Is patient with the bad' is one of the tributes of praise that
is paid in the fine paraphrase to that heart that is full of the
same love that is in God.  A patient love to the unjust and the
evil is one of the attributes and manifestations of the divine
nature, as that nature is seen both in God and in all genuinely
godly men.  And, indeed, in no other thing is the divine nature so
surely seen in any man as just in his love to and his patience with
bad men.  He schools and exercises himself every day to be patient
and good to other men as God has been to him.  He remembers when
tempted to resentment how God did not resent his evil, but, while
he was yet an enemy to God and to godliness, reconciled him to
Himself by the death of His Son.  And ever since the godly man saw
that, he has tried to reconcile his worst enemies to himself by the
death of his impatience and passion toward them, and has more
pitied than blamed them, even when their evil was done against
himself.  Let God judge, and if it must be, condemn that bad man.
But I am too bad myself to cast a stone at the worst and most
injurious of men.  If we so much pity ourselves for our sinful lot,
if we have so much compassion on ourselves because of our inherited
and unavoidable estate of sin and misery, why do we not share our
pity and our compassion with those miserable men who are in an even
worse estate than our own?  At any rate, I must not judge them lest
I be judged.  I must take care when I say, Forgive me my
trespasses, as I forgive them that trespass against me.  Not to
seven times must I grudgingly forgive, but ungrudgingly to seventy
times seven.  For with what judgment I judge, I shall be judged;
and with what measure I mete, it shall be measured to me again.


'Love harbours no suspicious thought,
Is patient to the bad:
Grieved when she hears of sins and crimes,
And in the truth is glad.'


4.  And then, most difficult and most dangerous, but most necessary
of all patience, we must learn how to be patient with ourselves.
Every day we hear of miserable men rushing upon death because they
can no longer endure themselves and the things they have brought on
themselves.  And there are moral suicides who cast off the faith
and the hope and the endurance of a Christian man because they are
so evil and have lived such an evil life.  We speak of patience
with bad men, but there is no man so bad, there is no man among all
our enemies who has at all hurt us like that man who is within
ourselves.  And to bear patiently what we have brought upon
ourselves,--to endure the inward shame, the self-reproof, the self-
contempt bitterer to drink than blood, the lifelong injuries,
impoverishment, and disgrace,--to bear all these patiently and
uncomplainingly,--to acquiesce humbly in the discovery that all
this was always in our hearts, and still is in our hearts--what
humility, what patience, what compassion and pity for ourselves
must all that call forth!  The wise nurse is patient with her
passionate, greedy, untidy, disobedient child.  She does not cast
it out of doors, she does not run and leave it, she does not kill
it because all these things have been and still are in its sad
little heart.  Her power for good with such a child lies just in
her pity, in her compassion, and in her patience with her child.
And the child that is in all of us is to be treated in the same
patient, hopeful, believing, forgiving, divine way.  We should all
be with ourselves as God is with us.  He knoweth our frame.  He
remembereth that we are dust.  He shows all patience toward us.  He
does not look for great things from us.  He does not break the
bruised reed, nor quench the smoking flax.  He shall not fail nor
be discouraged till He have set judgment in the earth.  And so
shall not we.

5.  And, then,--it is a sufficiently startling thing to say, but--
we must learn to be patient with God also.  All our patience, and
all the exercises of it, if we think aright about it, all run up in
the long-run into patience with God.  But there are some exercises
of patience that have to do directly and immediately with God and
with God alone.  When any man's heart has become fully alive to God
and to the things of God; when he begins to see and feel that he
lives and moves and has his being in God; then everything that in
any way affects him is looked on by him as come to him from God.
Absolutely, all things.  The very weather that everybody is so
atheistic about, the climate, the soil he labours, the rain, the
winter's cold and the summer's heat,--true piety sees all these
things as God's things, and sees God's immediate will in the
disposition and dispensation of them all.  He feels the
untameableness of his tongue in the indecent talk that goes on
everlastingly about the weather.  All these things may be without
God to other men, as they once were to him also, but you will find
that the truly and the intelligently devout man no longer allows
himself in such unbecoming speech.  For, though he cannot trace
God's hand in all the changes of the seasons, in heat and cold, in
sunshine and snow, yet he is as sure that God's wisdom and will are
there as that Scripture is true and the Scripture-taught heart.
'Great is our Lord, and His understanding is infinite.  Who
covereth the heavens with clouds, and prepareth rain for the earth,
and maketh the grass to grow upon the mountains.  He giveth snow
like wool; He scattereth the hoarfrost like ashes; He casteth forth
His ice like morsels.  Who can stand before his cold?'  Here is the
patience and the faith of the saints.  Here are they that keep the
commandments of God and the faith of Jesus Christ.

And, then, when through rain or frost or fire, when out of any
terror by night or arrow that flieth by day, any calamity comes on
the man who is thus pointed and practised in his patience, he is
able with Job to say, 'This is the Lord.  What, shall we receive
good at the hand of God and not also receive evil?'  By far the
best thing I have ever read on this subject, and I have read it a
thousand times since I first read it as a student, is Dr. Thomas
Goodwin's Patience and its Perfect Work.  That noble treatise had
its origin in the great fire of London in 1666.  The learned
President of Magdalen College lost the half of his library, five
hundred pounds worth of the best books, in that terrible fire.  And
his son tells us he had often heard his father say that in the loss
of his not-to-be-replaced books, God had struck him in a very
sensible place.  To lose his Augustine, and his Calvin, and his
Musculus, and his Zanchius, and his Amesius, and his Suarez, and
his Estius was a sore stroke to such a man.  I loved my books too
well, said the great preacher, and God rebuked me by this
affliction.  Let the students here read Goodwin's costly treatise,
and they will be the better prepared to meet such calamities as the
burning of their manse and their library, as also to counsel and
comfort their people when they shall lose their shops or their
stockyards by fire.


'Blind unbelief is sure to err,
And scan His work in vain;
God is His own interpreter,
And He will make it plain.'


And, then, in a multitude of New Testament scriptures, we are
summoned to great exercise of patience with the God of our
salvation, because it is His purpose and plan that we shall have to
wait long for our salvation.  God has not seen it good to carry us
to heaven on the day of our conversion.  He does not glorify us on
the same day that He justifies us.  We are appointed to salvation
indeed, but it is also appointed us to wait long for it.  This is
not our rest.  We are called to be pilgrims and strangers for a
season with God upon the earth.  We are told to endure to the end.
It is to be through faith and patience that we, with our fathers,
shall at last inherit the promises.  Holiness is not a Jonah's
gourd.  It does not come up in a night, and it does not perish in a
night.  Holiness is the Divine nature, and it takes a lifetime to
make us partakers of it.  But, then, if the time is long the thing
is sure.  Let us, then, with a holy and a submissive patience wait
for it.

'I saw moreover in my dream that Passion seemed to be much
discontent, but Patience was very quiet.  Then Christian asked,
What is the reason of the discontent of Passion?  The Interpreter
answered, The governor of them would have him stay for his best
things till the beginning of the next year; but he will have them
all now.  But Patience is willing to wait.'



SIMPLE, SLOTH, AND PRESUMPTION



'Ye did run well, who did hinder you?'--Paul.

It startles us not a little to come suddenly upon three pilgrims
fast asleep with fetters on their heels on the upward side of the
Interpreter's House, and even on the upward side of the cross and
the sepulchre.  We would have looked for those three miserable men
somewhere in the City of Destruction or in the Town of Stupidity,
or, at best, somewhere still outside of the wicket-gate.  But John
Bunyan did not lay down his Pilgrim's Progress on any abstract
theory, or on any easy and pleasant presupposition, of the
Christian life.  He constructed his so lifelike book out of his own
experiences as a Christian man, as well as out of all he had
learned as a Christian minister.  And in nothing is Bunyan's power
of observation, deep insight, and firm hold of fact better seen
than just in the way he names and places the various people of the
pilgrimage.  Long after he had been at the Cross of Christ himself,
and had seen with his own eyes all the significant rooms in the
Interpreter's House, Bunyan had often to confess that the fetters
of evil habit, unholy affection, and a hard heart were still firmly
riveted on his own heels.  And his pastoral work had led him to see
only too well that he was not alone in the temptations and the
dangers and the still-abiding bondage to sin that had so surprised
himself after he was so far on in the Christian life.  It was the
greatest sorrow of his heart, he tells us in a powerful passage in
his Grace Abounding, that so many of his spiritual children broke
down and came short in the arduous and perilous way in which he had
so hopefully started them.  'If any of those who were awakened by
my ministry did after that fall back, as sometimes too many did, I
can truly say that their loss hath been more to me than if one of
my own children, begotten of my body, had been going to its grave.
I think, verily, I may speak it without an offence to the Lord,
nothing hath gone so near me as that, unless it was the fear of the
salvation of my own soul.  I have counted as if I had goodly
buildings and lordships in those places where my children were
born; my heart has been so wrapped up in this excellent work that I
counted myself more blessed and honoured of God by this than if He
had made me the emperor of the Christian world, or the lord of all
the glory of the earth without it.'  And I have no doubt that we
have here the three things that above everything else bereft Bunyan
of so many of his spiritual children personified and then laid down
by the heels in Simple, Sloth, and Presumption.


SIMPLE


Let us shake up Simple first and ask him what it was that laid him
so soon and in such a plight and in such company in this bottom.
It was not that which from his name we might at first think it was.
It was not the weakness of his intellects, nor his youth, nor his
inexperience.  There is danger enough, no doubt, in all these
things if they are not carefully attended to, but none of all these
things in themselves, nor all of them taken together, will lay any
pilgrim by the heels.  There must be more than mere and pure
simplicity.  No blame attaches to a simple mind, much less to an
artless and an open heart.  We do not blame such a man even when we
pity him.  We take him, if he will let us, under our care, or we
put him under better care, but we do not anticipate any immediate
ill to him so long as he remains simple in mind, untainted in
heart, and willing to learn.  But, then, unless he is better
watched over than any young man or young woman can well be in this
world, that simplicity and child-likeness and inexperience of his
may soon become a fatal snare to him.  There is so much that is not
simple and sincere in this world; there is so much falsehood and
duplicity; there are so many men abroad whose endeavour is to
waylay, mislead, entrap, and corrupt the simple-minded and the
inexperienced, that it is next to impossible that any youth or
maiden shall long remain in this world both simple and safe also.
My son, says the Wise Man, keep my words, and lay up my
commandments with thee.  For at the window of my house I looked
through my casement, and beheld among the simple ones, I discerned
among the youths, a young man void of understanding;--and so on,--
till a dart strike through his liver, and he goeth as an ox to the
slaughter.  And so, too often in our own land, the maiden in her
simplicity also opens her ear to the promises and vows and oaths of
the flatterer, till she loses both her simplicity and her soul, and
lies buried in that same bottom beside Sloth and Presumption.

It is not so much his small mind and his weak understanding that is
the fatal danger of their possessor, it is his imbecile way of
treating his small mind.  In our experience of him we cannot get
him, all we can do, to read an instructive book.  We cannot get him
to attend our young men's class with all the baits and traps we can
set for him.  Where does he spend his Sabbath-day and week-day
evenings?  We cannot find out until we hear some distressing thing
about him, that, ten to one, he would have escaped had he been a
reader of good books, or a student with us, say, of Dante and
Bunyan and Rutherford, and a companion of those young men and young
women who talk about and follow such intellectual tastes and
pursuits.  Now, if you are such a young man or young woman as that,
or such an old man or old woman, you will not be able to understand
what in the world Bunyan can mean by saying that he saw you in his
dream fast asleep in a bottom with irons on your heels.  No; for to
understand the Pilgrim's Progress, beyond a nursery and five-year-
old understanding of it, you must have worked and studied and
suffered your way out of your mental and spiritual imbecility.  You
must have for years attended to what is taught from the pulpit and
the desk, and, alongside of that, you must have made a sobering and
solemnising application of it all to your own heart.  And then you
would have seen and felt that the heels of your mind and of your
heart are only too firmly fettered with the irons of ignorance and
inexperience and self-complacency.  But as it is, if you would tell
the truth, you would say to us what Simple said to Christian, I see
no danger.  The next time that John Bunyan passed that bottom, the
chains had been taken off the heels of this sleeping fool and had
been put round his neck.


SLOTH


Sloth had a far better head than Simple had; but what of that when
he made no better use of it?  There are many able men who lie all
their days in a sad bottom with the irons of indolence and
inefficiency on their heels.  We often envy them their abilities,
and say about them, What might they not have done for themselves
and for us had they only worked hard?  Just as we are surprised to
see other men away above us on the mountain top, not because they
have better abilities than we have, but because they tore the
fetters of sloth out of their soft flesh and set themselves down
doggedly to their work.  And the same sloth that starves and
fetters the mind at the same time casts the conscience and the
heart into a deep sleep.  I often wonder as I go on working among
you, if you ever attach any meaning or make any application to
yourselves of all those commands and counsels of which the
Scriptures are full,--to be up and doing, to watch and pray, to
watch and be sober, to fight the good fight of faith, to hold the
fort, to rise early, and even by night, and to endure unto death,
and never for one moment to be found off your guard.  Do you attach
any real meaning to these examples of the psalmists, to these
continual commands and examples of Christ, and to these urgent
counsels of his apostles?  Do you?  Against whom and against what
do you thus campaign and fight?  For fear of whom or of what do you
thus watch?  What fort do you hold?  What occupies your thoughts in
night-watches, and what inspires and compels your early prayers?
It is your stupefying life of spiritual sloth that makes it
impossible for you to answer these simple and superficial
questions.  Sloth is not the word for it.  Let them give the right
word to insanity like that who sleep and soak in sinful sloth no
longer.

We have all enemies in our own souls that never sleep, whatever we
may do.  There are no irons on their heels.  They never
procrastinate.  They never say to their master, A little more
slumber.  Now, could you name any hateful enemy entrenched in your
own heart, of which you have of yourself said far more than that?
And, if so, what have you done, what are you at this moment doing,
to cast that enemy out?  Have you any armour on, any weapons of
offence and precision, against that enemy?  And what success and
what defeat have you had in unearthing and casting out that enemy?
What fort do you hold?  On what virtue, on what grace are you
posted by your Lord to keep for yourself and for Him?  And with
what cost of meat and drink and sleep and amusement do you lose it
or keep it for Him?  Alexander used to leave his tent at midnight
and go round the camp, and spear to his post the sentinel he found
sleeping.

There is nothing we are all so slothful in as secret, particular,
importunate prayer.  We have an almighty instrument in our hand in
secret and exact prayer if we would only importunately and
perseveringly employ it.  But there is an utterly unaccountable
restraint of secret and particularising prayer in all of us.  There
is a soaking, stupefying sloth, that so fills our hearts that we
forget and neglect the immense concession and privilege we have
afforded us in secret prayer.  Our sloth and stupidity in prayer is
surely the last proof of our fall and of the misery of our fallen
state.  Our sloth with a gold mine open at our feet; a little more
sleep on the top of a mast with a gulf under us that hath no
bottom,--no language of this life can adequately describe the
besottedness of that man who lies with irons on his heels between
Simple and Presumption.


PRESUMPTION


The greatest theologian of the Roman Catholic Church has made an
induction and classification of sins that has often been borrowed
by our Protestant and Puritan divines.  His classification is made,
as will be seen, on an ascending scale of guilt and aggravation.
In the world of sin, he says, there are, first, sins of ignorance;
next, there are sins of infirmity; and then, at the top, there are
sins of presumption.  And this, it will be remembered, was the
Psalmist's inventory and estimate of sins also.  His last and his
most earnest prayer was, that he might be kept back from all
presumptuous sin.  Now you know quite well, without any
explanation, what presumption is.  Don't presume, you say, with
rising and scarce controlled anger.  Don't presume too far.  Take
care, you say, with your heart beating so high that you can
scarcely command it, take care lest you go too far.  And the word
of God feels and speaks about presumptuous sin very much as you do
yourself.  Now, what gave this third man who lay in fetters a
little beyond the cross the name of Presumption was just this, that
he had been at the cross with his past sin, and had left the cross
to commit the same sin at the first opportunity.  Presumption
presumed upon his pardon.  He presumed upon the abounding grace of
God.  He presumed upon the blood of Christ.  He was so high on the
Atonement, that he held that the gospel was not sufficiently
preached to him, unless not past sin only and present, but also all
future sin was atoned for on the tree before it was committed.
There is a reprobate in Dante, who, all the time he was repenting,
had his eye on his next opportunity.  Now, our Presumption was like
that.  He presumed on his youth, on his temptations, on his
opportunities, and especially on his future reformation and the
permanence and the freeness of the gospel offer.  When he was in
the Interpreter's House he did not hear what the Interpreter was
saying, the blood was roaring so through his veins.  His eyes were
so full of other images that he did not see the man in the iron
cage, nor the spider on the wall, nor the fire fed secretly.  He
had no more intention of keeping always to the way that was as
straight as a rule could make it, than he had of cutting off both
his hands and plucking out both his eyes.  When the three shining
ones stripped him of his rags and clothed him with change of
raiment, he had no more intention of keeping his garments clean
than he had of flying straight up to heaven on the spot.  Now, let
each man name to himself what that is in which he intentionally,
deliberately, and by foresight and forethought sins.  Have you
named it?  Well, it was for that that this reprobate was laid by
the heels on the immediately hither side of the cross and the
sepulchre.  Not that the iron might not have been taken off his
heels again on certain conditions, even after it was on; but, even
so, he would never have been the same man again that he was before
his presumptuous sin.  You will easily know a man who has committed
much presumptuous sin,--that is to say, if you have any eye for a
sinner.  I think I would find him out if I heard him pray once, or
preach once, or even select a psalm for public or for family
worship; even if I heard him say grace at a dinner-table, or
reprove his son, or scold his servant.  Presumptuous sin has so
much of the venom and essence of sin in it that, forgiven or
unforgiven, even a little of it never leaves the sinner as it found
him.  Even if his fetters are knocked off, there is always a piece
of the poisonous iron left in his flesh; there is always a fang of
his fetters left in the broken bone.  The presumptuous saint will
always be detected by the way he halts on his heels all his after
days.  Keep back Thy servant, O God, from presumptuous sin.  Let
him be innocent of the great transgression.

Dr. Thomas Goodwin says somewhere that the worm that dieth not only
comes to its sharpest sting and to its deadliest venom when it is
hatched up under gospel light.  The very light of nature itself
greatly aggravates some of our sins.  The light of our early
education greatly aggravates others of our sins.  But nothing
wounds our conscience and then exasperates the wound like a past
experience of the same sin, and, especially, an experience of the
grace of God in forgiving that sin.  Had we found young Presumption
in his irons before his conversion, we would have been afraid
enough at the sight.  Had we found him laid by the heels after his
first uncleanness, it would have made us shudder for ourselves.
But we are horrified and speechless as we see him apprehended and
laid in irons on the very night of his first communion, and with
the wine scarcely dry on his unclean lips.  Augustine postponed his
baptism till he should have his fill of sin, and till he should no
longer return to sin like a dog to his vomit.  Now, next Sabbath is
our communion day in this congregation.  Let us therefore this week
examine ourselves.  And if we must sin as long as we are in this
world, let it henceforth be the sin of ignorance and of infirmity.

So the three reprobates lay down to sleep again, and Christian as
he left that bottom went on in the narrow way singing:


'O to grace how great a debtor
Daily I'm constrained to be
Let that grace, Lord, like a fetter,
Bind my wandering heart to Thee.'



THE THREE SHINING ONES AT THE CROSS



'Salvation shall God appoint for walls.'--Isaiah.

John Bunyan's autobiography, Grace Abounding to the Chief of
Sinners, is the best of all our commentaries on The Pilgrim's
Progress, and again to-night I shall have to fall back on that
incomparable book.  'Now, I saw in my dream that the highway up
which Christian was to go was fenced on either side with a wall,
and that wall is called Salvation.  Up this way, therefore, did
burdened Christian run, but not without great difficulty, because
of the load on his back.'  In the corresponding paragraph in Grace
Abounding, our author says, speaking about himself:  'But forasmuch
as the passage was wonderful narrow, even so narrow that I could
not but with great difficulty enter in thereat, it showed me that
none could enter into life but those that were in downright
earnest, and unless also they left this wicked world behind them;
for here was only room for body and soul, but not for body and soul
and sin.'  'He ran thus till he came to a place somewhat ascending,
and upon that place stood a cross, and a little below in the bottom
a sepulchre.  So I saw in my dream, that just as Christian came up
with this cross, his burden loosed from off his shoulders and fell
from off his back, and began to tumble, and so continued to do till
it came to the mouth of the sepulchre, where it fell in, and I saw
it no more.'  Turning again to the Grace Abounding, we read in the
115th paragraph:  'I remember that one day as I was travelling into
the country and musing on the wickedness and blasphemy of my heart,
and considering of the enmity that was in me to God, that scripture
came into my mind, He hath made peace by the blood of His Cross.
By which I was made to see both again and again and again that day
that God and my soul were friends by that blood:  yea, I saw that
the justice of God and my sinful soul could embrace and kiss each
other through that blood.  That was a good day to me; I hope I
shall not forget it.  I thought I could have spoken of His love and
of His mercy to me that day to the very crows that sat upon the
ploughed lands before me had they been capable to have understood
me.  Wherefore I said in my soul with much gladness, Well, I would
I had a pen and ink here and I would write this down before I go
any farther, for surely I will not forget this forty years hence.'

From all this we learn that the way to the Celestial City lies
within high and close fencing walls.  There is not room for many
pilgrims to walk abreast in that way; indeed, there is seldom room
for two.  There are some parts of the way where two or even three
pilgrims can for a time walk and converse together, but for the
most part the path is distressingly lonely.  The way is so fenced
up also that a pilgrim cannot so much as look either to the right
hand or the left.  Indeed, it is one of the laws of that road that
no man is to attempt to look except straight on before him.  But
then there is this compensation for the solitude and stringency of
the way that the wall that so encloses it is Salvation.  And
Salvation is such a wall that it is companionship and prospect
enough of itself.  Dante saw a long reach of this same wall running
round the bottom of the mount that cleanses him who climbs it,--a
long stretch of such sculptured beauty, that it arrested him and
instructed him and delighted him beyond his power sufficiently to
praise it.  And thus, that being so, burdened and bowed down to the
earth as our pilgrim was, he was on the sure way, sooner or later,
to deliverance.  Somewhere and sometime and somehow on that steep
and high fenced way deliverance was sure to come.  And, then, as to
the burdened man himself.  His name was once Graceless, but his
name is Graceless no longer.  No graceless man runs long between
these close and cramping-up walls; and, especially, no graceless
man has that burden long on his back.  That is not Graceless any
longer who is leaving the Interpreter's House for the fenced way;
that is Christian, and as long as he remains Christian, the
closeness of the fence and the weight of his burden are a small
matter.  But long-looked-for comes at last.  And so, still carrying
his burden and keeping close within the fenced-up way, our pilgrim
came at last to a cross.  And a perfect miracle immediately took
place in that somewhat ascending ground.  For scarcely had
Christian set his eyes on the cross, when, without his pulling at
it, or pushing it, or even at that moment thinking of it, ere ever
he was aware, he saw his burden begin to tumble, and so it
continued to do till it fell fairly out of his sight into an open
sepulchre.

The application of all that is surely self-evident.  For our way in
a holy life is always closely fenced up.  It is far oftener a
lonely way than otherwise.  And the steepness, sternness, and
loneliness of our way are all aggravated by the remembrance of our
past sins and follies.  They still, and more and more, lie upon our
hearts a heart-crushing burden.  But if we, like Christian, know
how to keep our back to our former house and our face to heaven,
sooner or later we too shall surely come to the cross.  And then,
either suddenly, or after a long agony, our burden also shall be
taken off our back and shut down into Christ's sepulchre.  And I
saw it no more, says the dreamer.  He does not say that its owner
saw it no more.  He was too wise and too true a dreamer to say
that.

It will be remembered that the first time we saw this man, with
whose progress to the Celestial City we are at present occupied, he
was standing in a certain place clothed with rags and with a burden
on his back.  After a long journey with him, we have just seen his
burden taken off his back, and it is only after his burden is off
and a Shining One has said to him, Thy sins be forgiven, that a
second Shining One comes and strips him of his rags and clothes him
with change of raiment.  Now, why, it may be asked, has Christian
had to carry his burden so long, and why is he still kept so ragged
and so miserable and he so far on in the pilgrim's path?  Surely,
it will be said, John Bunyan was dreaming indeed when he kept a
truly converted man, a confessedly true and sincere Christian, so
long in bonds and in rags.  Well, as to his rags:  filthy rags are
only once spoken of in the Bible, and it is the prophet Isaiah,
whose experience and whose language John Bunyan had so entirely by
heart, who puts them on.  And that evangelist among the prophets
not only calls his own and Israel's sins filthy rags, but Isaiah is
very bold, and calls their very righteousnesses by that opprobrious
name.  Had that bold prophet said that all his and all his people's
UNrighteousnesses were filthy rags, all Israel would have
subscribed to that.  There was no man so brutish as not to admit
that.  But as long as they had any sense of truth and any self-
respect, multitudes of Isaiah's first hearers and readers would
resent what he so rudely said of their righteousnesses.  On the
other hand, the prophet's terrible discovery and comparison, just
like our dreamer's dramatic distribution of Christian experience,
was, to a certainty, an immense consolation to many men in Israel
in his day.  They gathered round Isaiah because, but for him and
his evangelical ministry, they would have been alone in their
despair.  To them Isaiah's ministry was a house of refuge, and the
prophet himself a veritable tower of strength.  They felt they were
not alone so long as Isaiah dwelt in the same city with them.  And
thus, whatever he might be to others, he was God's very prophet to
them as his daily prayers in the temple both cast them down and
lifted them up.  'Oh that Thou wouldst rend the heavens and come
down . . . But we are all as an unclean thing, and all our
righteousnesses are as filthy rags, and our iniquities like the
wind have taken us away.'  Thousands in Israel found in these
terrible words a door of hope, a sense of fellowship, and a call to
trust and thanksgiving.  And tens of thousands have found the same
help and consolation out of what have seemed to others the very
darkest and most perplexing pages of the Pilgrim's Progress and the
Grace Abounding.  'It made me greatly ashamed,' says Hopeful, 'of
the vileness of my former life, and confounded me with the sense of
mine own ignorance, for there never came into mine heart before now
that showed me so by contrast the beauty of the Lord Jesus.  My own
vileness and nakedness made me love a holy life.  Yea, I thought
that had I now a thousand gallons of blood in my body, I could
spill it all for the sake of the Lord Jesus.'  And if you, my
brother, far on in the way of Salvation, still think sometimes
that, after all, you must be a reprobate because of your filthy
rags, read what David Brainerd wrote with his half-dead hand on the
last page of his seraphic journal:  'How sweet it is to love God
and to have a heart all for God!  Yes; but a voice answered me, You
are not all for God, you are not an angel.  To which my whole soul
replied, I as sincerely desire to love and glorify God as any angel
in heaven.  But you are filthy, and not fit for heaven.  When
hereupon there instantly appeared above me and spread over me the
blessed robes of Christ's righteousness which I could not but exult
and triumph in.  And then I knew that I should be as active as an
angel in heaven, and should then be for ever stripped of my filthy
garments and clothed with spotless raiment.'  Let me die the death
of David Brainerd, and let my latter end be like his!

The third Shining One then came forward and set a mark on the
forehead of this happy man.  And it was a most ancient and a most
honourable mark.  For it was the same redeeming mark that was set
by Moses upon the foreheads of the children of Israel when the Lord
took them into covenant with Himself at the Passover in the
wilderness.  It was the same distinguishing mark also that the man
with the slaughter-weapon in his hand first set upon the foreheads
of the men who sighed and cried for the abominations that were done
in the midst of Jerusalem.  And it was the same glorious mark that
John saw in the foreheads of the hundred and forty and four
thousand who stood upon Mount Zion and sang a song that no man knew
but those men who had been redeemed from the earth by the blood of
the Lamb.  The mark was set for propriety and for ornament and for
beauty.  It was set upon his forehead so that all who looked on him
ever after might thus know to what company and what country he
belonged, and that this was not his rest, but that he had been
called and chosen to a heavenly inheritance.  And, besides, it was
no sooner set upon his forehead than it greatly added to his
dignity and his comeliness.  He had now the gravity and beauty of
an angel; nay, the beauty in his measure and the gravity of
Goodwill at the gate himself.  And, then, as if that were not
enough, the third Shining One also gave him a roll with a seal upon
it, which he was bidden look on as he ran, and which he was to give
in when he arrived at the Celestial Gate.  Now, what was that
sealed roll but just the inward memory and record of all this
pilgrim's experiences of the grace of God from the day he set out
on pilgrimage down to that day when he stood unburdened of his
guilt, unclothed of his rags, and clothed upon with change of
raiment?  The roll contained his own secret life, all sealed and
shone in upon by the light of God's countenance.  The secret of the
Lord with this pilgrim was written within that roll, a secret that
no man could read but he himself alone.  It was the same roll that
this same Shining One gave to Abraham, the first pilgrim and the
father of all true pilgrims, after Melchizedek, the priest of the
Most High God, had brought forth bread and wine and had blessed
that great believer.  'Fear not, Abram:  I am thy shield, and thy
exceeding great reward.'  And, again, after Abram had lost his
roll, like our pilgrim in the arbour, when he recovered it he read
thus in it:  'I am the Almighty God:  walk before Me, and be thou
perfect.  And I will make My covenant between Me and thee.'  And
Abram fell on his face for joy.  It was the same roll out of which
the Psalmist proposed to read a passage to all those in his day who
feared God.  'Come and hear, all ye that fear God, and I will
declare what He hath done for my soul.'  It was the same roll also
that God sent to Israel in his sore captivity.  'Fear not, O
Israel, for I have redeemed thee; I have called thee by thy name,
thou art Mine.  When thou passest through the waters, I will be
with thee.'  The high priest Joshua also had the same roll put into
his hand, and that not only for his own comfort, but to make him
the comforter of God's afflicted people.  For after the Lord had
plucked Joshua as a brand out of the fire, and had made his
iniquity to pass from him, and had clothed him with change of
raiment, and had set a fair mitre on his head, the Lord gave to
Joshua a sealed roll, the contents of which may be read to this day
in the book of the prophet Zechariah.  Nay, more:  'Will you have
me to speak plainly?' says great Goodwin on this matter.  'Then,
though our Lord had the assurance of faith that He was the Son of
God, for He knew it out of the Scriptures by reading all the
prophets, yet, to have it sealed to Him with joy unspeakable and
glorious,--this was deferred to the time of His baptism.  He was
then anointed with the oil of assurance and gladness in a more
peculiar and transcendent manner.'  'In His baptism,' says Bengel,
'our Lord was magnificently enlightened.  He was previously the Son
of God, and yet the power of the Divine testimony to His Sonship at
His baptism long affected Him in a lively manner.'  And we see our
Lord reading His roll to assure and sustain His heart when all
outward acceptance and sustenance failed Him.  'There is One who
beareth witness of Me, and His witness is true.  I receive not
witness from men.  I have a greater witness than even that of John.
For the Father Himself that hath sent Me, He beareth witness of
Me.'  No wonder that our heavy-laden pilgrim of yesterday gave
three leaps for joy and went on singing with such a roll as that in
his bosom.  For, at that supreme moment he had that inward
illumination and assurance sealed on his heart that had so
gladdened and sustained so many prophets and psalmists and apostles
and saints before his day.  And though, like Abraham and all the
other saints who ever had that noble roll put into their keeping,
except Jesus Christ, he often lost it, yet as often as he again
recovered it, it brought back again with it all his first joy and
gladness.

But, as was said at the beginning, the Grace Abounding is the best
of all our commentaries on The Pilgrim's Progress.  As thus here
also:  'Now had I an evidence, as I thought, of my salvation from
heaven, with many golden seals thereon, all hanging in my sight.
Now could I remember this manifestation and that other discovery of
grace with comfort, and should often long and desire that the last
day were come, that I might be for ever inflamed with the sight and
joy of Him and communion with Him whose head was crowned with
thorns, whose face was spit on, and body broken, and soul made an
offering for my sins.  For whereas, before, I lay continually
trembling at the mouth of hell, now, methought, I was got so far
therefrom that I could not, when I looked back, scarce discern it.
And oh! thought I, that I were fourscore years old now, that I
might die quickly, that my soul might be gone to rest.'

Then Christian gave three leaps for joy and went on singing:


'Thus far did I come laden with my sin,
Nor could ought ease the grief that I was in
Till I came hither:  . . .
Blest Cross! blest Sepulchre! blest rather be
The Man that there was put to shame for me.'



FORMALIST AND HYPOCRISY



'A form of godliness.'--Paul.

We all began our religious life by being formalists.  And we were
not altogether to blame for that.  Our parents were first to blame
for that, and then our teachers, and then our ministers.  They made
us say our psalm and our catechism to them, and if we only said our
sacred lesson without stumbling, we were straightway rewarded with
their highest praise.  They seldom took the trouble to make us
understand the things we said to them.  They were more than content
with our correct repetition of the words.  We were never taught
either to read or repeat with our eyes on the object.  And we had
come to our manhood before we knew how to seek for the visual image
that lies at the root of all our words.  And thus the ill-taught
schoolboy became in us the father of the confirmed formalist.  The
mischief of this neglect still spreads through the whole of our
life, but it is absolutely disastrous in our religious life.  Look
at the religious formalist at family worship with his household
gathered round him all in his own image.  He would not on any
account let his family break up any night without the habitual
duty.  He has a severe method in his religious duties that nothing
is ever allowed to disarrange or in any way to interfere with.  As
the hour strikes, the big Bible is brought out.  He opens where he
left off last night, he reads the regulation chapter, he leads the
singing in the regulation psalm, and then, as from a book, he
repeats his regulation prayer.  But he never says a word to show
that he either sees or feels what he reads, and his household break
up without an idea in their heads or an affection in their hearts.
He comes to church and goes through public worship in the same
wooden way, and he sits through the Lord's Table in the same formal
and ceremonious manner.  He has eyes of glass and hands of wood,
and a heart without either blood or motion in it.  His mind and his
heart were destroyed in his youth, and all his religion is a
religion of rites and ceremonies without sense or substance.
'Because I knew no better,' says Bunyan, 'I fell in very eagerly
with the religion of the times:  to wit, to go to church twice a
day, and that, too, with the foremost.  And there should I sing and
say as others did.  Withal, I was so overrun with the spirit of
superstition that I adored, and that with great devotion, even all
things, both the high place, priest, clerk, vestment, service, and
what else belonged to the church:  counting all things holy that
were therein contained.  But all this time I was not sensible of
the danger and evil of sin.  I was kept from considering that sin
would damn me, what religion soever I followed, unless I was found
in Christ.  Nay, I never thought of Christ, nor whether there was
one or no.'

A formalist is not yet a hypocrite exactly, but he is ready now and
well on the way at any moment to become a hypocrite.  As soon now
as some temptation shall come to him to make appear another and a
better man than he really is:  when in some way it becomes his
advantage to seem to other people to be a spiritual man:  when he
thinks he sees his way to some profit or praise by saying things
and doing things that are not true and natural to him,--then he
will pass on from being a bare and simple formalist, and will
henceforth become a hypocrite.  He has never had any real
possession or experience of spiritual things amid all his formal
observances of religious duties, and he has little or no
difficulty, therefore, in adding another formality or two to his
former life of unreality.  And thus the transition is easily made
from a comparatively innocent and unconscious formalist to a
conscious and studied hypocrite.  'An hypocrite,' says Samuel
Rutherford, 'is he who on the stage represents a king when he is
none, a beggar, an old man, a husband, when he is really no such
thing.  To the Hebrews, they were faciales, face-men; colorati,
dyed men, red men, birds of many colours.  You may paint a man, you
may paint a rose, you may paint a fire burning, but you cannot
paint a soul, or the smell of a rose, or the heat of a fire.  And
it is hard to counterfeit spiritual graces, such as love to Christ,
sincere intending of the glory of God, and such like spiritual
things.'  Yes, indeed; it is hard to put on and to go through with
a truly spiritual grace even to the best and most spiritually-
minded of men; and as for the true hypocrite, he never honestly
attempts it.  If he ever did honestly and resolutely attempt it, he
would at once in that pass out of the ranks of the hypocrites
altogether and pass over into a very different category.  Bunyan
lets us see how a formalist and a hypocrite and a Christian all
respectively do when they come to a real difficulty.  The three
pilgrims were all walking in the same path, and with their faces
for the time in the same direction.  They had not held much
conference together since their first conversation, and as time
goes on, Christian has no more talk but with himself, and that
sometimes sighingly, and sometimes more comfortably.  When, all at
once, the three men come on the hill Difficulty.  A severe act of
self-denial has to be done at this point of their pilgrimage.  A
proud heart has to be humbled to the dust.  A second, a third, a
tenth place has to be taken in the praise of men.  An outbreak of
anger and wrath has to be kept under for hours and days.  A great
injury, a scandalous case of ingratitude, has to be forgiven and
forgotten; in short, as Rutherford says, an impossible-to-be-
counterfeited spiritual grace has to be put into its severest and
sorest exercise; and the result was--what we know.  Our pilgrim
went and drank of the spring that always runs at the bottom of the
hill Difficulty, and thus refreshed himself against that hill;
while Formalist took the one low road, and Hypocrisy the other,
which led him into a wide field full of dark mountains, where he
stumbled and fell and rose no more.  When, after his visit to the
spring, Christian began to go up the hill, saying:


'This hill, though high, I covet to ascend;
The difficulty will not me offend;
For I perceive the way to life lies here;
Come, pluck up heart; let's neither faint nor fear;
Better, though difficult, the right way to go,
Than wrong, though easy, where the end is woe.'


Now, all this brings us to the last step in the evolution of a
perfect hypocrite out of a simple formalist.  The perfect and
finished hypocrite is not your commonplace and vulgar scoundrel of
the playwright and the penny-novelist type; the finest hypocrite is
a character their art cannot touch.  'The worst of hypocrites,'
Rutherford goes on to say, 'is he who whitens himself till he
deceives himself.  It is strange that a man hath such power over
himself.  But a man's heart may deceive his heart, and he may
persuade himself that he is godly and righteous when he knows
nothing about it.'  'Preaching in a certain place,' says Boston,
'after supper the mistress of the house told me how I had terrified
God's people.  This was by my doctrine of self-love, self-
righteousness, self-ends, and such like.  She restricted hypocrites
to that sort that do all things to be seen of men, and harped much
on this--how can one be a hypocrite who hates hypocrisy in other
people? how can one be a hypocrite and not know it?  All this led
me to see the need of such doctrine.'  And if only to show you that
this is not the dismal doctrine of antediluvian Presbyterians only,
Canon Mozley says:  'The Pharisee did not know that he was a
Pharisee; if he had known it he would not have been a Pharisee.  He
does not know that he is a hypocrite.  The vulgar hypocrite knows
that he is a hypocrite because he deceives others, but the true
Scripture hypocrite deceives himself.'  And the most subtle teacher
of our century, or of any century, has said:  'What is a hypocrite?
We are apt to understand by a hypocrite one who makes a profession
of religion for secret ends without practising what he professes;
who is malevolent, covetous, or profligate, while he assumes an
outward sanctity in his words and conduct, and who does so
deliberately, deceiving others, and not at all self-deceived.  But
this is not what our Saviour seems to have meant by a hypocrite;
nor were the Pharisees such.  The Pharisees deceived themselves as
well as others.  Indeed, it is not in human nature to deceive
others for any long time without in a measure deceiving ourselves
also.  When they began, each in his turn, to deceive the people,
they were not at the moment self-deceived.  But by degrees they
forgot that outward ceremonies avail nothing without inward purity.
They did not know themselves, and they unawares deceived themselves
as well as the people.'  What a terrible light, as of the last day
itself, does all that cast upon the formalisms and the hypocrisies
of which our own religious life is full!  And what a terrible light
it casts on those miserable men who are complete and finished in
their self-deception!  For the complete and finished hypocrite is
not he who thinks that he is better than all other men; that is
hopeless enough; but the paragon of hypocrisy is he who does not
know that he is worse than all other men.  And in his stone-
blindness to himself, and consequently to all reality and
inwardness and spirituality in religion, you see him intensely
interested in, and day and night occupied with, the outside things
of religion, till nothing short of a miracle will open his eyes.
See him in the ministry, for instance, sweating at his sermons and
in his visiting, till you would almost think that he is the
minister of whom Paul prophesied, who should spend and be spent for
the salvation of men's souls.  But all the time, such is the
hypocrisy that haunts the ministerial calling, he is really and at
bottom animated with ambition for the praise of men only, and for
the increase of his congregation.  See him, again, now assailing or
now defending a church's secular privileges, and he knowing no
more, all the time, what a church has been set up for on earth than
the man in the moon.  What a penalty his defence is and his support
to a church of Christ, and what an incubus his membership must be!
Or, see him, again, making long speeches and many prayers for the
extension of the kingdom of Christ, and all the time spending ten
times more on wine or whisky or tobacco, or on books or pictures or
foreign travel, than he gives to the cause of home or foreign
missions.  And so on, all through our hypocritical and self-blinded
life.  Through such stages, and to such a finish, does the
formalist pass from his thoughtless and neglected youth to his
hardened, blinded, self-seeking life, spent in the ostensible
service of the church of Christ.  If the light that is in such men
be darkness, how great is that darkness!  We may all well shudder
as we hear our Lord saying to ministers and members and church
defenders and church supporters, like ourselves:  'Now ye say, We
see; therefore your sin remaineth.'

Now, the first step to the cure of all such hypocrisy, and to the
salvation of our souls, is to know that we are hypocrites, and to
know also what that is in which we are most hypocritical.  Well,
there are two absolutely infallible tests of a true hypocrite,--
tests warranted to unmask, expose, and condemn the most finished,
refined, and even evangelical hypocrite in this house to-night, or
in all the world.  By far and away the best and swiftest is prayer.
True prayer, that is.  For here again our inexpugnable hypocrisy
comes in and leads us down to perdition even in our prayers.  There
is nothing our Lord more bitterly and more contemptuously assails
the Pharisees for than just the length, the loudness, the number,
and the publicity of their prayers.  The truth is, public prayer,
for the most part, is no true prayer at all.  It is at best an open
homage paid to secret prayer.  We make such shipwrecks of devotion
in public prayer, that if we have a shred of true religion about
us, we are glad to get home and to shut our door.  We preach in our
public prayers.  We make speeches on public men and on public
events in our public prayers.  We see the reporters all the time in
our public prayers.  We do everything but pray in our public
prayers.  And to get away alone,--what an escape that is from the
temptations and defeats of public prayer!  No; public prayer is no
test whatever of a hypocrite.  A hypocrite revels in public prayer.
It is secret prayer that finds him out.  And even secret prayer
will sometimes deceive us.  We are crushed down on our secret knees
sometimes, by sheer shame and the strength of conscience.  Fear of
exposure, fear of death and hell, will sometimes make us shut our
door.  A flood of passing feeling will sometimes make us pray for a
season in secret.  Job had all that before him when he said, 'Will
the hypocrite delight himself in the Almighty? will he always call
upon God?'  No, he will not.  And it is just here that the
hypocrite and the true Christian best discover themselves both to
God and to themselves.  The true Christian will, as Job again says,
pray in secret till God slays him.  He will pray in his dreams; he
will pray till death; he will pray after he is dead.  Are you in
earnest, then, not to be any more a hypocrite and to know the
infallible marks of such?  Ask the key of your closet door.  Ask
the chair at your bedside.  Ask the watchman what you were doing
and why your light was in so long.  Ask the birds of the air and
the beasts of the field and the crows on the ploughed lands after
your solitary walk.

Almost a better test of true and false religion than even secret
prayer, but a test that is far more difficult to handle, is our
opinion of ourselves.  In His last analysis of the truly justified
man and the truly reprobate, our Lord made the deepest test to be
their opinion of themselves.  'God, I thank Thee that I am not as
this publican,' said the hypocrite.  'God be merciful to me a
sinner,' said the true penitent.  And then this fine principle
comes in here--not only to speed the sure sanctification of a true
Christian, but also, if he has skill and courage to use it, for his
assurance and comfort,--that the saintlier he becomes and the riper
for glory, the more he will beat his breast over what yet abides
within his breast.  Yes; a man's secret opinion of himself is
almost a better test of his true spiritual state than even secret
prayer.  But, then, these two are not competing and exclusive
tests; they always go together and are never found apart.  And at
the mouth of these two witnesses every true hypocrite shall be
condemned and every true Christian justified.

Dr. Pusey says somewhere that the perfect hypocrite is the man who
has the truth of God in his mind, but is without the love of God in
his heart.  'Truth without love,' says that saintly scholar, 'makes
a finished Pharisee.'  Now we Scottish and Free Church people
believe we have the truth, if any people on the face of the earth
have it; and if we have not love mixed with it, you see where and
what we are.  We are called to display a banner because of the
truth, but let love always be our flag-staff.  Let us be jealous
for the truth, but let it be a godly, that is to say, a loving
jealousy.  When we contend for purity of doctrine and for purity of
worship, when we protest against popery and priestcraft, when we
resist rationalism and infidelity, when we do battle now for
national religion, as we call it, and now for the freedom of the
church, let us do it all in love to all men, else we had better not
do it at all.  If we cannot do it with clean and all-men-loving
hearts, let us leave all debate and contention to stronger and
better men than we are.  The truth will never be advanced or
guarded by us, nor will the Lord of truth and love accept our
service or bless our souls, till we put on the divine nature, and
have our hearts and our mouths still more full of love than our
minds and our mouths are full of truth.  Let us watch ourselves,
lest with all our so-called love of truth we be found reprobates at
last because we loved the truth for some selfish or party end, and
hated and despised our brother, and believed all evil and
disbelieved all good concerning our brother.  Truth without love
makes a hypocrite, says Dr. Pusey; and evangelical truth without
evangelical love makes an evangelical hypocrite, says Thomas
Shepard.  Only where the whole truth is united to a heart full of
love have we the perfect New Testament Christian.



TIMOROUS AND MISTRUST



'There is a lion in the way.'--The Slothful Man.
'I must venture.'--Christian.

'I at any rate must venture,' said Christian to Timorous and
Mistrust.  'Whatever you may do I must venture, even if the lions
you speak of should pull me to pieces.  I, for one, shall never go
back.  To go back is nothing but death; to go forward is fear of
death and everlasting life beyond it.  I will yet go forward.'  So
Mistrust and Timorous ran down the hill, and Christian went on his
way.  George Offor says, in his notes on this passage, that civil
despotism and ecclesiastical tyranny so terrified many young
converts in John Bunyan's day, that multitudes turned back like
Mistrust and Timorous; while at the same time, many like Bunyan
himself went forward and for a time fell into the lion's mouth.
Civil despotism and ecclesiastical tyranny do not stand in our way
as they stood in Bunyan's way--at least, not in the same shape:
but every age has its own lions, and every Christian man has his
own lions that neither civil despots nor ecclesiastical tyrants
know anything about.

Now, who or what is the lion in your way?  Who or what is it that
fills you with such timorousness and mistrust, that you are almost
turning back from the way to life altogether?  The fiercest of all
our lions is our own sin.  When a man's own sin not only finds him
out and comes roaring after him, but when it dashes past him and
gets into the woods and thickets before him, and stands pawing and
foaming on the side of his way, that is a trial of faith and love
and trust indeed.  Sometimes a man's past sins will fill all his
future life with sleepless apprehensions.  He is never sure at what
turn in his upward way he may not suddenly run against some of them
standing ready to rush out upon him.  And it needs no little quiet
trust and humble-minded resignation to carry a man through this
slough and that bottom, up this hill and down that valley, all the
time with his life in his hand; and yet at every turn, at every
rumour that there are lions in the way, to say, Come lion, come
lamb, come death, come life, I must venture, I will yet go forward.
As Job also, that wonderful saint of God, said, 'Hold your peace,
let me alone that I may speak, and let come on me what will.
Wherefore do I take my flesh in my teeth and put my life in my
hand?  Though He slay me, yet will I trust in Him.  He also shall
be my salvation; for an hypocrite shall not come before Him.'

One false step, one stumble in life, one error in judgment, one
outbreak of an unbridled temperament, one small sin, if it is even
so much as a sin, of ignorance or of infirmity, will sometimes not
only greatly injure us at the time, but, in some cases, will fill
all our future life with trials and difficulties and dangers.  Many
of us shall have all our days to face a future of defeat,
humiliation, impoverishment, and many hardships, that has not come
on us on account of any presumptuous transgression of God's law so
much as simply out of some combination of unfortunate circumstances
in which we may have only done our duty, but have not done it in
the most serpent-like way.  And when we are made to suffer unjustly
or disproportionately all our days for our error of judgment or our
want of the wisdom of this world, or what not, we are sorely
tempted to be bitter and proud and resentful and unforgiving, and
to go back from duty and endurance and danger altogether.  But we
must not.  We must rather say to ourselves, Now and here, if not in
the past, I must play the man, and, by God's help, the wise man.  I
must pluck safety henceforth out of the heart of the nettle danger.
Yes, I made a mistake.  I did what I would not do now, and I must
not be too proud to say so.  I acted, I see now, precipitately,
inconsiderately, imprudently.  And I must not gloom and rebel and
run away from the cross and the lion.  I must not insist or expect
that the always wise and prudent man's reward is to come to me.
The lion in my way is a lion of my own rearing; and I must not turn
my back on him, even if he should be let loose to leap on me and
rend me.  I must pass under his paw and through his teeth, if need
be, to a life with him and beyond him of humility and duty and
quiet-hearted submission to his God and mine.

Then, again, our salvation itself sometimes, our true
sanctification, puts on a lion's skin and not unsuccessfully
imitates an angry lion's roar.  Some saving grace that up till now
we have been fatally lacking in lies under the very lip of that
lion we see standing straight in our way.  God in His wisdom so
orders our salvation, that we must work out the best part of it
with fear and trembling.  Right before us, just beside us, standing
over us with his heavy paw upon us, is a lion, from under whose paw
and from between whose teeth we must pluck and put on that grace in
which our salvation lies.  Repentance and reformation lie in the
way of that lion; resignation also and humility; the crucifixion of
our own will; the sacrifice of our own heart; in short, everything
that is still lacking but is indispensable to our salvation lies
through that den of lions.  One man here is homeless and loveless;
another is childless; another has a home and children, and much
envies the man who has neither; one has talents there is no scope
for; another has the scope, but not the sufficient talent; another
must now spend all his remaining life in a place where he sees that
anger and envy and jealousy and malevolence will be his roaring
lions daily seeking to devour his soul.  There is not a Christian
man or woman in this house whose salvation, worth being called a
salvation, does not lie through such a lion's thicket as that.  Our
Lord Himself was a roaring lion to John the Baptist.  For the
Baptist's salvation lay not in his powerful preaching, but in his
being laid aside from all preaching; not in his crowds increasing,
but in his Successor's crowds increasing and his decreasing.  The
Baptist was the greatest born of woman in that day, not because he
was a thundering preacher--any ordinary mother in Israel might have
been his mother in that:  but to decrease sweetly and to steal down
quietly to perfect humility and self-oblivion,--that salvation was
reserved for the son of Elisabeth alone.  I would not like to say
Who that is champing and pawing for your blood right in your
present way.  Reverence will not let me say Who it is.  Only, you
venture on Him.

'Yes, I shall venture!' said Christian to the two terrified and
retreating men.  Now, every true venture is made against risk and
uncertainty, against anxiety and danger and fear.  And it is just
this that constitutes the nobleness and blessedness of faith.
Faith sells all for Christ.  Faith risks all for eternal life.
Faith faces all for salvation.  When it is at the worst, faith
still says, Very well; even if there is no Celestial City anywhere
in the world, it is better to die still seeking it than to live on
in the City of Destruction.  Even if there is no Jesus Christ,--I
have read about Him and heard about Him and pictured Him to myself,
till, say what you will, I shall die kissing and embracing that
Divine Image I have in my heart.  Even if there is neither mercy-
seat nor intercession in heaven, I shall henceforth pray without
ceasing.  Far far better for me all the rest of my sinful life to
be clothed with sackcloth and ashes, even if there is no fountain
opened in Jerusalem for sin and uncleanness, and no change of
raiment.  Christian protested that, as for him, lions and all, he
had no choice left.  And no more have we.  He must away somewhere,
anywhere, from his past life.  And so must we.  If all the lions
that ever drank blood are to collect upon his way, let them do so;
they shall not all make him turn back.  Why should they?  What is a
whole forest full of lions to a heart and a life full of sin?
Lions are like lambs compared with sin.  'Good morning!  I for one
must venture.  I shall yet go forward.'  So Mistrust and Timorous
ran down the hill, and Christian went on his way.

So I saw in my dream that he made haste and went forward, that if
possible he might get lodging in the house called Beautiful that
stood by the highway side.  Now, before he had gone far he entered
into a very narrow passage which was about a furlong off from the
porter's lodge, and looking very narrowly before him as he went, he
espied two lions in the way.  Then was he afraid, and thought also
to go back, for he thought that nothing but death was before him.
But the porter at the lodge, whose name was Watchful, perceiving
that Christian made a halt, as if he would go back, cried unto him,
saying, 'Is thy strength so small?  Fear not the lions, for they
are chained, and are only placed there for the trial of faith where
it is, and for the discovery of those who have none.  Keep the
midst of the path and no hurt shall come to thee.'  Yes, that is
all we have to do.  Whatever our past life may have been, whatever
our past sins, past errors of judgment, past mistakes and mishaps,
whatever of punishment or chastisement or correction or instruction
or sanctification and growth in grace may be under those lions'
skins and between their teeth for us, all we have got to do at
present is to leave the lions to Him who set them there, and to go
on, up to them and past them, keeping always to the midst of the
path.  The lions may roar at us till they have roared us deaf and
blind, but we are far safer in the midst of that path than we would
be in our own bed.  Only let us keep in the midst of the path.
When their breath is hot and full of blood on our cheek; when they
paw up the blinding earth; when we feel as if their teeth had
closed round our heart,--still, all the more, let us keep in the
midst of the path.  We must sometimes walk on a razor-edge of fear
and straightforwardness; that is the only way left for us now.
But, then, we have the Divine assurance that on that perilous edge
no hurt shall come to us.  'Temptations,' says our author in
another place, 'when we meet them at first, are as the lion that
roared upon Samson; but if we overcome them, the next time we see
them we shall find a nest of honey in them.'  O God, for grace and
sense and imagination to see and understand and apply all that to
our own daily life!  O to be able to take all that home to-night
and see it all there; lions and runaways, venturesome souls, narrow
paths, palaces of beauty, everlasting life and all!  Open Thou our
eyes that we may see the wonderful things that await us in our own
house at home!


'Things out of hope are compassed oft with venturing.'


So they are; and so they were that day with our terrified pilgrim.
He made a venture at the supreme moment of his danger, and things
that were quite out of all hope but an hour before were then
compassed and ever after possessed by him.  Make the same venture,
then, yourselves to-night.  Naught venture, naught have.  Your lost
soul is not much to venture, but it is all that Christ at this
moment asks of you--that you leave your lost soul in His hand, and
then go straight on from this moment in the middle of the path:
the path, that is, as your case may be, of purity, humility,
submission, resignation, and self-denial.  Keep your mind and your
heart, your eyes and your feet, in the very middle of that path,
and you shall have compassed the House Beautiful before you know.
The lions shall soon be behind you, and the grave and graceful
damsels of the House--Discretion and Prudence and Piety and
Charity--shall all be waiting upon you.



PRUDENCE {1}



'Let a man examine himself.'--Paul.

Let a man examine himself, says the apostle to the Corinthians, and
so let him eat of that bread and drink of that cup.  And thus it
was, that before the pilgrim was invited to sit down at the supper
table in the House Beautiful, quite a number of most pointed and
penetrating questions were put to him by those who had charge of
that house and its supper table.  And thus the time was excellently
improved till the table was spread, while the short delay and the
successive exercises whetted to an extraordinary sharpness the
pilgrim's hunger for the supper.  Piety and Charity, who had joint
charge of the house from the Master of the house, held each a
characteristic conversation with Christian, but it was left to
Prudence to hold the most particular discourse with him until
supper was ready, and it is to that so particular discourse that I
much wish to turn your attention to-night.

With great tenderness, but at the same time with the greatest
possible gravity, Prudence asked the pilgrim whether he did not
still think sometimes of the country from whence he had come out.
Yes, he replied; how could I help thinking continually of that
unhappy country and of my sad and miserable life in it; but,
believe me,--or, rather, you cannot believe me,--with what shame
and detestation I always think of my past life.  My face burns as I
now speak of my past life to you, and as I think what my old
companions know and must often say about me.  I detest, as you
cannot possibly understand, every remembrance of my past life, and
I hate and never can forgive myself, who, with mine own hands, so
filled all my past life with shame and self-contempt.  Gently
stopping the remorseful pilgrim's self-accusations about his past
life, Prudence asked him if he had not still with him, and, indeed,
within him, some of the very things that had so destroyed both him
and all his past life.  'Yes,' he honestly and humbly said.  'Yes,
but greatly against my will:  especially my inward and sinful
cogitations.'  At this Prudence looked on him with all her deep and
soft eyes, for it was to this that she had been leading the
conversation up all the time.  Prudence had a great look of
satisfaction, mingled with love and pity, at the way the pilgrim
said 'especially my inward and sinful cogitations.'  Those who
stood by and observed Prudence wondered at her delight in the sad
discourse on which the pilgrim now entered.  But she had her own
reasons for her delight in this particular kind of discourse, and
it was seldom that she lighted on a pilgrim who both understood her
questions and responded to them as did this man now sitting beside
her.  Now, my brethren, all parable apart, is that your religious
experience?  Are you full of shame and detestation at your inward
cogitations?  Are you tormented, enslaved, and downright cursed
with your own evil thoughts?  I do not ask whether or no you have
such thoughts always within you.  I do not ask, because I know.
But I ask, because I would like to make sure that you know what,
and the true nature of what, goes on incessantly in your mind and
in your heart.  Do you, or do you not, spit out your most inward
thoughts ten times a day like poison?  If you do, you are a truly
religious man, and if you do not, you do not yet know the very ABC
of true religion, and your dog has a better errand at the Lord's
table than you have.  And if your minister lets you sit down at the
Lord's table without holding from time to time some particular
discourse with you about your sinful thoughts, he is deceiving and
misleading you, besides laying up for himself an awakening at last
to shame and everlasting contempt.  What a mill-stone his communion
roll will be round such a minister's neck!  And how his
congregation will gnash their teeth at him when they see to what
his miserable ministry has brought them!

Let a man examine himself, said Paul.  What about your inward and
sinful cogitations? asked Prudence.  How long shall thy vain
thoughts lodge within thee? demanded the bold prophet.  Now, my
brethren, what have you to say to that particular accusation? Do
you know what vain thoughts are?  Are you at all aware what
multitudes of such thoughts lodge within you?  Do they drive you
every day to your knees, and do you blush with shame when you are
alone before God at the fountain of folly that fills your mind and
your heart continually?  The Apostle speaks of vain hopes that make
us ashamed that we ever entertained them.  You have been often so
ashamed, and yet do not such hopes still too easily arise in your
heart?  What castles of idiotic folly you still build!  Were a sane
man or a modest woman even to dream such dreams of folly overnight,
they would blush and hide their heads all day at the thought.  Out
of a word, out of a look, out of what was neither a word nor a look
intended for you, what a world of vanity will you build out of it!
The question of Prudence is not whether or no you are still a born
fool at heart, she does not put unnecessary questions:  hers to you
is the more pertinent and particular question, whether, since you
left your former life and became a Christian, you feel every day
increasing shame and detestation at yourself, on account of the
vanity of your inward cogitations.  My brethren, can you satisfy
her who is set by her Master to hold particular discourse with all
true Christians before supper?  Can you say with the Psalmist,--
could you tell Prudence where the Psalmist says,--I hate vain
thoughts, but Thy law do I love?  And can you silence her by
telling her that her Master alone knows with what shame you think
that He has such a fool as you are among His people?

Anger, also, sudden and even long-entertained anger, was one of the
'many failings' of which Christian was so conscious to himself.
His outbursts of anger at home, he bitterly felt, might well be one
of the causes why his wife and children did not accompany him on
his pilgrimage.  And though he knew his failing in this respect,
and was very wary of it, yet he often failed even when he was most
wary.  Now, while anger is largely a result of our blood and
temperament, yet few of us are so well-balanced and equable in our
temperament and so pure and cool in our blood, as altogether to
escape frequent outbursts of anger.  The most happily constituted
and the best governed of us have too much cause to be ashamed and
penitent both before God and our neighbours for our outbursts of
angry passion.  But Prudence is so particular in her discourse
before supper, that she goes far deeper into our anger than our
wives and our children, our servants and our neighbours, can go.
She not only asks if we stamp out the rising anger of our heart as
we would stamp out sparks of fire in a house full of gunpowder; but
she insists on being told what we think of ourselves when the house
of our heart is still so full of such fire and such gunpowder.  Any
man, to call a man, would be humbled in his own eyes and in his
walk before his house at home after an explosion of anger among
them; but he who would satisfy Prudence and sit beside her at
supper, must not only never let his anger kindle, but the simple
secret heat of it, that fire of hell that is hid from all men but
himself in the flint of his own hard and proud heart,--what, asks
Prudence, do you think of that, and of yourself on account of that?
Does that keep you not only watchful and prayerful, but, what is
the best ground in you of all true watchfulness and prayerfulness,
full of secret shame, self-fear, and self-detestation?  One
forenoon table would easily hold all our communicants if Prudence
had the distribution of the tokens.

And, then, we who are true pilgrims, are of all men the most
miserable, on account of that 'failing,' that rankling sting in our
hearts, when any of our friends has more of this world's
possessions, honours, and praises than we have, that pain at our
neighbour's pleasure, that sickness at his health, that hunger for
what we see him eat, that thirst for what we see him drink, that
imprisonment of our spirits when we see him set at liberty, that
depression at his exaltation, that sorrow at his joy, and joy at
his sorrow, that evil heart that would have all things to itself.
Yes, said Christian, I am only too conversant with all these sinful
cogitations, but they are all greatly against my will, and might I
but choose mine own thoughts, do you suppose that I would ever
think these things any more?  'The cause is in my will,' said
Caesar, on a great occasion.  But the true Christian, unhappily,
cannot say that.  If he could say that, he would soon say also that
the snare is broken and that his soul has escaped.  And then the
cause of all his evil cogitations, his vain thoughts, his angry
feelings, his envious feelings, his ineradicable covetousness, his
hell-rooted and heaven-towering pride, and his whole evil heart of
unbelief would soon be at an end.  'I cannot be free of sin,' said
Thomas Boston, 'but God knows that He would be welcome to make
havoc of my lusts to-night and to make me henceforth a holy man.  I
know no lust that I would not be content to part with.  My will
bound hand and foot I desire to lay at His feet.'  Yes:  such is
the mystery and depth of sin in the hearts of all God's saints,
that far deeper than their will, far back behind their will, the
whole substance and very core of their hearts is wholly corrupt and
enslaved to sin.  And thus it is that while their renewed and
delivered will works out, so far, their salvation in their walk and
conversation among men, the helplessness of their will in the
cleansing and the keeping of their hearts is to the end the sorrow
and the mystery of their sanctification.  To will was present with
Paul, and with Bunyan, and with Boston; but their heart--they could
not with all their keeping keep their heart.  No man can; no man
who has at all tried it can.  'Might I but choose mine own
thoughts, I would choose never to think of these things more:  but
when I would be doing of that which is best, that which is worst is
with me.'  We can choose almost all things.  Our will and choice
have almost all things at their disposal.  We can choose our God.
We can choose life or death.  We can choose heaven or hell.  We can
choose our church, our minister, our books, our companions, our
words, our works, and, to some extent, our inward thoughts, but
only to some extent.  We can encourage this or that thought; we can
entertain it and dwell upon it; or we can detect it, detest it, and
cast it out.  But that secret place in our heart where our thoughts
hide and harbour, and out of which they spring so suddenly upon the
mind and the heart, the imagination and the conscience,--of that
secretest of all secret places, God alone is able to say, I search
the heart.  'As for secret thoughts,' says our author, speaking of
his own former religious life, 'I took no notice of them, neither
did I understand what Satan's temptations were, nor how they were
to be withstood and resisted.'  But now all these things are his
deepest grief, as they are ours,--as many of us as have been truly
turned in our deepest hearts to God.

'But,' replied Prudence, 'do you not find sometimes as if those
things were vanquished which at other times are your perplexity?'
'Yes, but that is but seldom; but they are to me golden hours in
which such things happen to me.'  'Can you remember by what means
you find your annoyances at times as if they were vanquished?'
'Yes, when I think what I saw at the cross, that will do it; and
when I look upon my broidered coat, that will do it; also, when I
look into the roll that I carry in my bosom, that will do it; and
when my thoughts wax warm about whither I am going, that will do
it.'  Yes; and these same things have many a time done it to
ourselves also.  We also, my brethren--let me tell you your own
undeniable experience--we also have such golden hours sometimes,
when we feel as if we should never again have such an evil heart
within us.  The Cross of Christ to us also has done it.  It is of
such golden hours that Isaac Watts sings in his noble hymn:


'When I survey the wondrous Cross;'


and as often as we sing that hymn with our eyes upon the object,
that will for a time vanquish our worst cogitations.  Also, when we
read the roll that we too carry in our bosom--that is to say, when
we go back into our past life till we see it and feel it all, and
till we can think and speak of nothing else but the sin that
abounded in it and the grace that much more abounded, that has a
thousand times given us also golden hours, even rest from our own
evil hearts.  And we also have often made our hearts too hot for
sin to show itself, when we read our hearts deep into such books as
The Paradiso, The Pilgrim's Progress, The Saint's Rest, The Serious
Call, The Religious Affections, and such like.  These books have
often vanquished our annoyances, and given us golden hours on the
earth.  Yes, but that is but seldom.

'Now, what is it,' asked Prudence, as she wound up this so
particular colloquy, 'that makes you so desirous to go to Mount
Zion?'

'Why,' replied the pilgrim, and the water stood in his eyes, 'why,
there I hope to see Him alive that did hang dead on the cross; and
there I hope to be rid of all those things that to this day are an
annoyance to me; there they say is no death, and there shall I
dwell with such company as I love best.  For, to tell you truth, I
love Him, because by Him I was eased of my burden, and I am weary
of my inward sickness; and I would fain be where I shall die no
more, and for ever with that company that shall continually cry,
Holy, holy, holy.'



CHARITY



'I will walk within my house with a perfect heart.'--David.

There can be nobody here to-night so stark stupid as to suppose
that the pilgrim had run away from home and left his wife and
children to the work-house.  There have been wiseacres who have
found severe fault with John Bunyan because he made his Puritan
pilgrim such a bad husband and such an unnatural father.  But
nobody possessed of a spark of common sense, not to say religion or
literature, would ever commit himself to such an utter imbecility
as that.  John Bunyan's pilgrim, whatever he may have been before
he became a pilgrim, all the time he was a pilgrim, was the most
faithful, affectionate, and solicitous husband in all the country
round about, and the tenderest, the most watchful, and the wisest
of fathers.  This pilgrim stayed all the more at home that he went
so far away from home; he accomplished his whole wonderful
pilgrimage beside his own forge and at his own fireside; and he
entered the Celestial City amid trumpets and bells and harps and
psalms, while all the time sleeping in his own humble bed.  The
House Beautiful, therefore, to which we have now come in his
company, is not some remote and romantic mansion away up among the
mountains a great many days' journey distant from this poor man's
everyday home.  The House Beautiful was nothing else,--what else
better, what else so good could it be?--than just this Christian
man's first communion Sabbath and his first communion table (first,
that is, after his true conversion from sin to God and his
confessed entrance into a new life), while the country from whence
he had come out, and concerning which both Piety and Prudence
catechised him so closely, was just his former life of open
ungodliness and all his evil walk and conversation while he was as
yet living without God and without hope in the world.  The country
on which he confessed that he now looked back with so much shame
and detestation was not England or Bedfordshire, but the wicked
life he had lived in that land and in that shire.  And when Charity
asked him as to whether he was a married man and had a family, she
knew quite well that he was, only she made a pretence of asking him
those domestic questions in order thereby to start the touching
conversation.

Beginning, then, at home, as she always began, Charity said to
Christian, 'Have you a family?  Are you a married man?'  'I have a
wife and four small children,' answered Christian.  'And why did
you not bring them with you?'  Then Christian wept and said, 'Oh,
how willingly would I have done so, but they were all of them
utterly averse to my going on pilgrimage.'  'But you should have
talked to them and have shown them their danger.'  'So I did,' he
replied, 'but I seemed to them as one that mocked.'  Now, this of
talking, and, especially, of talking about religious things to
children, is one of the most difficult things in the world,--that
is, to do it well.  Some people have the happy knack of talking to
their own and to other people's children so as always to interest
and impress them.  But such happy people are few.  Most people talk
at their children whenever they begin to talk to them, and thus,
without knowing it, they nauseate their children with their
conversation altogether.  To respect a little child, to stand in
some awe of a little child, to choose your topics, your
opportunities, your neighbourhood, your moods and his as well as
all your words, and always to speak your sincerest, simplest, most
straightforward and absolutely wisest is indispensable with a
child.  Take your mannerisms, your condescensions, your
affectations, your moralisings, and all your insincerities to your
debauched equals, but bring your truest and your best to your
child.  Unless you do so, you will be sure to lay yourself open to
a look that will suddenly go through you, and that will swiftly
convey to you that your child sees through you and despises you and
your conversation too.  'You should not only have talked to your
children of their danger,' said Charity, 'but you should have shown
them their danger.'  Yes, Charity; but a man must himself see his
own and his children's danger too, before he can show it to them,
as well as see it clearly at the time he is trying to show it to
them.  And how many fathers, do you suppose, have the eyes to see
such danger, and how then can they shew such danger to their
children, of all people?  Once get fathers to see dangers or
anything else aright, and then you will not need to tell them how
they are to instruct and impress their children.  Nature herself
will then tell them how to talk to their children, and when Nature
teaches, all our children will immediately and unweariedly listen.

But, especially, said Charity, as your boys grew up--I think you
said that you had four boys and no girls?--well, then, all the
more, as they grew up, you should have taken occasion to talk to
them about yourself.  Did your little boy never petition you for a
story about yourself; and as he grew up did you never confide to
him what you have never confided to his mother?  Something, as I
was saying, that made you sad when you were a boy and a rising man,
with a sadness your son can still see in you as you talk to him.
In conversations like that a boy finds out what a friend he has in
his father, and his father from that day has his best friend in his
son.  And then as Matthew grew up and began to out-grow his
brothers and to form friendships out of doors, did you study to
talk at the proper time to him, and on subjects on which you never
venture to talk about to any other boy or man?  You men, Charity
went on to say, live in a world of your own, and though we women
are well out of it, yet we cannot be wholly ignorant that it is
there.  And, we may well be wrong, but we cannot but think that
fathers, if not mothers, might safely tell their men-children at
least more than they do tell them of the sure dangers that lie
straight in their way, of the sorrow that men and women bring on
one another, and of what is the destruction of so many cities.  We
may well be wrong, for we are only women, but I have told you what
we all think who keep this house and hear the reports and
repentances of pilgrims, both Piety and Prudence and I myself.  And
I, for one, largely agree with the three women.  It is easier said
than done.  But the simple saying of it may perhaps lead some
fathers and mothers to think about it, and to ask whether or no it
is desirable and advisable to do it, which of them is to attempt
it, on what occasion, and to what extent.  Christian by this time
had the Slough of Despond with all its history and all that it
contained to tell his eldest son about; he had the wicket gate also
just above the slough, the hill Difficulty, the Interpreter's
House, the place somewhat ascending with a cross standing upon it,
and a little below, in the bottom, a sepulchre, not to speak of her
who assaulted Faithful, whose name was Wanton, and who at one time
was like to have done even that trusty pilgrim a life-long
mischief.  Christian rather boasted to Charity of his wariness,
especially in the matter of his children's amusements, but Charity
seemed to think that he had carried his wariness into other matters
besides amusements, without the best possible results there either.
I have sometimes thought with her that among our multitude of
congresses and conferences of all kinds of people and upon all
manner of subjects, room and membership might have been found for a
conference of fathers and mothers.  Fathers to give and take
counsel about how to talk to their sons, and mothers to their
daughters.  I am much of Charity's mind, that, if more were done at
home, and done with some frankness, for our sons and daughters,
there would be fewer fathers and mothers found sitting at the
Lord's table alone.  'You should have talked to them,' said
Charity, with some severity in her tones, 'and, especially, you
should have told them of your own sorrow.'

And then, coming still closer up to Christian, Charity asked him
whether he prayed, both before and after he so spoke to his
children, that God would bless what he said to them.  Charity
believeth all things, hopeth all things, but when she saw this man
about to sit down all alone at the supper table, it took Charity
all her might to believe that he had both spoken to his children
and at the same time prayed to God for them as he ought to have
done.  Our old ministers used to lay this vow on all fathers and
mothers at the time of baptism, that they were to pray both with
and for their children.  Now, that is a fine formula; it is a most
comprehensive, and, indeed, exhaustive formula.  Both with and for.
And especially with.  With, at such and such times, on such and
such occasions, and in such and such places.  At those times, say,
when your boy has told a lie, or struck his little brother, or
stolen something, or destroyed something.  To pray with him at such
times, and to pray with him properly, and, if you feel able to do
it, and are led to do it, to tell him something after the prayer
about yourself, and your own not-yet-forgotten boyhood, and your
father; it makes a fine time to mix talk and prayer together in
that way.  Charity is not easily provoked, but the longer she lives
and keeps the table in the House Beautiful the more she is provoked
to think that there is far too little prayer among pilgrims; far
too little of all kinds of prayer, but especially prayer with and
for their children.  But hard as it was to tell all the truth at
that moment about Christian's past walk in his house at home, yet
he was able with the simple truth to say that he had indeed prayed
both with and for his children, and that, as they knew and could
not but remember, not seldom.  Yes, he said, I did sometimes so
pray with my boys, and that too, as you may believe, with much
affection, for you must think that my four boys were all very dear
to me.  And it is my firm belief that all that good man's boys will
come right yet:  Matthew and Joseph and James and Samuel and all.
'With much affection.'  I like that.  I have unbounded faith in
those prayers, both for and with, in which there is much affection.
It is want of affection, and want of imagination, that shipwrecks
so many of our prayers.  But this man's prayers had both these
elements of sure success in them, and they must come at last to
harbour.  At that one word 'with much affection,' this man's closet
door flies open and I see the old pilgrim first alone, and then
with his arms round his eldest son's neck, and both father and son
weeping together till they are ashamed to appear at supper till
they have washed their faces and got their most smiling and
everyday looks put on again.  You just wait and see if Matthew and
all the four boys down to the last do not escape into the Celestial
City before the gate is shut.  And when it is asked, Who are these
and whence came they? listen to their song and you will hear those
four happy children saying that their father, when they were yet
boys, both talked with them and prayed for and with them with so
much affection that therefore they are before the throne.

Why, then, with such a father and with such makable boys, why was
this household brought so near everlasting shipwreck?  It was the
mother that did it.  In one word, it was the wife and the mother
that did it.  It was the mistress of the house who wrought the
mischief here.  She was a poor woman, she was a poor man's wife,
and one would have thought that she had little enough temptation to
harm upon this present world.  But there it was, she did hang upon
it as much as if she had been the mother of the finest daughters
and the most promising boys in all the town.  Things like this were
from time to time reported to her by her neighbours.  One fine lady
had been heard to say that she would never have for her tradesman
any man who frequented conventicles, who was not content with the
religion of his betters, and who must needs scorn the parish church
and do despite to the saints' days.  Another gossip asked her what
she expected to make of her great family of boys when it was well
known that all the gentry in the neighbourhood but two or three had
sworn that they would never have a hulking Puritan to brush their
boots or run their errands.  And it almost made her husband burn
his book and swear that he would never be seen at another prayer-
meeting when his wife so often said to him that he should never
have had children, that he should never have made her his wife, and
that he was not like this when they were first man and wife.  And
in her bitterness she would name this wife or that maid, and would
say, You should have married her.  She would have gone to the
meeting-house with you as often as you wished.  Her sons are far
enough from good service to please you.  'My wife,' he softly said,
'was afraid of losing the world.  And then, after that, my growing
sons were soon given over, all I could do, to the foolish delights
of youth, so that, what by one thing and what by another, they left
me to wander in this manner alone.'  And I suppose there is
scarcely a household among ourselves where there have not been
serious and damaging misunderstandings between old-fashioned
fathers and their young people about what the old people called the
'foolish delights' of their sons and daughters.  And in thinking
this matter over, I have often been struck with how Job did when
his sons and his daughters were bent upon feasting and dancing in
their eldest brother's house.  The old man did not lay an interdict
upon the entertainment.  He did not take part in it, but neither
did he absolutely forbid it.  If it must be it must be, said the
wise patriarch.  And since I do not know whom they may meet there,
or what they may be tempted to do, I will sanctify them all.  I
will not go up into my bed till I have prayed for all my seven sons
and three daughters, each one of them by their names; and till they
come home safely I will rise every morning and offer burnt-
offerings according to the number of them all.  And do you think
that those burnt-offerings and accompanying intercessions would go
for nothing when the great wind came from the wilderness and smote
the four corners of the banqueting-house?  If you cannot banish the
love of foolish delights out the hearts of your sons and daughters,
then do not quarrel with them over such things; a family quarrel in
a Christian man's house is surely far worse than a feast or a
dance.  Only, if they must feast and dance and such like, be you
all the more diligent in your exercises at home on their behalf
till they are back again, where, after all, they like best to be,
in their good, kind, liberal, and loving father's house.

Have you a family?  Are you a married man?  Or, if not, do you hope
one day to be?  Then attend betimes to what Charity says to
Christian in the House Beautiful, and not less to what he says back
again to her.



SHAME



'Whosoever shall be ashamed of Me, and of My words, of him shall
the Son of Man be ashamed, when He shall come in His own glory, and
in His Father's, and of the holy angels.'--Our Lord.

Shame has not got the attention that it deserves either from our
moral philosophers or from our practical and experimental divines.
And yet it would well repay both classes of students to attend far
more to shame.  For, what really is shame?  Shame is an original
instinct planted in our souls by our Maker, and intended by Him to
act as a powerful and pungent check to our doing of any act that is
mean or dishonourable in the eyes of our fellow-men.  Shame is a
kind of social conscience.  Shame is a secondary sense of sin.  In
shame, our imagination becomes a kind of moral sense.  Shame sets
up in our bosom a not undivine tribunal, which judges us and
sentences us in the absence or the silence of nobler and more awful
sanctions and sentences.  But then, as things now are with us, like
all the rest of the machinery of the soul, shame has gone sadly
astray both in its objects and in its operations, till it demands a
long, a severe, and a very noble discipline over himself before any
man can keep shame in its proper place and directed in upon its
proper objects.  In the present disorder of our souls, we are all
acutely ashamed of many things that are not the proper objects of
shame at all; while, on the other hand, we feel no shame at all at
multitudes of things that are really most blameworthy,
dishonourable, and contemptible.  We are ashamed of things in our
lot and in our circumstances that, if we only knew it, are our
opportunity and our honour; we are ashamed of things that are the
clear will and the immediate dispensation of Almighty God.  And,
then, we feel no shame at all at the most dishonourable things, and
that simply because the men around us are too coarse in their
morals and too dull in their sensibilities to see any shame in such
things.  And thus it comes about that, in the very best of men,
their still perverted sense of shame remains in them a constant
snare and a source of temptation.  A man of a fine nature feels
keenly the temptation to shrink from those paths of truth and duty
that expose him to the cruel judgments and the coarse and
scandalising attacks of public and private enemies.  It was in the
Valley of Humiliation that Shame set upon Faithful, and it is a
real humiliation to any man of anything of this pilgrim's fine
character and feeling to be attacked, scoffed at, and held up to
blame and opprobrium.  And the finer and the more affectionate any
man's heart and character are, the more he feels and shrinks from
the coarse treatment this world gives to those whom it has its own
reasons to hate and assail.  They had the stocks and the pillory
and the shears in Bunyan's rude and uncivilised day, by means of
which many of the best men of that day were exposed to the insults
and brutalities of the mob.  The newspapers would be the pillory of
our day, were it not that, on the whole, the newspaper press is
conducted with such scrupulous fairness and with a love of truth
and justice such that no man need shrink from the path of duty
through fear of insult and injury.

But it is time to come to the encounter between Shame and Faithful
in the Valley of Humiliation.  Shame, properly speaking, is not one
of our Bunyan gallery of portraits at all.  Shame, at best, is but
a kind of secondary character in this dramatic book.  We do not
meet with Shame directly; we only hear about him through the report
of Faithful.  That first-class pilgrim was almost overcome of
Shame, so hot was their encounter; and it is the extraordinarily
feeling, graphic, and realistic account of their encounter that
Faithful gives us that has led me to take up Shame for our reproof
and correction to-night.

Religion altogether, but especially all personal religion, said
Shame to Faithful, is an unmanly business.  There is a certain
touch of smallness and pitifulness, he said, in all religion, but
especially in experimental religion.  It brings a man into
junctures and into companionships, and it puts offices and
endurances upon one such as try a man if he has any greatness of
spirit about him at all.  This life on which you are entering, said
Shame, will cost you many a blush before you are done with it.  You
will lay yourself open to many a scoff.  The Puritan religion, and
all the ways of that religious fraternity, are peculiarly open to
the shafts of ridicule.  Now, all that was quite true.  There was
no denying the truth of what Shame said.  And Faithful felt the
truth of it all, and felt it most keenly, as he confessed to
Christian.  The blood came into my face as the fellow spake, and
what he said for a time almost beat me out of the upward way
altogether.  But in this dilemma also all true Christians can fall
back, as Faithful fell back, upon the example of their Master.  In
this as in every other experience of temptation and endurance, our
Lord is the forerunner and the example of His people.  Our Lord was
in all points tempted like as we are, and among all His other
temptations He was tempted to be ashamed of His work on earth and
of the life and the death His work led Him into.  He must have
often felt ashamed at the treatment He received during His life of
humiliation, as it is well called; and He must often have felt
ashamed of His disciples:  but all that is blotted out by the
crowning shame of the cross.  We hang our worst criminals rather
than behead or shoot them, in order to heap up the utmost possible
shame and disgrace upon them, as well as to execute justice upon
them.  And what the hangman's rope is in our day, all that the
cross was in our Lord's day.  And, then, as if the cross itself was
not shame enough, all the circumstances connected with His cross
were planned and carried out so as to heap the utmost possible
shame and humiliation upon His head.  Our prison warders have to
watch the murderers in their cells night and day, lest they should
take their own life in order to escape the hangman's rope; but our
Lord, keenly as He felt His coming shame, said to His horrified
disciples, Behold, we go up to Jerusalem, when the Son of Man shall
be mocked, and spitefully entreated, and spitted on; and they shall
scourge Him and put Him to death.  Do you ever think of your Lord
in His shame?  How they made a fool of Him, as we say.  How they
took off His own clothes and put on Him now a red cloak and now a
white; how they put a sword of lath in His hand, and a crown of
thorns on His head; how they bowed the knee before Him, and asked
royal favours from Him; and then how they spat in His face, and
struck Him on the cheek, while the whole house rang with shouts of
laughter.  And, then, the last indignity of man, how they stripped
Him naked and lashed His naked and bleeding body to a whipping-
post.  And how they wagged their heads and put out their tongues at
Him when He was on the tree, and invited Him to come down and
preach to them now, and they would all become His disciples.  Did
not Shame say the simple truth when he warned Faithful that
religion had always and from the beginning made its followers the
ridicule of their times?

If you are really going to be a religious man, Shame went on, you
will have to carry about with you a very tender conscience, and a
more unmanly and miserable thing than a tender conscience I cannot
conceive.  A tender conscience will cost you something, let me tell
you, to keep it.  If nothing else, a tender conscience will all
your life long expose you to the mockery and the contempt of all
the brave spirits of the time.  That also is true.  At any rate, a
tender conscience will undoubtedly compel its possessor to face the
brave spirits of the time.  There is a good story told to this
present point about Sir Robert Peel, a Prime Minister of our Queen.
When a young man, Peel was one of the guests at a select dinner-
party in the West-end of London.  And after the ladies had left the
table the conversation of the gentlemen took a turn such that it
could not have taken as long as the ladies were present.  Peel took
no share in the stories or the merriment that went on, and, at
last, he rose up and ordered his carriage, and, with a burning
face, left the room.  When he was challenged as to why he had
broken up the pleasant party so soon, he could only reply that his
conscience would not let him stay any longer.  No doubt Peel felt
the mocking laughter that he left behind him, but, as Shame said to
Faithful, the tenderness of the young statesman's conscience
compelled him to do as he did.  But we are not all Peels.  And
there are plenty of workshops and offices and dinner-tables in our
own city, where young men who would walk up to the cannon's mouth
without flinching have not had Peel's courage to protest against
indecency or to confess that they belonged to an evangelical
church.  If a church is only sufficiently unevangelical there is no
trial of conscience or of courage in confessing that you belong to
it.  But as Shame so ably and honestly said, that type of religion
that creates a tender conscience in its followers, and sets them to
watch their words and their ways, and makes them tie themselves up
from all hectoring liberty--to choose that religion, and to cleave
to it to the end, will make a young man the ridicule still of all
the brave spirits round about him.  Ambitious young men get
promotion and reward every day among us for desertions and
apostasies in religion, for which, if they had been guilty of the
like in war, they would have been shot.  'And so you are a Free
Churchman, I am told.'  That was all that was said.  But the sharp
youth understood without any more words, and he made his choice
accordingly; till it is becoming a positive surprise to find the
rising members of certain professions in certain churches.  The
Quakers have a proverb in England that a family carriage never
drives for two generations past the parish church door.  Of which
state of matters Shame showed himself a shrewd prophet two hundred
years ago when he said that but few of the rich and the mighty and
the wise remained long of Faithful's Puritan opinion unless they
were first persuaded to be fools, and to be of a voluntary fondness
to venture the loss of all.

And I will tell you two other things, said sharp-sighted and plain-
spoken Shame, that your present religion will compel you to do if
you adhere to it.  It will compel you from time to time to ask your
neighbour's forgiveness even for petty faults, and it will insist
with you that you make restitution when you have done the weak and
the friendless any hurt or any wrong.  And every manly mind will
tell you that life is not worth having on such humbling terms as
those are.  Whatever may be thought about Shame in other respects,
it cannot be denied that he had a sharp eye for the facts of life,
and a shrewd tongue in setting those facts forth.  He has hit the
blot exactly in the matter of our first duty to our neighbour; he
has put his finger on one of the matters where so many of us,
through a false shame, come short.  It costs us a tremendous
struggle with our pride to go to our neighbour and to ask his
forgiveness for a fault, petty fault or other.  Did you ever do it?
When did you do it last, to whom, and for what?  One Sabbath
morning, now many years ago, I had occasion to urge this elementary
evangelical duty on my people here, and I did it as plainly as I
could.  Next day one of my young men, who is now a devoted and
honoured elder, came to me and told me that he had done that
morning what his conscience yesterday told him in the church to do.
He had gone to a neighbour's place of business, had asked for an
interview, and had begged his neighbour's pardon.  I am sure
neither of those two men have forgotten that moment, and the
thought of it has often since nerved me to speak plainly about some
of their most unwelcome duties to my people.  Shame, no doubt,
pulled back my noble friend's hand when it was on the office bell,
but, like Faithful in the text, he shook him out of his company and
went in.  I spoke of the remarkable justice of the newspaper press
in the opening of these remarks.  And it so happens that, as I lay
down my pen to rest my hand after writing this sentence and lift a
London evening paper, I read this editorial note, set within the
well-known brackets at the end of an indignant and expostulatory
letter:  ['Our correspondent's complaint is just.  The paragraph
imputing bad motives should not have been admitted.']  I have no
doubt that editor felt some shame as he handed that apologetic note
to the printer.  But not to speak of any other recognition and
recompense, he has the recompense of the recognition of all
honourable-minded men who have read that honourable admission and
apology.

Shame was quite right in his scoff about restitution also.  For
restitution rings like a trumpet tone through the whole of the law
of Moses, and then the New Testament republishes that law if only
in the exquisite story of Zaccheus.  And, indeed, take it
altogether, I do not know where to find in the same space a finer
vindication of Puritan pulpit ethics than just in this taunting and
terrifying attack on Faithful.  There is no better test of true
religion both as it is preached and practised than just to ask for
and to grant forgiveness, and to offer and accept restitution.
Now, does your public and private life defend and adorn your
minister's pulpit in these two so practical matters?  Could your
minister point to you as a proof of the ethics of evangelical
teaching?  Can any one in this city speak up in defence of your
church and thus protest:  'Say what you like about that church and
its ministers, all I can say is, that its members know how to make
an apology; as, also, how to pay back with interest what they at
one time damaged or defrauded'?  Can any old creditor's widow or
orphan stand up for our doctrine and defend our discipline pointing
to you?  If you go on to be a Puritan, said Shame to Faithful, you
will have to ask your neighbour's forgiveness even for petty
faults, and you will have to make restitution with usury where you
have taken anything from any one, and how will you like that?

And what did you say to all this, my brother?  Say?  I could not
tell what to say at the first.  I felt my blood coming up into my
face at some of the things that Shame said and threatened.  But, at
last, I began to consider that that which is highly esteemed among
men is often had in abomination with God.  And I said to myself
again, Shame tells me what men do and what men think, but he has
told me nothing about what He thinks with Whom I shall soon have
alone to do.  Therefore, thought I, what God thinks and says is
wisest and best, let all the men of the world say what they will.
Let all false shame, then, depart from my heart, for how else shall
I look upon my Lord, and how shall He look upon me at His coming?



TALKATIVE



'A man full of talk.'--Zophar.
'Let thy words be few.'--The Preacher.
'The soul of religion is the practick part.'--Christian.

Since we all have a tongue, and since so much of our time is taken
up with talk, a simple catalogue of the sins of the tongue is
enough to terrify us.  The sins of the tongue take up a much larger
space in the Bible than we would believe till we have begun to
suffer from other men's tongues and especially from our own.  The
Bible speaks a great deal more and a great deal plainer about the
sins of the tongue than any of our pulpits dare to do.  In the
Psalms alone you would think that the psalmists scarcely suffer
from anything else worth speaking about but the evil tongues of
their friends and of their enemies.  The Book of Proverbs also is
full of the same lashing scourge.  And James the Just, in a passage
of terrible truth and power, tells us that we are already as good
as perfect men if we can bridle our tongue; and that, on the other
hand, if we do not bridle our tongue, all our seeming to be
religious is a sham and a self-deception,--that man's religion is
vain.

With many men and many women great talkativeness is a matter of
simple temperament and mental constitution.  And a talkative habit
would be a childlike and an innocent habit if the heart of talker
and the hearts of those to whom he talks so much were only full of
truth and love.  But our hearts and our neighbours' hearts being
what they are, in the multitude of words there wanteth not sin.  So
much of our talk is about our absent neighbours, and there are so
many misunderstandings, prejudices, ambitions, competitions,
oppositions, and all kinds of cross-interests between us and our
absent neighbours, that we cannot long talk about them till our
hearts have run our tongues into all manner of trespass.  Bishop
Butler discourses on the great dangers that beset a talkative
temperament with almost more than all his usual sagacity,
seriousness, and depth.  And those who care to see how the greatest
of our modern moralists deals with their besetting sin should lose
no time in possessing and mastering Butler's great discourse.  It
is a truly golden discourse, and it ought to be read at least once
a month by all the men and all the women who have tongues in their
heads.  Bishop Butler points out to his offending readers, in a way
they can never forget, the certain mischief they do to themselves
and to other people just by talking too much.  But there are far
worse sins that our tongues fall into than the bad enough sins that
spring out of impertinent and unrestrained loquacity.  There are
many times when our talk, long or short, is already simple and
downright evil.  It is ten to one, it is a hundred to one, that you
do not know and would not believe how much you fall every day and
in every conversation into one or other of the sins of the tongue.
If you would only begin to see and accept this, that every time you
speak or hear about your absent neighbour what you would not like
him to speak or hear about you, you are in that a talebearer, a
slanderer, a backbiter, or a liar,--when you begin to see and admit
that about yourself, you will not wonder at what the Bible says
with such bitter indignation about the diabolical sins of the
tongue.  If you would just begin to-night to watch yourselves--on
the way home from church, at home after the day is over, to-morrow
morning when the letters and the papers are opened, and so on,--how
instinctively, incessantly, irrepressibly you speak about the
absent in a way you would be astounded and horrified to be told
they were at that moment speaking about you, then you would soon be
wiser than all your teachers in the sins and in the government of
the tongue.  And you would seven times every day pluck out your
tongue before God till He gives it back to you clean and kind in
that land where all men shall love their neighbours, present and
absent, as themselves.

Take detraction for an example, one of the commonest, and, surely,
one of the most detestable of the sins of the tongue.  And the
etymology here, as in this whole region, is most instructive and
most impressive.  In detraction you DRAW AWAY something from your
neighbour that is most precious and most dear to him.  In
detraction you are a thief, and a thief of the falsest and
wickedest kind.  For your neighbour's purse is trash, while his
good name is far more precious to him than all his gold.  Some one
praises your neighbour in your hearing, his talents, his
performances, his character, his motives, or something else that
belongs to your neighbour.  Some one does that in your hearing who
either does not know you, or who wishes to torture and expose you,
and you fall straight into the snare thus set for you, and begin at
once to belittle, depreciate, detract from, and run down your
neighbour, who has been too much praised for your peace of mind and
your self-control.  You insinuate something to his disadvantage and
dishonour.  You quote some authority you have heard to his hurt.
And so on past all our power to picture you.  For detraction has a
thousand devices taught to it by the master of all such devices,
wherewith to drag down and defile the great and the good.  But with
all you can say or do, you cannot for many days get out of your
mind the heart-poisoning praise you heard spoken of your envied
neighbour.  Never praise any potter's pots in the hearing of
another potter, said the author of the Nicomachean Ethics.
Aristotle said potter's pots, but he really all the time was
thinking of a philosopher's books; only he said potter's pots to
draw off his readers' attention from himself.  Now, always remember
that ancient and wise advice.  Take care how you praise a potter's
pots, a philosopher's books, a woman's beauty, a speaker's speech,
a preacher's sermon to another potter, philosopher, woman, speaker,
or preacher; unless, indeed, you maliciously wish secretly to
torture them, or publicly to expose them, or, if their
sanctification is begun, to sanctify them to their most inward and
spiritual sanctification.

Backbiting, again, would seem at first sight to be a sin of the
teeth rather than of the tongue, only, no sharpest tooth can tear
you when your back is turned like your neighbour's evil tongue.
Pascal has many dreadful things about the corruption and misery of
man, but he has nothing that strikes its terrible barb deeper into
all our consciences than this, that if all our friends only knew
what we have said about them behind their back, we would not have
four friends in all the world.  Neither we would.  I know I would
not have one.  How many would you have?  And who would they be?
You cannot name them.  I defy you to name them.  They do not exist.
The tongue can no man tame.

'Giving of characters' also takes up a large part of our everyday
conversation.  We cannot well help characterising, describing, and
estimating one another.  But, as far as possible, when we see the
conversation again approaching that dangerous subject, we should
call to mind our past remorse; we should suppose our absent
neighbour present; we should imagine him in our place and ourselves
in his place, and so turn the rising talk into another channel.
For, the truth is, few of us are able to do justice to our
neighbour when we begin to discuss and describe him.  Generosity in
our talk is far easier for us than justice.  It was this incessant
giving of characters that our Lord had in His eye when He said in
His Sermon on the Mount, Judge not.  But our Lord might as well
never have uttered that warning word for all the attention we give
it.  For we go on judging one another and sentencing one another as
if we were entirely and in all things blameless ourselves, and as
if God had set us up in our blamelessness in His seat of judgment
over all our fellows.  How seldom do we hear any one say in a
public debate or in a private conversation, I don't know; or, It is
no matter of mine; or, I feel that I am not in possession of all
the facts; or, It may be so, but I must not judge.  We never hear
such things as these said.  No one pays the least attention to the
Preacher on the Mount.  And if any one says to us, I must not
judge, we never forgive him, because his humility and his obedience
so condemn all our ill-formed, prejudiced, rash, and ill-natured
judgments of our neighbour.  Since, therefore, so Butler sums up,
it is so hard for us to enter on our neighbour's character without
offending the law of Christ, we should learn to decline that kind
of conversation altogether, and determine to get over that strong
inclination most of us have, to be continually talking about the
concerns, the behaviour, and the deserts of our neighbours.

Now, it was all those vices of the tongue in full outbreak in the
day of James the Just that made that apostle, half in sorrow, half
in anger, demand of all his readers that they should henceforth
begin to bridle their tongues.  And, like all that most practical
apostle's counsels, that is a most impressive and memorable
commandment.  For, it is well known that all sane men who either
ride on or drive unruly horses, take good care to bridle their
horses well before they bring them out of their stable door.  And
then they keep their bridle-hand firm closed on the bridle-rein
till their horses are back in the stable again.  Especially and
particularly they keep a close eye and a firm hand on their horse's
bridle on all steep inclines and at all sharp angles and sudden
turns in the road; when sudden trains are passing and when stray
dogs are barking.  If the rider or the driver of a horse did not
look at nothing else but the bridle of his horse, both he and his
horse under him would soon be in the ditch,--as so many of us are
at the present moment because we have an untamed tongue in our
mouth on which we have not yet begun to put the bridle of truth and
justice and brotherly love.  Indeed, such woe and misery has an
untamed tongue wrought in other churches and in other and more
serious ages than ours, that special religious brotherhoods have
been banded together just on the special and strict engagement that
they would above all things put a bridle on their tongues.  'What
are the chief cares of a young convert?' asked such a convert at an
aged Carthusian.  'I said I will take heed to my ways that I
trespass not with my tongue,' replied the saintly father.  'Say no
more for the present,' interrupted the youthful beginner; 'I will
go home and practise that, and will come again when I have
performed it.'

Now, whatever faults that tall man had who took up so much of
Faithful's time and attention, he was a saint compared with the men
and the women who have just passed before us.  Talkative, as John
Bunyan so scornfully names that tall man, though he undoubtedly
takes up too much time and too much space in Bunyan's book, was not
a busybody in other men's matters at any rate.  Nobody could call
him a detractor or a backbiter or a talebearer or a liar.
Christian knew him well, and had known him long, but Christian was
not afraid to leave him alone with Faithful.  We all know men we
feel it unsafe to leave long alone with our friends.  We feel sure
that they will be talking about us, and that to our hurt, as soon
as our backs are about.  But to give that tall man his due, he was
not given with all his talk to tale-bearing or scandal or
detraction.  Had he been guilty of any of these things, Faithful
would soon have found him out, and would have left him to go to the
Celestial City by himself.  But, after talking for half a day with
Talkative, instead of finding out anything wrong in the tall man's
talk, Faithful was so taken and so struck with it, that he stepped
across to Christian and said, 'What a brave companion we have got!
Surely this man will make a most excellent pilgrim!'  'So I once
thought too,' said Christian, 'till I went to live beside him, and
have to do with him in the business of daily life.'  Yes, it is
near neighbourhood and the business of everyday life that try a
talking man.  If you go to a meeting for prayer, and hear some men
praying and speaking on religious subjects, you would say to
yourself, What a good man that is, and how happy must his wife and
children and servants and neighbours be with such an example always
before them, and with such an intercessor for them always with God!
But if you were to go home with that so devotional man, and try to
do business with him, and were compelled to cross him and go
against him, you would find out why Christian smiled so when
Faithful was so full of Talkative's praises.

But of all the religiously-loquacious men of our day, your
ministers are the chief.  For your ministers must talk in public,
and that often and at great length, whether they are truly
religious men at home or no.  It is their calling to talk to you
unceasingly about religious matters.  You chose them to be your
ministers because they could talk well.  You would not put up with
a minister who could not talk well on religious things.  You
estimate them by their talk.  You praise and pay them by their
talk.  And if they are to live, talk incessantly to you about
religion they must, and they do.  If any other man among us is not
a religious man, well, then, he can at least hold his tongue.
There is no necessity laid on him to speak in public about things
that he does not practise at home.  But we hard-bested ministers
must go on speaking continually about the most solemn things.  And
if we are not extraordinarily watchful over ourselves, and
extraordinarily and increasingly conscientious, if we are not
steadily growing in inwardness and insight and depth and real
spirituality of mind and life ourselves, we cannot escape,--our
calling in life will not let us escape,--becoming as sounding
brass.  There is an awful sentence in Butler that should be written
in letters of fire in every minister's conscience, to the effect
that continually going over religion in talk and making fine
pictures of it in the pulpit, creates a professional insensibility
to personal religion that is the everlasting ruin of multitudes of
eloquent ministers.  That is true.  We ministers all feel that to
be true.  Our miserable experience tells us that is only too true
of ourselves.  What a flood of demoralising talk has been poured
out from the pulpits of this one city to-day!--demoralising to
preachers and to hearers both, because not intended to be put in
practice.  How few of those who have talked and heard talk all this
day about divine truth and human duty, have made the least
beginning or the least resolve to live as they have spoken and
heard!  And, yet, all will in words again admit that the soul of
religion is the practick part, and that the tongue without the
heart and the life is but death and corruption.

Let us, then, this very night begin to do something practical after
all this talk about talk.  And let us all begin to do something in
the direct line of our present talk.  What a noble congregation of
evangelical Carthusians that would make us if we all put a bridle
on our tongue to-night before we left this house.  For we all have
neighbours, friends, enemies, against whom we every day sin with
our unbridled tongue.  We all have acquaintances we are ashamed to
meet, we have been so unkind and so unjust to them with our tongue.
We hang down our head when they shake our hand.  Yes, we know the
men quite well of whom Pascal speaks.  We know many men who would
never speak to us again if they only knew how, and how often, we
have spoken about them behind their back.  Well, let us sin against
them, and against ourselves, and against our Master's command and
example no more.  Let this night and this lecture on Talkative and
his kindred see the last of our sin against our ill-used neighbour.
Let us promise God and our own consciences to-night, that we shall
all this week put on a bridle about that man, and about that
subject, and in that place, and in that company.  Let us say, God
helping me, I shall for all this week not speak about that man at
all, anything either good or bad, nor on that subject, nor will I
let the conversation turn into that channel at all if I can help
it.  And God will surely help us, till, after weeks and years of
such prayer and such practice, we shall by slow degrees, and after
many defeats, be able to say with the Psalmist, 'I will take heed
to my ways, that I sin not with my tongue.  I will keep my mouth
with a bridle.  I will be dumb with silence.  I will hold my peace
even from good.'



JUDGE HATE-GOOD



'Hear, O heads of Jacob, and ye princes of the house of Israel . .
. who hate the good and love the evil.'--Micah.

The portrait of Judge Hate-good in The Pilgrim's Progress is but a
poor replica, as our artists say, of the portrait of Judge Jeffreys
in our English history books.  I am sure you have often read, with
astonishment at Bunyan's literary power, his wonderful account of
the trial of Faithful, when, as Bunyan says, he was brought forth
to his trial in order to his condemnation.  We have the whole
ecclesiastical jurisprudence of Charles and James Stuart put before
us in that single satirical sentence.  But, powerful as Bunyan's
whole picture of Judge Hate-good's court is, it is a tame and a
poor picture compared with what all the historians tell us of the
injustice and cruelty of the court of Judge Jeffreys.  Macaulay's
portrait of the Lord Chief Justice of England for ferocity and
fiendishness beats out of sight Bunyan's picture of that judge who
keeps Satan's own seal in Bunyan's Book.  Jeffreys was bred for his
future work at the bar of the Old Bailey, a bar already proverbial
for the licence of its tongue and for the coarseness of its cases.
Jeffreys served his apprenticeship for the service that our two
last Stuarts had in reserve for him so well, that he soon became,
so his beggared biographer describes him, the most consummate bully
that ever disgraced an English bench.  The boldest impudence when
he was a young advocate, and the most brutal ferocity when he was
an old judge, sat equally secure on the brazen forehead of George
Jeffreys.  The real and undoubted ability and scholarship of
Jeffreys only made his wickedness the more awful, and his whole
career the greater curse both to those whose tool he was, and to
those whose blood he drank daily.  Jeffreys drank brandy and sang
lewd songs all night, and he drank blood and cursed and swore on
the bench all day.  Just imagine the state of our English courts
when a judge could thus assail a poor wretch of a woman after
passing a cruel sentence upon her.  'Hangman,' shouted the ermined
brute, 'Hangman, pay particular attention to this lady.  Scourge
her soundly, man.  Scourge her till the blood runs.  It is the
Christmas season; a cold season for madam to strip in.  See,
therefore, man, that you warm her shoulders thoroughly.'  And you
all know who Richard Baxter was.  You have all read his seraphic
book, The Saints' Rest.  Well, besides being the Richard Baxter so
well known to our saintly fathers and mothers, he was also, and he
was emphatically, the peace-maker of the Puritan party.  Baxter's
political principles were of the most temperate and conciliatory,
and indeed, almost royalist kind.  He was a man of strong passions,
indeed, but all the strength and heat of his passions ran out into
his hatred of sin and his love of holiness, and an unsparing and
consuming care for the souls of his people.  Very Faithful himself
stood before the bar of Judge Jeffreys in the person of Richard
Baxter.  It took all the barefaced falsehood and scandalous
injustice of the crown prosecutors to draw out the sham indictment
that was read out in court against inoffensive Richard Baxter.  But
what was lacking in the charge of the crown was soon made up by the
abominable scurrility of the judge.  'You are a schismatical
knave,' roared out Jeffreys, as soon as Baxter was brought into
court.  'You are an old hypocritical villain.'  And then, clasping
his hands and turning up his eyes, he sang through his nose:  'O
Lord, we are Thy peculiar people:  we are Thy dear and only
people.'  'You old blockhead,' he again roared out, 'I will have
you whipped through the city at the tail of the cart.  By the grace
of God I will look after you, Richard.'  And the tiger would have
been as good as his word had not an overpowering sense of shame
compelled the other judges to protest and get Baxter's inhuman
sentence commuted to fine and imprisonment.  And so on, and so on.
But it was Jeffreys' 'Western Circuit,' as it was called, that
filled up the cup of his infamy--an infamy, say the historians,
that will last as long as the language and the history of England
last.  The only parallel to it is the infamy of a royal house and a
royal court that could welcome home and promote to honour such a
detestable miscreant as Jeffreys was.  But the slaughter in
Somerset was only over in order that a similar slaughter in London
might begin.  Let those who have a stomach for more blood and tears
follow out the hell upon earth that James Stuart and George
Jeffreys together let loose on the best life of England in their
now fast-shortening day.  Was Judge Jeffreys, some of you will ask
me, born and bred in hell?  Was the devil his father, and original
sin his mother?  Or, was he not the very devil himself come to
earth for a season in English flesh?  No, my brethren, not so.
Judge Jeffreys was one of ourselves.  Little George Jeffreys was
born and brought up in a happy English home.  He was baptised and
confirmed in an English church.  He took honours in an English
university.  He ate dinners, was called to the bar, conducted
cases, and took silk in an English court of justice.  And in the
ripeness of his years and of his services, he wore the honourable
ermine and sat upon the envied wool-sack of an English sovereign.
It would have been far less awful and far less alarming to think
of, had Judge Jeffreys been, as you supposed, a pure devil let
loose on the Church of Christ and the awakening liberty of England.
But some innocent soul will ask me next whether there has ever been
any other monster on the face of the earth like Judge Jeffreys; and
whether by any possibility there are any such monsters anywhere in
our own day.  Yes, truth compels me to reply.  Yes, there are,
plenty, too many.  Only their environment, nowadays, as our
naturalists say, does not permit them to grow to such strength and
dimensions as those of James Stuart, and George Jeffreys, his
favourite judge.  At the same time, be not deceived by your own
deceitful heart, nor by any other deceiver's smooth speeches.
Judge Jeffreys is in yourself, only circumstances have not yet let
him fully show himself in you.  Still, if you look close enough and
deep enough into your own hearts, you will see the same wicked
light glancing sometimes there that used so to terrify Judge
Jeffreys' prisoners when they saw it in his wicked eyes.  If you
lay your ear close enough to your own heart, you will sometimes
hear something of that same hiss with which that human serpent
sentenced to torture and to death the men and the women who would
not submit to his command.  The same savage laughter also will
sometimes all but escape your lips as you think of how your enemy
has been made to suffer in body and in estate.  O yes, the very
same hell-broth that ran for blood in Judge Jeffreys' heart is in
all our hearts also; and those who have the least of its poison
left in their hearts will be the foremost to confess its presence,
and to hate and condemn and bewail themselves on account of its
terrible dregs.

HATE-GOOD is an awful enough name for any human being to bear.
Those who really know what goodness is, and then, what hatred is,--
they will feel how awful a thing it is for any man to hate
goodness.  But there is something among us sinful men far more
awful than even that, and that is to hate God.  The carnal mind,
writes the apostle Paul to the Romans--and it is surely the most
terrible sentence that often terrible enough apostle ever wrote--
the carnal mind is enmity against God.  And Dr. John Owen
annotating on that sentence is equally terrible.  The carnal mind,
he says, has 'chosen a great enemy indeed.'  And having mentioned
John Owen, will you let me once more beseech all students of
divinity, that is, all students, amongst other things, of the
desperate depravity of the human heart, to read John Owen's sixth
volume till they have it by heart,--by a broken, believing heart.
Owen On Indwelling Sin is one of the greatest works of the great
Puritan period.  It is a really great, and as we nowadays say, a
truly scientific work to the bargain.  But all that by the way.
Yes, this carnal heart that is still left in every one of us has
chosen a great enemy, and it would need both strong and faithful
allies in order to fight him.  The hatred that His Son also met
with when He was in this world is one of the most hateful pages of
this hateful world's hateful history.  He knew His own heart
towards His enemies, and thus He was able to say to the Searcher of
Hearts with His dying breath, They hated Me without a cause.  Truly
our hatred is hottest when it is most unjust.

'Look to yourselves,' wrote the apostle John to the elect lady and
her children.  Yes; let us all look sharply and suspiciously to
ourselves in this matter now in hand, and we shall not need John
Owen nor anybody else to discover to us the hatred and the
hatefulness of our own hearts.  Look to yourselves, and the work of
the law will soon be fulfilled in you.  Homo homini lupus, taught
an old philosopher who had studied moral philosophy not in books so
much as in his own heart.  'Is no man naturally good?' asked
innocent Lady Macleod of Dunvegan Castle at her guest, Dr. Samuel
Johnson.  'No, madam, no more than a wolf.'  That is quite past all
question with all those who either in natural morals or in revealed
religion look to and know and characterise themselves.  We have all
an inborn propensity to dislike one another, and a very small
provocation will suddenly blow that banked-up furnace into a flame.
It is ever present with me, says self-examining Paul, and hence its
so sudden and so destructive outbreaks.  So the written or the
printed name of our enemy, his image in our mind, his passing step,
his figure out of the window; his wife, his child, his carriage,
his cart in the street, anything, everything will stir up our heart
at the man we do not like.  And the whole of our so honest Bible,
our present text, and the illustrations of our text in Judge
Jeffreys' and Judge Hate-good's courts, all go to show that the
better a man is the more sometimes will we hate him.  Good men,
better men than we are, men who in public life and in private life
pursue great and good ends, of necessity cross and go counter to us
in our pursuit of small, selfish, evil ends, and of necessity we
hate them.  For, cross a selfish sinner sufficiently and you have a
very devil--as many good men, if they knew it, have in us.  Again,
good men who come into contact with us cannot help seeing our bad
lives, our tempers, our selfishness, our public and private vices;
and we see that they see us, and we cannot love those whose averted
eye so goes to our conscience.  And not only in the hatred of good
men, but if you know of God how to watch yourselves, you will find
yourselves out every day also in the hatred of good movements, good
causes, good institutions, and good works.  There are doctors who
would far rather hear of their rival's patient expiring in his
hands than hear their rival's success trumpeted through all the
town.  There are ministers, also, who would rather that the masses
of the city and the country sank yet deeper into improvidence and
drink and neglect of ordinances than that they were rescued by any
other church than their own.  They hate to hear of the successes of
another church.  There are party politicians who would rather that
the ship of the state ran on the rocks both in her home and her
foreign policy than that the opposite party should steer her amid a
nation's cheers into harbour.  And so of good news.  I will stake
the divine truth of this evening's Scriptures, and of their
historical and imaginative illustrations, on the feelings, if you
know how to observe, detect, characterise, and confess them,--the
feelings, I say, that will rise in your heart to-morrow morning
when you read what is good news to other men, even to good men, and
to the families and family interests of good men.  It does not
matter one atom into what profession, office, occupation, interest
you track the corrupt heart of man, as sure as a substance casts a
shadow, so sure will you find your own selfish heart hating
goodness when the goodness does not serve or flatter you.

Now, though they will never be many, yet there must be some men
among us, one here and another there, who have so looked at and
found out themselves.  I can well believe that some men here came
up to this house to-night trembling in their heart all the way.
They felt the very advertisement go through them like a knife:
they felt that they were summoned up hither almost by name as to
judgment.  For they feel every day, though they have never told
their feelings to any, that they have this horrible heart deep-
seated within them to love evil and to hate good.  They gnash their
teeth at themselves as they catch themselves rejoicing in iniquity.
They feel their hearts expanding, and they know that their faces
shine, when you tell them evil tidings.  They sicken and lose heart
and sit solitary when you carry to them a good report.  They feel
as John Bunyan felt, that no one but the devil can equal them in
pollution of heart.  And their wonder sometimes is that the
Searcher of Hearts does not drive them down where devils dwell and
hate God and man and one another.  They look around them when the
penitential psalm is being sung, and they smile bitterly to
themselves.  O people of God, they say, you do not know what you
are saying.  Leave that psalm to me.  I can sing it.  I can tell to
God what He knows about sin, and about sin in the heart.  Stand
away back from me, that man says, for I am a leper.  The chief of
sinners is beside you.  A whited sepulchre stands open beside you.-
-Stop now, O hating and hateful man, and let me speak for a single
moment before we separate.  Before you say any more about yourself,
and before you leave the house of God, lift up your broken heart
and with all your might bless God that He has opened your eyes and
taught you how to look at yourself and how to hate yourself.  There
are hundreds of honest Christian men and women in this house at
this moment to whom God has not done as, in His free grace, He has
done to you.  For He has not only begun a good work in you, but He
has begun that special and peculiar work which, when it goes on to
perfection, makes a great and an eminent saint of God.  To know
your own heart as you evidently know it, and to hate it as you say
you hate it, and to hunger after a clean heart as, with every
breath, you hunger,--all that, if you would only believe it, sets
you, or will yet set you, high up among the people of God.  Be
comforted; it is your bounden duty to be comforted.  God deserves
it at your hands that you be more than comforted amid such
unmistakable signs of His eminent grace to you.  And be patient
under your exceptional sanctification.  Rome was not built in a
day.  You cannot reverse the awful law of your sanctification.  You
cannot be saved by Jesus Christ and His Holy Spirit without seeing
yourself, and you cannot see yourself without hating yourself, and
you cannot begin to hate yourself without all your hatred
henceforth turning against yourself.  You are deep in the red-hot
bosom of the refiner's fire.  And when you are once sufficiently
tried by the Divine Refiner of Souls, He will in His own good time
and way bring you out as gold.  Be patient, therefore, till the
coming of the Lord.  And say continually amid all your increasing
knowledge of yourself, and amid all your increasing hatred of
yourself, 'As for me, I will behold Thy face in righteousness; I
shall be satisfied when I awake with Thy likeness.'



FAITHFUL IN VANITY FAIR {2}



'Be thou faithful.'--Rev. 2. 10.

The breadth of John Bunyan's mind, the largeness of his heart, and
the tolerance of his temper all come excellently out in his fine
portrait of Faithful.  New beginners in personal religion, when
they first take up The Pilgrim's Progress in earnest, always try to
find out something in themselves that shall somewhat correspond to
the recorded experience of Christian, the chief pilgrim.  And they
are afraid that all is not right with them unless they, like him,
have had, to begin with, a heavy burden on their back.  They look
for something in their religious life that shall answer to the
Slough of Despond also, to the Hill Difficulty, to the House
Beautiful, and, especially and indispensably, to the place somewhat
ascending with a cross upon it and an open sepulchre beneath it.
And because they cannot always find all these things in themselves
in the exact order and in the full power in which they are told of
Christian in Bunyan's book, they begin to have doubts about
themselves as to whether they are true pilgrims at all.  But here
is Faithful, with whom Christian held such sweet and confidential
discourse, and yet he had come through not a single one of all
these things.  The two pilgrims had come from the same City of
Destruction indeed, and they had met at the gate of Vanity and
passed through Vanity Fair together, but, till they embraced one
another again in the Celestial City, that was absolutely all the
experience they had in common.  Faithful had never had any such
burden on his back as that was which had for so long crushed
Christian to the earth.  And the all but complete absence of such a
burden may have helped to let Faithful get over the Slough of
Despond dry shod.  He had the good lot to escape Sinai also and the
Hill Difficulty, and his passing by the House Beautiful and not
making the acquaintance of Discretion and Prudence and Charity may
have had something to do with the fact that one named Wanton had
like to have done him such a mischief.  His remarkable experiences,
however, with Adam the First, with Moses, and then with the Man
with holes in His hands, all that makes up a page in Faithful's
autobiography we could ill have spared.  His encounter with Shame
also, and soon afterwards with Talkative, are classical passages in
his so individual history.  Altogether, it would be almost
impossible for us to imagine two pilgrims talking so heartily
together, and yet so completely unlike one another.  A very
important lesson surely as to how we should abstain from measuring
other men by ourselves, as well as ourselves by other men; an
excellent lesson also as to how we should learn to allow for all
possible varieties among good men, both in their opinions, their
experiences, and their attainments.  True Puritan as the author of
The Pilgrim's Progress is, he is no Procrustes.  He does not cut
down all his pilgrims to one size, nor does he clip them all into
one pattern.  They are all thinking men, but they are not all men
of one way of thinking.  John Bunyan is as fresh as Nature herself,
and as free and full as Holy Scripture herself in the variety, in
the individuality, and even in the idiosyncrasy of his spiritual
portrait gallery.

Vanity Fair is one of John Bunyan's universally-admitted
masterpieces.  The very name of the fair is one of his happiest
strokes.  Thackeray's famous book owes half its popularity to the
happy name he borrowed from John Bunyan.  Thackeray's author's
heart must have leaped in his bosom when Vanity Fair struck him as
a title for his great satire.  'Then I saw in my dream that when
they were got out of the wilderness they presently saw a town
before them, and the name of that town is Vanity, and at that town
there is a fair kept called Vanity Fair.  The fair is kept all the
year long, and it beareth the name of Vanity Fair, because the town
where it is kept is lighter than Vanity.  And, also, because all
that is sold there is vanity.  As is the saying of the wise, All
that cometh is vanity.  The fair is no new erected business, but a
thing of ancient standing:  I will show you the original of it.
About five thousand years ago there were pilgrims walking to the
Celestial City, as these two honest persons now are, and Beelzebub,
Apollyon, and Legion, with their companions, perceiving that by the
path that the pilgrims made, that their way to the city lay through
this town of Vanity, they contrived there to set up a fair:  a fair
wherein should be sold all sorts of vanity, and that it should last
all the year long.  Therefore at this fair are all such merchandise
sold as houses, lands, trades, places, honours, preferments,
titles, countries, kingdoms, pleasures, and delights of all sorts,
as wives, husbands, children, masters, servants, lives, blood,
bodies, souls, silver, gold, precious stones, and what not.  And,
moreover, at this fair at all times there is to be seen juggling,
cheats, games, plays, fools, apes, knaves, and rogues, and that of
every kind.'  And then our author goes on to tell us the names of
the various streets and rows where such and such wares are vended.
And from that again he goes on to tell how the Prince of princes
Himself went at one time through this same fair, and that upon a
fair day too, and how the lord of the fair himself came and took
Him from street to street to try to get Him induced to cheapen and
buy some of the vain merchandise.  But as it turned out He had no
mind to the merchandise in question, and He therefore passed
through the town without laying out so much as one farthing upon
its vanities.  The fair, therefore, you will see, is of long
standing and a very great fair.  Now, our two pilgrims had heard of
all that, they remembered also what Evangelist had told them about
the fair, and so they buttoned up their pockets and pushed through
the booths in the hope of getting out at the upper gate before any
one had time to speak to them.  But that was not possible, for they
were soon set upon by the men of the fair, who cried after them:
'Hail, strangers, look here, what will you buy?'  'We buy the truth
only,' said Faithful, 'and we do not see any of that article of
merchandise set out on any of your stalls.'  And from that began a
hubbub that ended in a riot, and the riot in the apprehension and
shutting up in a public cage of the two innocent pilgrims.  Lord
Hate-good was the judge on the bench of Vanity in the day of their
trial, and the three witnesses who appeared in the witness-box
against the two prisoners were Envy, Superstition, and Pickthank.
The twelve jurymen who sat on their case were Mr. Blindman, Mr. No-
good, Mr. Malice, Mr. Love-lust, Mr. Live-loose, Mr. Heady, Mr.
High-mind, Mr. Enmity, Mr. Liar, Mr. Cruelty, Mr. Hate-light, and
Mr. Implacable,--Mr. Blindman to be the foreman.  And it was before
these men that Faithful was brought forth to his trial in order to
his condemnation.  And very soon after his trial Faithful came to
his end.  'Now I saw that there stood behind the multitude a
chariot and a couple of horses waiting for Faithful, who (so soon
as his adversaries had despatched him) was taken up into it, and
straightway was carried up through the clouds, with sound of
trumpet, the nearest way to the Celestial gate.'

Now, I cannot tell you how it was, I cannot account for it to
myself, but it is nevertheless absolutely true that as I was
reading my author last week and was meditating my present
exposition, it came somehow into my mind, and I could not get it
out of my mind, that there is a great and a close similarity
between John Bunyan's Vanity Fair and a general election.  And, all
I could do to keep the whole thing out of my mind, one similarity
after another would leap up into my mind and would not be put out
of it.  I protest that I did not go out to seek for such
similarities, but the more I frowned on them the thicker they came.
And then the further question arose as to whether I should write
them down or no; and then much more, as to whether I should set
them out before my people or no.  As you will easily believe, I was
immediately in a real strait as to what I should do.  I saw on the
one side what would be sure to be said by ill-natured people and
people of a hasty judgment.  And I saw with much more anxiety what
would be felt even when they restrained themselves from saying it
by timid and cautious and scrupulous people.  I had the full fear
of all such judges before my eyes; but, somehow, something kept
this before my eyes also, that, as Evangelist met the two pilgrims
just as they were entering the fair, so, for anything I knew to the
contrary, it might be of God, that I also, in my own way, should
warn my people of the real and special danger that their souls will
be in for the next fortnight.  And as I thought of it a procession
of people passed before me all bearing to this day the stains and
scars they had taken on their hearts and their lives and their
characters at former general elections.  And, like Evangelist, I
felt a divine desire taking possession of me to do all I could to
pull my people out of gun-shot of the devil at this election.  And,
then, when I read again how both the pilgrims thanked Evangelist
for his exhortation, and told him withal that they would have him
speak further to them about the dangers of the way, I said at last
to myself, that the thanks of one true Christian saved in anything
and in any measure from the gun of the devil are far more to be
attended to by a minister than the blame and the neglect of a
hundred who do not know their hour of temptation and will not be
told it.  And so I took my pen and set down some similarities
between Vanity Fair and the approaching election, with some lessons
to those who are not altogether beyond being taught.

Well, then, in the first place, the only way to the Celestial City
ran through Vanity Fair; by no possibility could the advancing
pilgrims escape the temptations and the dangers of the fatal fair.
He that will go to the Celestial City and yet not go through Vanity
Fair must needs go out of the world.  And so it is with the
temptations and trials of the next ten days.  We cannot get past
them.  They are laid down right across our way.  And to many men
now in this house the next ten days will be a time of simply
terrible temptation.  If I had been quite sure that all my people
saw that and felt that, I would not have introduced here to-night
what some of them, judging too hastily, will certainly call this so
secular and unseemly subject.  But I am so afraid that many not
untrue, and in other things most earnest men amongst us, do not yet
know sufficiently the weakness and the evil of their own hearts,
that I wish much, if they will allow me, to put them on their
guard.  ''Tis hard,' said Contrite, who was a householder and had a
vote in the town of Vanity, ''tis hard keeping our hearts and our
spirits in any good order when we are in a cumbered condition.  And
you may be sure that we are full of hurry at fair-time.  He that
lives in such a place as this is, and that has to do with such as
we have to do with, has need of an item to caution him to take heed
every hour of the day.'  Now, if all my people, and all this day's
communicants, were only contrite enough, I would leave them to the
hurry of the approaching election with much more comfort.  But as
it is, I wish to give them such an item as I am able to caution
them for the next ten days.  Let them know, then, that their way
for the next fortnight lies, I will not say through a fair of
jugglings and cheatings, carried on by apes and knaves, but, to
speak without figure, their way certainly lies through what will be
to many of them a season of the greatest temptation to the very
worst of all possible sins--to anger and bitterness and ill-will;
to no end of evil-thinking and evil-speaking; to the breaking up of
life-long friendships; and to widespread and lasting damage to the
cause of Christ, which is the cause of truth and love, meekness and
a heavenly mind.  Now, amid all that, as Evangelist said to the two
pilgrims, look well to your own hearts.  Let none of all these evil
things enter your heart from the outside, and let none of all these
evil things come out of your hearts from the inside.  Set your
faces like a flint from the beginning against all evil-speaking and
evil-thinking.  Let your own election to the kingdom of heaven be
always before you, and walk worthy of it; and amid all the hurry of
things seen and temporal, believe steadfastly concerning the things
that are eternal, and walk worthy of them.

'We buy the truth and we sell it not again for anything,' was the
reply of the two pilgrims to every stall-keeper as they passed up
the fair, and this it was that made them to be so hated and hunted
down by the men of the fair.  And, in like manner, there is nothing
more difficult to get hold of at an election time than just the
very truth.  All the truth on any question is not very likely to be
found put forward in the programme of any man or any party, and,
even if it were, a general election is not the best time for you to
find it out.  'I design the search after truth to be the one
business of my life,' wrote the future Bishop Butler at the age of
twenty-one.  And whether you are to be a member of Parliament or a
silent voter for a member of Parliament, you, too, must love truth
and search for her as for hid treasure from your youth up.  You
must search for all kinds of truth,--historical, political,
scientific, and religious,--with much reading, much observation,
and much reflection.  And those who have searched longest and dug
deepest will always be found to be the most temperate, patient, and
forbearing with those who have not yet found the truth.  I do not
know who first said it, but he was a true disciple of Socrates and
Plato who first said it.  'Plato,' he said, 'is my friend, and
Socrates is my friend, but the truth is much more my friend.'
There is a thrill of enthusiasm, admiration and hope that goes
through the whole country and comes down out of history as often as
we hear or read of some public man parting with all his own past,
as well as with all his leaders and patrons and allies and
colleagues in the present, and taking his solitary way out after
the truth.  Many may call that man Quixotic, visionary,
unpractical, imprudent, and he may be all that and more, but to
follow conscience and the love of truth even when they are for the
time leading him wrong is noble, and is every way far better both
for himself and for the cause he serves, than if he were always
found following his leaders loyally and even walking in the way of
righteousness with the love of self and the love of party at bottom
ruling his heart.  How healthful and how refreshing at an election
time it is to hear a speech replete with the love of the truth,
full knowledge of the subject, and with the dignity, the good
temper, the respect for opponents, and the love of fair play that
full knowledge of the whole subject is so well fitted to bring with
it!  And next to hearing such a speaker is the pleasure of meeting
such a hearer or such a reader at such a time.  Now, I want such
readers and such hearers, if not such speakers, to be found all the
next fortnight among my office-bearers and my people.  Be sure you
say to some of your political opponents something like this:- 'I do
not profess to read all the speeches that fill the papers at
present.  I do not read all the utterances made even on my own
side, and much less all the utterances made on your side.  But
there is one of your speakers I always read, and I almost always
find him instructive and impressive, a gentleman, if not a
Christian.  He is fair, temperate, frank, bold, and independent;
and, to my mind at least, he always throws light on these so
perplexing questions.'  Now, if you have the intelligence and the
integrity and the fair-mindedness to say something like that to a
member of the opposite party you have poured oil on the waters of
party; nay, you are in that a wily politician, for you have almost,
just in saying that, won over your friend to your own side.  So
noble is the love of truth, and so potent is the high-principled
pursuit and the fearless proclamation of the truth.

A general election is a trying time to all kinds of public men, but
it is perhaps most trying of all to Christian ministers.  Unless
they are to disfranchise themselves and are to detach and shut
themselves in from all interest in public affairs altogether, an
election time is to our ministers, beyond any other class of
citizens perhaps, a peculiarly trying time.  How they are to escape
the Scylla of cowardice and the contempt of all free and true men
on the one hand, and the Charybdis of pride and self-will and scorn
of other men's opinions and wishes on the other, is no easy dilemma
to our ministers.  Some happily constituted and happily
circumstanced ministers manage to get through life, and even
through political life, without taking or giving a wound in all
their way.  They are so wise and so watchful; they are so
inoffensive, unprovoking, and conciliatory; and even where they are
not always all that, they have around them sometimes a people who
are so patient and tolerant and full of the old-fashioned respect
for their minister that they do not attempt to interfere with him.
Then, again, some ministers preach so well, and perform all their
pastoral work so well, that they make it unsafe and impossible for
the most censorious and intolerant of their people to find fault
with them.  But all our ministers are not like that.  And all our
congregations are not like that.  And those of our ministers who
are not like that must just be left to bear that which their past
unwisdom or misfortune has brought upon them.  Only, if they have
profited by their past mistakes or misfortunes, a means of grace,
and an opportunity of better playing the man is again at their
doors.  I am sure you will all join with me in the prayer that all
our ministers, as well as all their people, may come well out of
the approaching election.

There is yet one other class of public men, if I may call them so,
many of whom come almost worse out of an election time than even
our ministers, and that class is composed of those, who, to
continue the language of Vanity Fair, keep the cages of the fair.
I wish I had to-night, what I have not, the ear of the conductors
of our public journals.  For, what an omnipotence in God's
providence to this generation for good or evil is theirs!  If they
would only all consider well at election times, and at all times,
who they put into their cages and for what reason; if they would
only all ask what can that man's motives be for throwing such dirt
at his neighbour; if they would only all set aside all the letters
they will get during the next fortnight that are avowedly composed
on the old principle of calumniating boldly in the certainty that
some of it will stick, what a service they would do to the cause of
love and truth and justice, which is, surely, after all, their own
cause also!  The very best papers sin sadly in this respect when
their conductors are full for the time of party passion.  And it is
inexpressibly sad when a reader sees great journals to which he
owes a lifelong debt of gratitude absolutely poisoned under his
very eyes with the malignant spirit of untruthful partisanship.
But so long as our public cages are so kept, let those who are
exposed in them resolve to imitate Christian and Faithful, who
behaved themselves amid all their ill-usage yet more wisely, and
received all the ignominy and shame that was cast upon them with so
much meekness and patience that it actually won to their side
several of the men of the fair.

My brethren, this is the last time this season that I shall be able
to speak to you from this pulpit; and, perhaps, the last time
altogether.  But, if it so turns out, I shall not repent that the
last time I spoke to you, and that, too, immediately after the
communion table, the burden of my message was the burden of my
Master's message after the first communion table.  'If ye know
these things, happy are ye if ye do them.  A new commandment I give
unto you, that ye love one another.  By this shall all men know
that ye are My disciples, if ye have love one to another.  Herein
is My Father glorified, that ye bear much fruit, so shall ye be My
disciples.  These things have I spoken unto you that in Me ye might
have peace.  In the world ye shall have tribulation; but be of good
cheer, I have overcome the world.  Know ye what I have done unto
you?  Ye call Me Master and Lord, and ye say well, for so I am.'



BY-ENDS



'Ye seek Me, not because ye saw the miracles, but because ye did
eat of the loaves.'--Our Lord.

In no part of John Bunyan's ingenious book is his strong sense and
his sarcastic and humorous vein better displayed than just in his
description of By-ends, and in the full and particular account he
gives of the kinsfolk and affinity of By-ends.  Is there another
single stroke in all sacred literature better fitted at once to
teach the gayest and to make the gravest smile than just John
Bunyan's sketch of By-ends' great-grandfather, the founder of the
egoistical family of Fairspeech, who was, to begin with, but a
waterman who always looked one way and rowed another?  By-ends'
wife also is a true helpmate to her husband.  She was my Lady
Feigning's favourite daughter, under whose nurture and example the
young lady had early come to a quite extraordinary pitch of good
breeding; and now that she was a married woman, she and her husband
had, so their biographer tells us, two firm points of family
religion in which they were always agreed and according to which
they brought up all their children, namely, never to strive too
much against wind and tide, and always to watch when Religion was
walking on the sunny side of the street in his silver slippers, and
then at once to cross over and take his arm.  But abundantly
amusing and entertaining as John Bunyan is at the expense of By-
ends and his family and friends, he has far other aims in view than
the amusement and entertainment of his readers.  Bunyan uses all
his great gifts of insight and sense and humour and scorn so as to
mark unmistakably the road and to guide the progress of his
reader's soul to God, his chiefest end and his everlasting portion.

It was no small part of our Lord's life of humiliation on the
earth,--much more so than His being born in a low condition and
being made under the law,--to have to go about all His days among
men, knowing in every case and on every occasion what was in man.
It was a real humiliation to our Lord to see those watermen of the
sea of Tiberias sweating at their oars as they rowed round and
round the lake after Him; and His humiliation came still more home
to Him as often as He saw His own disciples disputing and pressing
who should get closest to Him while for a short season He walked in
the sunshine; just as it was His estate of exaltation already
begun, when He could enter into Himself and see to the bottom of
His own heart, till He was able to say that it was His very meat
and drink to do His father's will, and to finish the work His
Father had given Him to do.  The men of Capernaum went out after
our Lord in their boats because they had eaten of the multiplied
loaves and hoped to do so again.  Zebedee's children had forsaken
all and followed our Lord, because they counted to sit the one on
His right hand and the other on His left hand in His soon-coming
kingdom.  The pain and the shame all that cost our Lord, we can
only remotely imagine.  But as for Himself, our Lord never once had
to blush in secret at His own motives.  He never once had to hang
down His head at the discovery of His own selfish aims and by-ends.
Happy man!  The thought of what He should eat or what He should
drink or wherewithal He should be clothed never troubled His head.
The thought of success, as His poor-spirited disciples counted
success, the thought of honour and power and praise, never once
rose in His heart.  All these things, and all things like them, had
no attraction for Him; they awoke nothing but indifference and
contempt in him.  But to please His Father and to hear from time to
time His Father's voice saying that He was well pleased with His
beloved Son,--that was better than life to our Lord.  To find out
and follow every new day His Father's mind and will, and to finish
every night another part of His Father's appointed work,--that was
more than His necessary food to our Lord.  The great schoolmen, as
they meditated on these deep matters, had a saying to the effect
that all created things take their true goodness or their true evil
from the end they aim at.  And thus it was that our Lord, aiming
only at His Father's ends and never at His own, both manifested and
attained to a Divine goodness, just as the greedy crowds of Galilee
and the disputatious disciples, as long and as far as they made
their belly or their honour their end and aim, to that extent fell
short of all true goodness, all true satisfaction, and all true
acceptance.

By-ends was so called because he was full of low, mean, selfish
motives, and of nothing else.  All that this wretched creature did,
he did with a single eye to himself.  The best things that he did
became bad things in his self-seeking hands.  His very religion
stank in those men's nostrils who knew what was in his heart.  By-
ends was one of our Lord's whited sepulchres.  And so deep, so
pervading, and so abiding is this corrupt taint in human nature,
that long after a man has had his attention called to it, and is
far on to a clean escape from it, he still--nay, he all the more--
languishes and faints and is ready to die under it.  Just hear what
two great servants of God have said on this humiliating and
degrading matter.  Writing on this subject with all his wonted
depth and solemnity, Hooker says, 'Even in the good things that we
do, how many defects are there intermingled!  For God in that which
is done, respecteth especially the mind and intention of the doer.
Cut off, then, all those things wherein we have regarded our own
glory, those things which we do to please men, or to satisfy our
own liking, those things which we do with any by-respect, and not
sincerely and purely for the love of God, and a small score will
serve for the number of our righteous deeds.  Let the holiest and
best things we do be considered.  We are never better affected to
God than when we pray; yet, when we pray, how are our affections
many times distracted!  How little reverence do we show to that God
unto whom we speak!  How little remorse of our own miseries!  How
little taste of the sweet influence of His tender mercy do we feel!
The little fruit we have in holiness, it is, God knoweth, corrupt
and unsound; we put no confidence at all in it, we challenge
nothing in the world for it, we dare not call God to a reckoning as
if we had Him in our debt-books; our continued suit to Him is, and
must be, to bear with our infirmities, and to pardon our offences.'
And Thomas Shepard, a divine of a very different school, as we say,
but a saint and a scholar equal to the best, and indeed with few to
equal him, thus writes in his Spiritual Experiences:- 'On Sabbath
morning I saw that I had a secret eye to my own name in all that I
did, for which I judged myself worthy of death.  On another
Sabbath, when I came home, I saw the deep hypocrisy of my heart,
that in my ministry I sought to comfort and quicken others, that
the glory might reflect on me as well as on God.  On the evening
before the sacrament I saw that mine own ends were to procure
honour, pleasure, gain to myself, and not to the Lord, and I saw
how impossible it was for me to seek the Lord for Himself, and to
lay up all my honour and all my pleasures in Him.  On Sabbath-day,
when the Lord had given me some comfortable enlargements, I
searched my heart and found my sin.  I saw that though I did to
some extent seek Christ's glory, yet I sought it not alone, but my
own glory too.  After my Wednesday sermon I saw the pride of my
heart acting thus, that presently my heart would look out and ask
whether I had done well or ill.  Hereupon I saw my vileness to make
men's opinions my rule.  The Lord thus gave me some glimpse of
myself and a good day that was to me.'  One would think that this
was By-ends himself climbed up into the ministry.  And so it was.
And yet David Brainerd could write on his deathbed about Thomas
Shepard in this way.  'He valued nothing in religion that was not
done to the glory of God, and, oh! that others would lay the stress
of religion here also.  His method of examining his ends and aims
and the temper of his mind both before and after preaching, is an
excellent example for all who bear the sacred character.  By this
means they are like to gain a large acquaintance with their own
hearts, as it is evident he had with his.'

But it is not those who bear the sacred character of the ministry
alone who are full of by-ends.  We all are.  You all are.  And
there is not one all-reaching, all-exposing, and all-humbling way
of salvation appointed for ministers, and another, a more external,
superficial, easy, and self-satisfied way for their people.  No.
Not only must the ambitious and disputing disciples enter into
themselves and become witnesses and judges and executioners within
themselves before they can be saved or be of any use in the
salvation of others--not only they, but the fishermen of the Lake
of Tiberias, they also must open their hearts to these stabbing
words of Christ, and see how true it is that they had followed Him
for loaves and fishes, and not for His grace and His truth.  And
only when they had seen and submitted to that humiliating self-
discovery would their true acquaintance with Christ and their true
search after Him begin.  Come, then, all my brethren, and not
ministers only, waken up to the tremendous importance of that which
you have utterly neglected, it may be ostentatiously neglected, up
to this hour,--the true nature, the true character, of your motives
and your ends.  Enter into yourselves.  Be not strangers and
foreigners to yourselves.  Let not the day of judgment be any
surprise to you.  Witness against, judge, and execute yourselves,
and that especially because of your by-aims and by-ends.  Take up
the touchstone of truth and lay it upon your most secret heart.  Do
not be afraid to discover how double-minded and deceitful your
heart is.  Hunt your heart down.  Track it to its most secret lair.
Put its true name, and continue to put its true name, upon the main
motive of your life.  Extort an answer by boot and by wheel, only
extort an answer from the inner man of the heart, to the torturing
question as to what is his treasure, his hope, his deepest wish,
his daily dream.  Watch not against any outward enemy, keep all
your eyes and all your ears to your own thoughts.  God keeps His
awful eye on your thoughts.  His eye goes at every glance to that
great depth in you.  Even His all-seeing eye can go no deeper into
you than to your secret thoughts.  Go you as deep as God goes, and
you will be a wise man; go as deep and as often as He does, and
then you will soon come to see eye to eye with God, not only about
your own thoughts, but about His thoughts too, and about everything
else.  Till you begin to watch your own thoughts, and to watch them
especially in their aims and their ends, you will have no idea what
that moral and spiritual life is that all God's saints live; that
life that Christ lived, and which He this night summons you all to
enter henceforth upon.

It is such a happy fact that it cannot be too often told, that in
the things of the soul really and truly to know and feel the
disease is to have already entered on the remedy.  You will not
feel, indeed, that you have entered on the remedy; but that does
not much matter so long as you really have.  And there is nothing
more certain among all the certainties of divine things than that
he who feels himself to be in death and hell with his heart so full
of by-ends is all the time as far from death and hell as any one
can be who is still on this side of heaven.  When a man's whole
will and desire is set on God, as is now and then the case, that
man is perilously near a sudden and an abundant entrance into that
life and that presence where his heart has for so long been.  When
a man is half mad with his own heart, as Thomas Shepard for one
was, that stranger on the earth is at last within a step of that
happy coast where all wishes end.  Watch that man.  Take a last
look at that man.  He will soon be taken out of your sight.  Ere
ever he is himself aware, he will be rapt up into that life where
saints and angels seek not their own will, labour not for their own
profit or promotion, listen not for their own praises, but find
their blessedness, the half of which had not here been told them,
in glorifying God and in enjoying Him for ever.

You must all have heard the name of a book that has helped many a
saint now in glory to the examination and the keeping of his own
heart.  I refer to Jeremy Taylor's Holy Living and Dying.  Take two
or three of Taylor's excellent rules with you as you go down from
God's house to-night.  'If you would really live a holy life and
die a holy death,' says Taylor, 'learn to reflect in your every
action on your secret end in it; consider with yourself why you do
it, and what you propound to yourself for your reward.  Pray
importunately that all your purposes and all your motives may be
sanctified.  Renew and rekindle your purest purposes by such
ejaculations as these:  "Not unto us, O God, not unto us, but to
Thy name be all the praise.  I am in this Thy servant; let all the
gain be Thine."  In great and eminent actions let there be a
special and peculiar act of resignation or oblation made to God;
and in smaller and more frequent actions fail not to secure a pious
habitual intention.'  And so on.  And above all, I will add, labour
and pray till you feel in your heart that you love God with a
supreme and an ever-growing love.  And, far as that may be above
you as yet, impress your heart with the assurance that such a love
is possible to you also, and that you can never be safe or happy
till you attain to that love.  Other men once as far from the
supreme love of God as you are have afterwards attained to it; and
so will you if you continue to set it before yourself.  Think often
on God; read the best books about God; call continually upon God;
hold an intimate communion with God, till you feel that you also
actually and certainly love God.  And though you begin with loving
God because He first loved you, you will, beginning with that, rise
far above that till you come to love Him for what He is in Himself
as well as for what He has done for you.  'I have done this in
order to have a seat in the Academy,' said a young man, handing the
solution of a problem to an old philosopher.  'Sir,' was the reply,
'with such dispositions you will never earn a seat there.  Science
must be loved for its own sake, and not for any advantage to be
derived from it.'  And much more is that true of the highest of all
the sciences, the knowledge and the love of God.  Love Him, then,
till you arrive at loving Him for Himself, and then you shall be
for ever delivered from all self-love and by-ends, and shall both
glorify and enjoy God for ever.  As all they now do who engaged
their hearts on earth to the service and the love and the enjoyment
of God is such psalms and prayers as these:  'Whom have I in heaven
but Thee? and there is no one on earth that I desire beside Thee.
How excellent is Thy loving-kindness, O God!  The children of men
shall put their trust under the shadow of Thy wings.  For with Thee
is the fountain of life, and in Thy light shall we see light.  As
for me, I will behold Thy face in righteousness:  I shall be
satisfied when I awake with Thy likeness.  Thou wilt show me the
path of life; in Thy presence is fullness of joy, and at Thy right
hand there are pleasures for evermore.'



GIANT DESPAIR



'A wounded spirit who can bear?'--Solomon.

Every schoolboy has Giant Despair by heart.  The rough road after
the meadow of lilies, the stile into By-Path-Meadow, the night
coming on, the thunder and the lightning and the waters rising
amain, Giant Despair's apprehension of Christian and Hopeful, their
dreadful bed in his dungeon from Wednesday morning till Saturday
night, how they were famished with hunger and beaten with a
grievous crab-tree cudgel till they were not able to turn, with
many other sufferings too many and too terrible to be told which
they endured till Saturday about midnight, when they began to pray,
and continued in prayer till almost break of day;--John Bunyan is
surely the best story-teller in all the world.  And, then, over and
above that, as often as a boy reads Giant Despair and his dungeon
to his father and mother, the two hearers are like Christian and
Hopeful when the Delectable shepherds showed them what had happened
to some who once went in at By-Path stile:  the two pilgrims looked
one upon another with tears gushing out, but yet said nothing to
the shepherds.

John Bunyan's own experience enters deeply into these terrible
pages.  In composing these terrible pages, Bunyan writes straight
and bold out of his own heart and conscience.  The black and bitter
essence of a whole black and bitter volume is crushed into these
four or five bitter pages.  Last week I went over Grace Abounding
again, and marked the passages in which its author describes his
own experiences of doubt, diffidence, and despair, till I gave over
counting the passages, they are so many.  I had intended to
illustrate the passage before us to-night out of the kindred
materials that I knew were so abundant in Bunyan's terrible
autobiography, but I had to give up that idea.  It would have taken
two or three lectures to itself to tell all that Bunyan suffered
all his life long from an easily-wounded spirit.  The whole book is
just Giant Despair and his dungeon, with a gleam here and there of
that sunshiny weather that threw the giant into one of his fits, in
which he always lost for the time the use of his limbs.  Return
often, my brethren, to that masterpiece, Grace Abounding to the
Chief of Sinners.  I have read it a hundred times, but last week it
was as fresh and powerful and consoling as ever to my sin-wounded
spirit.

Let me select some of the incidents that offer occasion for a
comment or two.

1.  And, in the first place, take notice, and lay well to heart,
how sudden, and almost instantaneous, is the fall of Christian and
Hopeful from the very gate of heaven to the very gate of hell.  All
the Sabbath and the Monday and the Tuesday before that fatal
Wednesday, the two pilgrims had walked with great delight on the
banks of a very pleasant river; that river, in fact, which David
the King called the river of God, and John, the river of the water
of life.  They drank also of the water of the river, which was
pleasant and enlivening to their weary spirits.  On either side of
the river was there a meadow curiously beautified with lilies, and
it was green all the year long.  In this meadow they lay down and
slept, for here they might lie down and sleep safely.  When they
awoke they gathered again of the fruits of the trees, and drank
again of the water of the river, and then lay down again to sleep.
Thus they did several days and nights.  Now, could you have
believed it that two such men as our pilgrims were could be in the
enjoyment of all that the first half of the week, and then by their
own doing should be in Giant Despair's deepest dungeon before the
end of the same week?  And yet so it was.  And all that is written
for the solemn warning of those who are at any time in great
enlargement and refreshment and joy in their spiritual life.  It is
intended for all those who are at any time revelling in a season of
revival:  those, for example, who are just come home from Keswick
or Dunblane, as well as for all those who at home have just made
the discovery of some great master of the spiritual life, and who
are almost beside themselves with their delight in their divine
author.  If they are new beginners they will not take this warning
well, nor will even all old pilgrims lay it aright to heart; but
there it is as plain as the plainest, simplest, and most practical
writer in our language could put it.


Behold ye how these crystal streams do glide
To comfort pilgrims by the highway side;
The meadows green, besides their fragrant smell,
Yield dainties for them:  And he that can tell
What pleasant fruits, yea leaves, these trees do yield,
Will soon sell all that he may buy this field.


Thus the two pilgrims sang:  only, adds our author in a
parenthesis, they were not, as yet, at their journey's end.

2.  'Now, I beheld in my dream that they had not journeyed far when
the river and the way for a time parted.  At which the two pilgrims
were not a little sorry.'  The two pilgrims could not perhaps be
expected to break forth into dancing and singing at the parting of
the river and the way, even though they had recollected at that
moment what the brother of the Lord says about our counting it all
joy when we fall into divers temptations.  But it would not have
been too much to expect from such experienced pilgrims as they by
this time were, that they should have suspected and checked and
commanded their sorrow.  They should have said something like this
to one another:  Well, it would have been very pleasant had it been
our King's will and way with us that we should have finished the
rest of our pilgrimage among the apples and the lilies and on the
soft and fragrant bank of the river; but we believe that it must in
some as yet hidden way be better for us that the river and our road
should part from one another at least for a season.  Come, brother,
and let us go on till we find out our Master's deep and loving
mind.  But, instead of saying that, Christian and Hopeful soon
became like the children of Israel as they journeyed from Mount
Hor, their soul was much discouraged because of the way.  And
always as they went on they wished for a softer and a better way.
And it was so that they very soon came to the very thing they so
much wished for.  For, what is that on the left hand of the hard
road but a stile, and over the stile a meadow as soft to the feet
as the meadow of lilies itself?  ''Tis just according to my wish,'
said Christian; 'here is the easiest going.  Come, good Hopeful,
and let us go over.'  Hopeful:  'But how if the path should lead us
out of the way?'  'That's not like,' said the other; 'look, doth it
not go along by the wayside?'  So Hopeful, being persuaded by his
fellow, went after him over the stile.

Call to mind, all you who are delivered and restored pilgrims, that
same stile that once seduced you.  To keep that stile ever before
you is at once a safe and a seemly occupation of mind for any one
who has made your mistakes and come through your chastisements.
Christian's eyes all his after-days filled with tears, and he
turned away his face and blushed scarlet, as often as he suddenly
came upon any opening in a wall at all like that opening he here
persuaded Hopeful to climb through.  It is too much to expect that
those who are just mounting the stile, and have just caught sight
of the smooth path beyond it, will let themselves be pulled back
into the hard and narrow way by any persuasion of ours.  Christian
put down Hopeful's objection till Hopeful broke out bitterly when
the thunder was roaring over his head and he was wading about among
the dark waters:  'Oh that I had kept myself in my way!'  Are you a
little sorry to-night that the river and the way are parting in
your life?  Is your soul discouraged in you because of the soreness
of the way?  And as you go do you still wish for some better way
than the strait way?  And have you just espied a stile on the left
hand of your narrow and flinty path, and on looking over it is
there a pleasant meadow?  And does your companion point out to your
satisfaction, and, almost to your good conscience, that the soft
road runs right along the hard road, only over the stile and
outside the fence?  Then, good-bye.  For it is all over with you.
We shall meet you again, please God; but when we meet you again,
your mind and memory will be full of shame and remorse and
suffering enough to keep you in songs of repentance for all the
rest of your life on earth.  Farewell!


The Pilgrims now, to gratify the flesh,
Will seek its ease; but oh! how they afresh
Do thereby plunge themselves new grieves into:
Who seek to please the flesh themselves undo.


3.  The two transgressors had not gone far on their own way when
night came on and with the night a very great darkness.  But what
soon added to the horror of their condition was that they heard a
man fall into a deep pit right before them, and it sounded to them
as if he was dashed to pieces by his fall.  So they called to know
the matter, but there was none to answer, only they heard a
groaning.  Then said Hopeful:  Where are we now?  Then was his
fellow silent, as mistrusting that he had led Hopeful out of the
way.  Now, all that also is true to the very life, and has been
taken down by Bunyan from the very life.  We have all heard men
falling and heard them groaning just a little before us after we
had left the strait road.  They had just gone a little farther
wrong than we had as yet gone,--just a very little farther; in some
cases, indeed, not so far, when they fell and were dashed to pieces
with their fall.  It was well for us at that dreadful moment that
we heard the same voice saying to us for our encouragement as said
to the two trembling transgressors:  'Let thine heart be toward the
highway, even the way that thou wentest; turn again.'  Now, what is
it in which you are at this moment going off the right road?  What
is that life of disobedience or self-indulgence that you are just
entering on?  Keep your ears open and you will hear hundreds of men
and women falling and being dashed to pieces before you and all
around you.  Are you falling of late too much under the power of
your bodily appetites?  It is not one man, nor two, well known to
you, who have fallen never to rise again out of that horrible pit.
Are you well enough aware that you are being led into bad company?
Or, is your companion, who is not a bad man in anything else,
leading you, in this and in that, into what at any rate is bad for
you?  You will soon, unless you cut off your companion like a right
hand, be found saying with misguided and overruled Hopeful:  Oh
that I had kept me to my right way!  And so on in all manner of sin
and trespass.  Those who have ears to hear such things hear every
day one man after another falling through lust or pride or malice
or idleness or infidelity, till there is none to answer.

4.  'All hope abandon' was the writing that Dante read over the
door of hell.  And the two prisoners all but abandoned all hope
when they found themselves in Giant Despair's dungeon.  Only,
Christian, the elder man, had the most distress because their being
where they now were lay mostly at his door.  All this part of the
history also is written in Bunyan's very heart's blood.  'I found
it hard work,' he tells us of himself, 'to pray to God because
despair was swallowing me up.  I thought I was as with a tempest
driven away from God.  About this time I did light on that dreadful
story of that miserable mortal, Francis Spira, a book that was to
my troubled spirit as salt when rubbed into a fresh wound; every
groan of that man with all the rest of his actions in his dolours,
as his tears, his prayers, his gnashing of teeth, his wringing of
hands, was as knives and daggers in my soul, especially that
sentence of his was frightful to me:  "Man knows the beginning of
sin, but who bounds the issues thereof?"'  We never read anything
like Spira's experience and Grace Abounding and Giant Despair's
dungeon in the books of our day.  And why not, do you think?  Is
there less sin among us modern men, or did such writers as John
Bunyan overdraw and exaggerate the sinfulness of sin?  Were they
wrong in holding so fast as they did hold that death and hell are
the sure wages of sin?  Has divine justice become less fearful than
it used to be to those who rush against it, or is it that we are so
much better men?  Is our faith stronger and more victorious over
doubt and fear?  Is it that our hope is better anchored?  Whatever
the reason is, there can be no question but that we walk in a
liberty that our fathers did not always walk in.  Whether or no our
liberty is not recklessness and licentiousness is another matter.
Whether or no it would be a better sign of us if we were better
acquainted with doubt and dejection and diffidence, and even
despair, is a question it would only do us good to put to
ourselves.  When we properly attend to these matters we shall find
out that, the holier a man is, the more liable he is to the
assaults of doubt and fear and even despair.  We have whole psalms
of despair, so deep was David's sense of sin, so high were his
views of God's holiness and justice, and so full of diffidence was
his wounded heart.  And David's Son, when our sin was laid upon
Him, felt the curse and the horror of His state so much that His
sweat was in drops of blood, and His cry in the darkness was that
His God had forsaken Him.  And when our spirits are wounded with
our sins, as the spirits of all God's great saints have always been
wounded, we too shall feel ourselves more at home with David and
with Asaph, with Spira even, and with Bunyan.  Despair is not good,
but it is infinitely better than indifference.  'It is a common
saying,' says South, 'and an observation in divinity, that where
despair has slain its thousands, presumption has slain its ten
thousands.  The agonies of the former are indeed more terrible, but
the securities of the latter are far more fatal.'

5.  'I will,' says Paul to Timothy, 'that men pray everywhere,
lifting up holy hands without doubting.' And, just as Paul would
have it, Christian and Hopeful began to lift up their hands even in
the dungeon of Doubting Castle.  'Well,' we read, 'on Saturday
night about midnight they began to pray, and continued in prayer
till almost break of day.  Now, before it was day, good Christian,
as one half amazed, broke out in this passionate speech:  "What a
fool," quoth he, "am I thus to lie in a stinking dungeon when I may
as well walk at liberty; I have a key in my bosom, called Promise,
that will, I am persuaded, open any lock in all Doubting Castle."
Then said Hopeful:  "That's good news, good brother; pluck it out
of thy bosom and try."'  Then Christian pulled the key out of his
bosom and the bolt gave back, and Christian and Hopeful both came
out, and you may be sure they were soon out of the giant's
jurisdiction.

Now, I do not know that I can do better at this point, and in
closing, than just to tell you about some of that bunch of keys
that John Bunyan found from time to time in his own bosom, and
which made all his prison doors one after another fly open at their
touch.  'About ten o'clock one day, as I was walking under a hedge,
full of sorrow and guilt, God knows, and bemoaning myself for my
hard hap, suddenly this sentence bolted in upon me:  The blood of
Christ remits all guilt.  Again, when I was fleeing from the face
of God, for I did flee from His face, that is, my mind and spirit
fled before Him; for by reason of His highness I could not endure;
then would the text cry:  Return unto Me; it would cry with a very
great voice:  Return unto me, for I have redeemed thee.  And this
would make me look over my shoulder behind me to see if I could
discern that this God of grace did follow me with a pardon in His
hand.  Again, the next day, at evening, being under many fears, I
went to seek the Lord, and as I prayed, I cried, with strong cries:
O Lord, I beseech Thee, show me that Thou hast loved me with an
everlasting love.  I had no sooner said it but, with sweetness,
this returned upon me as an echo or sounding-again, I have loved
thee with an everlasting love.  Now, I went to bed at quiet; also,
when I awaked the next morning it was fresh upon my soul and I
believed it . . . Again, as I was then before the Lord, that
Scripture fastened on my heart:  O man, great is thy faith, even as
if one had clapped me on the back as I was on my knees before God .
. . At another time I remember I was again much under this
question:  Whether the blood of Christ was sufficient to save my
soul?  In which doubt I continued from morning till about seven or
eight at night, and at last, when I was, as it were, quite worn out
with fear, these words did sound suddenly within my heart:  He is
able.  Methought this word ABLE was spoke so loud unto me and gave
such a justle to my fear and doubt as I never had all my life
either before that or after . . . Again, one morning, when I was at
prayer and trembling under fear, that piece of a sentence dashed in
upon me:  My grace is sufficient.  At this, methought:  Oh, how
good a thing it is for God to send His word! . . . Again, one day
as I was in a meeting of God's people, full of sadness and terror,
for my fears were again strong upon me, and as I was thinking that
my soul was never the better, these words did with great power
suddenly break in upon me:  My grace is sufficient for thee, My
grace is sufficient for thee, three times together; and, oh!
methought that every word was a mighty word unto me; as MY, and
GRACE, and SUFFICIENT, and FOR THEE.  These words were then, and
sometimes still are, far bigger words than others are.  Again, one
day as I was passing in the field, and that, too, with some dashes
in my conscience, suddenly this sentence fell upon my soul:  Thy
righteousness is in heaven.  And methought withal I saw, with the
eyes of my soul, Jesus Christ at God's right hand.  I saw also,
moreover, that it was not my good frame of heart that made my
righteousness better, nor my bad frame that made my righteousness
worse, for my righteousness was Jesus Christ Himself, the same
yesterday, to-day, and for ever . . . Again, oh, what did I see in
that blessed sixth of John:  Him that cometh to Me I will in nowise
cast out.  I should in those days often flounce toward that promise
as horses do toward sound ground that yet stick in the mire.  Oh!
many a pull hath my heart had with Satan for this blessed sixth of
John . . . And, again, as I was thus in a muse, that Scripture also
came with great power upon my spirit:  Not by works of
righteousness which we have done, but according to His mercy He
saved us.  Now was I got on high:  I saw my self within the arms of
Grace and Mercy, and though I was before afraid to think of a dying
hour, yet now I cried:  Let me die.  Now death was lovely and
beautiful in my sight; for I saw that we shall never live indeed
till we be gone to the other world.  Heirs of God, methought, heirs
of God!  God himself is the portion of His saints.  This did
sweetly revive my spirit, and help me to hope in God; which when I
had with comfort mused on a while, that word fell with great weight
upon my mind:  Oh Death, where is thy sting?  Oh Grave, where is
thy victory?  At this I became both well in body and mind at once,
for my sickness did presently vanish, and I walked comfortably in
my work for God again.'

Such were some of the many keys by the use of which God let John
Bunyan so often out of despair into full assurance and out of
darkness into light.  Which of the promises have been of such help
to you?  Over what Scriptures have you ever cried out:  Oh, how
good a thing it is for God to send me His word!  Which are the
biggest words in all the Bible to you?  To what promise did you
ever flounce as a horse flounces when he is sticking in the mire?
And has any word of God so made God your God that even death
itself, since it alone separates you from His presence, is lovely
and beautiful in your eyes?  Have you a cluster of such keys in
your bosom?  If you have, take them all out to-night and go over
them again with thanksgiving before you sleep.



KNOWLEDGE



'I will give you pastors after Mine own heart, which shall feed you
with knowledge and understanding.'

The Delectable Mountains rise out of the heart of Immanuel's Land.
This fine range of far-rolling hills falls away on the one side
toward the plain of Destruction, and on the other side toward the
land of Beulah and the Celestial City, and the way to the Celestial
City runs like a bee-line over these well-watered pastures.
Standing on a clear day on the highest peak of the Delectable
Mountains, if you have good eyes you can see the hill Difficulty in
the far-back distance with a perpetual mist clinging to its base
and climbing up its sides, which mist the shepherds say to you
rises all the year round off the Slough of Despond, while, beyond
that again the heavy smoke of the city of Destruction and the town
of Stupidity shuts in the whole horizon.  And then, when you turn
your back on all that, in favourable states of the weather you can
see here and there the shimmer of that river over which there is no
bridge; and, then again, so high above the river that it seems to
be a city standing in heaven rather than upon the earth, you will
see the high towers and shining palace roofs and broad battlements
of the New Jerusalem itself.  The two travellers should have spent
the past three days among the sights of the Delectable Mountains;
and they would have done so had not the elder traveller misled the
younger.  But now that they were set free and fairly on the right
road again, the way they had spent the past three days and three
nights made the gardens and the orchards and the pastures that ran
round the bottom and climbed up the sides of the Delectable
Mountains delectable beyond all description to them.

Now, there were on the tops of those mountains certain shepherds
feeding their flocks, and they stood by the highway side.  The two
travellers therefore went up to the shepherds, and leaning upon
their staves (as is common with weary travellers when they stand to
talk with any by the way), they asked:  Whose delectable mountains
are these? and whose be the sheep that feed upon them?  These
mountains, replied the shepherds, are Immanuel's Land, and they are
within sight of the city; the sheep also are His, and He laid down
His life for them.  After some more talk like this by the wayside,
the shepherds, being pleased with the pilgrims, looked very
lovingly upon them and said:  Welcome to the Delectable Mountains.
The shepherds then, whose names were Knowledge, Experience,
Watchful, and Sincere, took them by the hand to lead them to their
tents, and made them partake of what was ready at present.  They
said, moreover:  We would that you should stay with us a while to
be acquainted with us, and yet more to solace yourselves with the
cheer of these Delectable Mountains.  Then the travellers told them
they were content to stay; and so they went to rest that night
because it was now very late.  The four shepherds lived all summer-
time in a lodge of tents well up among their sheep, while their
wives and families had their homes all the year round in the land
of Beulah.  The four men formed a happy fraternity, and they worked
among and watched over their Master's sheep with one united mind.
What one of those shepherds could not so well do in the tent or in
the fold or out on the hillside, some of the others better did.
And what one of them could do to any perfection all the others by
one consent left that to him to do.  You would have thought that
they were made by a perfect miracle to fit into one another, so
harmoniously did they live and work together, and such was the bond
of brotherly love that held them together.  At the same time, there
was one of the happy quaternity who, from his years on the hills,
and his services in times of trial and danger, and one thing and
another, fell always, and with the finest humility too, into the
foremost place, and his name, as you have already heard, was
Knowledge.  Old Mr. Know-all the children in the villages below ran
after him and named him as they clustered round his staff and hid
in the great folds of his shepherd's coat.

Now, in all this John Bunyan speaks as a child to children; but, of
such children as John Bunyan and his readers is the kingdom of
heaven.  My very youngest hearer here to-night knows quite well,
or, at any rate, shrewdly suspects, that Knowledge was not a
shepherd going about with his staff among woolly sheep; nor would
the simplest-minded reader of John Bunyan's book go to seek the
Delectable Mountains and Immanuel's Land in any geographer's atlas,
or on any schoolroom map.  Oh, no.  I do not need to stop to tell
the most guileless of my hearers that old Knowledge was not a
shepherd whose sheep were four-footed creatures, but a minister of
the gospel, whose sheep are men, women, and children.  Nor are the
Delectable Mountains any range of hills and valleys of grass and
herbs in England or Scotland.  The prophet Ezekiel calls them the
mountains of Israel; but by that you all know that he had in his
mind something far better than any earthly mountain.  That prophet
of Israel had in his mind the church of God with its synagogues and
its sacraments, with all the grace and truth that all these things
conveyed from God to the children of Israel.  As David also sang in
the twenty-third Psalm:  'The Lord is my Shepherd, I shall not
want.  He maketh me to lie down in green pastures; He leadeth me
beside the still waters.'

Knowledge, then, is a minister; but every congregation has not such
a minister set over it as Knowledge is.  All our college-bred and
ordained men are not ministers like Knowledge.  This excellent
minister takes his excellent name from his great talents and his
great attainments.  And while all his great talents are his
Master's gift to him, his great attainments are all his own to lay
out in his Master's service.  To begin with, his Master had given
His highly-favoured servant a good understanding and a good memory,
and many good and suitable opportunities.  Now, a good
understanding is a grand endowment for a minister, and his
ministerial office will all his days afford him opportunity for the
best understanding he can bring to it.  The Christian ministry,
first and last, has had a noble roll of men of a strong
understanding.  The author of the book now open before us was a man
of a strong understanding.  John Bunyan had a fine imagination,
with great gifts of eloquent, tender, and most heart-winning
utterance, but in his case also all that was bottomed in a strong
English understanding.  Then, again, a good memory is indispensable
to a minister of knowledge.  You must be content to take a second,
a third, or even a lower place still if your Master has withheld
from you a good memory.  Dr. Goodwin has a passage on this point
that I have often turned up when I had again forgotten it.  'Thou
mayest have a weak memory, perhaps, yet if it can and doth remember
good things as well and better than other things, then it is a
sanctified memory, and the defilement of thy memory is healed
though the imperfection of it is not; and, though thou art to be
humbled for it as a misery, yet thou art not to be discouraged; for
God doth not hate thee for it, but pities thee; and the like holds
good and may be said as to the want of other like gifts.'  You
cannot be a man of a commanding knowledge anywhere, and you must be
content to take a very subordinate and second place, even in the
ministry, unless you have both a good understanding and a good
memory; but then, at the last day your Master will not call you and
your congregation to an account for what He has not committed to
your stewardship.  And on that day that will be something.  But not
only must ministers of knowledge have a good mind and a good
memory; they must also be the most industrious of men.  Other men
may squander and kill their time as they please, but a minister had
as good kill himself at once out of the way of better men unless he
is to hoard his hours like gold and jewels.  He must read only the
best books, and he must read them with the 'pain of attention.'  He
must read nothing that is not the best.  He has not the time.  And
if he is poor and remote and has not many books, he will have
Butler, and let him read Butler's Preface to his Sermons till he
has it by heart.  The best books are always few, and they must be
read over and over again when other men are reading the 'great
number of books and papers of amusement that come daily in their
way, and which most perfectly fall in with their idle way of
reading and considering things.'  And, then, such a minister must
store up what he reads, if not in a good memory, then in some other
pigeon-hole that he has made for himself outside of himself, since
his Master has not seen fit to furnish him with such a repository
within himself.  And, then, after all that,--for a good minister is
not made yet,--understanding and memory and industry must all be
sanctified by secret prayer many times every day, and then laid out
every day in the instruction, impression, and comfort of his
people.  And, then, that privileged people will be as happy in
possessing that man for their minister as the sheep of Immanuel's
Land were in having Knowledge set over them for their shepherd.
They will never look up without being fed.  They will every
Sabbath-day be led by green pastures and still waters.  And when
they sing of the mercies of the Lord to them and to their children,
and forget not all His benefits, among the best of their benefits
they will not forget to hold up and bless their minister.

But, then, there is, nowadays, so much sound knowledge to be
gained, not to speak of so many books and papers of mere pastime
and amusement, that it may well be asked by a young man who is to
be a minister whether he is indeed called to be like that great
student who took all knowledge for his province.  Yes, indeed, he
is.  For, if the minister and interpreter of nature is to lay all
possible knowledge under contribution, what must not the minister
of Jesus Christ and the interpreter of Scripture and providence and
experience and the human heart be able to make the sanctified use
of?  Yes, all kinds and all degrees of knowledge, to be called
knowledge, belong by right and obligation to his office who is the
minister and interpreter of Him Who made all things, Who is the
Heir of all things, and by Whom all things consist.  At the same
time, since the human mind has its limits, and since human life has
its limits, a minister of all men must make up his mind to limit
himself to the best knowledge; the knowledge, that is, that chiefly
concerns him,--the knowledge of God so far as God has made Himself
known, and the knowledge of Christ.  He must be a student of his
Bible night and day and all his days.  If he has not the strength
of understanding and memory to read his Bible easily in the
original Hebrew and Greek, let him all the more make up for that by
reading it the oftener and the deeper in English.  Let him not only
read his Bible deeply for his sermons and prayers, lectures and
addresses, let him do that all day every day of the week, and then
read it all night, and every night of the week, for his own soul.
Let every minister know his Bible down to the bottom, and with his
Bible his own heart.  He who so knows his Bible and with it his own
heart has almost books enough.  All else is but ostentatious
apparatus.  When a minister has neither understanding nor memory
wherewith to feed his flock, let him look deep enough into his
Bible and into his own heart, and then begin out of them to write
and speak.  And, then, for the outside knowledge of the passing day
he will read the newspapers, and though he gives up all the morning
to the newspapers, and returns to them again in the evening, his
conscience will not upbraid him if he reads as Jonathan Edwards
read the newsletters of his day,--to see how the kingdom of heaven
is prospering in the earth, and to pray for its prosperity.  And,
then, by that time, and when he has got that length, all other
kinds of knowledge will have fallen into its own place, and will
have taken its own proper proportion of his time and his thought.
He was a man of a great understanding and a great memory and great
industry who said that he had taken all knowledge for his province.
But he was a far wiser man who said that knowledge is not our
proper happiness.  Our province, he went on to say, is virtue and
religion, life and manners:  the science of improving the temper
and making the heart better.  This is the field assigned us to
cultivate:  how much it has lain neglected is indeed astonishing.

Now, my brethren, two dangers, two simply terrible dangers, arise
to every one of you out of all this matter of your ministers and
their knowledge.  1. The first danger is,--to be frank with you on
this subject,--that you are yourselves so ignorant on all the
matters that a minister has to do with, that you do not know one
minister from another, a good minister from one who is really no
minister at all.  Now, I will put it to you, on what principle and
for what reason did you choose your present minister, if, indeed,
you did choose him?  Was it because you were assured by people you
could trust that he was a minister of knowledge and knew his own
business?  Or was it that when you went to worship with him for
yourself you have not been able ever since to tear yourself away
from him, nor has any one else been able to tear you away, though
some have tried?  When you first came to the city, did you give,
can you remember, some real anxiety, rising sometimes into prayer,
as to who your minister among so many ministers was to be?  Or did
you choose him and your present seat in his church because of some
real or supposed worldly interest of yours you thought you could
further by taking your letter of introduction to him?  Had you
heard while yet at home, had your father and mother talked of such
things to you, that rich men, and men of place and power, political
men and men high in society, sat in that church and took notice of
who attended it and who did not?  Do you, down to this day, know
one church from another so far as spiritual and soul-saving
knowledge is concerned?  Do you know that two big buildings, called
churches, may stand in the same street, and have men, called
ministers, carrying on certain services in them from week to week,
and yet, for all the purposes for which Christ came and died and
rose again and gave ministers to His church, these two churches and
their ministers are farther asunder than the two poles?  Do you
understand what I am saying?  Do you understand what I have been
saying all night, or are you one of those of whom the prophet
speaks in blame and in pity as being destroyed for lack of
knowledge?  Well, that is your first danger, that you are so
ignorant, and as a consequence, so careless, as not to know one
minister from another.

2.  And your second danger in connection with your minister is,
that you have, and may have long had, a good minister, but that you
still remain yourself a bad man.  My brethren, be you all sure of
it, there is a special and a fearful danger in having a specially
good minister.  Think twice, and make up your mind well, before you
call a specially good minister, or become a communicant, or even an
adherent under a specially good minister.  If two bad men go down
together to the pit, and the one has had a good minister, as, God
have mercy on us, sometimes happens, and the other has only had one
who had the name of a minister, the evangelised reprobate will lie
in a deeper bed in hell, and will spend a more remorseful eternity
on it than will the other.  No man among you, minister or no
minister, good minister or bad, will be able to sin with impunity.
But he who sins on and on after good preaching will be beaten with
many stripes.  'Woe unto thee, Chorazin!  Woe unto thee, Bethsaida!
For if the mighty works which were done in you had been done in
Tyre and Sidon, they would have repented long ago in sackcloth and
ashes.  But I say unto you, it shall be more tolerable for Tyre and
Sidon at the day of judgment than for you.'  'Thou that hast
knowledge,' says a powerful old preacher, 'canst not sin so cheap
as another that is ignorant.  Places of much knowledge'--he was
preaching in the university pulpit of Oxford--'and plentiful in the
means of grace are dear places for a man to sin in.  To be drunken
or unclean after a powerful sermon, and after the Holy Ghost has
enlightened thee, is more than to have so sinned twenty times
before.  Thou mightest have sinned ten times more and been damned
less.  For does not Jesus Christ the Judge say to thee, This is thy
condemnation, that so much light has come to thee?'  And, taking
the then way of execution as a sufficiently awful illustration, the
old Oxford Puritan goes on to say that to sin against light is the
highest step of the ladder before turning off.  And, again, that if
there are worms in hell that die not, it is surely gospel light
that breeds them.



EXPERIENCE



'My heart had great experience.'--The Preacher.
'I will give them pastors after Mine own heart.'

Experience, the excellent shepherd of the Delectable Mountains, had
a brother in the army, and he was an equally excellent soldier.
The two brothers--they were twin-brothers--had been brought up
together till they were grown-up men in the same town of Mansoul.
All the Experience family, indeed, had from time immemorial hailed
from that populous and important town, and their family tree ran
away back beyond the oldest extant history.  The two brothers,
while in all other things as like as two twin-brothers could be, at
the same time very early in life began to exhibit very different
talents and tastes and dispositions; till, when we meet with them
in their full manhood, the one is a soldier in the army and the
other a shepherd on the Delectable Mountains.  The soldier-brother
is thus described in one of the military histories of his day:  'A
man of conduct and of valour, and a person prudent in matters.  A
comely person, moreover, well-spoken in negotiations, and very
successful in undertakings.  His colours were the white colours of
Mansoul and his scutcheon was the dead lion and the dead bear.'

The shepherd-brother, on the other hand, is thus pictured out to us
by one who has seen him.  A traveller who has visited the
Delectable Mountains, and has met and talked with the shepherds,
thus describes Experience in his excellent itinerary:  'Knowledge,'
he says, 'I found to be the sage of the company, spare in build,
high of forehead, worn in age, and his tranquil gait touched with
abstractedness.  While Experience was more firmly knit in form and
face, with a shrewd kindly eye and a happy readiness in his
bearing, and all his hard-earned wisdom evidently on foot within
him as a capability for work and for control.'  This, then, was the
second of the four shepherds, who fed Immanuel's sheep on the
Delectable Mountains.

But here again to-night, and in the case of Experience, just as
last Sabbath night and in the case of Knowledge, in all this John
Bunyan speaks to children,--only the children here are the children
of the kingdom of heaven.  The veriest child who reads the
Delectable Mountains begins to suspect before he is done that
Knowledge and Experience are not after all two real and true
shepherds going their rounds with their staves and their wallets
and their wheeling dogs.  Yes, though the little fellow cannot put
his suspicions into proper words for you, all the same he has his
suspicions that he is being deceived by you and your Sabbath book;
and, ten to one, from that sceptical day he will not read much more
of John Bunyan till in after-life he takes up John Bunyan never for
a single Sabbath again to lay him down.  Yes, let the truth be told
at once, Experience is simply a minister, and not a real shepherd
at all; a minister of the gospel, a preacher, and a pastor; but,
then, he is a preacher and a pastor of no ordinary kind, but of the
selectest and very best kind.

1.  Now, my brethren, to plunge at once out of the parable and into
the interpretation, I observe, in the first place, that pastors who
are indeed to be pastors after God's own heart have all to pass
into their pastorate through the school of experience.  Preaching
after God's own heart, and pastoral work of the same divine
pattern, cannot be taught in any other school than the school of
experience.  Poets may be born and not made, but not pastors nor
preachers.  Nay, do not all our best poets first learn in their
sufferings what afterwards they teach us in their songs?  At any
rate, that is certainly the case with preachers and pastors.  As my
own old minister once said to me in a conversation on this very
subject, 'Even God Himself cannot inspire an experience.'  No.  For
if He could He would surely have done so in the case of His own
Son, to Whom in the gift of the Holy Ghost He gave all that He
could give and all that His Son could receive.  But an experience
cannot in the very nature of things be either bestowed on the one
hand or received and appropriated on the other.  An experience in
the unalterable nature of the thing itself must be undergone.  The
Holy Ghost Himself after He has been bestowed and received has to
be experimented upon, and taken into this and that need, trial,
cross, and care of life.  He is not sent to spare us our
experiences, but to carry us through them.  And thus it is (to keep
for a moment in sight of the highest illustration we have of this
law of experience), thus it is, I say, that the apostle has it in
his Epistle to the Hebrews that though Christ Himself were a Son,
yet learned He obedience by the things that He suffered.  And being
by experience made perfect He then went on to do such and such
things for us.  Why, for instance, for one thing, why do you think
was our Lord able to speak with such extraordinary point,
impressiveness, and assurance about prayer; about the absolute
necessity and certainty of secret, importunate, persevering prayer
having, sooner or later, in one shape or other, and in the best
possible shape, its answer?  Why but because of His own experience?
Why but because His own closet, hilltop, all-night, and up-before-
the-day prayers had all been at last heard and better heard than He
had been able to ask?  We can quite well read between the lines in
all our Lord's parables and in all the passages of His sermons
about prayer.  The unmistakable traces of otherwise untold
enterprises and successes, agonies and victories of prayer, are to
be seen in every such sermon of His.  And so, in like manner, in
all that He says to His disciples about the sweetness of
submission, resignation, and self-denial, as also about the
nourishment for His soul that He got out of every hard act of
obedience,--and so on.  There is running through all our Lord's
doctrinal and homiletical teaching that note of reality and of
certitude that can only come to any teaching out of the long and
deep and intense experience of the teacher.  And as the Master was,
so are all His ministers.  When I read, for instance, what William
Law says about the heart-searching and heart-cleansing efficacy of
intercessory prayer in the case of him who continues all his life
so to pray, and carries such prayer through all the experiences and
all the relationships of life, I do not need you to tell me where
that great man of God made that great discovery.  I know that he
made it in his own closet, and on his own knees, and in his own
evil heart.  And so, also, when I come nearer home.  Whenever I
hear a single unconventional, immediate, penetrating, overawing
petition or confession in a minister's pulpit prayer or in his
family worship, I do not need to be told out of what prayer-book he
took that.  I know without his telling me that my minister has
been, all unknown to me till now, at that same school of prayer to
which his Master was put in the days of His flesh, and out of which
He brought the experiences that He afterwards put into the Friend
at midnight, and the Importunate widow, as also into the Egg and
the scorpion, the Bread and the stone, the Knocking and the
opening, the Seeking and the finding.


His children thus most dear to Him,
Their heavenly Father trains,
Through all the hard experience led
Of sorrows and of pains.


And if His children, then ten times more the tutors and governors
of His children,--the pastors and the preachers He prepares for His
people.

2.  Again, though I will not put those two collegiate shepherds
against one another, yet, in order to bring out the whole truth on
this matter, I will risk so far as to say that where we cannot have
both Knowledge and Experience, by all means let us have Experience.
Yes, I declare to you that if I were choosing a minister for
myself, and could not have both the book-knowledge and the
experience of the Christian life in one and the same man; and could
not have two ministers, one with all the talents and another with
all the experiences; I would say that, much as I like an able and
learned sermon from an able and learned man, I would rather have
less learning and more experience.  And, then, no wonder that such
pastors and preachers are few.  For how costly must a thoroughly
good minister's experience be to him!  What a quantity and what a
quality of experience is needed to take a raw, light-minded,
ignorant, and self-satisfied youth and transform him into the
pastor, the tried and trusted friend of the tempted, the sorrow-
laden, and the shipwrecked hearts and lives in his congregation!
What years and years of the selectest experiences are needed to
teach the average divinity student to know himself, to track out
and run to earth his own heart, and thus to lay open and read other
men's hearts to their self-deceived owners in the light of his own.
A matter, moreover, that he gets not one word of help toward in all
his college curriculum.  David was able to say in his old age that
he fed the flock of God in Israel according to the integrity of his
heart, and guided them by the skilfulness of his hands.  But what
years and years of shortcoming and failure in private and in public
life lie behind that fine word 'integrity'! as also what stumbles
and what blunders behind that other fine word 'skilfulness'!  But,
then, how a lightest touch of a preacher's own dear-bought
experience skilfully let fall brightens up an obscure scripture!
How it sends a thrill through a prayer!  How it wings an arrow to
the conscience!  How it sheds abroad balm upon the heart!  Let no
minister, then, lose heart when he is sent back to the school of
experience.  He knows in theory that tribulation worketh patience,
and patience experience, but it is not theory, but experience, that
makes a minister after God's own heart.  I sometimes wish that I
may live to see a chair of Experimental Religion set up in all our
colleges.  I fear it is a dream, and that it must have been
pronounced impracticable long ago by our wisest heads.  Still, all
the same, that does not prevent me from again and again indulging
my dream.  I indulge my fond dream again as often as I look back on
my own tremendous mistakes in the management of my own personal and
ministerial life, as well as sometimes see some signs of the same
mistakes in some other ministers.  In my dream for the Church of
the future I see the programme of lectures in the Experimental
Class and the accompanying examinations.  I see the class library,
and I envy the students.  I am present at the weekly book-day, and
at the periodical addresses delivered to the class by those town
and country ministers who have been most skilful in their pastorate
and most successful in the conversion and in the character of their
people.  And, unless I wholly deceive myself, I see, not all the
class--that will never be till the millennium--but here and there
twos and threes, and more men than that, who will throw their whole
hearts into the work of such a class till they come out of the hall
in experimental religion like Sir Proteus in the play:


Their years but young, but their experience old,
Their heads unmellowed, but their judgment ripe.


It is quite true, that, as my old minister shrewdly said to me,
even the Holy Ghost cannot inspire an experience.  No.  But a class
of genuine experimental divinity would surely help to foster and
develop an experience.  And, till the class is established, any
student who has the heart for it may lay in the best of the class
library for a few shillings.  Mr. Thin will tell you that there is
no literature that is such a drug in the market as the best books
of Experimental Divinity.  No wonder, then, that we make such slow
and short way in the skilfulness, success, and acceptance of our
preaching and our pastorate.

3.  But, at the same time, my brethren, all your ministers'
experience of personal religion will be lost upon you unless you
are yourselves attending the same school.  The salvation of the
soul, you must understand, is not offered to ministers only.
Ministers are not the only men who are, to begin with, dead in
trespasses and sins.  The Son of God did not die for ministers
only.  The Holy Ghost is not offered to ministers only.  A clean,
humble, holy heart is not to be the pursuit of ministers only.  It
is not to His ministers only that our Lord says, Take up My yoke
and learn of Me.  The daily cross is not the opportunity of
ministers only.  It is not to ministers only that tribulation
worketh patience, and patience experience, and experience hope.  It
was to all who had obtained like precious faith with their
ministers that Peter issued this exhortation that they were to give
all diligence to add to their faith virtue, and to virtue
knowledge, and to knowledge temperance, and to temperance
patience,--and so on.  Now, my brethren, unless all that is on foot
in yourselves, as well as in your ministers, then their progress in
Christian experience will only every new Sabbath-day separate you
and your ministers further and further away from one another.  When
a minister is really making progress himself in the life of
religion that progress must come out, and ought to come out, both
in his preaching and in his prayers.  And, then, two results of all
that will immediately begin to manifest themselves among his
people.  Some of his people will visibly, and still more will
invisibly, make corresponding progress with their minister; while
some others, alas! will fall off in interest, in understanding, and
in sympathy till at last they drop off from his ministry
altogether.  That is an old law in the Church of God:  'like people
like priest,' and 'like priest like people.'  And while there are
various influences at work retarding and perplexing the immediate
operation of that law, at the same time, he who has eyes to see
such things in a congregation and in a community will easily see
Hosea's great law of congregational selection in operation every
day.  Like people gradually gravitate to like preachers.  You will
see, if you have the eyes, congregations gradually dissolving and
gradually being consolidated again under that great law.  You will
see friendships and families even breaking up and flying into
pieces; and, again, new families and new friendships being built up
on that very same law.  If you were to study the session books of
our city congregations in the light of that law, you would get
instruction.  If you just studied who lifted their lines, and why;
and, again, what other people came and left their lines, and why,
you would get instruction.  The shepherds in Israel did not need to
hunt up and herd their flocks like the shepherds in Scotland.  A
shepherd on the mountains of Israel had nothing more to do than
himself pass up into the pasture lands and then begin to sing a
psalm or offer a prayer, when, in an instant, his proper sheep were
all round about him.  The sheep knew their own shepherd's voice,
and they fled from the voice of a stranger.  And so it is with a
true preacher,--a preacher of experience, that is.  His own people
know no voice like his voice.  He does not need to bribe and
flatter and run after his people.  He may have, he usually has, but
few people as people go in our day, and the better the preacher
sometimes the smaller the flock.  It was so in our Master's case.
The multitude followed after the loaves but they fled from the
feeding doctrines, till He first tasted that dejection and that
sense of defeat which so many of His best servants are fed on in
this world.  Still, as our Lord did not tune His pulpit to the
taste of the loungers of Galilee, no more will a minister worth the
name do anything else but press deeper and deeper into the depths
of truth and life, till, as was the case with his Master, his
followers, though few, will be all the more worth having.  The
Delectable Mountains are wide and roomy.  They roll far away both
before and behind.  Immanuel's Land is a large place, and there are
many other shepherds among those hills and valleys besides
Knowledge and Experience and Watchful and Sincere.  And each
several shepherd has, on the whole, his own sheep.  Knowledge has
his; Experience has his; Watchful has his; and Sincere has his; and
all the other here unnamed shepherds have all theirs also.  For,
always, like shepherd like sheep.  Yes.  Hosea must have been
something in Israel somewhat analogous to a session-clerk among
ourselves.  'Like priest like people' is certainly a digest of some
such experience.  Let some inquisitive beginner in Hebrew this
winter search out the prophet upon that matter, consulting Mr.
Hutcheson and Dr. Pusey, and he will let me hear the result.

4.  Now, my brethren, in closing, we must all keep it clearly
before our minds, and that too every day we live, that God orders
and overrules this whole world, and, indeed, keeps it going very
much just that He may by means of it make unceasing experiment upon
His people.  Experiment, you know, results in experience.  There is
no other way by which any man can attain to a religious experience
but by undergoing temptation, trial, tribulation:- experiment.  And
it gives a divine dignity to all things, great and small, good and
bad, when we see them all taken up into God's hand, in order that
by means of them He may make for Himself an experienced people.
Human life on this earth, when viewed under this aspect, is one
vast workshop.  And all the shafts and wheels and pulleys; all the
crushing hammers, and all the whirling knives; all the furnaces and
smelting-pots; all the graving tools and smoothing irons, are all
so many divinely-designed and divinely-worked instruments all
directed in upon this one result,--our being deeply experienced in
the ways of God till we are for ever fashioned into His nature and
likeness.  Our faith in the unseen world and in our unseen God and
Saviour is at one time put to the experiment.  At another time it
is our love to Him; the reality of it, and the strength of it.  At
another time it is our submission and our resignation to His will.
At another time it is our humility, or our meekness, or our
capacity for self-denial, or our will and ability to forgive an
injury, or our perseverance in still unanswered prayer; and so on
the ever-shifting but never-ceasing experiment goes.  I do beseech
you, my brethren, take that true view of life home with you again
this night.  This true view of life, namely, that experience in the
divine life can only come to you through your being much
experimented upon.  Meet all your trials and tribulations and
temptations, then, under this assurance, that all things will work
together for good to you also if you are only rightly exercised by
means of them.  Nothing else but this growing experience and this
settling assurance will be able to support you under the sudden
ills of life; but this will do it.  This, when you begin by
experience to see that all this life, and all the good and all the
ill of this life, are all under this splendid divine law,--that
your tribulations also are indeed working within you a patience,
and your patience an experience, and your experience a hope that
maketh not ashamed.



WATCHFUL



'Son of man, I have made thee a watchman unto the house of
Israel.'--The word of the Lord to Ezekiel.

'They watch for your souls.'--The Apostle to the Hebrews.

There were four shepherds who had the care of Immanuel's sheep on
the Delectable Mountains, and their names were Knowledge,
Experience, Watchful, and Sincere.  Now, in that very beautiful
episode of his great allegory, John Bunyan is doing his very utmost
to impress upon all his ministerial readers how much there is that
goes to the making of a good minister, and how much every good
minister has to do.  Each several minister must do all that in him
lies, from the day of his ordination to the day of his death, to be
all to his people that those four shepherds were to Immanuel's
sheep.  He is to labour, in season and out of season, to be a
minister of the ripest possible knowledge, the deepest and widest
possible experience, the most sleepless watchfulness, and the most
absolute and scrupulous sincerity.  Now, enough has perhaps been
said already about a minister's knowledge and his experience;
enough, certainly, and more than enough for some of us to hope half
to carry out; and, therefore, I shall at once go on to take up
Watchful, and to supply, so far as I am able, the plainest possible
interpretation of this part of Bunyan's parable.

1.  Every true minister, then, watches, in the words of the
apostle, for the souls of his people.  An ordinary minister's
everyday work embraces many duties and offers many opportunities,
but through all his duties and through all his opportunities there
runs this high and distinctive duty of watching for the souls of
his people.  A minister may be a great scholar, he may have taken
all sacred learning for his province, he may be a profound and a
scientific theologian, he may be an able church leader, he may be a
universally consulted authority on ecclesiastical law, he may be a
skilful and successful debater in church courts, he may even be a
great pulpit orator, holding thousands entranced by his impassioned
eloquence; but a true successor of the prophets of the Old
Testament and of the apostles of the New Testament he is not,
unless he watches for the souls of men.  All these endowments, and
all these occupations, right and necessary as, in their own places,
they all are,--great talents, great learning, great publicity,
great popularity,--all tend, unless they are taken great care of,
to lead their possessors away from all time for, and from all
sympathy with, the watchfulness of the New Testament minister.
Watching over a flock brings to you none of the exhilaration of
authority and influence, none of the intoxication of publicity and
applause.  Your experiences are the quite opposite of all these
things when you are watching over your flock.  Your work among your
flock is all done in distant and lonely places, on hillsides, among
woods and thickets, and in cloudy and dark days.  You spend your
strength among sick and dying and wandering sheep, among wolves and
weasels, and what not, of that verminous kind.  At the same time,
all good pastors are not so obscure and forgotten as all that.
Some exceptionally able and exceptionally devoted and self-
forgetful men manage to combine both extremes of a minister's
duties and opportunities in themselves.  Our own Sir Henry
Moncreiff was a pattern pastor.  There was no better pastor in
Edinburgh in his day than dear Sir Henry was; and yet, at the same
time, everybody knows what an incomparable ecclesiastical casuist
Sir Henry was.  Mr. Moody, again, is a great preacher, preaching to
tens of thousands of hearers at a time; but, at the same time, Mr.
Moody is one of the most skilful and attentive pastors that ever
took individual souls in hand and kept them over many years in
mind.  But these are completely exceptional men, and what I want to
say to commonplace and limited and everyday men like myself is
this, that watching for the souls of our people, one by one, day in
and day out,--that, above everything else, that, and nothing else,-
-makes any man a pastor of the apostolic type.  An able man may
know all about the history, the habitat, the various species, the
breeds, the diseases, and the prices of sheep, and yet be nothing
at all of a true shepherd.  And so may a minister.

2.  Pastoral visitation, combined with personal dealing, is by far
the best way of watching for souls.  I well remember when I first
began my ministry in this congregation, how much I was impressed
with what one of the ablest and best of our then ministers was
reported to have testified on his deathbed.  Calling back to his
bedside a young minister who had come to see him, the dying man
said:  'Prepare for the pulpit; above everything else you do,
prepare for the pulpit.  Let me again repeat it, should it at any
time stand with you between visiting a death-bed and preparing for
the pulpit, prepare for the pulpit.'  I was immensely impressed
with that dying injunction when it was repeated to me, but I have
lived,--I do not say to put my preparation for the pulpit, such as
it is, second to my more pastoral work in my week's thoughts, but--
to put my visiting in the very front rank and beside my pulpit.
'We never were accustomed to much visiting,' said my elders to me
in their solicitude for their young minister when he was first left
alone with this whole charge; 'only appear in your own pulpit twice
on Sabbath:  keep as much at home as possible:  we were never used
to much visiting, and we do not look for it.'  Well, that was most
kindly intended; but it was much more kind than wise.  For I have
lived to learn that no congregation will continue to prosper, or,
if other more consolidated and less exacting congregations, at any
rate not this congregation, without constant pastoral attention.
And remember, I do not complain of that.  Far, far from that.  For
I am as sure as I am of anything connected with a minister's life,
that a minister's own soul will prosper largely in the measure that
the souls of his people prosper through his pastoral work.  No
preaching, even if it were as good preaching as the apostle's
itself, can be left to make up for the neglect of pastoral
visitation and personal intercourse.  'I taught you from house to
house,' says Paul himself, when he was resigning the charge of the
church of Ephesus into the hands of the elders of Ephesus.  What
would we ministers not give for a descriptive report of an
afternoon's house-to-house visitation by the Apostle Paul!  Now in
a workshop, now at a sickbed, now with a Greek, now with a Jew,
and, in every case, not discussing politics and cursing the
weather, not living his holidays over again and hearing of all the
approaching marriages, but testifying to all men in his own
incomparably winning and commanding way repentance toward God and
faith toward the Lord Jesus Christ.  We city ministers call out and
complain that we have no time to visit our people in their own
houses; but that is all subterfuge.  If the whole truth were told
about the busiest of us, it is not so much want of time as want of
intention; it is want of set and indomitable purpose to do it; it
is want of method and of regularity such as all business men must
have; and it is want, above all, of laying out every hour of every
day under the Great Taskmaster's eye.  Many country ministers
again,--we, miserable men that we are, are never happy or well
placed,--complain continually that their people are so few, and so
scattered, and so ignorant, and so uninteresting, and so
unresponsive, that it is not worth their toil to go up and down in
remote places seeking after them.  It takes a whole day among bad
roads and wet bogs to visit a shepherd's wife and children, and two
or three bothies and pauper's hovels on the way home.  'On the
morrow,' so runs many an entry in Thomas Boston's Memoirs, 'I
visited the sick, and spent the afternoon in visiting others, and
found gross ignorance prevailing.  Nothing but stupidity prevailed;
till I saw that I had enough to do among my handful.  I had another
diet of catechising on Wednesday afternoon, and the discovery I
made of the ignorance of God and of themselves made me the more
satisfied with the smallness of my charge . . . Twice a year I
catechised the parish, and once a year I visited their families.
My method of visitation was this.  I made a particular application
of my doctrine in the pulpit to the family, exhorted them all to
lay all these things to heart, exhorted them also to secret prayer,
supposing they kept family worship, urged their relative duties
upon them,' etc. etc.  And then at his leaving Ettrick, he writes:
'Thus I parted with a people whose hearts were knit to me and mine
to them.  The last three or four years had been much blessed, and
had been made very comfortable to me, not in respect of my own
handful only, but others of the countryside also.'  Jonathan
Edwards called Thomas Boston 'that truly great divine.'  I am not
such a judge of divinity as Jonathan Edwards was, but I always call
Boston to myself that truly great pastor.  But my lazy and
deceitful heart says to me:  No praise to Boston, for he lived and
did his work in the quiet Forest of Ettrick.  True, so he did.
Well, then, look at the populous and busy town of Kidderminster.
And let me keep continually before my abashed conscience that hard-
working corpse Richard Baxter.  Absolutely on the same page on
which that dying man enters diseases and medicines enough to fill a
doctor's diary after a whole day in an incurable hospital, that
noble soul goes on to say:  'I preached before the wars twice each
Lord's Day, but after the wars but once, and once every Thursday,
besides occasional sermons.  Every Thursday evening my neighbours
that were most desirous, and had opportunity, met at my house.  Two
days every week my assistant and I myself took fourteen families
between us for private catechising and conference; he going through
the parish, and the town coming to me.  I first heard them recite
the words of the Catechism, and then examined them about the sense,
and lastly urged them, with all possible engaging reason and
vehemency, to answerable affection and practice.  If any of them
were stalled through ignorance or bashfulness, I forbore to press
them, but made them hearers, and turned all into instruction and
exhortation.  I spent about an hour with a family, and admitted no
others to be present, lest bashfulness should make it burdensome,
or any should talk of the weakness of others.'  And then he tells
how his people's necessity made him practise physic among them,
till he would have twenty at his door at once.  'All these my
employments were but my recreations, and, as it were, the work of
my spare hours.  For my writings were my chiefest daily labour.
And blessed be the God of mercies that brought me from the grave
and gave me, after wars and sickness, fourteen years' liberty in
such sweet employment!'  Let all ministers who would sit at home
over a pipe and a newspaper with a quiet conscience keep Boston's
Memoirs and Baxter's Reliquiae at arm's-length.

3.  Our young communicants' classes, and still more, those private
interviews that precede and finish up our young communicants'
classes, are by far our best opportunities as pastors.  I remember
Dr. Moody Stuart telling me long ago that he had found his young
communicants' classes to be the most fruitful opportunities of all
his ministry; as, also, next to them, times of baptism in families.
And every minister who tries to be a minister at all after Dr.
Moody Stuart's pattern, will tell you something of the same thing.
They get at the opening history of their young people's hearts
before their first communion.  They make shorthand entries and
secret memoranda at such a season like this:  'A. a rebuke to me.
He had for long been astonished at me that I did not speak to him
about his soul.  B. traced his conversion to the singing of 'The
sands of time are sinking' in this church last summer.  C. was
spoken to by a room-mate.  D. was to be married, and she died.  Of
E. I have great hope.  F., were she anywhere but at home, I would
have great hopes of her,'--and so on.  But, then, when a minister
takes boldness to turn over the pages of his young communicants'
roll for half a lifetime--ah me, ah me!  What was I doing to let
that so promising communicant go so far astray, and I never to go
after him?  And that other.  And that other.  And that other.  Till
we can read no more.  O God of mercy, when Thou inquirest after
blood, let me be hidden in the cleft of that Rock so deeply cleft
for unwatchful ministers!

4.  And then, as Dr. Joseph Parker says, who says everything so
plainly and so powerfully:  'There is pastoral preaching as well as
pastoral visitation.  There is pastoral preaching; rich revelation
of divine truth; high, elevating treatment of the Christian
mysteries; and he is the pastor to me who does not come to my house
to drink and smoke and gossip and show his littleness, but who, out
of a rich experience, meets me with God's word at every turn of my
life, and speaks the something to me that I just at that moment
want.'  Let us not have less pastoral visitation in the time to
come, but let us have more and more of such pastoral preaching.

5.  But, my brethren, it is time for you, as John said to the elect
lady and her children, to look to yourselves.  The salvation of
your soul is precious, and its salvation is such a task, such a
battle, such a danger, and such a risk, that it will take all that
your most watchful minister can do, and all that you can do
yourself, and all that God can do for you, and yet your soul will
scarcely be saved after all.  You do not know what salvation is nor
what it costs.  You will not be saved in your sleep.  You will not
waken up at the last day and find yourself saved by the grace of
God and you not know it.  You will know it to your bitter cost
before your soul is saved from sin and death.  You and your
minister too.  And therefore it is that He Who is to judge your
soul at last says to you, as much as He says it to any of His
ministers, Watch!  What I say unto one I say unto all, Watch.
Watch and pray, lest you enter into temptation.  Look to yourself,
then, sinner.  In Christ's name, look to yourself and watch
yourself.  You have no enemy to fear but yourself.  No one can hurt
a hair of your head but yourself.  Have you found that out?  Have
you found yourself out?  Do you ever look in the direction of your
own heart?  Have you begun to watch what goes on in your own heart?
What is it to you what goes on in the world around you compared
with what goes on in the world within you?  Look, then, to
yourself.  Watch, above all watching, yourself.  Watch what it is
that moves you to do this or that.  Stop sometimes and ask yourself
why you do such and such a thing.  Did you ever hear of such a
thing as a motive in a human heart?  And did your minister,
watching for your soul, ever tell you that your soul will be lost
or saved, condemned or justified at the last day according to your
motives?  You never knew that!  You were never told that by your
minister!  Miserable pair!  What does he take up his Sabbaths with?
And what leads you to waste your Sabbaths and your soul on such a
stupid minister?  But, shepherd or no shepherd, minister or no
minister, look to yourself.  Look to yourself when you lie down and
when you rise up; when you go out and when you come in; when you
are in the society of men and when you are alone with your own
heart.  Look to yourself when men praise you, and look to yourself
when men blame you.  Look to yourself when you sit down to eat and
drink, and still more when you sit and speak about your absent
brother.  Look to yourself when you meet your enemy or your rival
in the street, when you pass his house, or hear or read his name.
Yes, you may well say so.  At that rate a man's life would be all
watching.  So it would.  And so it must.  And more than that, so it
is with some men not far from you who never told you how much you
have made them watch.  Did you never know all that till now?  Were
you never told that every Christian man, I do not mean every
communicant, but every truly and sincerely and genuinely Christian
man watches himself in that way?  For as the one essential and
distinguishing mark of a New Testament minister is not that he is
an able man, or a studious man, or an eloquent man, but that he is
a pastor and watches for souls, so it is the chiefest and the best
mark, and to himself the only safe and infallible mark, that any
man is a sincere and true Christian man, that he watches himself
always and in all things looks first and last to himself.



SINCERE



'In all things showing sincerity.'--Paul to Titus.

Charles Bennett has a delightful drawing of Sincere in Charles
Kingsley's beautiful edition of The Pilgrim's Progress.  You feel
that you could look all day into those clear eyes.  Your eyes would
begin to quail before you had looked long into the fourth
shepherd's deep eyes; but those eyes of his have no cause to quail
under yours.  This man has nothing to hide from you.  He never had.
He loves you, and his love to you is wholly without dissimulation.
He absolutely and unreservedly means and intends by you and yours
all that he has ever said to you and yours, and much more than he
has ever been able to say.  The owner of those deep blue eyes is as
true to you when he is among your enemies as he is true to the
truth itself when he is among your friends.  Mark also the
unobtrusive strength of his mouth, all suffused over as it is with
a most winning and reassuring sweetness.  The fourth shepherd of
the Delectable Mountains is one of the very best of Bennett's
excellent portraits.  But Mr. Kerr Bain's pen-and-ink portrait of
Sincere in his People of the Pilgrimage is even better than
Bennett's excellent drawing.  'Sincere is softer in outline and
feature than Watchful.  His eye is full-open and lucid, with a face
of mingled expressiveness and strength--a lovable, lowly, pure-
spirited man--candid, considerate, willing, cheerful--not speaking
many words, and never any but true words.'  Happy sheep that have
such a shepherd!  Happy people! if only any people in the Church of
Christ could have such a pastor.

It is surely too late, too late or too early, to begin to put tests
to a minister's sincerity after he has been licensed and called and
is now standing in the presence of his presbytery and surrounded
with his congregation.  It is a tremendous enough question to put
to any man at any time:  'Are not zeal for the honour of God, love
to Jesus Christ, and desire of saving souls your great motives and
chief inducement to enter into the function of the holy ministry?'
A man who does not understand what it is you are saying to him will
just make the same bow to these awful words that he makes to all
your other conventional questions.  But the older he grows in his
ministry, and the more he comes to discover the incurable plague of
his own heart, and with that the whole meaning and full weight of
your overwhelming words, the more will he shrink back from having
such questions addressed to him.  Fools will rush in where Moses
and Isaiah and Jeremiah and Peter and Paul feared to set their
foot.  Paul was to be satisfied if only he was let do the work of a
minister all his days and then was not at the end made a castaway.
And yet, writing to the same church, Paul says that his sincerity
among them had been such that he could hold up his ministerial life
like spotless linen between the eye of his conscience and the sun.
But all that was written and is to be read and understood as Paul's
ideal that he had honestly laboured after, rather than as an actual
attainment he had arrived at.  Great as Paul's attainments were in
humility, in purity of intention, and in simplicity and sincerity
of heart, yet the mind of Christ was not so given even to His most
gifted apostle, that he could seriously say that he had attained to
such utter ingenuity, simplicity, disengagement from himself, and
surrender to Christ, as to be able to face the sun with a spotless
ministry.  All he ever says at his boldest and best on that great
matter is to be read in the light of his universal law of personal
and apostolic imperfection--Not that I have attained, either am
already perfect; but I follow after.  And blessed be God that this
is all that He looks for in any of His ministers, that they follow
all their days after a more and more godly sincerity.  It was the
apostle's love of absolute sincerity,--and, especially, it was his
bitter hatred of all the remaining dregs of insincerity that he
from time to time detected in his own heart,--it was this that gave
him his good conscience before a God of pity and compassion, truth
and grace.  And with something of the same love of perfect
sincerity, accompanied with something of the same hatred of
insincerity and of ourselves on account of it, we, too, toward this
same God of pity and compassion, will hold up a conscience that
would fain be a good conscience.  And till it is a good conscience
we shall hold up with it a broken heart.  And that genuine love of
all sincerity, and that equally genuine hatred of all remaining
insincerity, will make all our ministerial work, as it made all
Paul's apostolic work, not only acceptable, but will also make its
very defects and defeats both acceptable and fruitful in the
estimation and result of God.  It so happens that I am reading for
my own private purposes at this moment an old book of 1641,
Drexilius On a Right Intention, and I cannot do better at this
point than share with you the page I am just reading.  'Not to be
too much troubled or daunted at any cross event,' he says, 'is the
happy state of his mind who has entered on any enterprise with a
pure and pious intention.  That great apostle James gained no more
than eight persons in all Spain when he was called to lay down his
head under Herod's sword.  And was not God ready to give the same
reward to James as to those who converted kings and whole kingdoms?
Surely He was.  For God does not give His ministers a charge as to
what they shall effect, but only as to what they shall intend to
effect.  Wherefore, when his art faileth a servant of God, when
nothing goes forward, when everything turneth to his ruin, even
when his hope is utterly void, he is scarce one whit troubled; for
this, saith he to himself, is not in my power, but in God's power
alone.  I have done what I could.  I have done what was fit for me
to do.  Fair and foul is all of God's disposing.'

And, then, this simplicity and purity of intention gives a minister
that fine combination of candour and considerateness which we saw
to exist together so harmoniously in the character of Sincere.
Such a minister is not tongue-tied with sinister and selfish
intentions.  His sincerity toward God gives him a masterful
position among his people.  His words of rebuke and warning go
straight to his people's consciences because they come straight out
of his own conscience.  His words are their own witness that he is
neither fearing his people nor fawning upon his people in speaking
to them.  And, then, such candour prepares the way for the utmost
considerateness when the proper time comes for considerateness.
Such a minister is patient with the stupid, and even with the
wicked and the injurious, because in all their stupidity and
wickedness and injuriousness they have only injured and
impoverished themselves.  And if God is full of patience and pity
for the ignorant and the evil and the out of the way, then His
sincere-hearted minister is of all men the very man to carry the
divine message of forgiveness and instruction to such sinners.
Yes, Mr. Bain must have seen Sincere closely and in a clear light
when he took down this fine feature of his character, that he is at
once candid and considerate--with a whole face of mingled
expressiveness and strength.

Writing about sincerity and a right intention in young ministers,
old Drexilius says:  'When I turn to clergymen, I would have sighs
and groans to speak for me.  For, alas! I am afraid that there be
found some which come into the ministry, not that they may obtain a
holy office in which to spend their life, but for worse ends.  To
enter the ministry with a naughty intention is to come straight to
destruction.  Let no minister think at any time of a better living,
but only at all times of a holier life.  Wherefore, O ministers and
spiritual men, consider and take heed.  There can be no safe guide
to your office but a right, sincere, pure intention.  Whosoever
cometh to it with any other conduct or companion must either return
to his former state of life, or here he shall certainly perish . .
. What is more commendable in a religious man than to be always in
action and to be exercised one while in teaching the ignorant,
another while in comforting such as are troubled in mind, sometimes
in making sermons, and sometimes in admonishing the sick?  But with
what secret malignity doth a wrong intention insinuate itself into
these very actions that are the most religious!  For ofttimes we
desire nothing else but to be doing.  We desire to become public,
not that we may profit many, but because we have not learned how to
be private.  We seek for divers employments, not that we may avoid
idleness, but that we may come into people's knowledge.  We despise
a small number of hearers, and such as are poor, simple, and
rustical, and let fly our endeavours at more eminent chairs, though
not in apparent pursuit; all which is the plain argument of a
corrupt intention.  O ye that wait upon religion, O ministers of
God, this is to sell most transcendent wares at a very low rate--
nay, this is to cast them, and yourselves too, into the fire.'

There are some outstanding temptations to insincerity in some
ministers that must be pointed out here.  (1) Ministers with a warm
rhetorical temperament are beset continually with the temptation to
pile up false fire on the altar; to dilate, that is, both in their
prayers and in their sermons, upon certain topics in a style that
is full of insincerity.  Ministers who have no real hold of divine
things in themselves will yet fill their pulpit hour with the most
florid and affecting pictures of sacred and even of evangelical
things.  This is what our shrewd and satirical people mean when
they say of us that So-and-so has a great SOUGH of the gospel in
his preaching, but the SOUGH only.  (2) Another kindred temptation
to even the best and truest of ministers is to make pulpit appeals
about the evil of sin and the necessity of a holy life that they
themselves do not feel and do not attempt to live up to.  Butler
has a terrible passage on the heart-hardening effects of making
pictures of virtue and never trying to put those pictures into
practice.  And readers of Newman will remember his powerful
application of this same temptation to literary men in his fine
sermon on Unreal Words.  (3) Another temptation is to affect an
interest in our people and a sympathy with them that we do not in
reality feel.  All human life is full of this temptation to double-
dealing and hypocrisy; but, then, it is large part of a minister's
office to feel with and for his people, and to give the tenderest
and the most sacred expression to that feeling.  And, unless he is
a man of a scrupulously sincere, true, and tender heart, his daily
duties will soon develop him into a solemn hypocrite.  And if he
feels only for his own people, and for them only when they become
and as long as they remain his own people, then his insincerity and
imposture is only the more abominable in the sight of God.  (4)
Archbishop Whately, with that strong English common sense and that
cultivated clear-headedness that almost make him a writer of
genius, points out a view of sincerity that it behoves ministers
especially to cultivate in themselves.  He tells us not only to act
always according to our convictions, but also to see that our
convictions are true and unbiassed convictions.  It is a very
superficial sincerity even when we actually believe what we profess
to believe.  But that is a far deeper and a far nobler sincerity
which watches with a strict and severe jealousy over the formation
of our beliefs and convictions.  Ministers must, first for
themselves and then for their people, live far deeper down than
other men.  They must be at home among the roots, not of actions
only, but much more of convictions.  We may act honestly enough out
of our present convictions and principles, while, all the time, our
convictions and our principles are vitiated at bottom by the
selfish ground they ultimately stand in.  Let ministers, then, to
begin with, live deep down among the roots of their opinions and
their beliefs.  Let them not only flee from being consciously
insincere and hypocritical men; let them keep their eye like the
eye of God continually on that deep ground of the soul where so
many men unknown to themselves deceive themselves.  And, thus
exercised, they shall be able out of a deep and clean heart to rise
far above that trimming and hedging and self-seeking and self-
sheltering in disputed and unpopular questions which is such a
temptation to all men, and is such a shame and scandal in a
minister.

Now, my good friends, we have kept all this time to the fourth
shepherd and to his noble name, but let us look in closing at some
of his sheep,--that is to say, at ourselves.  For is it not said in
the prophet:  Ye my flock, the flock of my pasture, are men, and I
am your God, saith the Lord God.  All, therefore, that has been
said about the sincerity and insincerity of ministers is to be said
equally of their people also in all their special and peculiar
walks of life.  Sincerity is as noble a virtue, and insincerity is
as detestable a vice, in a doctor, or a lawyer, or a schoolmaster,
or a merchant,--almost, if not altogether, as much so as in a
minister.  Your insincerity and hypocrisy in your daily intercourse
with your friends and neighbours is a miserable enough state of
mind, but at the root of all that there lies your radical
insincerity toward God and your own soul.  In his Christian
Perfection William Law introduces his readers to a character called
Julius, who goes regularly to prayers, and there confesses himself
to be a miserable sinner who has no health in him; and yet that
same Julius cannot bear to be informed of any imperfection or
suspected to be wanting in any kind or degree of virtue.  Now, Law
asks, can there be a stronger proof that Julius is wanting in the
sincerity of his devotions?  Is it not as plain as anything can be
that that man's confessions of sin are only words of course, a
certain civility of sacred speech in which his heart has not a
single atom of share?  Julius confesses himself to be in great
weakness, corruption, disorder, and infirmity, and yet he is
mortally angry with you if at any time you remotely and tenderly
hint that he may be just a shade wrong in his opinions, or one
hair's-breadth off what is square and correct in his actions.  Look
to yourself, Julius, and to your insincere heart.  Look to yourself
at all times, but above all other times at the times and in the
places of your devotions.  Ten to one, my hearer of to-night, you
may never have thought of that before.  And what would you think if
you were told that this Sincere shepherd was appointed us for this
evening's discourse, and that you were led up to this house, just
that you might have your attention turned to your many miserable
insincerities of all kinds, but especially to your so Julius-like
devotions?  'And Nathan said unto David, Thou art the man.  And
David said unto Nathan, I have sinned against the Lord.'

What, then, my truly miserable fellow-sinner and fellow-worshipper,
what are we to do?  Am I to give up preaching altogether because I
am continually carried on under the impulse of the pulpit far
beyond both my attainments and my intentions?  Am I to cease from
public prayer altogether because when engaged in it I am compelled
to utter words of contrition and confession and supplication that
little agree with the everyday temper and sensibility of my soul?
And am I wholly to eschew pastoral work because my heart is not so
absolutely clean and simple and sincere toward all my own people
and toward other ministers' people as it ought to be?  No!  Never!
Never!  Let me rather keep my heart of such earth and slag in the
hottest place of temptation, and then, such humiliating discoveries
as are there continually being made to me of myself will surely at
last empty me of all self-righteousness and self-sufficiency, and
make me at the end of my ministry, if not till then, the penitent
pastor of a penitent people.  And when thus penitent, then surely,
also somewhat more sincere in my designs and intentions, if not
even then in my attainments and performances.

'O Eternal God, Who hast made all things for man, and man for Thy
glory, sanctify my body and my soul, my thoughts and my intentions,
my words and my actions, that whatsoever I shall think or speak or
do may be by me designed to the glory of Thy name.  O God, turn my
necessities into virtue, and the works of nature into the works of
grace, by making them orderly, regular, temperate, subordinate, and
profitable to ends beyond their own proper efficacy.  And let no
pride or self-seeking, no covetousness or revenge, no impure
mixtures or unhandsome purposes, no little ends and low
imaginations, pollute my spirit or unhallow any of my words or
actions.  But let my body be the servant of my spirit, and both
soul and body servants of my Lord, that, doing all things for Thy
glory here, I may be made a partaker of Thy glory hereafter;
through Jesus Christ, my Lord.  Amen.'



Footnotes:

{1}  Delivered on the Sabbath before Communion.

{2}  Delivered June 26th, 1892, on the eve of a general election.





End of Project Gutenberg Etext Bunyan Characters: First Series by Whyte

*The Project Gutenberg Etext of Inferno/Hell by Dante Aligheri*

Also see our other translations of Dante's Divine Comedy; also,
you may want to look at our Etext #1000 in the original Italian


Copyright laws are changing all over the world, be sure to check
the copyright laws for your country before posting these files!!

Please take a look at the important information in this header.
We encourage you to keep this file on your own disk, keeping an
electronic path open for the next readers.  Do not remove this.


**Welcome To The World of Free Plain Vanilla Electronic Texts**

**Etexts Readable By Both Humans and By Computers, Since 1971**

*These Etexts Prepared By Hundreds of Volunteers and Donations*

Information on contacting Project Gutenberg to get Etexts, and
further information is included below.  We need your donations.


The Divine Comedy, Volume 1, Hell [The Inferno]

by Dante Aligheri

Translated by Charles Eliot Norton

December, 1999  [Etext #1995]


*The Project Gutenberg Etext of Inferno/Hell by Dante Aligheri*
*****This file should be named 1ddcn10.txt or 1ddcn10.zip******

Corrected EDITIONS of our etexts get a new NUMBER, 1ddcn11.txt
VERSIONS based on separate sources get new LETTER, 1ddcn10a.txt


Etext scanned by Dianne Bean of Phoenix, Arizona

Project Gutenberg Etexts are usually created from multiple editions,
all of which are in the Public Domain in the United States, unless a
copyright notice is included.  Therefore, we usually do NOT keep any
of these books in compliance with any particular paper edition.


We are now trying to release all our books one month in advance
of the official release dates, leaving time for better editing.

Please note:  neither this list nor its contents are final till
midnight of the last day of the month of any such announcement.
The official release date of all Project Gutenberg Etexts is at
Midnight, Central Time, of the last day of the stated month.  A
preliminary version may often be posted for suggestion, comment
and editing by those who wish to do so.  To be sure you have an
up to date first edition [xxxxx10x.xxx] please check file sizes
in the first week of the next month.  Since our ftp program has
a bug in it that scrambles the date [tried to fix and failed] a
look at the file size will have to do, but we will try to see a
new copy has at least one byte more or less.


Information about Project Gutenberg (one page)

We produce about two million dollars for each hour we work.  The
time it takes us, a rather conservative estimate, is fifty hours
to get any etext selected, entered, proofread, edited, copyright
searched and analyzed, the copyright letters written, etc.  This
projected audience is one hundred million readers.  If our value
per text is nominally estimated at one dollar then we produce $2
million dollars per hour this year as we release thirty-six text
files per month, or 432 more Etexts in 1999 for a total of 2000+
If these reach just 10% of the computerized population, then the
total should reach over 200 billion Etexts given away this year.

The Goal of Project Gutenberg is to Give Away One Trillion Etext
Files by December 31, 2001.  [10,000 x 100,000,000 = 1 Trillion]
This is ten thousand titles each to one hundred million readers,
which is only ~5% of the present number of computer users.

At our revised rates of production, we will reach only one-third
of that goal by the end of 2001, or about 3,333 Etexts unless we
manage to get some real funding; currently our funding is mostly
from Michael Hart's salary at Carnegie-Mellon University, and an
assortment of sporadic gifts; this salary is only good for a few
more years, so we are looking for something to replace it, as we
don't want Project Gutenberg to be so dependent on one person.

We need your donations more than ever!


All donations should be made to "Project Gutenberg/CMU": and are
tax deductible to the extent allowable by law.  (CMU = Carnegie-
Mellon University).

For these and other matters, please mail to:

Project Gutenberg
P. O. Box  2782
Champaign, IL 61825

When all other email fails. . .try our Executive Director:
Michael S. Hart <hart@pobox.com>
hart@pobox.com forwards to hart@prairienet.org and archive.org
if your mail bounces from archive.org, I will still see it, if
it bounces from prairienet.org, better resend later on. . . .

We would prefer to send you this information by email.

******

To access Project Gutenberg etexts, use any Web browser
to view http://promo.net/pg.  This site lists Etexts by
author and by title, and includes information about how
to get involved with Project Gutenberg.  You could also
download our past Newsletters, or subscribe here.  This
is one of our major sites, please email hart@pobox.com,
for a more complete list of our various sites.

To go directly to the etext collections, use FTP or any
Web browser to visit a Project Gutenberg mirror (mirror
sites are available on 7 continents; mirrors are listed
at http://promo.net/pg).

Mac users, do NOT point and click, typing works better.

Example FTP session:

ftp sunsite.unc.edu
login: anonymous
password: your@login
cd pub/docs/books/gutenberg
cd etext90 through etext99
dir [to see files]
get or mget [to get files. . .set bin for zip files]
GET GUTINDEX.??  [to get a year's listing of books, e.g., GUTINDEX.99]
GET GUTINDEX.ALL [to get a listing of ALL books]

***

**Information prepared by the Project Gutenberg legal advisor**

(Three Pages)


***START**THE SMALL PRINT!**FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN ETEXTS**START***
Why is this "Small Print!" statement here?  You know: lawyers.
They tell us you might sue us if there is something wrong with
your copy of this etext, even if you got it for free from
someone other than us, and even if what's wrong is not our
fault.  So, among other things, this "Small Print!" statement
disclaims most of our liability to you.  It also tells you how
you can distribute copies of this etext if you want to.

*BEFORE!* YOU USE OR READ THIS ETEXT
By using or reading any part of this PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
etext, you indicate that you understand, agree to and accept
this "Small Print!" statement.  If you do not, you can receive
a refund of the money (if any) you paid for this etext by
sending a request within 30 days of receiving it to the person
you got it from.  If you received this etext on a physical
medium (such as a disk), you must return it with your request.

ABOUT PROJECT GUTENBERG-TM ETEXTS
This PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm etext, like most PROJECT GUTENBERG-
tm etexts, is a "public domain" work distributed by Professor
Michael S. Hart through the Project Gutenberg Association at
Carnegie-Mellon University (the "Project").  Among other
things, this means that no one owns a United States copyright
on or for this work, so the Project (and you!) can copy and
distribute it in the United States without permission and
without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules, set forth
below, apply if you wish to copy and distribute this etext
under the Project's "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark.

To create these etexts, the Project expends considerable
efforts to identify, transcribe and proofread public domain
works.  Despite these efforts, the Project's etexts and any
medium they may be on may contain "Defects".  Among other
things, Defects may take the form of incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged
disk or other etext medium, a computer virus, or computer
codes that damage or cannot be read by your equipment.

LIMITED WARRANTY; DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES
But for the "Right of Replacement or Refund" described below,
[1] the Project (and any other party you may receive this
etext from as a PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm etext) disclaims all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including
legal fees, and [2] YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE OR
UNDER STRICT LIABILITY, OR FOR BREACH OF WARRANTY OR CONTRACT,
INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE
OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE
POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.

If you discover a Defect in this etext within 90 days of
receiving it, you can receive a refund of the money (if any)
you paid for it by sending an explanatory note within that
time to the person you received it from.  If you received it
on a physical medium, you must return it with your note, and
such person may choose to alternatively give you a replacement
copy.  If you received it electronically, such person may
choose to alternatively give you a second opportunity to
receive it electronically.

THIS ETEXT IS OTHERWISE PROVIDED TO YOU "AS-IS".  NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ARE MADE TO YOU AS
TO THE ETEXT OR ANY MEDIUM IT MAY BE ON, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A
PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Some states do not allow disclaimers of implied warranties or
the exclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so the
above disclaimers and exclusions may not apply to you, and you
may have other legal rights.

INDEMNITY
You will indemnify and hold the Project, its directors,
officers, members and agents harmless from all liability, cost
and expense, including legal fees, that arise directly or
indirectly from any of the following that you do or cause:
[1] distribution of this etext, [2] alteration, modification,
or addition to the etext, or [3] any Defect.

DISTRIBUTION UNDER "PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm"
You may distribute copies of this etext electronically, or by
disk, book or any other medium if you either delete this
"Small Print!" and all other references to Project Gutenberg,
or:

[1]  Only give exact copies of it.  Among other things, this
     requires that you do not remove, alter or modify the
     etext or this "small print!" statement.  You may however,
     if you wish, distribute this etext in machine readable
     binary, compressed, mark-up, or proprietary form,
     including any form resulting from conversion by word pro-
     cessing or hypertext software, but only so long as
     *EITHER*:

     [*]  The etext, when displayed, is clearly readable, and
          does *not* contain characters other than those
          intended by the author of the work, although tilde
          (~), asterisk (*) and underline (_) characters may
          be used to convey punctuation intended by the
          author, and additional characters may be used to
          indicate hypertext links; OR

     [*]  The etext may be readily converted by the reader at
          no expense into plain ASCII, EBCDIC or equivalent
          form by the program that displays the etext (as is
          the case, for instance, with most word processors);
          OR

     [*]  You provide, or agree to also provide on request at
          no additional cost, fee or expense, a copy of the
          etext in its original plain ASCII form (or in EBCDIC
          or other equivalent proprietary form).

[2]  Honor the etext refund and replacement provisions of this
     "Small Print!" statement.

[3]  Pay a trademark license fee to the Project of 20% of the
     net profits you derive calculated using the method you
     already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  If you
     don't derive profits, no royalty is due.  Royalties are
     payable to "Project Gutenberg Association/Carnegie-Mellon
     University" within the 60 days following each
     date you prepare (or were legally required to prepare)
     your annual (or equivalent periodic) tax return.

WHAT IF YOU *WANT* TO SEND MONEY EVEN IF YOU DON'T HAVE TO?
The Project gratefully accepts contributions in money, time,
scanning machines, OCR software, public domain etexts, royalty
free copyright licenses, and every other sort of contribution
you can think of.  Money should be paid to "Project Gutenberg
Association / Carnegie-Mellon University".

*END*THE SMALL PRINT! FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN ETEXTS*Ver.04.29.93*END*





Etext scanned by Dianne Bean of Phoenix, Arizona.





The Divine Comedy, Volume 1, Hell [The Inferno]

by Dante Aligheri

Translated by Charles Eliot Norton




HELL




To

JAMES RUSSELL LOWELL.

E come sare' io sense lui corso?

It is a happiness for me to connect this volume with the memory
of my friend and master from youth. I was but a beginner in the
study of the Divine Comedy when I first had his incomparable aid
in the understanding of it. During the last year of his life he
read the proofs of this volume, to what great advantage to my
work may readily be conceived.

When, in the early summer of this year, the printing of the
Purgatory began, though illness made it an exertion to him, he
continued this act of friendship, and did not cease till, at the
fifth canto, he laid down the pencil forever from his dear and
honored hand.

CHARLES ELIOT NORTON.


CAMBRIDGE, MASSACHUSETTS,

1 October, 1891

The text followed in this translation is, in general, that of
Witte. In a few cases I have preferred the readings which the
more recent researches of the Rev. Dr. Edward Moore, of Oxford,
seem to have established as correct.



CONTENTS

CANTO I. Dante, astray in a wood, reaches the foot of a hill
which he begins to ascend; he is hindered by three beasts; he
turns back and is met by Virgil, who proposes to guide him into
the eternal world.

CANTO II. Dante, doubtful of his own powers, is discouraged at
the outset.--Virgil cheers him by telling him that he has been
sent to his aid by a blessed Spirit from Heaven.--Dante casts off
fear, and the poets proceed.

CANTO III. The gate of Hell. Virgil leads Dante in.--The
punishment of the neither good nor bad.--Acheron, and the sinners
on its bank.--Charon.--Earthquake.--Dante swoons.

CANTO IV. The further side of Acheron.--Virgil leads Dante into
Limbo, the First Circle of Hell, containing the spirits of those
who lived virtuously but without Christianity.--Greeting of
Virgil by his fellow poets.--They enter a castle, where are the
shades of ancient worthies.--Virgil and Dante depart.

CANTO V. The Second Circle: Carnal sinners.--Minos.--Shades
renowned of old.--Francesca da Rimini.

CANTO VI. The Third Circle: the Gluttonous.--Cerberus.--Ciacco.

CANTO VII. The Fourth Circle: the Avaricious and the Prodigal.--
Pluto.--Fortune.--The Styx.--The Fifth Circle: the Wrathful and
the Sullen.

CANTO VIII. The Fifth Circle.--Phlegyas and his boat.--Passage of
the Styx.--Filippo Argenti.--The City of Dis.--The demons refuse
entrance to the poets.

CANTO IX. The City of Dis.--Eriehtho.--The Three Furies.--The
Heavenly Messenger.--The Sixth Circle: Heresiarchs.

CANTO X. The Sixth Circle: Heresiarchs.--Farinata degli Uberti.--
Cavalcante Cavalcanti.--Frederick II.

CANTO XI. The Sixth Circle: Heretics.--Tomb of Pope Anastasius.--
Discourse of Virgil on the divisions of the lower Hell.

CANTO XII. First round of the Seventh Circle: those who do
violence to others.--Tyrants and Homicides.--The Minotaur.--The
Centaurs.--Chiron.--Nessus.--The River of Boiling Blood, and the
Sinners in it.

CANTO XIII. Second round of the Seventh Circle: those who have
done violence to themselves and to their goods.--The Wood of
Self-murderers.--The Harpies.--Pier della Vigne.--Lano of Siena
and others.

CANTO XIV. Third round of the Seventh Circle those who have done
violence to God.--The Burning Sand.--Capaneus.--Figure of the Old
Man in Crete.--The Rivers of Hell.

CANTO XV. Third round of the Seventh Circle: those who have done
violence to Nature.--Brunetto Latini.--Prophecies of misfortune
to Dante.

CANTO XVI. Third round of the Seventh Circle: those who have done
violence to Nature.--Guido Guerra, Tegghiaio Aldobrandi and
Jacopo Rusticucci.--The roar of Phlegethon as it pours downward.-
-The cord thrown into the abyss.

CANTO XVII. Third round of the Seventh Circle: those who have
done violence to Art.--Geryon.--The Usurers.--Descent to the
Eighth Circle.

CANTO XVIII. Eighth Circle: the first pit: Panders and Seducers.-
-Venedico Caccianimico.--Jason.--Second pit: false flatterers.--
Alessio Interminei.--Thais.

CANTO XIX. Eighth Circle: third pit: Simonists.--Pope Nicholas
III

CANTO XX. Eighth Circle: fourth pit: Diviners, Soothsayers, and
Magicians.--Amphiaraus.--Tiresias.--Aruns.--Manto.--Eurypylus.--
Michael Scott.--Asolente.

CANTO XXI. Eighth Circle: fifth pit: Barrators.--A magistrate of
Lucca.--The Malebranche.--Parley with them.

CANTO XXII. Eighth Circle: fifth pit: Barrators.--Ciampolo of
Navarre.--Brother Gomita.--Michael Zanche.--Fray of the
Malebranche.

CANTO XXIII. Eighth Circle. Escape from the fifth pit.--The sixth
pit: Hypocrites.--The Jovial Friars.--Caiaphas.--Annas.--Frate
Catalano.

CANTO XXIV. Eighth Circle. The poets climb from the sixth pit.--
Seventh pit: Fraudulent Thieves.--Vanni Fucci.--Prophecy of
calamity to Dante.

CANTO XXV. Eighth Circle: seventh pit: Fraudulent Thieves.--
Cacus.--Agnello Brunellesehi and others.

CANTO XXVI. Eighth Circle: eighth pit: Fraudulent Counsellors.--
Ulysses and Diomed.

CANTO XXVII. Eighth Circle: eighth pit: Fraudulent Counsellors.--
Guido da Montefeltro.

CANTO XXVIII. Eighth Circle: ninth pit: Sowers of discord and
schism.--Mahomet and Ali.--Fra Dolcino.--Pier da Medicina.--
Curio.--Mosca.--Bertran de Born.

CANTO XXIX. Eighth Circle: ninth pit.--Geri del Bello.--Tenth
pit: Falsifiers of all sorts.--Griffolino of Mezzo.--Capocchio.

CANTO XXX. Eighth Circle: tenth pit: Falsifiers of all sorts.--
Myrrha.--Gianni Schiechi.--Master Adam.--Sinon of Troy.

CANTO XXXI. The Giants around the Eighth Circle.--Nimrod.--
Ephialtes.--Antiens sets the Poets down in the Ninth Circle.

CANTO XXXII. Ninth Circle: Traitors. First ring: Caina.--Counts
of Mangona.--Camicion de' Pazzi.--Second ring: Antenora.--Bocca
degli Abati.--Buoso da Duera.--Count Ugolino.

CANTO XXXIII. Ninth Circle: Traitors. Second ring: Antenora.--
Count Ugolino.--Third ring: Ptolomaea.--Brother Alberigo.--Branca
d' Oria.

CANTO XXXIV. Ninth Circle: Traitors. Fourth ring: Judecca.--
Lucifer.--Judas, Brutus and Cassius.--Centre of the universe.--
Passage from Hell.--Ascent to the surface of the Southern
hemisphere.


INTRODUCTION.

So many versions of the Divine Comedy exist in English that a new
one might well seem needless. But most of these translations are
in verse, and the intellectual temper of our time is impatient of
a transmutation in which substance is sacrificed for form's sake,
and the new form is itself different from the original. The
conditions of verse in different languages vary so widely as to
make any versified translation of a poem but an imperfect
reproduction of the archetype. It is like an imperfect mirror
that renders but a partial likeness, in which essential features
are blurred or distorted. Dante himself, the first modern critic,
declared that "nothing harmonized by a musical bond can be
transmuted from its own speech without losing all its sweetness
and harmony," and every fresh attempt at translation affords a
new proof of the truth of his assertion. Each language exhibits
its own special genius in its poetic forms. Even when they are
closely similar in rhythmical method their poetic effect is
essentially different, their individuality is distinct. The
hexameter of the Iliad is not the hexameter of the Aeneid. And if
this be the case in respect to related forms, it is even more
obvious in respect to forms peculiar to one language, like the
terza rima of the Italian, for which it is impossible to find a
satisfactory equivalent in another tongue.

If, then, the attempt be vain to reproduce the form or to
represent its effect in a translation, yet the substance of a
poem may have such worth that it deserves to be known by readers
who must read it in their own tongue or not at all. In this case
the aim of the translator should he to render the substance
fully, exactly, and with as close a correspondence to the tone
and style of the original as is possible between prose and
poetry. Of the charm, of the power of the poem such a translation
can give but an inadequate suggestion; the musical bond was of
its essence, and the loss of the musical bond is the loss of the
beauty to which form and substance mutually contributed, and in
which they were both alike harmonized and sublimated. The
rhythmic life of the original is its vital spirit, and the
translation losing this vital spirit is at best as the dull
plaster cast to the living marble or the breathing bronze. The
intellectual substance is there; and if the work be good,
something of the emotional quality may be conveyed; the
imagination may mould the prose as it moulded the verse,--but,
after all, "translations are but as turn-coated things at best,"
as Howell said in one of his Familiar Letters.

No poem in any tongue is more informed with rhythmic life than
the Divine Comedy. And yet, such is its extraordinary
distinction, no poem has an intellectual and emotional substance
more independent of its metrical form. Its complex structure, its
elaborate measure and rhyme, highly artificial as they are, are
so mastered by the genius of the poet as to become the most
natural expression of the spirit by which the poem is inspired;
while at the same time the thought and sentiment embodied in the
verse is of such import, and the narrative of such interest, that
they do not lose their worth when expressed in the prose of
another tongue; they still haye power to quicken imagination, and
to evoke sympathy.

In English there is an excellent prose translation of the
Inferno, by Dr. John Carlyle, a man well known to the reader of
his brother's Correspondence. It was published forty years ago,
but it is still contemporaneous enough in style to answer every
need, and had Dr. Carlyle made a version of the whole poem I
should hardly have cared to attempt a new one. In my translation
of the Inferno I am often Dr. Carlyle's debtor. His conception of
what a translation should be is very much the same as my own. Of
the Purgatorio there is a prose version which has excellent
qualities, by Mr. W. S. Dugdale. Another version of great merit,
of both the Purgatorio and Paradiso, is that of Mr. A. J. Butler.
It is accompanied by a scholarly and valuable comment, and I owe
much to Mr. Butler's work. But through what seems to me
occasional excess of literal fidelity his English is now and then
somewhat crabbed. "He overacts the office of an interpreter," I
cite again from Howell, "who doth enslave himself too strictly to
words or phrases. One may be so over-punctual in words that he
may mar the matter."

I have tried to be as literal in my translation as was consmstent
with good English, and to render Dante's own words in words as
nearly correspondent to them as the difference in the languages
would permit. But it is to be remembered that the familiar uses
and subtle associations which give to words their full meaning
are never absohitely the same in two languages. Love in English
not only SOUNDS but IS different from amor in Latin, or amore in
Italian. Even the most felicitous prose translation must fail
therefore at times to afford the entire and precise meaning of
the original.

Moreover, there are difficulties in Dante's poem for Italians,
and there are difficulties in the translation for English
readers. These, where it seemed needful, I have endeavored to
explain in brief footnotes. But I have desired to avoid
distracting the attention of the reader from the narrative, and
have mainly left the understanding of it to his good sense and
perspicacity. The clearness of Dante's imaginative vision is so
complete, and the character of his narration of it so direct and
simple, that the difficulties in understanding his intention are
comparatively few.

It is a noticeable fact that in by far the greater number of
passages where a doubt in regard to the interpretation exists,
the obscurity lies in the rhyme-word. For with all the abundant
resources of the Italian tongue in rhyme, and with all Dante's
mastery of them, the truth still is that his triple rhyme often
compelled him to exact from words such service as they did not
naturally render and as no other poet had required of them. The
compiler of the Ottimo Commento records, in an often-cited
passage, that "I, the writer, heard Dante say that never a rhyme
had led him to say other than he would, but that many a time and
oft he had made words say for him what they were not wont to
express for other poets." The sentence has a double truth, for it
indicates not only Dante's incomparable power to compel words to
give out their full meaning, but also his invention of new uses
for them, his employment of them in unusual significations or in
forms hardly elsewhere to be found. These devices occasionally
interfere with the limpid flow of his diction, but the
difficulties of interpretation to which they give rise serve
rather to mark the prevailing clearness and simplicity of his
expression than seriously to impede its easy and unperplexed
current. There are few sentences in the Divina Commedia in which
a difficulty is occasioned by lack of definiteness of thought or
distinctness of image.

A far deeper-lying and more pervading source of imperfect
comprehension of the poem than any verbal difficulty exists in
the double or triple meaning that runs through it. The narrative
of the poet's spiritual journey is so vivid and consistent that
it has all the reality of an account of an actual experience; but
within and beneath runs a stream of allegory not less consistent
and hardly less continuous than the narrative itself. To the
illustration and carrying out of this interitr meaning even the
minutest details of external incident are made to contribute,
with an appropriateness of significance, and with a freedom from
forced interpretation or artificiality of construction such as no
other writer of allegory has succeeded in attaining. The poem may
be read with interest as a record of experience without attention
to its inner meaning, but its full interest is only felt when
this inner meaning is traced, and the moral significance of the
incidents of the story apprehended by the alert intelligence. The
allegory is the soul of the poem, but like the soul within the
body it does not show itself in independent existence. It is, in
scholastic phrase, the form of the body, giving to it its special
individuality. Thus in order truly to understand and rightly
appreciate the poem the reader must follow its course with a
double intelligence. "Taken literally," as Dante declares in his
Letter to Can Grande, "the subject is the state of the soul after
death, simply considered. But, allegorically taken, its subject
is man, according as by his good or ill deserts he renders
himself liable to the reward or punishment of Justice." It is the
allegory of human life; and not of human life as an abstraction,
but of the individual life; and herein, as Mr. Lowell, whose
phrase I borrow, has said, "lie its profound meaning and its
permanent force." [1] And herein too lie its perennial freshness
of interest, and the actuality which makes it contemporaneous
with every successive generation. The increase of knowledge, the
loss of belief in doctrines that were fundamental in Dante's
creed, the changes in the order of society, the new thoughts of
the world, have not lessened the moral import of the poem, any
more than they have lessened its excellence as a work of art. Its
real substance is as independent as its artistic beauty, of
science, of creed, and of institutions. Human nature has not
changed; the motives of action are the same, though their
relative force and the desires and ideals by which they are
inspired vary from generation to generation. And thus it is that
the moral judgments of life framed by a great poet whose
imagination penetrates to the core of things, and who, from his
very nature as poet, conceives and sets forth the issues of life
not in a treatise of abstract morality, but by means of sensible
types and images, never lose interest, and have a perpetual
contemporaneousness. They deal with the permanent and unalterable
elements of the soul of man.

[1] Mr. Lowell's essay on Dante makes other writing about the
poet or the poem seem ineffectual and superfluous. I must assume
that it will be familiar to the readers of my version, at least
to those among them who desire truly to understand the Divine
Comedy.


The scene of the poem is the spiritual world, of which we are
members even while still denizens mu the world of time. In the
spiritual world the results of sin or perverted love, and of
virtue or right love, in this life of probation, are manifest.
The life to come is but the fulfilment of the life that now is.
This is the truth that Dante sought to enforce. The allegory in
which he cloaked it is of a character that separates the Divine
Comedy from all other works of similar intent, In The Pilgrim's
Progress, for example, the personages introduced are mere
simulacra of men and women, the types of moral qualities or
religious dispositions. They are abstractions which the genius of
Bunyan fails to inform with vitality sufficient to kindle the
imagination of the reader with a sense of their actual, living
and breathing existence. But in the Divine Comedy the personages
are all from real life, they are men and women with their natural
passions and emotions, and they are undergoing an actual
experience. The allegory consists in making their characters and
their fates, what all human characters and fates really are, the
types and images of spiritual law. Virgil and Beatrice, whose
nature as depicted in the poem makes nearest approach to purely
abstract and typical existence, are always consistently presented
as living individuals, exalted indeed in wisdom and power, but
with hardly less definite and concrete humanity than that of
Dante himself.

The scheme of the created Universe held by the Christians of the
Middle Ages was comparatively simple, and so definite that Dante,
in accepting it in its main features without modification, was
provided with the limited stage that was requisite for his
design, and of which the general disposition was familiar to all
his readers. The three spiritual realms had their local bounds
marked out as clearly as those of time earth itself. Their
cosmography was but an extension of the largely hypothetical
geography of the tune.

The Earth was the centre of the Universe, and its northern
hemisphere was the abode of man. At the middle point of this
hemisphere stood Jerusalem, equidistant from the Pillars of
Hercules on the West, and the Ganges on the East.

Within the body of this hemisphere was hell, shared as a vast
cone, of which the apex was the centre of the globe; and here,
according to Dante, was the seat of Lucifer. The concave of Hell
had been formed by his fall, when a portion of the solid earth,
through fear of him, ran back to the southern uninhabited
hemisphere, and formed there, directly antipodal to Jerusalem,
the mountain of Purgatory which rose from the waste of waters
that covered this half of the globe. Purgatory was shaped as a
cone, of similar dinmensions to that of Hell, amid at its summit
was the Terrestrial Paradise.

Immediately surrounding the atmosphere of the Earth was the
sphere of elemental fire. Around this was the Heaven of the Moon,
and encircling this, in order, were the Heavens of Mercury,
Venus, the Sun, Mars, Jove, Saturn, the Fixed Stars, and the
Crystalline or first moving Heaven. These nine concentric Heavens
revolved continually around the Earth, and in proportion to their
distance from it was time greater swiftness of each. Encircling
all was the Empyrean, increate, incorporeal, motionless,
unbounded in time or space, the proper seat of God, the home of
the Angels, the abode of the Elect.

The Angelic Hierarchy consisted of nine orders, corresponding to
the nine moving heavens. Their blessedness and the swiftness of
time motion with which in unending delight they circled around
God were in proportion to their nearness to Him, --first the
Seraphs, then the Cherubs, Thrones, Dominations, Virtues, Powers,
Princes, Archangels, and Angels. Through them, under the general
name of Intelligences, the Divine influence was transmitted to
the Heavens, giving to them their circular motion, which was the
expression of their longing to be united with the source of their
creation. The Heavens in their turn streamed down upon the Earth
the Divine influence thus distributed among them, in varying
proportion and power, producing divers effects in the generation
and corruption of material things, and in the dispositions and
the lives of men.

Such was the general scheme of the Universe. The intention of God
in its creation was to communicate of his own perfection to the
creatures endowed with souls, that is, to men and to angels, and
the proper end of every such creature was to seek its own
perfection in likeness to time Divine. This end was attained
through that knowledge of God of which the soul was capable, and
through love which was in proportion to knowledge. Virtue
depended on the free will of man; it was the good use of that
will directed to a right object of love. Two lights were given to
the soul for guidance of the will: the light of reason for
natural things and for the direction of the will to moral virtue
the light of grace for things supernatural, and for the direction
of the will to spiritual virtue. Sin was the opposite of virtue,
the choice by the will of false objects of love; it involved the
misuse of reason, and the absence of grace. As the end of virtue
was blessedness, so the end of sin was misery.

The cornerstone of Dante's moral system was the Freedom of the
Will; in other words, the right of private judgment with the
condition of accountability. This is the liberty which Dante,
that is man, goes seeking in his journey through the spiritual
world. This liberty is to be attained through the right use of
reason, illuminated by Divine Grace; it consists in the perfect
accord of the will of man with the will of God.

With this view of the nature and end of man Dante's conception of
the history of the race could not be other than that its course
was providentially ordered. The fall of man had made him a just
object of the vengeance of God; but the elect were to be
redeemed, and for their redemption the history of the world from
the beginning was directed. Not only in his dealings with the
Jews, but in his dealings with the heathen was God preparing for
the reconciliation of man, to be finally accomplished in his
sacrifice of Himself for them. The Roman Empire was foreordained
and established for this end. It was to prepare the way for the
establishment of the Roman Church. It was the appointed
instrument for the political governument of men. Empire and
Church were alike divine institutions for the guidance of man on
earth.

The aim of Dante in the Divine Comedy was to set forth these
truths in such wise as to affect the imaginations and touch the
hearts of men, so that they should turn to righteousness. His
conviction of these truths was no mere matter of belief; it had
the ardor and certainty of faith. They had appeared to him in all
their fulness as a revelation of the Divine wisdom. It was his
work as poet, as poet with a divine commission, to make this
revelation known. His work was a work of faith; it was sacred; to
it both Heaven and Earth had set their hands.

To this work, as I have said, the definiteness and the limits of
the generally accepted theory of the Universe gave the required
frame. The very narrowness of this scheme made Dante's design
practicable. He had had the experience of a man on earth. He had
been lured by false objects of desire from the pursuit of the
true good. But Divine Grace, in the form of Beatrice, who had of
old on earth led him aright, now intervened and sent to his aid
Virgil, who, as the type of Human Reason, should bring him safe
through Hell, showing to him the eternal consequences of sin, and
then should conduct him, penitent, up the height of Purgatory,
till on its summit, in the Earthly Paradise, Beatrice should
appear once more to him. Thence she, as the type of that
knowledge through which comes the love of God, should lead him,
through the Heavens up to the Empyrean, to the consummation of
his course in the actual vision of God.


AIDS TO THE STUDY OF THE DIVINE COMEDY.

The Essay by Mr. Lowell, to which I have already referred (Dante,
Lowell's Prose Works, vol. iv.) is the best introduction to the
study of the poem. It should be read and re-read.

Dante, an essay by the late Dean Church, is the work of a learned
and sympathetic selmolar, and is an excellent treatise on the
life, times, and work of the poet.

The Notes and Illustrations that accompany Mr. Longfellow's
translation of the Divine Comedy form an admirable body of
comment on the poem.

The Rev. Dr. Edward Moore's little volume, on The Time-References
in the Divina Cominedia (London, 1887), is of great value in
making the progress of Dante's journey clear, and in showing
Dante's scrupulous consistency of statement. Dr. Moore's more
recent work, Contributions to the Textual Criticism of the Divina
Commedia (Cambridge, 1889), is to be warmly commended to the
advanced student.

These sources of information are enough for the mere English
reader. But one who desires to make himself a thorough master of
the poem must turn to foreign sources of instruction: to Carl
Witte's invaluable Dante-Forschungen (2 vols. Halle, 1869); to
the comment, especially that on the Paradiso, which accompanies
the German translation of the Divine Comedy by Philalethes. the
late King John of Saxony; to Bartoli's life of Dante in his
Storia della Letteratura Italiana (Firenze, 1878 and subsequent
years), and to Scartazzini's Prolegomeni della Divina Commedia
(Leipzig, 1890). The fourteenth century Comments, especially
those of Boccaccio, of Buti, and of Benvenuto da Imola, are
indispensable to one who would understand the poem as it was
understood by Dante's immediate contemporaries and successors. It
is from them and from the Chronicle of Dante's contemporary and
fellow-citizen, Giovanni Villani, that our knowledge concerning
many of the personages mentioned in the Poem is derived.

In respect to the theology and general doctrine of the Poem, the
Summa Theologica of St. Thomas Aquinas is the main source from
which Dante himself drew.


Of editions of the Divina Commedia in Italian, either that of
Andreoli, or of Bianchi, or of Fraticelli, each in one volume,
may be recommended to the beginner. Scartazzini's edition in
three volumes is the best, in spite of some serious defects, for
the deeper student.


HELL.

CANTO I. Dante, astray in a wood, reaches the foot of a hill
which he begins to ascend; he is hindered by three beasts; he
turns back and is met by Virgil, who proposes to guide him into
the eternal world.


Midway upon the road of our life I found myself within a dark
wood, for the right way had been missed. Ah! how hard a thing it
is to tell what this wild and rough and dense wood was, which in
thought renews the fear! So bitter is it that death is little
more. But in order to treat of the good that there I found, I
will tell of the other things that I have seen there. I cannot
well recount how I entered it, so full was I of slumber at that
point where I abandoned the true way. But after I had arrived at
the foot of a hill, where that valley ended which had pierced my
heart with fear, I looked on high, and saw its shoulders clothed
already with the rays of the planet[1] that leadeth men aright
along every path. Then was the fear a little quieted which in the
lake of my heart had lasted through the night that I passed so
piteously. And even as one who with spent breath, issued out of
the sea upon the shore, turns to the perilous water and gazes, so
did my soul, which still was flying, turn back to look again upon
the pass which never had a living person left.


[1] The sun, a planet according to the Ptolemaic system.


After I had rested a little my weary body I took my way again
along the desert slope, so that the firm foot was always the
lower. And ho! almost at the beginning of the steep a
she-leopard, light and very nimble, which was covered with a
spotted coat. And she did not move from before my face, nay,
rather hindered so my road that to return I oftentimes had
turned.

The time was at the beginning of the morning, and the Sun was
mounting upward with those stars that were with him when Love
Divine first set in motion those beautiful things;[1] so that the
hour of the time and the sweet season were occasion of good hope
to me concerning that wild beast with the dappled skin. But not
so that the sight which appeared to me of a lion did not give me
fear. He seemed to be coming against me, with head high and with
ravening hunger, so that it seemed that the air was affrighted at
him. And a she-wolf,[2] who with all cravings seemed laden in her
meagreness, and already had made many folk to live forlorn,--she
caused me so much heaviness, with the fear that came from sight
of her, that I lost hope of the height And such as he is who
gaineth willingly, and the time arrives that makes him lose, who
in all his thoughts weeps and is sad,--such made me the beast
without repose that, coming on against me, little by little was
pushing me back thither where the Sun is silent.

[1] According to old tradition the spring was the season of the
creation.

[2] These three beasts correspond to the triple division of sins
into those of incontinence, of violence, and of fraud. See Canto
XI.


While I was falling back to the low place, before mine eyes
appeared one who through long silence seemed hoarse. When I saw
him in the great desert, "Have pity on me!" I cried to him,
"whatso thou art, or shade or real man." He answered me: "Not
man; man once I was, and my parents were Lombards, and Mantuans
by country both. I was born sub Julio, though late, and I lived
at Rome under the good Augustus, in the time of the false and
lying gods. Poet was I, and sang of that just son of Anchises who
came from Troy after proud Ilion had been burned. But thou, why
returnest thou to so great annoy? Why dost thou not ascend the
delectable mountain which is the source and cause of every joy?"

"Art thou then that Virgil and that fount which poureth forth so
large a stream of speech?" replied I to him with bashful front:
"O honor and light of the other poem I may the long seal avail
me, and the great love, which have made me search thy volume!
Thou art my master and my author; thou alone art he from whom I
took the fair style that hath done me honor. Behold the beast
because of which I turned; help me against her, famous sage, for
she makes any veins and pulses tremble." "Thee it behoves to hold
another course," he replied, when he saw me weeping, "if thou
wishest to escape from this savage place; for this beast, because
of which thou criest out, lets not any one pass along her way,
but so hinders him that she kills him! and she has a nature so
malign and evil that she never sates her greedy will, and after
food is hungrier than before. Many are the animals with which she
wives, and there shall be more yet, till the hound [1] shall come
that will make her die of grief. He shall not feed on land or
goods, but wisdom and love and valor, and his birthplace shall be
between Feltro and Feltro. Of that humble

[2] Italy shall he be the salvation, for which the virgin Camilla
died, and Euryalus, Turnus and Nisus of their wounds. He shall
hunt her through every town till he shall have set her back in
hell, there whence envy first sent her forth. Wherefore I think
and deem it for thy best that thou follow me, and I will be thy
guide, and will lead thee hence through the eternal place whew
thou shalt hear the despairing shrieks, shalt see the ancient
spirits woeful who each proclaim the second death. And then thou
shalt see those who are contented in the fire, because they hope
to come, whenever it may be, to the blessed folk; to whom if thou
wilt thereafter ascend, them shall be a soul more worthy than I
for that. With her I will leave thee at my departure; for that
Emperor who reigneth them above, because I was rebellious to His
law, wills not that into His city any one should come through me.
In all parts He governs and them He reigns: there in His city and
His lofty seat. O happy he whom thereto He elects!" And I to him,
"Poet, I beseech thee by that God whom thou didst not know, in
order that I may escape this ill and worse, that thou lead me
thither whom thou now hest said, so that I may see the gate of
St. Peter, and those whom thou makest so afflicted."


[1] Of whom the hound is the symbol, and to whom Dante looked for
the deliverance of Italy from the discorda and misrule that made
her wretched, is still matter of doubt, after centuries of
controversy.


[2] Fallen, humiliated.


Then he moved on, and I behind him kept.



CANTO II. Dante, doubtful of his own powers, is discouraged at
the outset.--Virgil cheers him by telling him that he has been
sent to his aid by a blessed Spirit from Heaven.--Dante casts off
fear, and the poets proceed.

The day was going, and the dusky air was taking the living things
that are on earth from their fatigues, and I alone was preparing
to sustain the war alike of the road, and of the woe which the
mind that erreth not shall retrace. O Muses, O lofty genius, now
assist me! O mind that didst inscribe that which I saw, here
shall thy nobility appear! I began: -"Poet, that guidest me,
consider my virtue, if it is sufficient, ere to the deep pass
thou trustest me. Thou sayest that the parent of Silvius while
still corruptible went to the immortal world and was there in the
body. Wherefore if the Adversary of every ill was then courteous,
thinking on the high effect that should proceed from him, and on
the Who and the What,[1] it seemeth not unmeet to the man of
understanding; for in the empyreal heaven he had been chosen for
father of revered Rome and of her empire; both which (to say
truth indeed) were ordained for the holy place where the
successor of the greater Peter hath his seat. Through this going,
whereof thou givest him vaunt, he learned things which were the
cause of his victory and of the papal mantle. Afterward the
Chosen Vessel went thither to bring thence comfort to that faith
which is the beginning of the way of salvation. But I, why go I
thither? or who concedes it? I am not Aeneas, I am not Paul; me
worthy of this, neither I nor others think; wherefore if I give
myself up to go, I fear lest the going may be mad. Thou art wise,
thou understandest better than I speak."

[1] Who he was, and what should result.


And as is he who unwills what he willed, and because of new
thoughts changes his design, so that he quite withdraws from
beginning, sucb I became on that dark hillside: wherefore in my
thought I abandoned the enterprise which had been so hasty in the
beginning.

"If I have rightly understood thy speech," replied that shade of
the magnanimous one, "thy soul is hurt by cowardice, which
oftentimes encumbereth a man so that it turns him back from
honorable enterprise, as false seeing does a beast when it is
startled. In order that thou loose thee from this fear I will
tell thee wherefore I have come, and what I heard at the first
moment that I grieved for thee. I was among those who are
suspended,[1] and a Lady called me, so blessed and beautiful that
I besought her to command. Her eyes were more lucent than the
star, and she began to speak to me sweet and low, with angelic
voice, in her own tongue: 'O courteous Mantuan soul, of whom the
fame yet lasteth in the world, and shall last so long as the
world endureth! a friend of mine and not of fortune upon the
desert hillside is so hindered on his road that he has turned for
fear, and I am afraid, through that which I have heard of him in
heaven, lest already he be so astray that I may have risen late
to his succor. Now do thou move, and with thy speech ornate, and
with whatever is needful for his deliverance, assist him so that
I may be consoled for him. I am Beatrice who make thee go. I come
from a place whither I desire to return. Love moved me, and makes
me speak. When I shall be before my Lord, I will commend thee
often unto Him.' Then she was silent, and thereon I began: 'O
Lady of Virtue, thou alone through whom the human race surpasseth
all contained within that heaven which hath the smallest circles!
[2] so pleasing unto me is thy command that to obey it, were it
already done, were slow to me. Thou hast no need further to
open unto me thy will; but tell me the cause why thou guardest
not thyself from descending down here into this centre, from the
ample place whither thou burnest to return.' 'Since thou wishest
to know so inwardly, I will tell thee briefly,' she replied to
me, 'wherefore I fear not to come here within. One ought to fear
those things only that have power of doing harm, the others not,
for they are not dreadful. I am made by God, thanks be to Him,
such that your misery toucheth me not, nor doth the flame of this
burning assail me. A gentle Lady[3] is in heaven who hath pity
for this hindrance whereto I send thee, so that stern judgment
there above she breaketh. She summoned Lucia in her request, and
said, "Thy faithful one now hath need of thee, and unto thee I
commend him." Lucia, the foe of every cruel one, rose and came to
the place where I was, seated with the ancient Rachel. She said,
"Beatrice, true praise of God, why dost thou not succor him who
so loved thee that for thee he came forth from the vulgar throng?
Dost thou not hear the pity of his plaint? Dost thou not see the
death that combats him beside the stream whereof the sea hath no
vaunt?" In the world never were persons swift to seek their good,
and to fly their harm, as I, after these words were uttered, came
here below, from my blessed seat, putting my trust in thy upright
speech, which honors thee and them who have heard it.' After she
had said this to me, weeping she turned her lucent eyes, whereby
she made me more speedy in coming. And I came to thee as she
willed. Thee have I delivered from that wild beast that took from
thee the short ascent of the beautiful mountain. What is it then?
Why, why dost thou hold back? why dost thou harbor such cowardice
in thy heart? why hast thou not daring and boldness, since three
blessed Ladies care for thee in the court of Heaven, and my
speech pledges thee such good?"

[1] In Limbo, neither in Hell nor Heaven.

[2] The heaven of the moon, nearest to the earth.

[3] The Virgin.


As flowerets, bent and closed by the chill of night, after the
sun shines on them straighten themselves all open on their stem,
so I became with my weak virtue, and such good daring hastened to
my heart that I began like one enfranchised: "Oh compassionate
she who succored me! and thou courteous who didst speedily obey
the true words that she addressed to thee! Thou by thy words hast
so disposed my heart with desire of going, that I have returned
unto my first intent. Go on now, for one sole will is in us both:
Thou Leader, thou Lord, and thou Master." Thus I said to him; and
when he had moved on, I entered along the deep and savage road.



CANTO III. The gate of Hell.--Virgil lends Dante in.--The
punishment of the neither good nor bad.--Aeheron, and the sinners
on its bank.--Charon.--Earthquake.--Dante swoons.

"Through me is the way into the woeful city; through me is the
way into eternal woe; through me is the way among the lost
people. Justice moved my lofty maker: the divine Power, the
supreme Wisdom and the primal Love made me. Before me were no
things created, unless eternal, and I eternal last. Leave every
hope, ye who enter!"

These words of color obscure I saw written at the top of a gate;
whereat I, "Master, their meaning is dire to me."

And he to me, like one who knew, "Here it behoves to leave every
fear; it behoves that all cowardice should here be dead. We have
come to the place where I have told thee that thou shalt see the
woeful people, who have lost the good of the understanding."

And when he had put his hand on mine, with a glad countenance,
wherefrom I took courage, he brought me within the secret things.
Here sighs, laments, and deep wailings were resounding though the
starless air; wherefore at first I wept thereat. Strange tongues,
horrible cries, words of woe, accents of anger, voices high and
hoarse, and sounds of hands with them, were making a tumult which
whirls forever in that air dark without change, like the sand
when the whirlwind breathes.

And I, who had my head girt with horror, said, "Master, what is
it that I hear? and what folk are they who seem in woe so
vanquished?"

And he to me, "This miserable measure the wretched souls maintain
of those who lived without infamy and without praise. Mingled are
they with that caitiff choir of the angels, who were not rebels,
nor were faithful to God, but were for themselves. The heavens
chased them out in order to be not less beautiful, nor doth the
depth of Hell receive them, because the damned would have some
glory from them."

And I, "Master, what is so grievous to them, that makes them
lament so bitterly?"

He answered, "I will tell thee very briefly. These have no hope
of death; and their blind life is so debased, that they are
envious of every other lot. Fame of them the world permitteth not
to be; mercy and justice disdain them. Let us not speak of them,
but do thou look and pass on."

And I, who was gazing, saw a banner, that whirling ran so swiftly
that it seemed to me to scorn all repose, and behind it came so
long a train of folk, that I could never have believed death had
undone so many. After I had distinguished some among them, I saw
and knew the shade of him who made, through cowardice, the great
refusal. [1] At once I understood and was certain, that this was
the sect of the caitiffs displeasing unto God, and unto his
enemies. These wretches, who never were alive, were naked, and
much stung by gad-flies and by wasps that were there. These
streaked their faces with blood, which, mingled with tears, was
harvested at their feet by loathsome worms.

[1] Who is intended by these words is uncertain.


And when I gave myself to looking onward, I saw people on the
bank of a great river; wherefore I said, "Master, now grant to me
that I may know who these are, and what rule makes them appear so
ready to pass over, as I discern through the faint light." And he
to me, "The things will be clear to thee, when we shall set our
steps on the sad marge of Acheron." Then with eyes bashful and
cast down, fearing lest my speech had been irksome to him, far as
to the river I refrained from speaking.

And lo! coming toward us in a boat, an old man, white with
ancient hair, crying, "Woe to you, wicked souls! hope not ever to
see Heaven! I come to carry you to the other bank, into eternal
darkness, to heat and frost. And thou who art there, living soul,
depart from these that are dead." But when he saw that I did not
depart, he said, "By another way, by other ports thou shalt come
to the shore, not here, for passage; it behoves that a lighter
bark bear thee."[1] 

[1] The boat that bears the souls to Purgatory. Charon recognizes
that Dante is not among the damned.


And my Leader to him, "Charon, vex not thyself, it is thus willed
there where is power to do that which is willed; and farther ask
not." Then the fleecy cheeks were quiet of the pilot of the livid
marsh, who round about his eyes had wheels of flame.

But those souls, who were weary and naked, changed color, and
gnashed their teeth soon as they heard his cruel words. They
blasphemed God and their parents, the human race, the place, the
time and the seed of their sowing and of their birth. Then,
bitterly weeping, they drew back all of them together to the evil
bank, that waits for every man who fears not God. Charon the
demon, with eyes of glowing coal, beckoning them, collects them
all; he beats with his oar whoever lingers.

As in autumn the leaves fall off one after the other, till the
bough sees all its spoils upon the earth, in like wise the evil
seed of Adam throw themselves from that shore one by one at
signals, as the bird at his call. Thus they go over the dusky
wave, and before they have landed on the farther side, already on
this a new throng is gathered.

"My son," said the courteous Master, "those who die in the wrath
of God, all meet together here from every land. And they are
eager to pass over the stream, for the divine justice spurs them,
so that fear is turned to desire. This way a good soul never
passes; and therefore if Charon snarleth at thee, thou now mayest
well know what his speech signifies." This ended, the dark plain
trembled so mightily, that the memory of the terror even now
bathes me with sweat. The tearful land gave forth a wind that
flashed a vermilion light which vanquished every sense of mine,
and I fell as a man whom slumber seizes.



CANTO IV. The further side of Acheron.--Virgil leads Dante into
Limbo, the First Circle of Hell, containing the spirits of those
who lived virtuously but without Christianity.--Greeting of
Virgil by his fellow poets.--They enter a castle, where are the
shades of ancient worthies.--Virgil and Dante depart.

A heavy thunder broke the deep sleep in my head, so that I
started up like a person who by force is wakened. And risen
erect, I moved my rested eye round about, and looked fixedly to
distinguish the place where I was. True it is, that I found
myself on the verge of the valley of the woeful abyss that
gathers in thunder of infinite wailings. Dark, profound it was,
and cloudy, so that though I fixed my sight on the bottom I did
not discern anything there.

"Now we descend down here into the blind world," began the Poet
all deadly pale, "I will be first, and thou shalt be second."

And I, who had observed his color, said, "How shall I come, if
thou fearest, who art wont to be a comfort to my doubting?" And
he to me, "The anguish of the folk who are down here depicts upon
my face that pity which thou takest for fear. Let us go on, for
the long way urges us."

So he set forth, and so he made me enter within the first circle
that girds the abyss. Here, so far as could be heard, there was
no plaint but that of sighs which made the eternal air to
tremble: this came of the woe without torments felt by the
crowds, which were many and great, of infants and of women and of
men.

The good Master to me, "Thou dost not ask what spirits are these
that thou seest. Now I would have thee know, before thou goest
farther, that they sinned not; and if they have merits it
sufficeth not, because they had not baptism, which is part of the
faith that thou believest; and if they were before Christianity,
they did not duly worship God: and of such as these am I myself.
Through such defects, and not through other guilt, are we lost,
and only so far harmed that without hope we live in desire."

Great woe seized me at my heart when I heard him, because I knew
that people of much worth were suspended in that limbo. "Tell me,
my Master, tell me, Lord," began I, with wish to be assured of
that faith which vanquishes every error,[1] "did ever any one who
afterwards was blessed go out from here, either by his own or by
another's merit?" And he, who understood my covert speech,
answered, "I was new in this state when I saw a Mighty One come
hither crowned with sign of victory. He drew out hence the shade
of the first parent, of Abel his son, and that of Noah, of Moses
the law-giver and obedient, Abraham the patriarch, and David the
King, Israel with his father, and with his offspring, and with
Rachel, for whom he did so much, and others many; and He made
them blessed: and I would have thee know that before these, human
spirits were not saved."

[1] Wishing especially to be assured in regard to the descent of
Christ into Hell.


We ceased not going on because he spoke, but all the while were
passing through the wood, the wood I mean of crowded spirits. Nor
yet had our way been long from where I slept, when I saw a fire,
that conquered a hemisphere of darkness. We were still a little
distant from it, yet not so far that I could not partially
discern that honorable folk possessed that place. "O thou that
honorest both science and art, these, who are they, that have
such honor that from the condition of the others it sets them
apart?" And he to me, "The honorable fame of them which resounds
above in thy life wins grace in heaven that so advances them." At
this a voice was heard by me, "Honor the loftiest Poet! his shade
returns that was departed." When the voice had ceased and was
quiet, I saw four great shades coming to us: they had a semblance
neither sad nor glad. The good Master began to say, "Look at him
with that sword in hand who cometh before the three, even as
lord. He is Homer, the sovereign poet; the next who comes is
Horace, the satirist; Ovid is the third, and the last is Lucan.
Since each shares with me the name that the single voice sounded,
they do me honor, and in that do well"

Thus I saw assembled the fair school of that Lord of the loftiest
song which above the others as an eagle flies. After they had
discoursed somewhat together, they turned to me with sign of
salutation; and my Master smiled thereat. And far more of honor
yet they did me, for they made me of their band, so that I was
the sixth amid so much wit. Thus we went on as far as the light,
speaking things concerning which silence is becoming, even as was
speech there where I was.

We came to the foot of a noble castle, seven times circled by
high walls, defended round about by a fair streamlet. This we
passed as if hard ground; through seven gates I entered with
these sages; we came to a meadow of fresh verdure. People were
there with eyes slow and grave, of great authority in their
looks; they spake seldom, and with soft voices. Thus we drew
apart, on one side, into a place open, luminous, and high, so
that they all could be seen. There opposite upon the green enamel
were shown to me the great spirits, whom to have seen I inwardly
exalt myself.

I saw Electra with many companions, among whom I knew both Hector
and Aeneas, Caesar in armor, with his gerfalcon eyes; I saw
Camilla and Penthesilea on the other side, and I saw the King
Latinus, who was seated with Lavinia his daughter. I saw that
Brutus who drove out Tarquin; Lucretia, Julia, Marcia, and
Cornelia; and alone, apart, I saw the Saladin. When I raised my
brow a little more, I saw the Master of those who know, seated
amid the philosophic family; all regard him, all do him honor.
Here I saw both Socrates and Plato, who before the others stand
nearest to him; Democritus, who ascribes the world to chance;
Diogenes, Anaxagoras, and Thales, Empedocles, Heraclitus, and
Zeno; and I saw the good collector of the qualities, Dioscorides,
I mean; and I saw Orpheus, Tully, and Linus, and moral Seneca,
Euclid the geometer, and Ptolemy, Hippocrates, Avicenna, Galen,
and Averrhoes, who made the great comment. I cannot report of all
in full, because the long theme so drives me that many times
speech comes short of fact.

The company of six is reduced to two. By another way the wise
guide leads me, out from the quiet, into the air that trembles,
and I come into a region where is nothing that can give light.



CANTO V. The Second Circle, that of Carnal Sinners.--Minos.--
Shades renowned of old.--Francesca da Rimini.

Thus I descended from the first circle down into the second,
which girdles less space, and so much more woe that it goads to
wailing. There abides Minos horribly, and snarls; he examines the
sins at the entrance; he judges, and he sends according as he
entwines himself. I mean, that, when the miscreant spirit comes
there before him, it confesses itself wholly, and that discerner
of sins sees what place of Hell is for it; he girdles himself
with his tail so many times as the degrees he wills it should be
sent down. Always before him stand many of them. They go, in
turn, each to the judgment; they speak, and hear, and then are
whirled below.

"O thou that comest to the woeful inn," said Minos to me, when he
saw me, leaving the act of so great an office, "beware how thou
enterest, and to whom thou trustest thyself; let not the
amplitude of the entrance deceive thee." And my Leader to
him, "Why then dost thou cry out? Hinder not his fated going;
thus is it willed there where is power to do that which is
willed; and ask thou no more."

Now the woeful notes begin to make themselves heard; now am I
come where much lamentation smites me. I had come into a place
mute of all light, that bellows as the sea does in a tempest, if
it be combated by opposing winds. The infernal hurricane that
never rests carries along the spirits in its rapine; whirling and
smiting it molests them. When they arrive before its rushing
blast, here are shrieks, and bewailing, and lamenting; here they
blaspheme the power divine. I understood that to such torment are
condemned the carnal sinners who subject reason to appetite. And
as their wings bear along the starlings in the cold season in a
troop large and full, so that blast the evil spirits; hither,
thither, down, up it carries them; no hope ever comforts them,
not of repose, but even of less pain.

And as the cranes go singing their lays, making in air a long
line of themselves, so saw I come, uttering wails, shades borne
along by the aforesaid strife. Wherefore I said, "Master, who are
those folk whom the black air so castigates?" "The first of these
of whom thou wishest to have knowledge," said he to me then, "was
empress of many tongues. To the vice of luxury was she so
abandoned that lust she made licit in her law, to take away the
blame she had incurred. She is Semiramis, of whom it is read that
she succeeded Ninus and had been his spouse; she held the land
which the Soldan rules. That other is she who, for love, killed
herself, and broke faith to the ashes of Sichaeus. Next is
Cleopatra, the luxurious. See Helen, for whom so long a time of
ill revolved; and see the great Achilles, who at the end fought
with love. See Paris, Tristan,--" and more than a thousand shades
he showed me with his finger, and named them, whom love had
parted from our life.

After I had heard my Teacher name the dames of eld and the
cavaliers, pity overcame me, and I was well nigh bewildered. I
began, "Poet, willingly would I speak with those two that go
together, and seem to be so light upon the wind." And he to me,
"Thou shalt see when they shall be nearer to us, and do thou then
pray them by that love which leads them, and they will come."
Soon as the wind sways them toward us I lifted my voice, "O weary
souls, come speak to us, if One forbid it not."

As doves, called by desire, with wings open and steady, fly
through the air to their sweet nest, borne by their will, these
issued from the troop where Dido is, coming to us through the
malign air, so strong was the compassionate cry.

"O living creature, gracious and benign, that goest through the
lurid air visiting us who stained the world blood-red,--if the
King of the universe were a friend we would pray Him for thy
peace, since thou hast pity on our perverse ill. Of what it
pleaseth thee to hear, and what to speak, we will hear and we
will speak to you, while the wind, as now, is hushed for us. The
city where I was born sits upon the sea-shore, where the Po, with
its followers, descends to have peace. Love, that on gentle heart
quickly lays hold, seized him for the fair person that was taken
from me, and the mode still hurts me. Love, which absolves no
loved one from loving, seized me for the pleasing of him so
strongly that, as thou seest, it does not even now abandon me.
Love brought us to one death. Caina awaits him who quenched our
life." These words were borne to us from them.

Soon as I had heard those injured souls I bowed my face, and held
it down, until the Poet said to me, "What art thou thinking?"
When I replied, I began, "Alas! how many sweet thoughts, how
great desire, led these unto the woeful pass." Then I turned me
again to them, and I spoke, and began, "Francesca, thy torments
make me sad and piteous to weeping. But tell me, at the time of
the sweet sighs by what and how did love concede to you to know
the dubious desires?" And she to me, "There is no greater woe
than in misery to remember the happy time, and that thy Teacher
knows. But if to know the first root of our love thou hast so
great a longing, I will do like one who weeps and tells.

"We were rending one day, for delight, of Lancelot, how love
constrained him. We were alone and without any suspicion. Many
times that reading made us lift our eyes, and took the color from
our faces, but only one point was that which overcame us. When we
read of the longed-for smile being kissed by such a lover, this
one, who never from me shall be divided, kissed my mouth all
trembling. Galahaut was the book, and he who wrote it. That day
we read in it no farther."[1] 

[1] In the Romance, it was Galahaut that prevailed on Guinevere
to give a kiss to Lancelot.


While one spirit said this the other was weeping so that through
pity I swooned, as if I had been dying, and fell as a dead body
falls.



CANTO VI. The Third Circle, that of the Gluttonous.--Cerberus.--
Ciacco.

When the mind returned, which closed itself before the pity of
these two kinsfolk, that had all confounded me with sadness, new
torments and new tormented souls I see around me wherever I move,
and howsoever I turn, and wherever I gaze.

I am in the third circle, that of the rain eternal, accursed,
cold, and heavy. Its rule and quality are never new. Coarse hail,
and foul water and snow pour down through the tenebrous air; the
earth that receives them stinks. Cerberus, a beast cruel and
monstrous, with three throats barks doglike above the people that
are here submerged. He has vermilion eyes, and a greasy and black
beard, and a big belly, and hands armed with claws: he tears the
spirits, flays them, and rends them. The rain makes them howl
like dogs; of one of their sides they make a screen for the
other; the profane wretches often turn themselves.

When Cerberus, the great worm, observed us he opened his mouths,
and showed his fangs to us; not a limb had he that he kept quiet.
And my Leader opened wide his hands, took some earth, and with
full fists threw it into the ravenous gullets. As the dog that
barking craves, and becomes quiet when he bites his food, and is
intent and fights only to devour it, such became those filthy
faces of the demon Cerberus, who so thunders at the souls that
they would fain be deaf.

We were passing over the shades whom the heavy rain subdues, and
were setting our feet upon their vain show that seems a body.
They all of them lay upon the ground, except one who raised
himself to sit, quickly as he saw us passing before him. "O thou
who art led through this Hell," he said to me, "recognize me, if
thou canst; thou wast made before I was unmade." And I to him,
"The anguish which thou hast perchance withdraws thee from my
memory, so that it seems not that I ever saw thee. But tell me
who thou art, that in a place so woeful art set, and with such a
punishment, that if any other is greater none is so displeasing."
And he to me, "Thy city which is so full of envy, that already
the sack runs over, held me in it, in the serene life. You
citizens called me Ciacco; [1] for the damnable sin of gluttony,
as thou seest, I am broken by the rain. And I, wretched soul, am
not alone, for all these endure like punishment, for like sin,"
and more he said not. I answered him, "Ciacco, thy trouble so
weighs upon me, that it invites me to weeping; but tell me, if
thou canst, to what will come the citizens of the divided city;
if any one in it is just; and tell me the reason why such great
discord has assailed it."

[1] Ciacco, in popular speech, signifies a hog.


And he to me, "After long contention they will come to blood, and
the savage party will chase out the other with great injury.
Thereafter within three suns it behoves this to fall, and the
other to surmount through the force of one who even now is
tacking. It will hold high its front long time, keeping the other
under heavy burdens, however it may lament and be shamed thereat.
Two men are just, but there they are not heeded; Pride, Envy,
Avarice are the three sparks that have inflamed their hearts."[1]

Here he set end unto the lamentable sound.

[1] This prophecy relates to the dissensions and violence of the
parties of the Whites and the Blacks by which Florence was rent.
The "savage party" was that of the Whites, who were mainly
Ghibellines. The "one who even now is tacking" was the Pope,
Boniface VIII., who was playing fast and loose with both. Who the
"two just men" were is unknown.


And I to him, "Still I would that thou teach me, and that of more
speech thou make a gift to me. Farinata and the Tegghiaio who
were so worthy, Jacopo Rusticucci, Arrigo, and the Mosca, and the
rest who set their minds on well-doing, tell me where they are,
and cause that I may know them, for great desire constrains me to
learn if Heaven sweeten them, or Hell envenom.

And he, "They are among the blacker souls: a different sin weighs
them down to the bottom; if thou so far descendest, thou canst
see them. But when thou shalt be in the sweet world I pray thee
that thou bring me to the memory of others. More I say not to
thee, and more I answer thee not." His straight eyes he twisted
then awry, looked at me a little, and then bent his head, and
fell with it level with the other blind.

And the Leader said to me, "He wakes no more this side the sound
of the angelic trump. When the hostile Sovereign shall come, each
one will find again his dismal tomb, will take again his flesh
and his shape, will hear that which through eternity reechoes."

Thus we passed along with slow steps through the foul mixture of
the shades and of the rain, touching a little on the future life.
Wherefore I said, "Master, these torments will they increase
after the great sentence, or will they become less, or will they
be just as burning?" And he to me, "Return to thy science, which
declares that the more perfect a thing is the more it feels the
good, and so the pain. Though this accursed people never can
attain to true perfection, it expects thereafter to be more than
now."

We took a circling course along that road, speaking far more than
I repeat; and came to the point where the descent is. Here we
found Pluto,[1] the great enemy.

[1] Pluto appears here not as Hades, the god of the lower world,
but in his character as the giver of wealth.



CANTO VII. The Fourth Circle, that of the Avaricious and the
Prodigal.--Pluto.--Fortune.--The Styx.--The Fifth Circle, that of
the Wrathful and the Sullen.

"Pape Satan, pape Satan aleppe,"--began Pluto with his clucking
voice. And that gentle Sage, who knew everything, said to comfort
me, "Let not thy fear hurt thee; for whatso power he have shall
not take from thee the descent of this rock." Then he turned to
that swollen lip and said, "Be silent, accursed wolf! inwardly
consume thyself with thine own rage: not without cause is this
going to the abyss; it is willed on high, there where Michael did
vengeance on the proud adultery."[1] As sails swollen by the wind
fall in a heap when the mast snaps, so fell to earth the cruel
beast.

[1] Adultery, in the sense of infidelity to God.


Thus we descended into the fourth hollow, taking more of the
woeful bank that gathers in the evil of the whole universe. Ah,
Justice of God! Who heapeth up so many new travails and penalties
as I saw? And why doth our sin so waste us? As doth the wave,
yonder upon Charybdis, which is broken on that which it
encounters, so it behoves that here the people counterdance.

Here saw I people more than elsewhere many, and from one side and
the other with great howls rolling weights by force of chest.
They struck against each other, and then just there each turned,
rolling backward, crying, "Why keepest thou?" and "Why flingest
thou away?" Thus they turned through the dark circle on either
hand to the opposite point, still crying out their opprobrious
verse; then each, when he had come through his half circle,
wheeled round to the other joust.

And I, who had my heart well-nigh pierced through, said, "My
Master, now declare to me what folk is this, and if all these
tonsured ones on our left were clerks."

And he to me, "All of these were so asquint in mind in the first
life that they made no spending there with measure. Clearly
enough their voices bay it out, when they come to the two points
of the circle where the contrary sin divides them. These were
clerks who have no hairy covering on their head, and Popes and
Cardinals, in whom avarice practices its excess."

And I, "Master, among such as these I ought surely to recognize
some who were polluted with these evils."

And he to me, "Vain thought thou harborest; the undiscerning life
that made them foul, to all recognition now makes them dim.
Forever will they come to the two buttings; these will rise from
the sepulchre with closed fist, and these with shorn hair.
Ill-giving and ill-keeping have taken from them the fair world,
and set them to this scuffle; such as it is, I adorn not words
for it. Now canst thou, son, see the brief jest of the goods that
are committed unto Fortune, for which the human race so scramble;
for all the gold that is beneath the moon, or that ever was, of
these weary souls could not make a single one repose."

"Master," said I to him, "now tell me further; this Fortune, on
which thou touchest for me, what is it, that hath the goods of
the world so in its clutches?

And he to me, "O creatures foolish, how great is that ignorance
that harms you! I would have thee now take in my judgment of her.
He whose wisdom transcendeth all made the heavens, and gave them
their guides, so that every part on every part doth shine,
equally distributing the light. In like wise for the splendors of
the world, He ordained a general ministress and guide, who should
ever and anon transfer the vain goods from race to race, and from
one blood to another, beyond the resistance of human wit.
Wherefore one race rules, and the other languishes, pursuant to
her judgment, which is occult as the snake in the grass. Your
wisdom hath no withstanding of her: she provides, judges and
maintains her realm, as theirs the other gods. Her permutations
have no truce; necessity compels her to be swift, so often cometh
he who obtains a turn. This is she who is so set upon the cross,
even by those who ought to give her praise, giving her blame
amiss and ill report. But she is blessed and hears this not. With
the other Primal Creatures glad she turns her sphere, and blessed
she rejoices. But now let us descend to greater woe. Already
every star sinks that was rising when I set out, and too long
stay is forbidden."

We crossed the circle to the other bank, above a fount that boils
and pours down through a cleft that proceeds from it. The water
was far darker than perse;[1] and we, in company with the dusky
waves, entered down through a strange way. A marsh it makes, that
is named Styx, this dismal little stream, when it has descended
to the foot of the malign gray slopes. And I, who stood intent to
gaze, saw muddy people in that swamp, all naked and with look of
hurt. They were smiting each other, not only with hands, but with
head, and with chest, and with feet, mangling one another
piecemeal with their teeth.

[1] Purple-black.


The good Master said, "Son, now thou seest the souls of those
whom anger overcame; and likewise I would have thee believe for
certain that beneath the water are folk who sigh, and make this
water bubble at the surface, as thine eye tells thee wherever it
turns. Fixed in the slime, they say, 'Sullen were we in the sweet
air that by the Sun is gladdened, bearing within ourselves the
sluggish fume; now we are sullen in the black mire.' This hymn
they gurgle in their throats, for they cannot speak with entire
words."[1] 

[1] The sin here punished is that known to the Middle Ages as
acedia, or accidie,--slackness in good works, and spiritual gloom
and despondency. In the Parson's Tale Chaucer says: "Envie and
ire maken bitternesse in heart, which bitternesse is mother of
accidie."


Thus we circled a great arc of the foul fen, between the dry bank
and the slough, with eyes turned on those who guzzle the mire. We
came at length to the foot of a tower.



CANTO VIII. The Fifth Circle.--Phlegyas and his boat.--Passage of
the Styx.--Filippo Argenti.--The City of Dis.--The demons refuse
entrance to the poets.

I say, continuing, that, long before we were at the foot of the
high tower, our eyes went upward to its top because of two
flamelets that we saw set there, and another giving sigual back
from so far that hardly could the eye reach it. And I turned me
to the Sea of all wisdom; I said, "This one, what says it? and
what answers that other fire? and who are they that make it?" And
he to me, "Upon the foul waves already thou mayest discern that
which is expected, if the fume of the marsh hide it not from
thee."

Bowstring never sped arrow from itself that ran so swift a course
through the air, as a very little boat which I saw coming through
the water toward us at that instant, under the direction of a
single ferryman, who was crying out, "Art thou then come, fell
soul?"

"Phlegyas, Phlegyas, this time thou criest out in vain," said my
Lord; "longer thou shalt not have us than only while crossing the
slough." As one who listens to some great deceit that has been
practiced on him, and then chafes at it, such became Phlegyas in
his stifled anger.

My Leader descended into the bark and then he made me enter after
him, and only when I was in did it seem laden. Soon as my Leader
and I were in the boat, the antique prow goes its way, cutting
more of the water than it is wont with others.

While we were running through the dead channel, before me showed
himself one full of mud, and said, "Who art thou that comest
before the hour?" And I to him, "If I come I stay not; but thou,
who art thou that art become so foul?" He answered, "Thou seest
that I am one who weeps." And I to him, "With weeping and with
wailing, accursed spirit, do thou remain, for I know thee
although thou art all filthy." Then he stretched to the boat both
his hands, whereat the wary Master thrust him back, saying,
"Begone there, with the other dogs!" Then with his arms he
clasped my neck, kissed my face, and said, "Disdainful soul,
blessed be she who bore thee! This one was an arrogant person in
the world; no goodness is there that adorns his memory; therefore
is his shade so furious here. How many now up there are held
great kings who shall stand here like swine in mire, leaving of
themselves horrible dispraises." And I, "Master, I should much
like to see him ducked in this broth before we depart from the
lake." And he to me, "Ere the shore allows thee to see it thou
shalt be satisfied; it will be fitting that thou enjoy such a
desire." After this a little I saw such rending of him by the
muddy folk that I still praise God therefor, and thank Him for
it. All cried, "At Filippo Argenti! " and the raging florentine
spirit turned upon himself with his teeth. Here we left him; so
that I tell no more of him.

But on my ears there smote a wailing, whereat forward intent I
open wide my eye. And the good Master said, "Now, son, the city
draws near that is named Dis, with its heavy citizens, with its
great throng." And I, "Master, already in the valley therewithin
I clearly discern its mosques vermilion, as if issuing from
fire." And he said to me, "The eternal fire that blazes within
them displays them red as thou seest in this nether Hell."

We at last arrived within the deep ditches that encompass that
disconsolate city. The walls seemed to me to be of iron. Not
without first making a great circuit did we come to a place where
the ferryman loudly shouted to us, "Out with you, here is the
entrance.'

Upon the gates I saw more than a thousand of those rained down
from heaven who angrily were saying, "Who is this, that without
death goes through the realm of the dead folk?" And my wise
Master made a sign of wishing to speak secretly with them. Then
they shut in a little their great scorn, and said, "Come thou
alone, and let him be gone who so boldly entered on this realm.
Alone let him return on the mad path: let him try if he can; for
thou, who hast escorted him through so dark a region, shalt
remain here."

Think, Reader, if I was discomforted at the sound of the accursed
words, for I did not believe ever to return hither.[1] 

[1] To this world.


"O my dear Leader, who more than seven times hast renewed
assurance in me, and drawn me from deep peril that stood
confronting me, leave me not," said I, "thus undone; and, if the
going farther onward be denied us, let us together retrace our
footprints quickly." And that Lord who had led me thither said to
me, "Fear not, for no one can take from us our onward way, by
Such an one it is given to us. But here await me, and comfort thy
dejected spirit and feed on good hope, for I will not leave thee
in the nether world."

So the sweet Father goes away, and here abandons me, and I remain
in suspense; and yes and no contend within my head. I could not
hear what he set forth to them, but he had not staid there long
with them, when each ran vying back within. These our adversaries
closed the gates on the breast of my Lord, who remained without,
and returned to me with slow steps. He held his eyes upon the
ground, and his brow was shorn of all hardihood, and he said in
sighs, "Who hath denied to me the houses of woe?" And he said to
me, "Thou, because I am wroth, be not dismayed, for I shall win
the strife, whoever circle round within for the defence. This
their insolence is not new, for of old they used it at a less
secret gate, which still is found without a bolt. Above it thou
didst see the dead inscription; and already on this side of it
descends the steep, passing without escort through the circles,
One such that by him the city shall be opened to us."



CANTO IX. The City of Dis.--Erichtho.--The Three Furies.--The
Heavenly Messenger.--The Sixth Circle, that of the Heresiarchs.

That color which cowardice painted outwardly on me when I saw my
Guide turn back, repressed more speedily his own new color. He
stopped attentive, like a man that listens, for the eye could not
lead him far through the black air, and through the dense fog.

"Yet it must be for us to win the fight," began he, "unless--Such
an one offered herself to us.[1] Oh how slow it seems till Some
one here arrive! "[2] 

[1] Beatrice.

[2] The messenger from Heaven, referred to in the last verses of
the last canto.


I saw well how he covered up the beginning with the rest that
came after, which were words different from the first. But
nevertheless his speech gave me fear, because I drew his broken
phrase perchance to a worse meaning than it held.

"Into this depth of the dismal shell does any one ever descend
from the first grade who has for penalty only hope cut off? "[1] 
This question I put, and he answered me, "Seldom it happens that
any one of us maketh the journey on which I am going. It is true
that another time I was conjured down here by that cruel Erichtho
who was wont to call back shades into their bodies. Short while
had my flesh been bare of me, when she made me enter within that
wall in order to drag out for her a spirit from the circle of
Judas. That is the lowest place, and the darkest, and the
farthest from the Heaven that encircles all. Well do I know the
road: therefore assure thyself. This marsh which breathes out the
great stench girds round about the woeful city wherein now we
cannot enter without anger."

[1] Dante asks for assurance that Virgil, whose station is in
Limbo, "the first grade," knows the way.


And more he said, but I hold it not in mind because my eye had
wholly attracted me toward the high tower with the ruddy summit,
where in an instant were uprisen suddenly three infernal furies,
stained with blood, who had the limbs of women and their action,
and were girt with greenest hydras. Little serpents and cerastes
they had for hair, wherewith their savage brows were bound.

And he, who well knew the handmaids of the queen of the eternal
lamentation, said to me, "Behold the fell Erinnyes; this is
Megaera on the left side, she who weeps on the right is Alecto,
Tisiphone is in the middle," and therewith he was silent.

With her nails each was tearing her breast, they beat themselves
with their hands, and cried out so loud that I pressed close to
the Poet through dread. "Let Medusa come, so we will make him of
stone," they all said, looking down. "Ill was it we avenged not
on Theseus his assault."

"Turn thy back, and keep thy sight closed, for if the Gorgon show
herself, and thou shouldest see her, no return upward would there
ever be." Thus said the Master, and he himself turned me, and did
not so trust to my hands that with his own he did not also
blindfold me.

O ye who have sound understanding, regard the doctrine that is
hidden under the veil of the strange verses.

And already was coming across the turbid waves a tumult of a
sound full of terror at which both the shores trembled. Not
otherwise it was than of a wind, impetuous through the opposing
heats, that strikes the forest, and without any stay shatters the
branches, beats down and carries them away; forward, laden with
dust, it goes superb, and makes the wild beasts and the shepherds
fly.

My eyes he loosed, and said, "Now direct the nerve of sight
across the ancient scum, there yonder where that fume is most
bitter."

As frogs before the hostile snake all scatter through the water,
till each huddles on the ground, I saw more than a thousand
destroyed souls flying thus before one, who at the ford was
passing over the Styx with dry feet. From his face he removed
that thick air, waving his left hand oft before him, and only
with that trouble seemed he weary. Well I perceived that he was
sent from Heaven, and I turned me to the Master, and he made sign
that I should stand quiet and bow down unto him. Ah, how full of
disdain he seemed to me! He reached the gate and with a little
rod he opened it, for there was no withstanding.

"O outcasts from Heaven, folk despised," began he upon the
horrible threshold, "wherefore is this overweening harbored in
you? Why do ye kick against that will from which its end can
never be cut short, and which many a time hath increased your
grief? What avails it to butt against the fates? Your Cerberus,
if ye remember well, still bears his chin and his throat peeled
for that." Then he turned back upon the filthy road and said no
word to us, but wore the semblance of a man whom other care
constrains and stings, than that of him who is before him.

And we moved our feet toward the city, confident after his holy
words. Within we entered without any strife, and I, who had
desire to observe the condition which such a stronghold locks in,
when I was within, sent my eyes round about; and I see on every
hand a great plain full of woe and of cruel torment.

As at Arles, where the Rhone stagnates, as at Pola, near the
Quarnaro that shuts in Italy and bathes its borders, sepulchres
make all the place uneven; so did they here on every side, saving
that the manner was more bitter here; for among the tombs flames
were scattered, by which they were so intensely kindled that no
art requires iron more so. All their lids were lifted; and such
dire laments were issuing forth from them as truly seemed of
wretches and of sufferers.

And I, "Master, who are these folk that, buried within those
coffers, make themselves heard with their woeful sighs?" And he
to me, "Here are the heresiarchs with their followers of every
sect, and the tombs are much more laden than thou thinkest. Like
with like is buried here, and the monuments are more and less
hot."

And when he to the right hand had turned, we passed between the
torments and the high battlements.



CANTO X. The Sixth Circle: Heresiarchs.--Farinata degli
Uberti.-Cavalcante Cavalcanti.--Frederick II.

Now along a narrow path between the wall of the city and the
torments my Master goeth on, and I behind his shoulders.

"O Virtue supreme," I began, "that through the impious circles
turnest me, according to thy pleasure, speak to me and satisfy my
desires. The folk that are lying in the sepulchres, can they be
seen? All the lids are now lifted, and no one keepeth guard." And
he to me, "All shall be locked in when from Jehoshaphat they
shall here return with the bodies which they have left on earth.
Upon this side Epicurus with all his followers, who make the soul
mortal with the body, have their burial place. Therefore as to
the demand that thou makest of me, thou shalt soon be satisfied
here within; and also as to the desire concerning which thou art
silent to me." And I, "Good Leader, I hold not my heart hidden
from thee except in order to speak little; and not only now to
that hast thou disposed me."

"O Tuscan, who through the city of fire alive art going, speaking
thus modestly, may it please thee to stop in this place. Thy
speech makes manifest that thou art native of that noble
fatherland to which perchance I was too molestful." Suddenly this
sound issued from one of the coffers, wherefore I drew, in fear,
a little nearer to my Leader. And he said to me, "Turn, what dost
thou? Behold Farinata who hath uprisen; thou shalt see him all
from the girdle up."

I had already fixed my face on his, and he straightened himself
up with breast and front as though he had Hell in great scorn.
And the bold and ready hands of my Leader pushed me among the
sepulchres to him, saying, "Let thy words be choice."

When I was at the foot of his tomb, he looked at me a little, and
then, as though disdainful, asked me, "Who were thy ancestors?"
I, who was desirous to obey, concealed them not, but disclosed
them all to him; whereon he raised his brows a little up, then
said, "Fiercely were they adverse to me, and to my fathers, and
to my party, so that twice I scattered them." [1] "If they were
driven out, they returned from every side," replied I to him,
"both one and the other time, but yours have not learned well
that art."

[1] Dante's ancestors were Guelphs.


Then there arose, to view uncovered down to the chin, a shade at
the side of this one; I think that it had risen on its knees.
Round about me it looked, as if it had desire to see if another
were with me, but when its expectancy was quite extinct, weeping
it said, "If through this blind dungeon thou goest through
loftiness of genius, my son, where is he? and why is he not with
thee?" And I to him, "Of myself I come not; he who waits yonder
leads me through here, whom perchance your Guido held in
scorn."[1] 

[1] Guido Cavalcanti was charged with the same sin of unbelief as
his father. Dante regards this as a sin specially contrary to
right reason, typified by Virgil.


His words and the mode of the punishment had already read to me
the name of this one, wherefore my answer was so full.

Suddenly straightening up, he cried, "How didst thou say, 'he
held'? lives he not still? doth not the sweet light strike his
eyes?" When he took note of some delay that I made before
answering, he fell again supine, and forth appeared no more.

But that other magnanimous one, at whose instance I had stayed,
changed not aspect, nor moved his neck, nor bent his side. "And
if," he said, continuing his first words, "they have ill learned
that art, it torments me more than this bed. But the face of the
lady who ruleth here will not be rekindled fifty times ere thou
shalt know how much that art weighs. And, so mayest thou return
unto the sweet world, tell me wherefore is that people so
pitiless against my race in its every law?" Then I to him, "The
rout and the great carnage that colored the Arbia red cause such
orison to be made in our temple." After he had, sighing, shaken
his head, "In that I was not alone," he said, "nor surely without
cause would I have moved with the rest; but I was alone,--there
[1] where it was agreed by every one to lay Florence waste,--he
who defended her with open face." "Ah! so hereafter may your seed
repose," I prayed to him, "loose for me that knot, which here has
entangled my judgment. It seems, if I rightly hear, that ye
foresee that which time is bringing with him, and as to the
present have another way." "We see," he said, "like those who
have feeble light, the things that are far from us, so much still
shineth on us the supreme Leader; when they draw near, or are,
our intelligence is all vain, and, if some one report not to us,
we know nothing of your human state. Therefore thou canst
comprehend that our knowledge will be utterly dead from that
moment when the gate of the future shall he closed." Then, as
compunctious for my fault I said, "Now wilt thou therefore tell
that fallen one that his son is still conjoined with the living,
and if just now I was dumb to answer, make him know that I was so
because I was still thinking in that error which you have solved
for me." [2] 

[1] At Empoli, in 126O, after the defeat of the Florentine
Guelphs at Montaperti on the Arbia.

[2] Guido Cavalcanti died in August, 13OO; his death, being near
at hand at the time of Dante's journey, was not known to his
father.


And now my Master was calling me back, wherefore I prayed the
spirit more hastily that he would tell me who was with him. He
said to me, "Here with more than a thousand do I lie; here within
is the second Frederick and the Cardinal,[1] and of the others I
am silent."

[1] Ottaviano degli Ubaldini, a fierce Ghibelline, who was
reported as saying, "If there be a soul I have lost it for the
Ghibellines."


Thereon he hid himself; and I toward the ancient Poet turned my
steps, reflecting on that speech which seemed hostile to me. He
moved on, and then, thus going, he said to me, "Why art thou so
distraught?" And I satisfied his demand. "Let thy memory preserve
that which thou hast heard against thyself," commanded me that
Sage, "and now attend to this," and he raised his finger. "When
thou shalt be in presence of the sweet radiance of her whose
beautiful eye sees everything, from her thou shalt learn the
journey of thy life." Then to the left he turned his step.

We left the wall, and went toward the middle by a path which
strikes into a valley that even up there its stench made
displeasing.



CANTO XI. The Sixth Circle: Heretics.--Tomb of Pope Anastasins.-
-Discourse of Virgil on the divisions of the lower Hell.

Upon the edge of a high bank formed by great rocks broken in a
circle, we came above a more cruel pen. And here, because of the
horrible excess of the stench that the deep abyss throws out, we
drew aside behind the lid of a great tomb, whereon I saw an
inscription which said, "Pope Anastasius I hold, he whom Photinus
drew from the right way."

"Our descent must needs be slow so that the sense may first
accustom itself a little to the dismal blast, and then will be no
heed of it." Thus the Master, and I said to him, "Some
compensation do thou find that the time pass not lost." And be,
"Behold, I am thinking of that. My son, within these rocks," he
began to say, "are three circlets from grade to grade like those
thou leavest. All are full of accursed spirits; but, in order
that hereafter sight only may suffice thee, hear how and
wherefore they are in constraint.

"Of every malice that wins hate in heaven injury is the end, and
every such end afflicts others either by force or by fraud. But
because fraud is the peculiar sin of man, it most displeaseth
God; and therefore the fraudulent are the lower, and more woe
assails them.

"The first circle[1] is wholly of the violent; but because
violence can be done to three persons, in three rounds it is
divided and constructed. Unto God, unto one's self, unto one's
neighbor may violence be done; I mean unto them and unto their
belongings, as thou shalt hear in plain discourse. By violence
death and grievous wounds are inflicted on one's neighbor; and on
his substance ruins, burnings, and harmful robberies. Wherefore
homicides, and every one who smites wrongfully, devastators and
freebooters, all of them the first round torments, in various
troops.

[1] The first circle below, the seventh in the order of Hell.


"Man may lay violent hands upon himself and on his goods; and,
therefore, in the second round must needs repent without avail
whoever deprives himself of your world, gambles away and
squanders his property, and laments there where he ought to be
joyous.[2] 

[2] Laments on earth because of violence done to what should have
made him happy.


"Violence may be done to the Deity, by denying and blaspheming
Him in heart, and despising nature and His bounty: and therefore
the smallest round seals with its signet both Sodom and Cahors,
and him who despising God speaks from his heart.

"Fraud, by which every conscience is bitten, man may practice on
one that confides in him, or on one that owns no confidence. This
latter mode seemeth to destroy only the bond of love that nature
makes; wherefore in the second circle[1] nestle hypocrisy,
flatteries, and sorcerers, falsity, robbery, and simony, panders,
barrators, and such like filth.

[1] The second circle below, the eighth in the order of Hell.


"By the other mode that love is forgotten which nature makes, and
also that which is thereafter added, whereby special confidence
is created. Hence, in the smallest circle, where is the centre of
the universe, on which Dis sits, whoso betrays is consumed
forever."

And I, "Master, full clearly doth thy discourse proceed, and full
well divides this pit, and the people that possess it; but, tell
me, they of the fat marsh, and they whom the wind drives, and
they whom the rain beats, and they who encounter with such sharp
tongues, why are they not punished within the ruddy city if God
be wroth with them? and if he be not so, why are they in such
plight?"

And he said to me, "Wherefore so wanders thine understanding
beyond its wont? or thy mind, where else is it gazing? Dost thou
not remember those words with which thine Ethics treats in full
of the three dispositions that Heaven abides not; in continence,
malice, and mad bestiality, and how incontinence less offends
God, and incurs less blame? [1] If thou considerest well this
doctrine, and bringest to mind who are those that up above,
outside,[2] suffer punishment, thou wilt see clearly why from
these felons they are divided, and why less wroth the divine
vengeance hammers them."

[1] Aristotle, Ethics, vii. 1.

[2] Outside the walls of the city of Dis.


"O Sun that healest every troubled vision, thou dost content me
so, when thou explainest, that doubt, not less than knowledge,
pleaseth me; yet return a little back," said I, "there where thou
saidst that usury offends the Divine Goodness, and loose the
knot."

"Philosophy," he said to me, "points out to him who understands
it, not only in one part alone, how Nature takes her course from
the Divine Intellect and from its art. And if thou note thy
Physics [1] well thou wilt find after not many pages that your
art follows her so far as it can, as the disciple does the
master, so that your art is as it were grandchild of God. By
means of these two, if thou bringest to mind Genesis at its
beginning, it behoves mankind to obtain their livelihood and to
thrive. But because the usurer takes another course, he despises
Nature in herself, and in her follower, since upon other thing he
sets his hope. But follow me now, for to go on pleaseth me; for
the Fishes are gliding on the horizon, and the Wain lies quite
over Corus,[2] and far yonder is the way down the cliff."

[1] Aristotle, Physics, ii. 2.

[2] The time indicated is about 4, or from 4 to 5 A.M. Corus, the
name of the north-west wind, here stands for that quarter of the
heavens.



CANTO XII. First round of the Seventh Circle; those who do
violence to others; Tyrants and Homicides.--The Minotaur.--The
Centaurs.--Chiron.--Nessus.--The River of Boiling Blood, and the
Sinners in it.

The place where we came to descend the bank was rugged, and,
because of what was there besides, such that every eye would be
shy of it.

As is that ruin which, on this side of Trent, struck the Adige on
its flank, either by earthquake or by failure of support,--for
from the top of the mountam whence it moved, to the plain, the
cliff has so fallen down that it might give a path to one who was
above,--so was the descent of that ravine. And on the edge of the
broken chasm lay stretched out the infamy of Crete, that was
conceived in the false cow. And when he saw us he bit himself
even as one whom wrath rends inwardly. My Sage cried out toward
him, "Perchance thou believest that here is the Duke of Athens
who up in the world brought death to thee? Get thee gone, beast,
for this one comes not instructed by thy sister, but he goes to
behold your punishments."

As a bull that breaks away at the instant he has now received his
mortal stroke, and cannot go, but plunges hither and thither, the
Minotaur I saw do the like.

And that wary one cried out, "Run to the pass; while he is raging
it is well that thou descend." So we took our way down over the
discharge of those stones, which often moved under my feet
because of the novel burden.

I was going along thinking, and he said, "Thou thinkest perhaps
on this ruin which is guarded by that bestial with which I just
now quenched. Now would I have thee know that the other time when
I descended hither into the nether hell, this cliff had not yet
fallen. But in truth, if I discern clearly, a little ere He came,
who levied the great spoil on Dis from the supernal circle, in
all its parts the deep foul valley trembled so that I thought the
universe had felt the love by which, as some believe, oft times
the world has been converted into chaos:[1] and, at that moment,
this ancient cliff here and elsewhere made this downfall. But fix
thine eyes below, for the river of blood is near, in which boils
whoso doth harm to others by violence."

[1] Empedocles taught, as Dante may have learned from Aristotle,
that Love and Hate were the forces by which the elements of which
the world is composed were united and dissociated. The effort of
Love was to draw all things into a simple perfect sphere, by
which the common order of the world would be brought to chaos.


Oh blind cupidity, both guilty and mad, that so spurs us in the
brief life, and then, in the eternal, steeps us so ill!

I saw a broad ditch, bent in an arc, like one that embraces all
the plain; according as my Guide had said. And between the foot
of the bank and it, in a file were running Centaurs armed with
arrows, as they were wont in the world to go to the chase. Seeing
us descending, all stopped, and from the troop three detached
themselves, with bows and arrows first selected. And one shouted
from afar, "To what torment are ye coming, ye who descend the
slope? Tell it from there; if not, I draw the bow." My Master
said, "We will make answer unto Chiron near you there: ill was it
that thy will was ever thus hasty."

Then he touched me, and said, "That is Nessus, who died for the
beautiful Dejanira, and he himself wrought vengeance for himself;
and that one in the middle, who is gazing on his breast, is the
great Chiron who nurtured Achilles. That other is Pholus, who was
so full of wrath. Round about the ditch they go by thousands
shooting with their arrows what soul lifts itself from the blood
more than its guilt has allotted it."

We drew near to those fleet wild beasts. Chiron took a shaft, and
with the notch put his beard backward upon his jaw. When he had
uncovered his great mouth he said to his companions, "Are ye
aware that the one behind moves what he touches? so are not wont
to do the feet of the dead." And my good Leader, who was now at
his breast, where the two natures are conjoined, replied, "Truly
he is alive, and thus all alone it behoves me to show him the
dark valley: necessity brings him hither and not delight. One
withdrew from singing alleluiah who committed unto me this new
office; he is no robber, nor I a thievish spirit. But, by that
power through which I move my steps along so savage a road, give
to us one of thine, to whom we may be close, that he may show us
where the ford is, and may carry this one on his back, for he is
not a spirit who can go through the air."

Chiron turned upon his right breast, and said to Nessus, "Turn,
and guide them thus, and if another troop encounter you, make it
give way."

We moved on with the trusty escort along the edge of the crimson
boiling, in which the boiled were making loud shrieks. I saw folk
under it up to the brow, and the great Centaur said, "These are
tyrants who gave themselves to blood and pillage. Here they weep
their pitiless offenses: here is Alexander, and cruel Dionysius
who caused Sicily to have woeful years. And that front which hath
such black hair is Azzolino, and that other who is blond is
Opizzo of Esti, who in truth was slain by his stepson up there in
the world."

Then I turned me to the Poet, and he said, " Let him now be
first, and I second." A little further on the Centaur stopped
above some folk who far as the throat were seen to issue from
that boiling stream. He showed to us at one side a solitary
shade, and said, "He cleft, in the bosom of God, the heart that
still is honored on the Thames."[1] Then I saw folk, who out of
the stream held their head, and even all their chest; and of
these I recognized many. Thus ever more and more shallow became
that blood, until it cooked only the feet: and here was our
passage of the foss.

[1] In 1271, Prince Henry, son of Richard of Cornwall, was
stabbed during the mass, in a church at Viterbo, by Guy of
Montfort, to avenge the death of his father, Simon, Earl of
Leicester, in 1261. The heart of the young Prince was placed in a
golden cup, as Villani (vii. 39) reports, on a column, at the
head of a bridge in London.


"Even as on this side, thou seest that the boiling stream ever
diminishes," said the Centaur, "I would have thee believe that on
this other its bed sinks more and more, until it comes round
again where it behoves that tyranny should groan. The divine
justice here pierces that Attila who was a scourge on earth, and
Pyrrhus and Sextus; and forever milks the tears that with the
boiling it unlocks from Rinier of Corneto, and from Rinier Pazzo,
who upon the highways made such warfare."

Then he turned back and repassed the ford.



CANTO XIII. Second round of the Seventh Circle: of those who have
done violence to themselves and to their goods.--The Wood of
Self-murderers.--The Harpies.--Pier delle Vigne.--Lano of Siena
and others.

Nessus had not yet reached the yonder bank when we set forward
through a wood which was marked by no path. Not green leaves but
of a dusky color, not smooth boughs but knotty and gnarled, not
fruits were there but thorns with poison. Those savage beasts
that hold in hate the tilled places between Cecina and Corneto
have no thickets so rough or so dense.

Here the foul Harpies make their nests, who chased the Trojans
from the Strophades with dismal announcement of future calamity.
They have broad wings, and human necks and faces, feet with
claws, and a great feathered belly. They make lament upon the
strange trees.

And the good Master, "Before thou enter farther know that thou
art in the second round," he began to say to me, "and wilt be,
till thou shalt come unto the horrible sand. Therefore look well
around, and so thou shalt see things that would take credence
from my speech."[1] 

[1] Things which if told would seem incredible.


I heard wailings uttered on every side, and I saw no one who
might make them, wherefore, I, all bewildered, stopped. I believe
that he believed that I believed that all these voices issued
amid those stumps from people who because of us had hidden
themselves.

Therefore said the Master, "If thou break off a twig from one of
these plants, the thoughts thou hast will all be cut short." Then
I stretched my hand a little forward and plucked a branchlet from
a great thorn-bush, and its trunk cried out, "Why dost thou rend
me?" When it had become dark with blood it began again to cry,
"Why dost thou tear me? hast thou not any spirit of pity? Men we
were, and now we are become stocks; truly thy hand ought to be
more pitiful had we been the souls of serpents."

As from a green log that is burning at one of its ends, and from
the other drips, and hisses with the air that is escaping, so
from that broken splinter came out words and blood together;
whereon I let the tip fall, and stood like a man who is afraid.

"If he had been able to believe before," replied my Sage, "O
wounded soul, what he has seen only in my verse,[1] he would not
upon thee have stretched his hand. But the incredible thing made
me prompt him to an act which grieves my very self. But tell him
who thou wast, so that, by way of some amends, he may refresh thy
fame in the world above, whereto it is allowed him to return."

[1] In the story of Polydorus, in the third book of the Aeneid.


And the trunk, "So with sweet speech dost thou allure me, that I
cannot be silent, and may it not displease you, that I am enticed
to speak a little. I am he who held both the keys of the heart of
Frederick, and who turned them, locking and unlocking so softly,
that from his confidence I kept almost every one.[1] Fidelity so
great I bore to the glorious office, that I lost slumber and
strength thereby. The harlot,[2] that never from the abode of
Caear turned her strumpet eyes,--the common death and vice of
courts,--inflamed all minds against me, and they, inflamed, did
so inflame Augustus that my glad honors turned to dismal sorrows.
My mind, in scornful temper thinking to escape scorn by death,
made me unjust toward my just self. By the strange roots of this
tree I swear to you, that I never broke faith unto my lord who
was so worthy of honor. And if one of you returneth to the world,
let him comfort my memory that yet lies prostrate from the blow
that envy gave it."

[1] The spirit who speaks is Pier delle Vigne, the Chancellor of
Frederick II.; of low birth, he rose tathe first place in the
state; he was one of the earliest writers of Italian verse. Dante
has placed his master as well as him in Hell. See Canto X.

[3] Envie ys lavendere of the court alway;
  For she ne parteth neither nyght ne day
  Out of the house of Cesar, thus saith Daunte.
     Legende of Goode Women, 35860.


A while he paused, and then, "Since he is silent," said the Poet
to me, "lose not the hour, but speak and ask of him, if more
pleaseth thee." Whereon I to him, "Do thou ask him further of
what thou thinkest may satisfy me, for I cannot, such pity fills
my heart."

Therefore he began again, "So may this man do for thee freely
what thy speech prays, spirit incarcerate, still be pleased to
tell us how the soul is bound within these knots, and tell us, if
thou canst, if any from such limbs is ever loosed."

Then the trunk puffed strongly, and soon that wind was changed
into this voice: "Briefly shall ye be answered. When the
ferocious soul departeth from the body wherefrom itself hath torn
itself, Minos sends it to the seventh gulf. It falls into the
wood, and no part is chosen for it, but where fortune flings it,
there it takes root like a grain of spelt; it springs up in a
shoot and to a wild plant. The Harpies, feeding then upon its
leaves, give pain, and to the pain a window.[1] Like the rest
we shall go for our spoils,[2] but not, forsooth, that any one
may revest himself with them, for it is not just to have that of
which one deprives himself. Hither shall we drag them, and
through the melancholy wood shall our bodies be suspended, each
on the thorn-tree of his molested shade."

[1] The tearing of the leaves gives an outlet to the woe.

[2] Our bodies, at the Last Judgment.


We were still attentive to the trunk, believing that it might
wish to say more to us, when we were surprised by an uproar, as
one who perceives the wild boar and the chase coming toward his
stand and hears the Feasts and the branches crashing. And behold
two on the left hand, naked and scratched, flying so violently
that they broke all the limbs of the wood. The one in front was
shouting, "Now, help, help, Death!" and the other, who seemed to
himself too slow, "Lano, thy legs were not so nimble at the
jousts of the Toppo: "[1] and when perhaps his breath was
failing, of himself and of a bush he made a group. Behind them
the wood was full of black bitches, ravenous and running like
greyhounds that have been unleashed. On him that had squatted
they set their teeth and tore him to pieces, bit by bit, then
carried off his woeful limbs.

[1] Lano was slain in flight at the defeat of the Sienese by the
Aretines, near the Pieve del Toppo, in 1280. He and Jacomo were
notorious prodigals.


My Guide then took me by the hand, and led me to the bush, which
was weeping through its bleeding breaks in vain. "O Jacomo of
Sant' Andrea," it was saying, "what hath it vantaged thee to make
of me a screen? What blame have I for thy wicked life?" When the
Master had stopped beside it, he said, "Who wast thou, who
through so many wounds blowest forth with blood thy woeful
speech?" And he to us, "O souls who art arrived to see the
shameful ravage that hath thus disjoined my leaves from me,
collect theni at the foot of the wretched bush. I was of the city
which for the Baptist changed her first patron;[1] wherefore will
he always make her sorrowful with his art. And were it not that
at the passage of the Arno some semblance of him yet remains,
those citizens who afterwards rebuilt it upon the ashes that were
left by Attila[2] would have labored in vain. I made a gibbet for
myself of my own dwelling."

[1] The first patron of florence was Mars; a fragment of a statue
of whom stood till 1333 on the Ponte Vecchio.

[2] It was not Attila, but Totila, who in 542 besieged Florence,
and, according to false popular tradition, burned it. The names
and personages were frequently confounded in the Dark Ages.



CANTO XIV. Third round of the Seventh Circle of those who have
done violence to God.--The Burning Sand.--Capaneus.--Figure of
the Old Man in Crete.--The Rivers of Hell.

Because the charity of my native place constrained me, I gathered
up the scattered leaves and gave them back to him who was already
hoarse.

Then we came to the confine, where the second round is divided
from the third, and where is seen a horrible mode of justice.

To make clearly manifest the new things, I say that we had
reached a plain which from its bed removeth every plant. The
woeful wood is a garland round about it, even as the dismal foss
to that. Here, on the very edge, we stayed our steps. The floor
was a dry and dense sand, not made in other fashion than that
which of old was trodden by the feet of Cato.

O vengeance of God, how much thou oughtest to be feared by every
one who readeth that which was manifest unto mine eyes!

Of naked souls I saw many flocks, that were all weeping very
miserably, and diverse law seemed imposed upon them. Some folk
were lying supine on the ground, some were seated all crouched
up, and others were going about continually. Those who were going
around were far the more, and those the fewer who were lying down
under the torment, but they had their tongues more loose for
wailing.

Over all the sand, with a slow falling, were raining down dilated
flakes of fire, as of snow on alps without a wind. As the flames
which Alexander in those hot parts of India saw falling upon his
host, solid to the ground, wherefore he took care to trample the
soil by his troops, because the vapor was better extinguished
while it was single; so was descending the eternal glow whereby
the sand was kindled, like tinder beneath the steel, for doubling
of the dole. Without repose was ever the dance of the wretched
hands, now there, now here, brushing from them the fresh burning.

I began, "Master, thou that overcomest everything, except the
obdurate demons, who at the entrance of the gate came out against
us, who is that great one that seemeth not to heed the fire, and
lies scornful and contorted, so that the rain seems not to ripen
him?" And that same one who had perceived that I was asking my
Leader about him, cried out, "Such as I was alive, such am I
dead. Though Jove weary his smith, from whom in wrath he took the
sharp thunderbolt wherewith on my last day I was smitten, or
though he weary the others, turn by turn, in Mongibello at the
black forge, crying, 'Good Vulcan, help, help!' even as he did at
the fight of Phlegra, and should hurl on me with all his might,
thereby he should not have glad vengeance."

Then my Leader spoke with force so great that I had not heard him
so loud, "O Capaneus, in that thy pride is not quenched, art thou
the more punished; no torture save thine own rage would be a pain
adequate to thy fury."

Then he turned round to me with better look, saying, "He was one
of the Seven Kings that besieged Thebes, and he held, and it
appears that he holds God in disdain, and little it appears that
he prizes Him; but as I said to him, his own despites are very
due adornments for his breast. Now come on behind me, and take
heed withal, not to set thy feet upon the burning sand, but keep
them always close unto the wood."

Silent we came to where spirts forth from the wood a little
streamlet, the redness of which still makes me shudder. As from
the Bulicame issues a brooklet, which then the sinful women share
among them, so this down across the sand went along.[1] Its bed
and both its sloping banks were made of stone, and the margins on
the side, whereby I perceived that the crossing[2] was there.

[1] The Bulicame, a hot spring near Viterbo, much frequented as a
bath, the use of a portion of which was assigned to "sinful
women."

[2] The crossing of the breadth of the round of burning sand, on
the way inward toward the next circle.


"Among all else that I have shown to thee, since we entered
through the gate whose threshold is barred to no one, nothing has
been discerned by thine eyes so notable as is the present stream
which deadens all the flamelets upon it." These words were of my
Leader, wherefore I prayed him, that he should give me largess of
the food for which he had given me largess of desire.

"In mid sea sits a wasted land," said he then, "which is named
Crete, under whose king the world of old was chaste. A mountain
is there that of old was glad with waters and with leaves, which
is called Ida; now it is desert, like a thing outworn. Rhea chose
it of old for the trusty cradle of her little son, and to conceal
him better when he cried had shoutings made there. Within the
mountain stands erect a great old man, who holds his shoulders
turned towards Damietta, and looks at Rome as if his mirror. His
head is formed of fine gold, and pure silver are his arms and
breast; then he is of brass far as to the fork. From there
downward he is all of chosen iron, save that his right foot is of
baked clay, and he stands erect on that more than on the
other.[1] Every part except the gold is cleft with a fissure that
trickles tears, which collected perforate that cavern. Their
course falls from rock to rock into this valley; they form
Acheron, Styx, and Phlegethon; then it goes down through this
narrow channel far as where there is no more descending. They
form Cocytus, and what that pool is, thou shalt see; therefore
here is it not told."

[1] This image is taken directly from the dream of Nebuchadnezzar
(Daniel ii. 31-33). It is the type of the ages of tradition and
history, with its back to the past, its face toward Rome,--the
seat of the Empire and of the Church. The tears of the sin and
suffering of the generations of man form the rivers of Hell.


And I to him, "If the present rill floweth down thus from our
world, why doth it appear to us only at this rim?"

And he to me, "Thou knowest that the place is round, and though
thou art come far, ever to the left descending toward the bottom,
not yet hast thou turned through the whole circle; wherefore if a
new thing appears to us, it ought not to bring wonder to thy
face."

And I again, "Master, where are Phlegethon and Lethe found, for
of the one thou art silent, and of the other thou sayest that it
is formed by this rain?"

"In all thy questions surely thou pleasest me," he answered, "but
the boiling of the red water ought truly to solve one that thou
askest. Lethe thou shalt see, but outside of this ditch, there
where souls go to lave themselves when sin repented of is taken
away." Then he said, "Now it is time to depart from the wood;
take heed that thou come behind me; the margins afford way, for
they are not burning, and above them all the vapor is
extinguished."



CANTO XV. Third round of the Seventh Circle: of those who have
done violence to Nature.--Brunetto Latini.--Prophecies of
misfortune to Dante.

Now one of the hard margins bears us on, and the fume of the
brook overshadows so that it saves the water and the banks from
the fire. As the Flemings, between Wissant and Bruges, fearing
the flood that is blown in upon them, make the dyke whereby the
sea is routed; and as the Paduans along the Brenta, in order to
defend their towns and castles, ere Chiarentana[1] feel the
heat,--in such like were these made, though neither so high nor
so thick had the master, whoever he was, made them.

[1] The mountain range north of the Brenta, by the floods from
which the river is swollen in the spring.


We were now so remote from the wood that I could not have seen
where it was though I had turned me round to look, when we
encountered a troop of souls which was coming along by the bank,
and each of them was looking at us, as at eve one is wont to look
at another under the new moon, and they so sharpened their brows
toward us as the old tailor does on the needle's eye.

Thus gazed at by that company, I was recognized by one who took
me by the hem, and cried out, "What a marvel!" And when he
stretched out his arm to me, I fixed my eyes on his baked aspect
so that his scorched visage prevented not my mind from
recognizing him; and bending down my own to his face, I answered,
"Are you here, Sir Brunetto?"[1] And he, "O my son, let it not
displease thee if Brunetto Latini turn a little back with thee,
and let the train go on." I said to him, "With all my power I
pray this of you, and if you will that I seat myself with you I
will do so, if it pleaseth this one, for I go with him." "O son,"
said he, "whoever of this herd stops for an instant lies then a
hundred years without fanning himself when the fire smites him;
therefore go onward, I will come at thy skirts, and then I will
rejoin my band which goeth weeping its eternal sufferings."

[1] Brunetto Latini, one of the most learned and able Florentines
of the thirteenth century. He was banished with the other chiefs
of the Guelph party, after the battle of Montaperti, in 1260, and
went to France, where he resided for many years. After his return
to Florence he became Secretary of the Commune, and he was the
master of Dante and Guido Cavalcanti. His principal literary work
was Li Livres dou Tresor, written in French, an interesting
compend of the omne scibile. He died in 1290. Dante uses the
plural "you" in addressing him, as a sign of respect.


I dared not descend from the road to go level with him, but I
held my head bowed like one who goes reverently. He began, "What
fortune, or destiny, ere the last day, brings thee down here? and
who is this that shows the road?"

"There above, in the clear life," I answered him, "I lost myself
in a valley, before my time was full. Only yester morn I turned
my back on it; this one[1] appeared to me as I was returning to
it, and he is leading me homeward along this path."

[1] Dante never speaks Virgil's name in Hell.


And he to me: "If thou follow thy star, thou canst not miss the
glorious port, if, in the beautiful life, I discerned aright. And
if I had not so untimely died, seeing heaven so benignant unto
thee I would have given cheer unto thy work. But that ungrateful
populace malign which descended from Fiesole of old,[1] and
smacks yet of the mountain and the rock, will hate thee because
of thy good deeds; and this is right, for among the bitter sorb
trees it is not fitting the sweet fig should bear fruit. Old
report in the world calls them blind; it is a people avaricious,
envious, and proud; from their customs take heed that thou keep
thyself clean. Thy fortune reserves such honor for thee that one
party and the other shall hunger for thee; but far from the goat
shall be the grass. Let the Fiesolan beasts make litter of
themselves, and touch not the plant, if any spring still upon
their dungheap, in which may live again the holy seed of those
Romans who remained there when it became the nest of so much
malice."

[1] After his flight from Rome Catiline betook himself to
Faesulae (Fiesole), and here for a time held out against the
Roman forces. The popular tradition ran that, after his defeat,
Faesulae was destroyed, and its people, together with a colony
from Rome, made a settlement on the banks of the Arno, below the
mountain on which Faesulae had stood. The new town was named
Fiora, siccome fosse in fiore edificata, "as though built among
flowers," but afterwards was called Fiorenza, or Florence. See G.
Villani, Cronica, I. xxxi.-xxxviii.


"If all my entreaty were fulfilled," replied I to him, "you would
not yet be placed in banishment from human nature; for in my mind
is fixed, and now fills my heart, the dear, good, paternal image
of you, when in the world hour by hour you taught me how man
makes himself eternal and in what gratitude I hold it, so long as
I live, it behoves that on my tongue should be discerned. That
which you tell me of my course I write, and reserve it to be
glossed with other text,[1] by a Lady, who will know how, if I
attain to her. Thus much would I have manifest to you: if only
that my conscience chide me not, for Fortune, as she will, I am
ready. Such earnest is not strange unto my ears; therefore let
Fortune turn her wheel as pleases her, and the churl his
mattock."[2] 

[1] The prophecy by Ciacco of the fall of Dante's party, Canto
vi., and that by Farinata of Dante's exile, Canto x., which
Virgil had told should be made clear to him by Beatrice.

[2] The churl of Fiesole.


My Master then upon his right side turned himself back, and
looked at me; then said, "He listens well who notes it."

Not the less for this do I go on speaking with Sir Brunetto, and
I ask, who are his most known and most eminent companions. And he
to me, "To know of some is good, of the others silence will be
laudable for us, for the time would be short for so much speech.
In brief, know that all were clerks, and great men of letters,
and of great fame, defiled in the world with one same sin.
Priscian goes along with that disconsolate crowd, and Francesco
of Accorso;[1] and thou mightest also have seen, hadst thou had
desire of such scurf, him who by the Servant of Servants was
translated from Arno to Bacchiglione, where he left his
ill-strained nerves.[2] Of more would I tell, but the going on
and the speech cannot be longer, for I see yonder a new cloud
rising from the sand. Folk come with whom I must not be. Let my
Tesoro be commended to thee, in which I still am living, and more
I ask not."

[1] Priscian, the famous grammarian of the sixth century; Francis
of Accorso, a jurist of great repute, who taught at Oxford and at
Bologna, and died in 1294.

[2] Andrea de Mozzi, bishop of Florence, translated by Boniface
VIII. to Viceuza, near which the Bacchiglione runs. He died in
1296.


Then he turned back, and seemed of those who run at Verona for
the green cloth[1] across the plain, and of these he seemed the
one that wins, and not he that loses.

[1] The prize in the annual races at Verona.



CANTO XVI. Third round of the Seventh Circle: of those who have
done violence to Nature.--Guido Guerra, Tegghiaio Aldobrandi and
Jacopo Rusticucci.--The roar of Phlegethon as it pours downward.-
-The cord thrown into the abyss.

Now was I in a place where the resounding of the water that was
falling into the next circle was heard, like that hum which the
beehives make, when three shades together separated themselves,
running, from a troop that was passing under the rain of the
bitter torment. They came toward us, and each cried out, "Stop
thou, that by thy garb seemest to us to be one from our wicked
city!"

Ah me! what wounds I saw upon their limbs, recent and old, burnt
in by the flames. Still it grieves me for them but to remember
it.

To their cries my Teacher gave heed; he turned his face toward
me, and "Now wait," he said; "to these one should be courteous,
and were it not for the fire that the nature of the place shoots
out, I should say that haste better befitted thee than them."

They began again, when we stopped, the old verse, and when they
had reached us they made a wheel of themselves all three. As
champions naked and oiled are wont to do, watching their hold and
their vantage, before they come to blows and thrusts, thus,
wheeling, each directed his face on me, so that his neck in
contrary direction to his feet was making continuous journey.

"Ah! if the misery of this shifting sand bring us and our prayers
into contempt," began one, "and our darkened and blistered
aspect, let our fame incline thy mind to tell us who thou art,
that so securely plantest thy living feet in Hell. He whose
tracks thou seest me trample, though he go naked and singed, was
of greater state than thou thinkest. Grandson he was of the good
Gualdrada; his name was Guidoguerra, and in his life he did much
with counsel, and with the sword. The other who treads the sand
behind me is Tegghiaio Aldobrandi, whose fame should be welcome
in the world above. And I, who am set with them on the cross, was
Jacopo Rusticucci,[1] and surely my savage wife more than aught
else injures

[1] Concerning Tegghiaio and Rusticucci Dante had enquired of
Ciacco, Canto vi. They and Guido Guerra were illustrious citizens
of Florence in the thirteenth century. Their deeds are recorded
by Villani and Ricordano Malespini. The good Gualdrada, famed for
her beauty and her modesty, was the daughter of Messer
Bellincione Berti, referred to in Cantos w. and wi. of Paradise
as one of the early worthies of the city. See O. Villani,
Cronica. V. xxxvii.


If I could have been sheltered from the fire I would have cast
myself below among them, and I think that the Teacher would have
permitted it; but because I should have been scorched and baked,
fear overcame my good will that made me greedy to embrace them.
Then I began: "Not contempt, but grief, did your condition fix
within me, so that slowly will it be all divested, soon as this
my Lord said words to me by which I understood that such folk as
ye are might be coming. Of your city I am; and always your deeds
and honored names have I retraced and heard with affection. I
leave the gall and go for the sweet fruits promised me by my
veracious Leader; but far as the centre needs must I first
descend."

"So may thy soul long direct thy limbs," replied he then, "and so
may thy fame shine after thee, say if courtesy and valor abide in
our city as they were wont, or if they have quite gone forth from
it? For Guglielmo Borsiere,[1] who is in torment with us but
short while, and goes yonder with our companions, afflicts us
greatly with his words."

[1] Nothing is known from contemporary record of Borsiere, bnt
Boccaccio tells a story of him in the Decameron, giorn. i. nov.
8.


"The new people and the sudden gains [1] have generated pride and
excess, Florence, in thee, so that already thou weepest thereat."
Thus cried I with face uplifted. And the three, who understood
that for answer, looked one at the other, as men look at hearing
truth.

[1] Florence had grown rapidly in population and in wealth during
the last years of the thirteenth century.


"If other times it costeth thee so little," replied they all, "to
satisfy others, happy thou that thus speakest at thy pleasure.
Therefore, if thou escapest from these dark places, and returnest
to see again the beautiful stars, when it shall rejoice thee to
say, 'I have been,' mind thou speak of us unto the people." Then
they broke the wheel, and in flying their swift legs seemed
wings.

Not an amen could have been said so quickly as they had
disappeared; wherefore it seemed good to my Master to depart. I
followed him, and we had gone little way before the sound of the
water was so near to us, that had we spoken we scarce had heard.
As that river on the left slope of the Apennine, which, the first
from Monte Veso toward the east, has its proper course,--which is
called Acquacheta up above, before it sinks valleyward into its
low bed, and at Forli no longer has that name,[1] --reverberates
from the alp in falling with a single leap there above San
Benedetto, where there ought to be shelter for a thousand;[2] 
thus down from a precipitous bank we found that dark-tinted water
resounding, so that in short while it would have hurt the ears.

[1] At Forli the river is called the Montone; it was the first of
the rivers on the left of the Apennines that had its course to
the sea; the others before it being tributaries of the Po, which
rises on Monte Veso.

[2] These last words are obscure, and none of the commentators
explain them satisfactorily.


I had a cord girt around me, and with it I had once thought to
take the leopard of the dappled skin.[1] After I had loosed it
wholly from me, even as my Leader had commanded me, I reached it
to him wound up and coiled. Whereon he turned toward the right,
and somewhat far from the edge threw it down into that deep
abyss. "And surely some strange thing must needs respond," said I
to myself, "to the strange signal which the Master so follows
with his eye."

[2] The leopard of the dappled skin, which had often turned
back Dante from the Mountain to the Dark Wood (see Canto i.); the
type of sensual sin. The cord is the type of religions
asceticism, of which the poet no longer has need. The meaning of
its use as a signal is not apparent.


Ah! how cautious men ought to be near those who see not only the
act, but with their wisdom look within the thoughts. He said to
me: "Soon will come up that which I await, and what thy thought
is dreaming must soon discover itself unto thy sight."

To that truth which has the aspect of falsehood ought one always
to close his lips so far as he can, because without fault it
causes shame;[1] but here I cannot be silent, and by the notes of
this comedy, Reader, I swear to thee,--so may they not be void of
lasting grace,--that I saw through that thick and dark air a
shape come swimming upwards marvelous to every steadfast heart;
like as he returns who goes down sometimes to loose an anchor
that grapples either a rock or other thing that in the sea is
hid, who stretches upward, and draws in his feet.

[1] Because the narrator is falsely taxed with falsehood.



CANTO XVII. Third round of the Seventh Circle: of those who have
done violence to Art.--Geryon.--The Usurers.--Descent to the
Eighth Circle.

"Behold the wild beast with the pointed tail, that passes
mountains, and breaks walls and weapons; behold him that infects
all the world."[1] Thus began my Leader to speak to me; and he
beckoned to him that he should come to shore near the end of the
trodden marbles.[2] And that loathsome image of fraud came
onward, and landed his head and his body, but drew not his tail
upon the bank. His face was the face of a just man (so benignant
was its skin outwardly), and of a serpent all the trunk beside;
he had two paws, hairy to the armpits; his back and breast and
both his sides were painted with nooses and circles. With more
colors of woof and warp Tartars or Turks never made cloth, nor
were such webs woven by Arachne.

[1] Dante makes Geryon the type and image of Fraud, thus
allegorizing the triple form (forma tricorperis umbrae: Aeneid
vi. 289; tergemini Geryonae; Id. viii. 292) ascribed to him by
the ancient poets.

[2] The stony margin of Phlegethon, on which Virgil and Dante
have crossed the sand.


As sometimes boats lie on the shore, so that they are partly in
water and partly on the ground, and as yonder, among the
gluttonous Germans, the beaver settles himself to make his
war,[1] so lay that worst of beasts upon the rim that closes in
the sand with stone. In the void all his tail was quivering,
twisting upwards its venomous fork, which like a scorpion's armed
the point.

[1] With his tail in the water to catch his prey, as was
popularly believed.


The Leader said: "Now needs must our way bend a little toward
that wicked beast that is couching there." Therefore we descended
on the right hand and took ten steps upon the verge quite to
avoid the sand and flame. And when we had come to it, I see, a
little farther on, people sitting upon the sand near to the void
place.[1] 

[1] These people are the third class of sinners punished in this
round of the Seventh Circle, those who have done violence to Art,
the usurers. (See Canto xi.)


Here the Master said to me: "In order that thou mayst bear away
complete experience of this round, now go and see their
condition. Let thy discourse there be brief. Till thou returnest
I will speak with this one, that he may concede to us his strong
shoulders."

Thus, still up by the extreme head of that seventh circle, all
alone, I went where the sad people were sitting. Through the eyes
their woe was bursting forth. This way and that they helped with
their hands, sometimes against the vapors,[1] and sometimes
against the hot soil. Not otherwise do the dogs in summer, now
with muzzle, now with paw, when they are bitten either by fleas,
or flies, or gadflies. When I set my eyes on the face of some on
whom the woeful fire falls, not one of them I recognized;[2] but
I perceived that from the neck of each was hanging a pouch, that
had a certain color and a certain device,[3] and thereupon it
seems their eyes feed. And as I looking come among them, I saw
upon a yellow purse azure that had the face and bearing of a
lion.[4] Then as the current of my look proceeded I saw another,
red as blood, display a goose whiter than butter. And one, who
had his little white bag marked with an azure and pregnant
sow,[5] said to me, "What art thou doing in this ditch? Now get
thee gone, and since thou art still alive, know that my neighbor,
Vitaliano, will sit here at my left side. With these Florentines
am I, a Paduan; often they stun my ears shouting, 'Let the
sovereign cavalier come who will bring the pouch with the three
goats."[1] Then he twisted his mouth, and stuck out his tongue,
like an ox that licks his nose.

[1] The falling flames.

[2] Dante thus indicates that they were not worthy to be known.

[3] The blazon of their arms, by which Dante learns who they are.

[4] This was the device of the Gianfigliazzi, a Guelph family of
Florence; the next was that of the Ubriachi, Ghibellines, also of
Florence.

[5] Arms of the Scrovigni of Padua.

[6] One Giovanni Buiamonte of Florence, "who surpassed all others
of the time in usury," says Benvenuto da Imola.


And I, fearing lest longer stay might vex him who had admonished
me to stay but little, turned back from these weary souls. I
found my Leader, who had already mounted upon the croup of the
fierce animal, and he said to me, "Now be strong and courageous;
henceforth the descent is by such stairs; [1] mount thou in
front, for I wish to be between, so that the tail cannot do thee
harm."

[1] Not by foot, nor by boat as heretofore, but carried by living
ministers of Hell.


As is he who hath the shivering fit of the quartan so near that
his nails are already pallid, and he is all of a tremble only
looking at the shade, such I became at these words uttered. But
his reproaches wrought shame in me, which in presence of a good
lord makes a servant strong.

I seated myself on those huge shoulders. I wished to speak thus,
"Take heed that thou embrace me," but the voice came not as I had
thought. But he who other time had succored me, in other peril,
soon as I mounted, clasped and sustained me with his arms: and he
said, "Geryon, move on now; let the circles be wide, and the
descending slow; consider the strange burden that thou hast."

As a little vessel goeth from its place, backward, backward, so
he thence withdrew; and when he felt himself quite at play, he
turned his tail to where his breast had been, and moved it,
stretched out like an eel, and with his paws gathered the air to
himself. Greater fear I do not think there was when Phaethon
abandoned the reins, whereby heaven, as is still apparent, was
scorched; nor when the wretched Icarus felt his flanks
unfeathering through the melting of the wax, his father shouting
to him, "Ill way thou holdest," than mine was, when I saw that I
was in the air on every side, and saw every sight vanished,
except that of the beast. He goes along swimming very slowly,
wheels and descends, but I perceive it not, save by the wind upon
my face, and from below.

I heard now on the right hand the gorge making beneath us a
horrible roar; wherefore I stretch out my head, with my eyes
downward. Then I became more afraid to lean over, because I saw
fires and heard laments; whereat I, trembling, wholly cowered
back. And I saw then, what I had not seen before, the descending
and the wheeling, by the great evils that were drawing near on
diverse sides.

As the falcon which has been long on wing, that, without sight of
lure or bird, makes the falconer say, "Ah me, thou stoopest!
descends weary, there whence he had set forth swiftly, through a
hundred circles, and lights far from his master, disdainful and
sullen; so Geryon set us at the bottom, at the very foot of the
scarped rock, and, disburdened of our persons, darted away as
arrow from the bowstring.



CANTO XVIII. Eighth Circle: the first pit: panders and seducers.-
-Venedico Caccianimico.--Jason.--Second pit: false flatterers.--
Alessio Interminei.--Thais.

There is a place in Hell called Malebolge, all of stone of the
color of iron, as is the encircling wall that surrounds it. Right
in the middle of this field malign yawns an abyss exceeding wide
and deep, the structure of which I will tell of in its place.
That belt, therefore, which remains between the abyss and the
foot of the high bank is circular, and it has its ground divided
into ten valleys. Such an aspect as where, for guard of the
walls, many moats encircle castles, the place where they are
presents, such image did these make here. And as in such
strongholds from their thresholds to the outer bank are little
bridges, so from the base of the precipitous wall started crags
which traversed the dykes and the moats far as the abyss that
collects and cuts them off.

In this place, shaken off from the back of Geryon, we found
ourselves; and the Poet held to the left, and I moved on behind.
On the right hand I saw new sorrow, new torments, and new
scourgers, with which the first pit [1] was replete. At its
bottom were the sinners naked. This side the middle they came
facing us; on the farther side with us, but with swifter pace. As
the Romans, because of the great host in the year of Jubilee,[2] 
have taken means upon the bridge for the passage of the people,
who on one side all have their front toward the Castle,[3] and go
to Saint Peter's, and on the other toward the Mount.[4] 

[1] Bolgia, literally, budget, purse, sack, here used for
circular valley, or pit.

[2] The year 1299-1300, from Christmas to Easter.

[3] Of Sant' Angelo.

[4] The Capitoline.


Along the gloomy rock, on this side and on that, I saw horned
demons with great scourges, who were beating them cruelly from
behind. Ah! how they made them lift their heels at the first
blows; truly not one waited for the second, or the third.

While I was going on, my eyes encountered one, and I said
straightway, "Ere now for sight of him I have not fasted;"
wherefore to shape him out I stayed my feet, and the sweet Leader
stopped with ire, and assented to my going somewhat back. And
that scourged one thought to conceal himself by lowering his
face, but little it availed him, for I said: "O thou that castest
thine eye upon the ground, if the features that thou bearest are
not false, thou art Venedico Caccianimico; but what brings thee
unto such pungent sauces?"

And he to me, "Unwillingly I tell it, but thy clear speech
compels me, which makes me recollect. the olden world. I was he
who brought the beautiful Ghisola[1] to do the will of the
Marquis, how ever the shameful tale may be reported. And not the
only Bolognese do I weep here, nay, this place is so full of
them, that so many tongues are not now taught between Savena and
the Reno to say sipa; [2] and if of this thou wishest pledge or
testimony, bring to mind our avaricious heart." As he spoke thus
a demon struck him with his scourge and said, "Begone, pandar,
here are no women for coining."

[1] His own sister; the unseemly tale is known only through Dante
and his fourteenth-century commentators, and the latter, while
agreeing that the Marquis was one of the Esti of Ferrara, do not
agree as to which of them he was.

[2] Bologna lies between the Savena and the Reno; sipa is the
Bolognese form of sia, or si.


I rejoined my Escort; then with few steps we came to where a crag
jutted from the bank.[1] Easily enough we ascended it, and
turning to the right[2] upon its ridge, from those eternal
circles we departed.

[1] Forming a bridge, thrown like an arch across the pit.

[2] The course of the Poets, which has mostly been to the left
through the upper Circles, is now generally to proceed straight
across the lower Circles where Fraud is punished. They had been
going to the left at the foot of the precipice, and consequently
turn to the right to ascend the bridge. The allegorical intention
in the direction of their course is evident.


When we were there where it opens below to give passage to the
scourged, the Leader said, "Stop, and let the sight strike on
thee of these other miscreants, of whom thou hast not yet seen
the face, because they have gone along in the same direction with
us."

From the ancient bridge we looked at the train that was coining
toward us from the other side, and which the whip in like manner
drives on. The good Master, without my asking, said to me, "Look
at that great one who is coming, and seems not to shed a tear for
pain. What royal aspect he still retains! He is Jason, who by
courage and by wit despoiled the Colchians of their ram. He
passed by the isle of Lemnos, after the undaunted women pitiless
had given all their males to death. There with tokens and with
ornate words he deceived Hypsipyle, the maiden, who first had
deceived all the rest. There he left her pregnant, and alone;
such sin condemns him to such torment; and also for Medea is
vengeance done. With him goes whoso in such wise deceives. And
let this suffice to know of the first valley, and of those that
it holds in its fangs."

Now we were where the narrow path sets across the second dyke,
and makes of it shoulders for another arch. Here we heard people
moaning in the next pit, and snorting with their muzzles, and
with their palms beating themselves. The banks were encrusted
with a mould because of the breath from below that sticks on
them, and was making quarrel with the eyes and with the nose. The
bottom is so hollowed out that no place sufficeth us for seeing
it, without mounting on the crest of the arch where the crag
rises highest. Hither we came, and thence, down in the ditch, I
saw people plunged in an excrement that seemed as if it proceeded
from human privies.

And while I am searching down there with my eye, I saw one with
his head so foul with ordure that it was not apparent whether he
were layman or clerk. He shouted to me, "Why art so greedy to
look more at me than at the other filthy ones?" And I to him,
"Because, if I remember rightly, ere now I have seen thee with
dry hair, and thou art Alessio Interminei of Lucca[1]; therefore
I eye thee more than all the rest." And he then, beating his
pate, "Down here those flatteries wherewith my tongue was never
cloyed have submerged me."

[1] Of him nothing is known but what these words tell.


Hereupon my Leader, "Mind thou push thy sight a little farther
forward so that with thine eyes thou mayest quite reach the face
of that dirty and disheveled creature, who is scratching herself
there with her nasty nails, and now is crouching down and now
standing on foot. She is Thais the prostitute, who answered her
paramour when he said, 'Have I great thanks from thee?'--'Nay,
marvelous.'" [1] And herewith let our sight be satisfied.

[1] These words are derived from Terence, Eunuchus, act iii. sc.
1.



CANTO XIX. Eighth Circle third pit: simonists.--Pope Nicholas
III.

Oh Simon Magus! Oh ye his wretched followers, who, rapacious, do
prostitute for gold and silver the things of God that ought to be
the brides of righteousness, now it behoves for you the trumpet
sound, since ye are in the third pit!

Already were we come to the next tomb,[1] mounted on that part of
the crag which just above the middle of the ditch hangs plumb. Oh
Supreme Wisdom, how great is the art that Thou displayest in
Heaven, on Earth, and in the Evil World! and how justly doth Thy
Power distribute!

[1] The next bolgia or pit.


I saw along the sides, and over the bottom, the livid stone full
of holes all of one size, and each was circular. They seemed to
me not less wide nor larger than those that in my beautiful Saint
John are made as place for the baptizers [1] one of which, not
many years ago, I broke for sake of one who was stifling in it;
and be this the seal to undeceive all men. Forth from the mouth
of each protruded the feet of a sinner, and his legs up to the
calf, and the rest was within. The soles of all were both on
fire, wherefore their joints quivered so violently that they
would have snapped withes and bands. As the flaming of things
oiled is wont to move only on the outer surface, so was it there
from the heels to the toes.

[1] "My beautiful Saint John" is the Baptistery at Florence. In
Dante's time the infants, born during the year, were all here
baptized by immersion, mostly on the day of St. John Baptist, the
24th of June. There was a large circular font in the middle of
the church, and around it in its marble wall were four
cylindrical standing-places for the priests, closed by doors, to
protect them from the pressure of the crowd.


"Who is he, Master, that writhes, quivering more than the others
his consorts," said I, "and whom a ruddier flame is sucking?" And
he to me, "If thou wilt that I carry thee down there by that bank
which slopes the most,[1] from him thou shalt know of himself and
of his wrongs." And I, "Whatever pleaseth thee even so is good to
me. Thou art Lord, and knowest that I part me not from thy
will, and thou knowest that which is unspoken."

[1] The whole of the Eighth circle slopes toward the centre, so
that the inner wall of each bolgia is lower, and is less sharply
inclined than the outer.


Then we went upon the fourth dyke, turned, and descended on the
left hand, down to the bottom pierced with holes, and narrow. And
the good Master set me not down yet from his haunch, till he
brought me to the cleft of him who was thus lamenting with his
shanks.

"O whoe'er thou art, that keepest upside down, sad soul, planted
like a stake," I began to say, "speak, if thou canst." I was
standing like the friar who confesses the perfidious assassin,[1]
who, after he is fixed, recalls him, in order to delay his death.

[1] Such criminals were not infrequently punished by being set,
head downwards, in a hole in which they were buried alive.


And he[1] cried out, "Art thou already standing there? Art thoh
already standing there, Boniface? By several years the record
lied to me. Art thou so quickly sated with that having, for which
thou didst not fear to seize by guile the beautiful Lady,[2] and
then to do her outrage?"

[1] This is Nicholas III., pope from 1277 to 128O; he takes Dante
to be Boniface VIII., but Boniface was not to die till 13O3.
Compare what Nicholas says of "the record" with Farinata's
statement, in Canto X, concerning the foresight of the damned.

[2] The Church, to which Boniface did outrage in many forms;
but worst by his simoniacal practices.


Such I became as those that, not comprehending that which is
replied to them, stand as if mocked, and know not what to answer.

Then Virgil said, "Tell him quickly, I am not he, I am not he
thou thinkest." And I answered as was enjoined on me; whereat the
spirit quite twisted his feet. Thereafter, sighing and with
tearful voice, he said to me, "Then what dost thou require of me?
If to know who I am concerneth thee so much that thou hast
crossed the bank therefor, know that I was vested with the Great
Mantle; and verily I was a son of the She-Bear,[1] so eager to
advance the cubs, that up there I put wealth, and here myself,
into the purse. Beneath my head are stretched the others that
preceded me in simony, flattened through the fissures of the
rock. There below shall I likewise sink, when he shall come whom
I believed thou wert, then when I put to thee the sudden
question; but already the time is longer that I have cooked my
feet, and that I have been thus upside down, than he will stay
planted with red feet; for after him will come, of uglier deed,
from westward, a shepherd without law,[2] such as must cover him
and me again. A new Jason will he be, of whom it is read in
Maccabees;[3] and as to that one his king was compliant, so unto
this he who rules France shall be."[4] 

[1] Nicholas was of the Orsini family.

[2] Clement V., who will come from Avignon, and in a little more
than ten years after the death of Boniface. Nicholas had already
"cooked his feet" for twenty years. The prophecy of the death of
Clement after a shorter time affords an indication that this
canto was not written until after 1314, the year of his death.

[3] The story of Jason, "that ungodly wretch and no high-priest"
who bought the high-priesthood from King Antiochus, is told in 2
Maccabees iv. Its application to the Pope was plain.

[4] "He who rules France" was Philip the Fair.


I know not if here I was too audacious that I only answered him
in this strain, "Pray now tell me how much treasure our Lord
desired of Saint Peter before he placed the keys in his keeping?
Surely he required nothing save 'Follow me.' Nor did Peter or the
others require of Matthias gold or silver, when he was chosen to
the place which the guilty soul had lost. Therefore stay thou,
for thou art rightly punished, and guard well the ill-gotten
money that against Charles[1] made thee to be bold. And were it
not that reverence for the Supreme Keys that thou heldest in the
glad life still forbiddeth me, I would use words still more
grave; for your avarice saddens the world, trampling down the
good and exalting the bad. Of you shepherds the Evangelist was
aware, when she that sitteth upon the waters was seen by him to
fornicate with kings: that woman that was born with the seven
heads, and from the ten horns had evidence, so long as virtue
pleased her spouse.[2] Ye have made you a god of gold and silver:
and what difference is there between you and the idolater save
that he worships one and ye a hundred? Ah Constantine! of how
much ill was mother, not thy conversion, but that dowry which the
first rich Father received from thee!"[3] 

[1] Charles of Anjou, of whom Nicholas III, was the enemy. He was
charged with having been bribed to support the attempt to expel
the French from Sicily, which began with the Sicilian Vespers in
1282.

[2] Dante deals freely with the figures of the Apocalypse:
Revelation wii. The woman here stands for the Church; her seven
heads may be interpreted as the Seven Sacraments, and her ten
horns as the Commandments; her spouse is the Pope.

[3] The reference is to the so-called Donation of Constantine,
the reality of which was generally accepted till long after
Dante's time.


And, while I was singing these notes to him, whether anger or
conscience stung him, he violently quivered with both feet. I
believe, forsooth, that it had pleased my Leader, with so
contented look be listened ever to the sound of the true words
uttered. Thereupon with both his arms he took me, and when he had
me wholly on his breast, remounted on the way by which he had
descended. Nor did he tire of holding me clasped till he had
borne me up to the summit of the arch which is the passage from
the fourth to the fifth dyke. Here softly he laid down his
burden, softly because of the ragged and steep crag, that would
be a difficult pass for goats. Thence another great valley was
discovered to me.



CANTO XX. Eighth Circle: fourth pit: diviners, soothsayers, and
magicians.--Amphiaraus.--Tiresias.--Aruns.--Manto.--Eurypylus.--
Michael Scott.--Asdente.

Of a new punishment needs must I make verses, and give matetial
to the twentieth canto of the first lay, which is of the
submerged.[1] 

[1] Plunged into the misery of Hell.


I was now wholly set on looking into the disclosed depth that was
bathed with tears of anguish, and I saw folk coming, silent and
weeping, through the circular valley, at the pace at which
lltanies go in this world. As my sight descended deeper among
them, each appeared marvelously distorted from the chin to the
beginning of the chest; for toward their reins their face was
turned, and they must needs go backwards, because they were
deprived of looking forward. Perchance sometimes by force of
palsy one has been thus completely twisted, but I never saw it,
nor do I think it can be.

So may God let thee, Reader, gather fruit from thy reading, now
think for thyself how I could keep my face dry, when near by I
saw our image so contorted that the weeping of the eyes bathed
the buttocks along the cleft. Truly I wept, leaning on one of the
rocks of the hard crag, so that my Guide said to me, "Art thou
also one of the fools? Here pity liveth when it is quite dead.[1]

Who is more wicked than he who feels compassion at the Divine
Judgment? Lift up thy head, lift up, and see him [2] for whom the
earth opened before the eyes of the Thebans, whereon they shouted
all, 'Whither art thou rushing, Amphiaraus? Why dost thou leave
the war?' And he stopped not from falling headlong down far as
Minos, who seizes hold of every one. Look, how he has made a
breast of his shoulders! Because he wished to see too far before
him, he looks behind and makes a backward path.


[1] It is impossible to give the full significance of Dante's
words in a literal translation, owing to the double meaning of
pieta in the original. Qui viva la pieta quando e ben morta.
That is: "Here liveth piety when pity is quite dead."

[2] One of the seven kings who besieged Thebes, augur and
prophet. Dante found his story in Statius, Thebais, viii. 84.


"See Tiresias,[1] who changed his semblance, when from a male he
became a female, his members all of them being transformed; and
afterwards was obliged to strike once more the two entwined
serpents with his rod, ere he could regain his masculine plumage.
Aruns[2] is he that to this one's belly has his back, who on the
mountains of Luni (where grubs the Carrarese who dwells beneath),
amid white marbles, had a cave for his abode, whence for looking
at the stars and the sea his view was not cut off.

[1] The Theban soothsayer. Dante had learned of him from Ovid.,
Metam., iii. 320 sqq., as well as from Statius.

[2] An Etruscan haruspex of whom Lucan tells,--Arens incoluit
desertae moenia Lanae. Phars. i. 556.


"And she who with her loose tresses covers her breasts, which
thou dost not see, and has on that side all her hairy skin, was
Manto,[1] who sought through many lands, then settled there where
I was born; whereof it pleases me that thou listen a little to
me. After her father had departed from life, and the city of
Bacchus had become enslaved, long while she wandered through the
world. Up in fair Italy lies a lake, at foot of the alp that
shuts in Germany above Tyrol, and it is called Benaco.[2] Through
a thousand founts, I think, and more, between Garda and Val
Camonica, the Apennine is bathed by the water which settles in
that lake. Midway is a place where the Trentine Pastor and he of
Brescia and the Veronese might each give his blessing if he took
that road.[3] Peschiera, fortress fair and strong, sits to
confront the Brescians and Bergamasques, where the shore round
about is lowest. Thither needs must fall all that which in the
lap of Benaco cannot stay, and it becomes a river down through
the verdant pastures. Soon as the water gathers head to run, no
longer is it called Benaco, but Mincio, far as Governo, where it
falls into the Po. No long course it hath before it finds a
plain, on which it spreads, and makes a marsh, and is wont in
summer sometimes to be noisome. Passing that way, the cruel
virgin saw a land in the middle of the fen without culture and
bare of inhabitants. There, to avoid all human fellowship, she
stayed with her servants to practice her arts, and lived, and
left there her empty body. Afterward the men who were scattered
round about gathered to that place, which was strong because of
the fen which surrounded it. They built the city over those dead
hones, and for her, who first had chosen the place, they called
it Mantua, without other augury. Of old its people were more
thick within it, before the stupidity of Casalodi had been
tricked by Pinamonte.[4] Therefore I warn thee, that if thou ever
hearest otherwise the origin of my town, no falsehood may defraud
the truth."

[1] The daughter of Tiresias, of whom Statius, Ovid, and Virgil
all tell.

[2] Now Lago di Garda.

[3] Where the three dioceses meet.

[4] The Count of Casalodi, being lord of Mantua about 1276,
gave ear to the treacherous counsels of Messer Pinamonte de
Buonacorsi, and was driven, with his friends, from the city.


And I, "Master, thy discourses are so certain to me, and so lay
hold on my faith, that the others would be to me as dead embers.
But tell me of the people who are passing, if thou seest any one
of them worthy of note; for only unto that my mind reverts."

Then he said to me, "That one, who from his cheek stretches his
beard upon his dusky shoulders, was an augur when Greece was so
emptied of males that they scarce remained for the cradles, and
with Calchas at Aulis he gave the moment for cutting the first
cable. Eurypylus was his name, and thus my lofty Tragedy sings
him in some place;[1] well knowest thou this, who knowest the
whole of it. That other who is so small in the flanks was Michael
Scott,[2] who verily knew the game of magical deceptions. See
Guido Bonatti,[3] see Asdente,[4] who now would wish he had
attended to his leather and his thread, but late repents. See the
forlorn women who left the needle, the spool, and the spindle,
and became fortune-tellers; they wrought spells with herb and
with image.

[1] Suspensi Eurypylum scitantem oracula Phoebi
 Mittimus. Aeneid, ii. 112.

[2] A wizard of such dreaded fame
 That, when in Salamanca's cave
 Him listed his magic wand to wave,
 The bells would ring in Notre Dame.
 Lay of the Lost Minstrel, Canto ii.

[3] A famous astrologer of Forli, in the thirteenth century.

[4] Dante, in the Canvito, trattato iv. c. 16, says that if
NOBLE meant being widely known, then "Asdente, the shoemaker of
Parma, would be more noble than any of his fellow-citizens."


"But come on now, for already Cain with his thorns [1] holds the
confines of both the hemispheres, and touches the wave below
Seville. And already yesternight was the moon round; well
shouldst thou remember it, for it did thee no harm sometimes in
the deep wood." Thus he spoke to me, and we went on the while.

[1] The Man in the Moon, according to an old popular legend.



CANTO XXI. Eighth Circle: fifth pit: barrators.--A magistrate of
Lucca.--The Malebranche.--Parley with them.

So from bridge to bridge we went, speaking other things, which my
Comedy careth not to sing, and held the suffimit, when we stopped
to see the next cleft of Malebolge and the next vain
lamentations; and I saw it wonderfully dark.

As in the Arsenal of the Venetians, in winter, the sticky pitch
for smearing their unsound vessels is boiling, because they
cannot go to sea, and, instead thereof, one builds him a new
bark, and one caulks the sides of that which hath made many a
voyage; one hammers at the prow, and one at the stern; another
makes oars, and another twists the cordage; and one the foresail
and the mainsail patches,--so, not by fire, but by divine art, a
thick pitch was boiling there below, which belimed the bank on
every side. I saw it, but saw not in it aught but the bubbles
which the boiling raised, and all of it swelling up and again
sinking compressed.

While I was gazing down there fixedly, my Leader, saying, "Take
heed! take heed!" drew me to himself from the place where I was
standing. Then I turned as one who is slow to see what it behoves
him to fly, and whom a sudden fear unnerves, and delays not to
depart in order to see. And I saw behind us a black devil come
running up along the crag. Ah! how fell he was in aspect, and how
rough he seemed to me in action, with wings open, and light upon
his feet! His shoulder, which was sharp and high, was laden by a
sinner with both haunches, the sinew of whose fee